UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
(Mark One)
☒ ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended December 31, 2021 or
☐ TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the transition period from________to________
Commission
file numberRegistrant, State of Incorporation or Organization, Address of Principal Executive
Offices and Telephone NumberIRS Employer
Identification No.
1-32853 DUKE ENERGY  CORPORA TION 20-2777218
(a Delaware corporation)
526 South Church Street
Charlotte, North Carolina 28202-1803
704-382-3853
1-4928 DUKE ENERGY  CAROLINAS, LLC 56-0205520
(a North Carolina limited liability company)
526 South Church Street
Charlotte, North Carolina 28202-1803
704-382-3853
1-15929 PROGRESS ENERGY , INC. 56-2155481
(a North Carolina corporation)
410 South Wilmington Street
Raleigh, North Carolina 27601-1748
704-382-3853
1-3382 DUKE ENERGY  PROGRESS, LLC 56-0165465
(a North Carolina limited liability company)
410 South Wilmington Street
Raleigh, North Carolina 27601-1748
704-382-3853
1-3274 DUKE ENERGY  FLORIDA, LLC 59-0247770
(a Florida limited liability company)
299 First Avenue North
St. Petersburg, Florida 33701
704-382-3853
1-1232 DUKE ENERGY  OHIO, INC. 31-0240030
(an Ohio corporation)
139 East Fourth Street
Cincinnati, Ohio 45202
704-382-3853
1-3543 DUKE ENERGY  INDIANA, LLC 35-0594457
(an Indiana limited liability company)
1000 East Main Street
Plainfield, Indiana 46168
704-382-3853
1-6196 PIEDMONT NA TURAL  GAS COMP ANY, INC. 56-0556998
(a North Carolina corporation)
4720 Piedmont Row Drive
Charlotte, North Carolina 28210
704-364-3120
SECURITIES REGISTERED PURSUANT TO SECTION 12(b) OF THE ACT:
Name of each exchange on
Registrant    Title of each class        Trading symbols    which registered
Duke Energy Corporation    Common Stock, $0.001 par value         DUK    New York Stock Exchange LLC
(Duke Energy)
Duke Energy    5.625% Junior Subordinated Debentures due         DUKB    New York Stock Exchange LLC
September 15, 2078
Duke Energy    Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,000th         DUK PR A    New York Stock Exchange LLC
interest in a share of 5.75% Series A Cumulative
Redeemable Perpetual Preferred Stock, par value
$0.001 per share
SECURITIES REGISTERED PURSUANT TO SECTION 12(g) OF THE ACT:  None
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act.
Duke Energy Yes ☒ No ☐ Duke Energy Florida, LLC (Duke Energy Florida) Yes ☒ No ☐
Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC (Duke Energy Carolinas)Yes ☒ No ☐ Duke Energy Ohio, Inc. (Duke Energy Ohio) Yes ☒ No ☐
Progress Energy, Inc. (Progress Energy) Yes ☐ No ☒ Duke Energy Indiana, LLC (Duke Energy Indiana)Yes ☒ No ☐
Duke Energy Progress, LLC (Duke Energy Progress) Yes ☒ No ☐ Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc. (Piedmont) Yes ☒ No ☐
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Exchange Act. Yes ☐ No ☒
(Response applicable to all registrants.)
Indicate by check mark whether the registrants (1) have filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of
1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to
such filing requirements for the past 90 days. Yes ☒ No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrants have submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to Rule
405 of Regulation S-T (§232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to submit
such files). Yes ☒ No ¨
Indicate by check mark whether Duke Energy is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller reporting company, or
an emerging growth company. See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting company,” and "emerging growth
company" in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.:
Large Accelerated Filer ☒ Accelerated Filer ¨ Non-accelerated Filer ☐ Smaller Reporting Company ☐ Emerging Growth Company ☐
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any
new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. ☐
Indicate by check mark whether each of Duke Energy Carolinas, Progress Energy, Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Florida, Duke Energy Ohio,
Duke Energy Indiana and Piedmont is a large accelerated filer, accelerated filer, non-accelerated filer, smaller reporting company, or emerging growth
company. See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting company,” and "emerging growth company" in Rule
12b-2 of the Exchange Act.:
Large Accelerated Filer ¨ Accelerated Filer ¨ Non-accelerated Filer ☒ Smaller Reporting Company ☐ Emerging Growth Company ☐
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any
new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has filed a report on and attestation to its management’s assessment of the effectiveness of its internal
control over financial reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7252(b)) by the registered public accounting firm that
prepared or issued its audit report. ☒
Indicate by check mark whether each of the registrants is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act). Yes ☐ No x
Estimated aggregate market value of the common equity held by nonaffiliates of Duke Energy at June 30, 2021. $ 75,871,309,901 
Number of shares of Common Stock, $0.001 par value, outstanding at January 31, 2022. 769,358,344 
DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE
Portions of the Duke Energy definitive proxy statement for the 2021 Annual Meeting of the Shareholders or an amendment to this Annual Report are
incorporated by reference into PART III, Items 10, 11 and 13 hereof.
This combined Form 10-K is filed separately by eight registrants: Duke Energy, Duke Energy Carolinas, Progress Energy, Duke Energy Progress,
Duke Energy Florida, Duke Energy Ohio, Duke Energy Indiana and Piedmont (collectively the Duke Energy Registrants). Information contained
herein relating to any individual registrant is filed by such registrant solely on its own behalf. Each registrant makes no representation as to
information relating exclusively to the other registrants.
Duke Energy Carolinas, Progress Energy, Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Florida, Duke Energy Ohio, Duke Energy Indiana and Piedmont
meet the conditions set forth in General Instructions I(1)(a) and (b) of Form 10-K and are, therefore, filing this Form 10-K with the reduced disclosure
format specified in General Instructions I(2) of Form 10-K. 
Auditor Firm ID: 34      Auditor Name: Deloitte & Touche LLP Auditor Location: Charlotte, NC
TABLE OF CONTENTS
TABLE OF CONTENTS
FORM 10-K FOR THE YEAR ENDED December 31, 2021
 Item Page
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT REGARDING FORWARD-LOOKING INFORMATION  
GLOSSARY OF TERMS  
PART I.  
1. BUSINESS 9
DUKE ENERGY 9
GENERAL 9
BUSINESS SEGMENTS 9
EMPLOYEES 20
EXECUTIVE OFFICERS 22
ENVIRONMENTAL MATTERS 23
DUKE ENERGY CAROLINAS 23
PROGRESS ENERGY 23
DUKE ENERGY PROGRESS 23
DUKE ENERGY FLORIDA 24
DUKE ENERGY OHIO 24
DUKE ENERGY INDIANA 24
PIEDMONT 24
1A. RISK FACTORS 24
1B. UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS 33
2. PROPERTIES 34
3. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS 38
4. MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES 38
PART II.  
5. MARKET FOR REGISTRANT’S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND ISSUER PURCHASES
OF EQUITY SECURITIES 39
6. SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA 39
7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS 40
7A. QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK 70
8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA 71
9. CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND FINANCIAL DISCLOSURE 230
9A. CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES 230
PART III.  
10. DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE 232
11. EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION 232
12. SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND RELATED STOCKHOLDER
MATTERS 232
13. CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS AND DIRECTOR INDEPENDENCE 232
14. PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTING FEES AND SERVICES 233
PART IV.  
15. EXHIBITS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES 234
 EXHIBIT INDEX E-1
 SIGNATURES E-2
FORWARD LOOKING STATEMENTS
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT REGARDING FORWARD-LOOKING INFORMATION
This document includes forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933 and Section 21E of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934. Forward-looking statements are based on management’s beliefs and assumptions and can often be identified by terms and
phrases that include “anticipate,” “believe,” “intend,” “estimate,” “expect,” “continue,” “should,” “could,” “may,” “plan,” “project,” “predict,” “will,”
“potential,” “forecast,” “target,” “guidance,” “outlook” or other similar terminology. Various factors may cause actual results to be materially different
than the suggested outcomes within forward-looking statements; accordingly, there is no assurance that such results will be realized. These factors
include, but are not limited to:
◦ The impact of the COVID-19 pandemic;
◦ State, federal and foreign legislative and regulatory initiatives, including costs of compliance with existing and future environmental
requirements, including those related to climate change, as well as rulings that affect cost and investment recovery or have an impact on rate
structures or market prices;
◦ The extent and timing of costs and liabilities to comply with federal and state laws, regulations and legal requirements related to coal ash
remediation, including amounts for required closure of certain ash impoundments, are uncertain and difficult to estimate;
◦ The ability to recover eligible costs, including amounts associated with coal ash impoundment retirement obligations, asset retirement and
construction costs related to carbon emissions reductions, and costs related to significant weather events, and to earn an adequate return on
investment through rate case proceedings and the regulatory process;
◦ The costs of decommissioning nuclear facilities could prove to be more extensive than amounts estimated and all costs may not be fully
recoverable through the regulatory process;
◦ Costs and effects of legal and administrative proceedings, settlements, investigations and claims;
◦ Industrial, commercial and residential growth or decline in service territories or customer bases resulting from sustained downturns of the
economy and the economic health of our service territories or variations in customer usage patterns, including energy efficiency efforts, natural
gas building and appliance electrification, and use of alternative energy sources, such as self-generation and distributed generation
technologies;
◦ Federal and state regulations, laws and other efforts designed to promote and expand the use of energy efficiency measures, natural gas
electrification, and distributed generation technologies, such as private solar and battery storage, in Duke Energy service territories could result
in a reduced number of customers, excess generation resources as well as stranded costs;
◦ Advancements in technology;
◦ Additional competition in electric and natural gas markets and continued industry consolidation;
◦ The influence of weather and other natural phenomena on operations, including the economic, operational and other effects of severe storms,
hurricanes, droughts, earthquakes and tornadoes, including extreme weather associated with climate change;
◦ Changing investor, customer and other stakeholder expectations and demands including heightened emphasis on environmental, social and
governance concerns;
◦ The ability to successfully operate electric generating facilities and deliver electricity to customers including direct or indirect effects to the
company resulting from an incident that affects the United States electric grid or generating resources;
◦ Operational interruptions to our natural gas distribution and transmission activities;
◦ The availability of adequate interstate pipeline transportation capacity and natural gas supply;
◦ The impact on facilities and business from a terrorist attack, cybersecurity threats, data security breaches, operational accidents, information
technology failures or other catastrophic events, such as fires, explosions, pandemic health events or other similar occurrences;
◦ The inherent risks associated with the operation of nuclear facilities, including environmental, health, safety, regulatory and financial risks,
including the financial stability of third-party service providers;
◦ The timing and extent of changes in commodity prices and interest rates and the ability to recover such costs through the regulatory process,
where appropriate, and their impact on liquidity positions and the value of underlying assets;
◦ The results of financing efforts, including the ability to obtain financing on favorable terms, which can be affected by various factors, including
credit ratings, interest rate fluctuations, compliance with debt covenants and conditions, an individual utility’s generation mix, and general market
and economic conditions;
◦ Credit ratings of the Duke Energy Registrants may be different from what is expected;
◦ Declines in the market prices of equity and fixed-income securities and resultant cash funding requirements for defined benefit pension plans,
other post-retirement benefit plans and nuclear decommissioning trust funds;
◦ Construction and development risks associated with the completion of the Duke Energy Registrants’ capital investment projects, including risks
related to financing, obtaining and complying with terms of permits, meeting construction budgets and schedules and satisfying operating and
environmental performance standards, as well as the ability to recover costs from customers in a timely manner, or at all;
◦ Changes in rules for regional transmission organizations, including changes in rate designs and new and evolving capacity markets, and risks
related to obligations created by the default of other participants;
FORWARD LOOKING STATEMENTS
◦ The ability to control operation and maintenance costs;
◦ The level of creditworthiness of counterparties to transactions;
◦ The ability to obtain adequate insurance at acceptable costs;
◦ Employee workforce factors, including the potential inability to attract and retain key personnel;
◦ The ability of subsidiaries to pay dividends or distributions to Duke Energy Corporation holding company (the Parent);
◦ The performance of projects undertaken by our nonregulated businesses and the success of efforts to invest in and develop new opportunities;
◦ The effect of accounting pronouncements issued periodically by accounting standard-setting bodies;
◦ The impact of United States tax legislation to our financial condition, results of operations or cash flows and our credit ratings;
◦ The impacts from potential impairments of goodwill or equity method investment carrying values;
◦ Asset or business acquisitions and dispositions, including our ability to successfully consummate the second closing of the minority investment
in Duke Energy Indiana, may not yield the anticipated benefits;
◦ The actions of activist shareholders could disrupt our operations, impact our ability to execute on our business strategy, or cause fluctuations in
the trading price of our common stock; and
◦ The ability to implement our business strategy, including its carbon emission reduction goals.
Additional risks and uncertainties are identified and discussed in the Duke Energy Registrants' reports filed with the SEC and available at the SEC's
website at sec.gov. In light of these risks, uncertainties and assumptions, the events described in the forward-looking statements might not occur or
might occur to a different extent or at a different time than described. Forward-looking statements speak only as of the date they are made and the
Duke Energy Registrants expressly disclaim an obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new
information, future events or otherwise.
GLOSSARY OF TERMS
Glossary of Terms 
The following terms or acronyms used in this Form 10-K are defined below:
Term or Acronym Definition
2017 Settlement
Second Revised and Restated Settlement Agreement in 2017 among Duke Energy Florida, the Florida Office
of Public Counsel and other customer advocates, which replaces and supplants the 2013 Settlement
2021 Settlement Settlement Agreement in 2021 among Duke Energy Florida, the Florida Office of Public Counsel, the Florida
Industrial Power Users Group, White Springs Agricultural Chemicals, Inc. d/b/a PSC Phosphate and NUCOR
Steel Florida, Inc.
ACP Atlantic Coast Pipeline, LLC, a limited liability company owned by Dominion and Duke Energy
ACP pipeline The approximately 600-mile canceled interstate natural gas pipeline
AFS Available for Sale
AFUDC Allowance for funds used during construction
AMI Advanced Metering Infrastructure
AMT Alternative Minimum Tax
AOCI Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)
ARO Asset Retirement Obligation
Audit Committee Audit Committee of the Board of Directors
Belews Creek Belews Creek Steam Station
Bison Bison Insurance Company Limited
Board of Directors Duke Energy Board of Directors
Brunswick Brunswick Nuclear Plant
Cardinal Cardinal Pipeline Company, LLC
Catawba Catawba Nuclear Station
CC Combined Cycle
CCR Coal Combustion Residuals
Cinergy Cinergy Corp. (collectively with its subsidiaries)
Citrus County CC Citrus County Combined Cycle Facility
CO Carbon Dioxide
Coal Ash Act North Carolina Coal Ash Management Act of 2014
the company Duke Energy Corporation and its subsidiaries
Constitution Constitution Pipeline Company, LLC
COVID-19 Coronavirus Disease 2019
CPCN Certificate of Public Convenience and Necessity
CRC Cinergy Receivables Company LLC
Crystal River Unit 3 Crystal River Unit 3 Nuclear Plant
CT Combustion Turbine
DATC Duke-American Transmission Company, LLC
DECON A method of decommissioning in which structures, systems, and components that contain radioactive
contamination are removed from a site and safely disposed at a commercially operated low-level waste
disposal facility, or decontaminated to a level that permits the site to be released for unrestricted use shortly
after it ceases operation
DEFR Duke Energy Florida Receivables, LLC
Deloitte Deloitte & Touche LLP, and the member firms of Deloitte Touche Tohmatsu and their respective affiliates
DEPR Duke Energy Progress Receivables, LLC
DERF Duke Energy Receivables Finance Company, LLC
DOE U.S. Department of Energy
Dominion Dominion Energy, Inc.2
GLOSSARY OF TERMS
Dth Dekatherms
Duke Energy Duke Energy Corporation (collectively with its subsidiaries)
Duke Energy Carolinas Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC
Duke Energy Florida Duke Energy Florida, LLC
Duke Energy Indiana Duke Energy Indiana, LLC
Duke Energy Kentucky Duke Energy Kentucky, Inc.
Duke Energy Ohio Duke Energy Ohio, Inc.
Duke Energy Progress Duke Energy Progress, LLC
Duke Energy Registrants Duke Energy, Duke Energy Carolinas, Progress Energy, Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Florida, Duke
Energy Ohio, Duke Energy Indiana and Piedmont
East Bend East Bend Generating Station
EDIT Excess deferred income tax
EE Energy efficiency
EPA U.S. Environmental Protection Agency
EPC Engineering, Procurement and Construction agreement
EPS Earnings Per Share
ETR Effective tax rate
Exchange Act Securities Exchange Act of 1934
FASB Financial Accounting Standards Board
FERC Federal Energy Regulatory Commission
Form S-3 Registration statement
FPSC Florida Public Service Commission
FTR Financial transmission rights
FV-NI Fair value through net income
GAAP Generally Accepted Accounting Principles in the United States
GAAP Reported Earnings Net Income Available to Duke Energy Corporation common stockholders
GAAP Reported EPS Basic EPS Available to Duke Energy Corporation common stockholders
GHG Greenhouse Gas
GIC GIC Private Limited, Singapore's sovereign wealth fund and an experienced investor in U.S. infrastructure
GWh Gigawatt-hour
Hardy Storage Hardy Storage Company, LLC
Harris Shearon Harris Nuclear Plant
HLBV Hypothetical Liquidation at Book Value
IMPA Indiana Municipal Power Agency
IMR Integrity Management Rider
IRP Integrated Resource Plans
IRS Internal Revenue Service
ISO Independent System Operator
ITC Investment Tax Credit
IURC Indiana Utility Regulatory Commission
Investment Trusts Grantor trusts of Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Florida and Duke Energy Indiana
KO Transmission KO Transmission Company
KPSC Kentucky Public Service Commission
LIBOR London Interbank Offered Rate
LLC Limited Liability Company
GLOSSARY OF TERMS
McGuire McGuire Nuclear Station
MGP Manufactured gas plant
MISO Midcontinent Independent System Operator, Inc.
MTBE Methyl tertiary butyl ether
MW Megawatt
MWh Megawatt-hour
NCDEQ North Carolina Department of Environmental Quality
NCUC North Carolina Utilities Commission
NDTF Nuclear decommissioning trust funds
New Source Review Clean Air Act program that requires industrial facilities to install modern pollution control equipment when they
are built or when making a change that increases emissions significantly
NMC National Methanol Company
NOL Net operating loss
NPNS Normal purchase/normal sale
NRC U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission
NYSE New York Stock Exchange
Oconee Oconee Nuclear Station
OPEB Other Post-Retirement Benefit Obligations
OTTI Other-than-temporary impairment
OVEC Ohio Valley Electric Corporation
the Parent Duke Energy Corporation holding company
PGA Purchased Gas Adjustments
PHMSA Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety Administration
Piedmont Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc.
Pine Needle Pine Needle LNG Company, LLC
Pioneer Pioneer Transmission, LLC
PJM PJM Interconnection, LLC
PMPA Piedmont Municipal Power Agency
PISCC Post-in-service carrying costs
PPA Purchase Power Agreement
Progress Energy Progress Energy, Inc.
PSCSC Public Service Commission of South Carolina
PTC Production Tax Credits
PUCO Public Utilities Commission of Ohio
PURPA Public Utility Regulatory Policies Act of 1978
QF Qualifying Facility
REC Renewable Energy Certificate
Relative TSR TSR of Duke Energy stock relative to a predefined peer group
Robinson Robinson Nuclear Plant
ROU Right-of-use
RSU Restricted Stock Unit
RTO Regional Transmission Organization
Sabal Trail Sabal Trail Transmission, LLC
SAFSTOR A method of decommissioning in which a nuclear facility is placed and maintained in a condition that allows the
facility to be safely stored and subsequently decontaminated to levels that permit release for unrestricted use
GLOSSARY OF TERMS
SEC Securities and Exchange Commission
S&P Standard & Poor’s Rating Services
State utility commissions NCUC, PSCSC, FPSC, PUCO, IURC, KPSC and TPUC (Collectively)
State electric utility commissions NCUC, PSCSC, FPSC, PUCO, IURC and KPSC (Collectively)
State gas utility commissions NCUC, PSCSC, PUCO, TPUC and KPSC (Collectively)
Subsidiary Registrants Duke Energy Carolinas, Progress Energy, Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Florida, Duke Energy Ohio,
Duke Energy Indiana and Piedmont
Sutton L.V. Sutton Combined Cycle Plant
the Tax Act Tax Cuts and Jobs Act
TPUC Tennessee Public Utility Commission
TSR Total shareholder return
U.S. United States
VIE Variable Interest Entity
WACC Weighted Average Cost of Capital
W.S. Lee CC William States Lee Combined Cycle Facility
WVPA Wabash Valley Power Association, Inc.
BUSINESS
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
DUKE ENERGY
General
Duke Energy was incorporated on May 3, 2005, and is an energy company headquartered in Charlotte, North Carolina, subject to regulation by the
FERC and other regulatory agencies listed below. Duke Energy operates in the U.S. primarily through its direct and indirect subsidiaries. Certain
Duke Energy subsidiaries are also Subsidiary Registrants, including Duke Energy Carolinas, Progress Energy, Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy
Florida, Duke Energy Ohio, Duke Energy Indiana and Piedmont. When discussing Duke Energy’s consolidated financial information, it necessarily
includes the results of its separate Subsidiary Registrants, which along with Duke Energy, are collectively referred to as the Duke Energy Registrants.
The Duke Energy Registrants electronically file reports with the SEC, including Annual Reports on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q,
current reports on Form 8-K, proxy statements and amendments to such reports.
The SEC maintains an internet site that contains reports, proxy and information statements and other information regarding issuers that file
electronically with the SEC at sec.gov. Additionally, information about the Duke Energy Registrants, including reports filed with the SEC, is available
through Duke Energy’s website at duke-energy.com. Such reports are accessible at no charge and are made available as soon as reasonably
practicable after such material is filed with or furnished to the SEC.
Business Segments
Duke Energy's segment structure includes three reportable business segments: Electric Utilities and Infrastructure, Gas Utilities and Infrastructure
and Commercial Renewables. The remainder of Duke Energy’s operations is presented as Other. Duke Energy's chief operating decision-maker
routinely reviews financial information about each of these business segments in deciding how to allocate resources and evaluate the performance of
the business. For additional information on each of these business segments, including financial and geographic information, see Note 2 to the
Consolidated Financial Statements, “Business Segments.” The following sections describe the business and operations of each of Duke Energy’s
business segments, as well as Other.
ELECTRIC UTILITIES AND INFRASTRUCTURE
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure conducts operations primarily through the regulated public utilities of Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy
Progress, Duke Energy Florida, Duke Energy Indiana and Duke Energy Ohio. Electric Utilities and Infrastructure provides retail electric service
through the generation, transmission, distribution and sale of electricity to approximately 8.2 million customers within the Southeast and Midwest
regions of the U.S. The service territory is approximately 91,000 square miles across six states with a total estimated population of 26 million. The
operations include electricity sold wholesale to municipalities, electric cooperative utilities and other load-serving entities.
During 2021, Duke Energy executed an agreement providing for an investment by an affiliate of GIC in Duke Energy Indiana in exchange for a 19.9%
minority interest issued by Duke Energy Holdco, LLC, the holding company for Duke Energy Indiana. The transaction will be completed following two
closings. The first closing occurred on September 8, 2021, and resulted in Duke Energy Indiana Holdco, LLC issuing 11.05% of its membership
interest to the affiliate of GIC. The second closing is expected to occur no later than January 2023. See Note 1 to the Consolidated Financial
Statements, “Summary of Significant Accounting Policies," for additional information. Electric Utilities and Infrastructure is also a joint owner in certain
electric transmission projects. Electric Utilities and Infrastructure has a 50% ownership interest in DATC, a partnership with American Transmission
Company, formed to design, build and operate transmission infrastructure. DATC owns 72% of the transmission service rights to Path 15, an 84-mile
transmission line in central California. Electric Utilities and Infrastructure also has a 50% ownership interest in Pioneer, which builds, owns and
operates electric transmission facilities in North America. The following map shows the service territory for Electric Utilities and Infrastructure as of
December 31, 2021.
9
BUSINESS
The electric operations and investments in projects are subject to the rules and regulations of the FERC, the NRC, the NCUC, the PSCSC, the
FPSC, the IURC, the PUCO and the KPSC.
The following table represents the distribution of GWh billed sales by customer class for the year ended December 31, 2021.
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Energy Energy Energy Energy Energy
Carolinas Progress Florida Ohio Indiana
Residential 33 % 28 % 49 % 38 % 30 %
General service 32 % 22 % 35 % 37 % 25 %
Industrial 24 % 14 % 8 % 23 % 31 %
Total retail sales 89 % 64 % 92 % 98 % 86 %
Wholesale and other sales 11 % 36 % 8 % 2 % 14 %
Total sales 100 % 100 % 100 % 100 % 100 %
The number of residential and general service customers within the Electric Utilities and Infrastructure service territory is expected to increase over
time. Sales growth is expected within the service territory but continues to be impacted by adoption of energy efficiencies and self-generation.
Residential sales increased in 2021 compared to 2020 due to customer growth and the introduction of a hybrid work environment in response to
multiple waves of COVID-19 during 2021. Meanwhile, sales for general service and industrial customers recovered in 2021 from temporary closings
and ramp backs experienced in 2020 due to the COVID-19 pandemic. Over the longer time frame, it is still expected that the continued adoption of
more efficient housing and appliances will have a negative impact on average usage per residential customer over time.
Seasonality and the Impact of Weather
Revenues and costs are influenced by seasonal weather patterns. Peak sales of electricity occur during the summer and winter months, which
results in higher revenue and cash flows during these periods. By contrast, lower sales of electricity occur during the spring and fall, allowing for
scheduled plant maintenance. Residential and general service customers are more impacted by weather than industrial customers. Estimated
weather impacts are based on actual current period weather compared to normal weather conditions. Normal weather conditions are defined as the
long-term average of actual historical weather conditions.
The estimated impact of weather on earnings is based on the temperature variances from a normal condition and customers’ historic usage patterns.
The methodology used to estimate the impact of weather does not consider all variables that may impact customer response to weather conditions
such as humidity in the summer or wind chill in the winter. The precision of this estimate may also be impacted by applying long-term weather trends
to shorter-term periods.
10
BUSINESS
Heating degree days measure the variation in weather based on the extent the average daily temperature falls below a base temperature. Cooling
degree days measure the variation in weather based on the extent the average daily temperature rises above the base temperature. Each degree of
temperature below the base temperature counts as one heating degree day and each degree of temperature above the base temperature counts as
one cooling degree day.
Competition
Retail
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure’s businesses operate as the sole supplier of electricity within their service territories, with the exception of Ohio,
which has a competitive electricity supply market for generation service. Electric Utilities and Infrastructure owns and operates facilities necessary to
generate, transmit, distribute and sell electricity. Services are priced by state commission-approved rates designed to include the costs of providing
these services and a reasonable return on invested capital. This regulatory policy is intended to provide safe and reliable electricity at fair prices.
In Ohio, Electric Utilities and Infrastructure conducts competitive auctions for electricity supply. The cost of energy purchased through these auctions
is recovered from retail customers. Electric Utilities and Infrastructure earns retail margin in Ohio on the transmission and distribution of electricity, but
not on the cost of the underlying energy.
Competition in the regulated electric distribution business is primarily from the development and deployment of alternative energy sources including
on-site generation from industrial customers and distributed generation, such as private solar, at residential, general service and/or industrial
customer sites.
Wholesale
Duke Energy competes with other utilities and merchant generators for bulk power sales, sales to municipalities and cooperatives and wholesale
transactions under primarily cost-based contracts approved by FERC. The principal factors in competing for these sales are availability of capacity
and power, reliability of service and price. Prices are influenced primarily by market conditions and fuel costs.
Increased competition in the wholesale electric utility industry and the availability of transmission access could affect Electric Utilities and
Infrastructure’s load forecasts, plans for power supply and wholesale energy sales and related revenues. Wholesale energy sales will be impacted by
the extent to which additional generation is available to sell to the wholesale market and the ability of Electric Utilities and Infrastructure to attract new
customers and to retain existing customers.
Energy Capacity and Resources
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure owns approximately 50,259 MW of generation capacity. For additional information on owned generation facilities,
see Item 2, “Properties.”
Energy and capacity are also supplied through contracts with other generators and purchased on the open market. Factors that could cause Electric
Utilities and Infrastructure to purchase power for its customers may include, but are not limited to, generating plant outages, extreme weather
conditions, generation reliability, demand growth and price. Electric Utilities and Infrastructure has interconnections and arrangements with its
neighboring utilities to facilitate planning, emergency assistance, sale and purchase of capacity and energy and reliability of power supply.
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure’s generation portfolio is a balanced mix of energy resources having different operating characteristics and fuel
sources designed to provide energy at the lowest possible cost to meet its obligation to serve retail customers. All options, including owned
generation resources and purchased power opportunities, are continually evaluated on a real-time basis to select and dispatch the lowest-cost
resources available to meet system load requirements.
Sources of Electricity
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure relies principally on natural gas, nuclear fuel and coal for its generation of electricity. The following table lists
sources of electricity and fuel costs for the three years ended December 31, 2021.
Cost of Delivered Fuel per Net
Generation by Source Kilowatt-hour Generated (Cents)
2021 2020 2019 2021 2020 2019
Natural gas and fuel oil 31.8 % 31.3 % 29.2 % 3.89 2.55 2.96 
Nuclear 29.8 % 29.6 % 28.6 % 0.58 0.58 0.60 
Coal 18.2 % 18.1 % 21.6 % 2.84 2.99 3.08 
All fuels (cost based on weighted average) 79.8 % 79.0 % 79.4 % 2.42 1.91 2.14 
Hydroelectric and solar 1.5 % 1.9 % 1.2 %
Total generation 81.3 % 80.9 % 80.6 %
Purchased power and net interchange 18.7 % 19.1 % 19.4 %
Total sources of energy 100.0 % 100.0 % 100.0 %
(a)    Statistics related to all fuels reflect Electric Utilities and Infrastructure's public utility ownership interest in jointly owned generation facilities.
(b)    Generating figures are net of output required to replenish pumped storage facilities during off-peak periods. (a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(b)
11
BUSINESS
Natural Gas and Fuel Oil
Natural gas and fuel oil supply, transportation and storage for Electric Utilities and Infrastructure’s generation fleet is purchased under standard
industry agreements from various suppliers, including Piedmont. Natural gas supply agreements typically provide for a percentage of forecasted
burns being procured over time, with varied expiration dates. Electric Utilities and Infrastructure believes it has access to an adequate supply of
natural gas and fuel oil for the reasonably foreseeable future.
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure has certain dual-fuel generating facilities that can operate utilizing both natural gas and fuel oil. The cost of Electric
Utilities and Infrastructure’s natural gas and fuel oil is fixed price or determined by published market prices as reported in certain industry
publications, plus any transportation and freight costs. Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Florida and Duke Energy
Indiana use derivative instruments to manage a portion of their exposure to price fluctuations for natural gas. For Duke Energy Florida, there is
currently an agreed-upon moratorium with the FPSC on future hedging of natural gas prices.
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure has firm interstate and intrastate natural gas transportation agreements and storage agreements in place to
support generation needed for load requirements. Electric Utilities and Infrastructure may purchase additional shorter-term natural gas transportation
and utilize natural gas interruptible transportation agreements to support generation needed for load requirements. The Electric Utilities and
Infrastructure natural gas plants are served by various supply zones and multiple pipelines.
Nuclear
The industrial processes for producing nuclear generating fuel generally involve the mining and milling of uranium ore to produce uranium
concentrates and services to convert, enrich and fabricate fuel assemblies.
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure has contracted for uranium materials and services to fuel its nuclear reactors. Uranium concentrates, conversion
services and enrichment services are primarily met through a diversified portfolio of long-term supply contracts. The contracts are diversified by
supplier, country of origin and pricing. Electric Utilities and Infrastructure staggers its contracting so that its portfolio of long-term contracts covers the
majority of its fuel requirements in the near term and decreasing portions of its fuel requirements over time thereafter. Near-term requirements not
met by long-term supply contracts have been and are expected to be fulfilled with spot market purchases. Due to the technical complexities of
changing suppliers of fuel fabrication services, Electric Utilities and Infrastructure generally source these services to a single domestic supplier on a
plant-by-plant basis using multiyear contracts.
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure has entered into fuel contracts that cover 100% of its uranium concentrates and conversion services through at
least 2022, 100% of its enrichment services through at least 2023, and 100% of its fabrication services requirements for these plants through at least
2027. For future requirements not already covered under long-term contracts, Electric Utilities and Infrastructure believes it will be able to renew
contracts as they expire or enter into similar contractual arrangements with other suppliers of nuclear fuel materials and services.
Coal
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure meets its coal demand through a portfolio of long-term purchase contracts and short-term spot market purchase
agreements. Large amounts of coal are purchased under long-term contracts with mining operators who mine both underground and at the surface.
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure uses spot market purchases to meet coal requirements not met by long-term contracts. Expiration dates for its
long-term contracts, which may have various price adjustment provisions and market reopeners, range from 2022 to 2026 for Duke Energy Carolinas
and Duke Energy Progress and 2022 to 2025 for Duke Energy Florida, Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana. Electric Utilities and
Infrastructure expects to renew these contracts or enter into similar contracts with other suppliers as existing contracts expire, though prices will
fluctuate over time as coal markets change. Electric Utilities and Infrastructure has an adequate supply of coal under contract to meet its risk
management guidelines regarding projected future consumption. As a result of volatility in natural gas prices and the associated impacts on coal-fired
dispatch within the generation fleet, coal inventories will continue to fluctuate. Electric Utilities and Infrastructure continues to actively manage its
portfolio and has worked with suppliers to obtain increased flexibility in its coal contracts.
Coal purchased for the Carolinas is primarily produced from mines in Central Appalachia, Northern Appalachia and the Illinois Basin. Coal purchased
for Florida is primarily produced from mines in the Illinois Basin. Coal purchased for Kentucky is produced from mines along the Ohio River in Illinois,
Ohio, West Virginia and Pennsylvania. Coal purchased for Indiana is primarily produced in Indiana and Illinois. There are adequate domestic coal
reserves to serve Electric Utilities and Infrastructure's coal generation needs through end of life. The current average sulfur content of coal purchased
by Electric Utilities and Infrastructure is between 1.5% and 2% for Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress, between 2.5% and 3% for
Duke Energy Florida and Duke Energy Indiana, and between 3% and 3.5% for Duke Energy Ohio. Electric Utilities and Infrastructure's environmental
controls, in combination with the use of sulfur dioxide (SO) emission allowances, enable Electric Utilities and Infrastructure to satisfy current SO
emission limitations for its existing facilities.
Purchased Power
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure purchases a portion of its capacity and system requirements through purchase obligations, leases and purchase
capacity contracts. Electric Utilities and Infrastructure believes it can obtain adequate purchased power capacity to meet future system load needs.
However, during periods of high demand, the price and availability of purchased power may be significantly affected.
The following table summarizes purchased power for the previous three years:
2021 2020 2019
Purchase obligations and leases (in millions of MWh) 36 32.7 34.8 
Purchase capacity under contract (in MW) 4,259 4,716 4,238 
(a)    Represents approximately 14% of total system requirements for 2021, 13% for 2020 and 14% for 2019.
(b)    For 2021, 2020 and 2019, these agreements include approximately 412 MW of firm capacity under contract by Duke Energy Florida with QFs.2 2
(a)
(b)
12
BUSINESS
Inventory
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure must maintain an adequate stock of fuel and materials and supplies in order to ensure continuous operation of
generating facilities and reliable delivery to customers. As of December 31, 2021, the inventory balance for Electric Utilities and Infrastructure was
approximately $3 billion. For additional information on inventory, see Note 1 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Summary of Significant
Accounting Policies.”
Ash Basin Management
During 2015, EPA issued regulations related to the management of CCR from power plants. These regulations classify CCR as nonhazardous waste
under the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act (RCRA) and apply to electric generating sites with new and existing landfills and new and
existing surface impoundments and establish requirements regarding landfill design, structural integrity design and assessment criteria for surface
impoundments, groundwater monitoring, protection and remedial procedures and other operational and reporting procedures for the disposal and
management of CCR. In addition to the federal regulations, CCR landfills and surface impoundments (ash basins or impoundments) will continue to
be regulated by existing state laws, regulations and permits, such as the North Carolina Coal Ash Management Act of 2014 (Coal Ash Act).
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure has and will periodically submit to applicable authorities required site-specific coal ash impoundment remediation
or closure plans. Closure plans must be approved and all associated permits issued before any work can begin. Closure activities have begun in all
of Duke Energy's jurisdictions. Excavation began in 2015 at the four sites specified as high priority by the Coal Ash Act and at the W.S. Lee Steam
Station site in South Carolina in connection with other legal requirements. Excavation at these sites involves movement of CCR materials to
appropriate engineered off-site or on-site lined landfills or for reuse in an approved beneficial application. Duke Energy has completed excavation of
coal ash at three of the four high-priority North Carolina sites. At other sites where CCR management is required, planning and closure methods have
been studied and factored into the estimated retirement and management costs, and closure activities have commenced.
The EPA CCR rule and the Coal Ash Act leave the decision on cost recovery determinations related to closure of coal ash surface impoundments to
the normal ratemaking processes before utility regulatory commissions. Duke Energy's electric utilities have included compliance costs associated
with federal and state requirements in their respective rate proceedings. During 2017, Duke Energy Carolinas' and Duke Energy Progress’ wholesale
contracts were amended to include the recovery of expenditures related to AROs for the closure of coal ash basins. The amended contracts have
retail disallowance parity or provisions limiting challenges to CCR cost recovery actions at FERC. FERC approved the amended wholesale rate
schedules in 2017. For additional information on the ash basins and recovery, see Item 7, "Other Matters" and Notes 3, 4 and 9 to the Consolidated
Financial Statements, "Regulatory Matters," "Commitments and Contingencies" and "Asset Retirement Obligations," respectively.
Nuclear Matters
Duke Energy owns, wholly or partially, 11 operating nuclear reactors located at six operating stations. The Crystal River Unit 3 permanently ceased
operation in February 2013. Nuclear insurance includes: nuclear liability coverage; property damage coverage; nuclear accident decontamination and
premature decommissioning coverage; and accidental outage coverage for losses in the event of a major accidental outage. Joint owners reimburse
Duke Energy for certain expenses associated with nuclear insurance in accordance with joint owner agreements. The Price-Anderson Act requires
plant owners to provide for public nuclear liability claims resulting from nuclear incidents to the maximum total financial protection liability, which is
approximately $13.5 billion. For additional information on nuclear insurance, see Note 4 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Commitments
and Contingencies.”
Duke Energy has a significant future financial commitment to dispose of spent nuclear fuel and decommission and decontaminate each plant safely.
The NCUC, PSCSC and FPSC require Duke Energy to update their cost estimates for decommissioning their nuclear plants every five years.
The following table summarizes the fair value of NDTF investments and the most recent site-specific nuclear decommissioning cost studies.
Decommissioning costs are stated in 2018 or 2019 dollars, depending on the year of the cost study, and include costs to decommission plant
components not subject to radioactive contamination.
NDTF Decommissioning
(in millions) December 31, 2021 December 31, 2020 Costs Year of Cost Study
Duke Energy $ 10,401 $ 9,114 $ 9,105 2018 or 2019
Duke Energy Carolinas 5,759 4,977 4,365 2018
Duke Energy Progress 4,089 3,500 4,181 2019
Duke Energy Florida 553 637 559 N/A
(a)    Amounts for Progress Energy equal the sum of Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida.
(b)    Decommissioning cost for Duke Energy Carolinas reflects its ownership interest in jointly owned reactors. Other joint owners are responsible for
decommissioning costs related to their interest in the reactors.
(c)    Duke Energy Carolinas' site-specific nuclear decommissioning cost study completed in 2018 was filed with the NCUC and PSCSC in 2019. A
new funding study was also completed and filed with the NCUC and PSCSC in 2019.
(d)    Duke Energy Progress' site-specific nuclear decommissioning cost study completed in 2019 was filed with the NCUC and PSCSC in March
2020. Duke Energy Progress also completed a funding study, which was filed with the NCUC and PSCSC in July 2020.
(e)    During 2019, Duke Energy Florida reached an agreement to transfer decommissioning work for Crystal River Unit 3 to a third party and
decommissioning costs are based on the agreement with this third party rather than a cost study. Regulatory approval was received from
the NRC and the FPSC in April 2020 and August 2020, respectively. See Note 3 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Regulatory
Matters,” for more information.(a)
(a)
(b)(c)
(d)
(e)
13
BUSINESS
The NCUC, PSCSC, FPSC and FERC have allowed Electric Utilities and Infrastructure to recover estimated decommissioning costs through retail
and wholesale rates over the expected remaining service periods of their nuclear stations. Electric Utilities and Infrastructure believes the
decommissioning costs being recovered through rates, when coupled with the existing fund balances and expected fund earnings, will be sufficient to
provide for the cost of future decommissioning. For additional information, see Note 9 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Asset Retirement
Obligations.”
The Nuclear Waste Policy Act of 1982 (as amended) provides the framework for development by the federal government of interim storage and
permanent disposal facilities for high-level radioactive waste materials. The government has not yet developed a storage facility or disposal capacity,
so Electric Utilities and Infrastructure will continue to store spent fuel on its reactor sites.
Under federal law, the DOE is responsible for the selection and construction of a facility for the permanent disposal of spent nuclear fuel and high-
level radioactive waste. The DOE terminated the project to license and develop a geologic repository at Yucca Mountain, Nevada in 2010, and is
currently taking no action to fulfill its responsibilities to dispose of spent fuel.
Until the DOE begins to accept the spent nuclear fuel, Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida will continue to safely
manage their spent nuclear fuel. Under current regulatory guidelines, Harris has sufficient storage capacity in its spent fuel pools through the
expiration of its renewed operating license. With certain modifications and approvals by the NRC to expand the on-site dry cask storage facilities,
spent nuclear fuel dry storage facilities will be sufficient to provide storage space of spent fuel through the expiration of the operating licenses,
including any license renewals, for Brunswick, Catawba, McGuire, Oconee and Robinson. Crystal River Unit 3 ceased operation in 2013 and was
placed in a SAFSTOR condition in January 2018. As of January 2018, all spent fuel at Crystal River Unit 3 has been transferred from the spent fuel
pool to dry storage at an on-site independent spent fuel storage installation. During 2020, the NRC and the FPSC approved an agreement to transfer
ownership of spent fuel for Crystal River Unit 3 to a third party. See Note 3 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Regulatory Matters,” for more
information.
The nuclear power industry faces uncertainties with respect to the cost and long-term availability of disposal sites for spent nuclear fuel and other
radioactive waste, compliance with changing regulatory requirements, capital outlays for modifications and new plant construction.
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure is subject to the jurisdiction of the NRC for the design, construction and operation of its nuclear generating
facilities. The following table includes the current year of expiration of nuclear operating licenses for nuclear stations in operation. On June 7, 2021,
Duke Energy Carolinas filed a subsequent license renewal application for the Oconee Nuclear Station (ONS) with the U.S. Nuclear Regulatory
Commission to renew ONS's operating license for an additional 20 years. Duke Energy has announced its intention to seek 20-year operating license
renewals for each of the reactors it operates in Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress. See Note 3 to the Consolidated Financial
Statements, "Regulatory Matters,” for additional information.
Unit Year of Expiration
Duke Energy Carolinas
Catawba Units 1 and 2 2043
McGuire Unit 1 2041
McGuire Unit 2 2043
Oconee Units 1 and 2 2033
Oconee Unit 3 2034
Duke Energy Progress
Brunswick Unit 1 2036
Brunswick Unit 2 2034
Harris 2046
Robinson 2030
The NRC has acknowledged permanent cessation of operation and permanent removal of fuel from the reactor vessel at Crystal River Unit 3.
Therefore, the license no longer authorizes operation of the reactor. For additional information on nuclear decommissioning activity, see Notes 3 and
9 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Regulatory Matters" and "Asset Retirement Obligations," respectively.
Regulation
State
The state electric utility commissions approve rates for Duke Energy's retail electric service within their respective states. The state electric utility
commissions, to varying degrees, have authority over the construction and operation of Electric Utilities and Infrastructure’s generating facilities.
CPCNs issued by the state electric utility commissions, as applicable, authorize Electric Utilities and Infrastructure to construct and operate its electric
facilities and to sell electricity to retail and wholesale customers. Prior approval from the relevant state electric utility commission is required for the
entities within Electric Utilities and Infrastructure to issue securities. The underlying concept of utility ratemaking is to set rates at a level that allows
the utility to collect revenues equal to its cost of providing service plus earn a reasonable rate of return on its invested capital, including equity.
In addition to rates approved in base rate cases, each of the state electric utility commissions allow recovery of certain costs through various cost
recovery clauses to the extent the respective commission determines in periodic hearings that such costs, including any past over or under-recovered
costs, are prudent.
14
BUSINESS
Fuel, fuel-related costs and certain purchased power costs are eligible for recovery by Electric Utilities and Infrastructure. Electric Utilities and
Infrastructure uses coal, hydroelectric, natural gas, oil, renewable generation and nuclear fuel to generate electricity, thereby maintaining a diverse
fuel mix that helps mitigate the impact of cost increases in any one fuel. Due to the associated regulatory treatment and the method allowed for
recovery, changes in fuel costs from year to year have no material impact on operating results of Electric Utilities and Infrastructure, unless a
commission finds a portion of such costs to have been imprudent. However, delays between the expenditure for fuel costs and recovery from
customers can adversely impact the timing of cash flows of Electric Utilities and Infrastructure.
The table below reflects significant electric rate case applications approved and effective in the past three years or applications currently pending
approval.
Regulatory
BodyAnnual
Increase
(Decrease)
(in millions)Return
on
EquityEquity
Component of
Capital StructureEffective
Date
Approved Rate Cases:
Duke Energy Progress 2019 North Carolina Rate Case NCUC$ 178 9.6 % 52 % 6/1/2021
Duke Energy Carolinas 2019 North Carolina Rate Case NCUC 33 9.6 % 52 % 6/1/2021
Duke Energy Indiana 2019 Indiana Rate Case IURC 146 9.7 % 54 % 7/30/2020
Duke Energy Kentucky 2019 Kentucky Electric Rate Case KPSC 24 9.25 % 48.23 % 5/1/2020
Duke Energy Carolinas 2018 South Carolina Rate Case PSCSC 45 9.5 % 53 % 6/1/2019
Duke Energy Progress 2018 South Carolina Rate Case PSCSC 29 9.5 % 53 % 6/1/2019
Duke Energy Ohio 2017 Ohio Electric Rate Case PUCO (19) 9.84 % 50.75 % 1/2/2019
Pending Rate Cases:
Duke Energy Ohio 2021 Ohio Electric Rate Case PUCO$ 55 10.3 % 50.5 % 7/1/2022
(a)    Step 1 rates are approximately 75% of the total and became effective July 30, 2020. Step 2 rates are approximately 25% of the total rate case
increase. They were approved on July 28, 2021, and implemented in August 2021.
Additionally, in January 2021, Duke Energy Florida filed a settlement agreement with the FPSC that will allow annual increases to its base rates, an
agreed upon return on equity (“ROE”) and includes a base rate stay-out provision through 2024, among other provisions. The FPSC approved the
2021 Settlement on May 4, 2021, issuing an order on June 4, 2021. Revised customer rates became effective January 1, 2022, with subsequent
base rate increases effective January 1, 2023, and January 1, 2024. For more information on rate matters and other regulatory proceedings, see
Note 3 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Regulatory Matters.”
Federal
The FERC approves Electric Utilities and Infrastructure’s cost-based rates for electric sales to certain power and transmission wholesale customers.
Regulations of FERC and the state electric utility commissions govern access to regulated electric and other data by nonregulated entities and
services provided between regulated and nonregulated energy affiliates. These regulations affect the activities of nonregulated affiliates with Electric
Utilities and Infrastructure.
RTOs
PJM and MISO are the ISOs and FERC-approved RTOs for the regions in which Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana operate. PJM and
MISO operate energy, capacity and other markets, and control the day-to-day operations of bulk power systems through central dispatch.
Duke Energy Ohio is a member of PJM and Duke Energy Indiana is a member of MISO. Transmission owners in these RTOs have turned over
control of their transmission facilities and their transmission systems are currently under the dispatch control of the RTOs. Transmission service is
provided on a regionwide, open-access basis using the transmission facilities of the RTO members at rates based on the costs of transmission
service.
Environmental
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure is subject to the jurisdiction of the EPA and state and local environmental agencies. For a discussion of
environmental regulation, see “Environmental Matters” in this section. See the “Other Matters” section of Item 7 Management's Discussion and
Analysis for a discussion about potential Global Climate Change legislation and other EPA regulations under development and the potential impacts
such legislation and regulation could have on Duke Energy’s operations.
GAS UTILITIES AND INFRASTRUCTURE
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure conducts natural gas operations primarily through the regulated public utilities of Piedmont, Duke Energy Ohio and
Duke Energy Kentucky. The natural gas operations are subject to the rules and regulations of the NCUC, PSCSC, PUCO, KPSC, TPUC, PHMSA and
the FERC. Gas Utilities and Infrastructure serves residential, commercial, industrial and power generation natural gas customers, including
customers served by municipalities who are wholesale customers. Gas Utilities and Infrastructure has over 1.6 million total customers, including 1.1
million customers located in North Carolina, South Carolina and Tennessee, and an additional 550,000 customers located within southwestern Ohio
and northern Kentucky. In the Carolinas, Ohio and Kentucky, the service areas are comprised of numerous cities, towns and communities. In
Tennessee, the service area is the metropolitan area of Nashville. The following map shows the service territory and investments in operating
pipelines for Gas Utilities and Infrastructure as of December 31, 2021.(a)
15
BUSINESS
The number of residential, commercial and industrial customers within the Gas Utilities and Infrastructure service territory is expected to increase
over time. Average usage per residential customer is expected to remain flat or decline for the foreseeable future; however, decoupled rates in North
Carolina and various rate design mechanisms in other jurisdictions partially mitigate the impact of the declining usage per customer on overall
profitability.
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure also owns, operates and has investments in various pipeline transmission and natural gas storage facilities.
Natural Gas for Retail Distribution
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure is responsible for the distribution of natural gas to retail customers in its North Carolina, South Carolina, Tennessee,
Ohio and Kentucky service territories. Gas Utilities and Infrastructure’s natural gas procurement strategy is to contract primarily with major and
independent producers and marketers for natural gas supply. It also purchases a diverse portfolio of transportation and storage service from
interstate pipelines. This strategy allows Gas Utilities and Infrastructure to assure reliable natural gas supply and transportation for its firm customers
during peak winter conditions. When firm pipeline services or contracted natural gas supplies are temporarily not needed due to market demand
fluctuations, Gas Utilities and Infrastructure may release these services and supplies in the secondary market under FERC-approved capacity
release provisions or make wholesale secondary market sales. In 2021, firm supply purchase commitment agreements provided 100% of the natural
gas supply for both Piedmont and Duke Energy Ohio.
16
BUSINESS
Impact of Weather
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure revenues are generally protected from the impact of weather fluctuations due to the regulatory mechanisms that are
available in most service territories. In North Carolina, margin decoupling provides protection from both weather and other usage variations like
conservation for residential and small and medium general service customers. Margin decoupling provides a set margin per customer independent of
actual usage. In South Carolina, Tennessee and Kentucky, weather normalization adjusts revenues either up or down depending on how much
warmer or colder than normal a given month has been. Weather normalization adjustments occur from November through March in South Carolina,
from October through April in Tennessee and from November through April in Kentucky. Duke Energy Ohio collects most of its non-fuel revenue
through a fixed monthly charge that is not impacted by usage fluctuations that result from weather changes or conservation.
Competition
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure’s businesses operate as the sole provider of natural gas service within their retail service territories. Gas Utilities and
Infrastructure owns and operates facilities necessary to transport and distribute natural gas. Gas Utilities and Infrastructure earns retail margin on the
transmission and distribution of natural gas and not on the cost of the underlying commodity. Services are priced by state commission-approved rates
designed to include the costs of providing these services and a reasonable return on invested capital. This regulatory policy is intended to provide
safe and reliable natural gas service at fair prices.
In residential, commercial and industrial customer markets, natural gas distribution operations compete with other companies that supply energy,
primarily electric companies, propane and fuel oil dealers, renewable energy providers and coal companies in relation to sources of energy for
electric power plants, as well as nuclear energy. A significant competitive factor is price. Gas Utilities and Infrastructure's primary product competition
is with electricity for heating, water heating and cooking. Increases in the price of natural gas or decreases in the price of other energy sources could
negatively impact competitive position by decreasing the price benefits of natural gas to the consumer. In the case of industrial customers, such as
manufacturing plants, adverse economic or market conditions, including higher natural gas costs, could cause these customers to suspend business
operations or to use alternative sources of energy in favor of energy sources with lower per-unit costs.
Higher natural gas costs or decreases in the price of other energy sources may allow competition from alternative energy sources for applications
that have traditionally used natural gas, encouraging some customers to move away from natural gas-fired equipment to equipment fueled by other
energy sources. Competition between natural gas and other forms of energy is also based on efficiency, performance, reliability, safety and other
non-price factors. Technological improvements in other energy sources and events that impair the public perception of the non-price attributes of
natural gas could erode our competitive advantage. These factors in turn could decrease the demand for natural gas, impair our ability to attract new
customers and cause existing customers to switch to other forms of energy or to bypass our systems in favor of alternative competitive sources. This
could result in slow or no customer growth and could cause customers to reduce or cease using our product, thereby reducing our ability to make
capital expenditures and otherwise grow our business, adversely affecting our earnings.
Pipeline and Storage Investments
Duke Energy, through its Gas Utilities and Infrastructure segment, has a 7.5% equity ownership interest in Sabal Trail. Sabal Trail is a joint venture
that owns the Sabal Trail Natural Gas Pipeline (Sabal Trail pipeline) to transport natural gas to Florida, regulated by FERC. The Sabal Trail Phase I
mainline was placed into service in July 2017 and traverses Alabama, Georgia and Florida. The remaining lateral line to the Duke Energy Florida's
Citrus County CC was placed into service in March 2018. Phase II of Sabal Trail went into service in May 2020, adding approximately 200,000 Dth of
capacity to the Sabal Trail pipeline.
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure has a 47% equity ownership interest in ACP, which planned to build the ACP pipeline, an approximately 600-mile
interstate natural gas pipeline. The ACP pipeline was intended to transport diverse natural gas supplies into southeastern markets and would be
regulated by FERC. Dominion Energy owns 53% of ACP and was contracted to construct and operate the ACP pipeline upon completion. On July 5,
2020, Dominion announced a sale of substantially all of its gas transmission and storage segment assets, which were critical to the ACP pipeline.
Further, permitting delays and legal challenges had materially affected the timing and cost of the pipeline. As a result, Duke Energy determined that
they would no longer invest in the construction of the ACP pipeline.
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure has a 24% equity ownership interest in Constitution, an interstate pipeline development company formed to develop,
construct, own and operate a 124-mile natural gas pipeline and related facilities, regulated by FERC. Constitution was slated to transport natural gas
supplies from the Marcellus supply region in northern Pennsylvania to major northeastern markets. As of February 5, 2020, the Constitution partners
formally resolved to initiate the dissolution of Constitution, and to terminate the Constitution Pipeline project.
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure has a 21.49% equity ownership interest in Cardinal, an intrastate pipeline located in North Carolina regulated by the
NCUC, a 45% equity ownership in Pine Needle, an interstate liquefied natural gas storage facility located in North Carolina and a 50% equity
ownership interest in Hardy Storage, an underground interstate natural gas storage facility located in Hardy and Hampshire counties in West Virginia.
Pine Needle and Hardy Storage are regulated by FERC.
KO Transmission Company (KO Transmission), a wholly owned subsidiary of Duke Energy Ohio, is an interstate pipeline company engaged in the
business of transporting natural gas and is subject to the rules and regulations of FERC. KO Transmission's 90-mile pipeline supplies natural gas to
Duke Energy Ohio and interconnects with the Columbia Gulf Transmission pipeline and Tennessee Gas Pipeline. An approximately 70-mile portion of
KO Transmission's pipeline facilities is co-owned by Columbia Gas Transmission Corporation.
See Notes 3, 12 and 17 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Regulatory Matters," "Investments in Unconsolidated Affiliates" and "Variable
Interest Entities," respectively, for further information on Duke Energy's pipeline investments.
Inventory
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure must maintain adequate natural gas inventory in order to provide reliable delivery to customers. As of December 31,
2021, the inventory balance for Gas Utilities and Infrastructure was $125 million. For more information on inventory, see Note 1 to the Consolidated
Financial Statements, "Summary of Significant Accounting Policies."
17
BUSINESS
Regulation
State
The state gas utility commissions approve rates for Duke Energy's retail natural gas service within their respective states. The state gas utility
commissions, to varying degrees, have authority over the construction and operation of Gas Utilities and Infrastructure’s natural gas distribution
facilities. CPCNs issued by the state gas utility commissions or other government agencies, as applicable, authorize Gas Utilities and Infrastructure to
construct and operate its natural gas distribution facilities and to sell natural gas to retail and wholesale customers. Prior approval from the relevant
state gas utility commission is required for Gas Utilities and Infrastructure to issue securities. The underlying concept of utility ratemaking is to set
rates at a level that allows the utility to collect revenues equal to its cost of providing service plus a reasonable rate of return on its invested capital,
including equity.
In addition to amounts collected from customers through approved base rates, each of the state gas utility commissions allow recovery of certain
costs through various cost recovery clauses to the extent the respective commission determines in periodic hearings that such costs, including any
past over- or under-recovered costs, are prudent.
Natural gas costs are eligible for recovery by Gas Utilities and Infrastructure. Due to the associated regulatory treatment and the method allowed for
recovery, changes in natural gas costs from year to year have no material impact on operating results of Gas Utilities and Infrastructure, unless a
commission finds a portion of such costs to have been imprudent. However, delays between the expenditure for natural gas and recovery from
customers can adversely impact the timing of cash flows of Gas Utilities and Infrastructure.
The following table summarizes certain components underlying recently approved and effective base rates or rate stabilization filings in the last three
years.
Annual
Increase
(Decrease)
(in millions)Return
on
EquityEquity
Component of
Capital Structure Effective Date
Approved Rate Cases:
Duke Energy Kentucky 2018 Natural Gas Base Rate Case $ 7 9.7 % 50.8 % April 2019
Piedmont 2019 North Carolina Natural Gas Base Rate Case 109 9.7 % 52.0 % November 2019
Piedmont 2019 South Carolina Rate Stabilization Adjustment Filing 6 9.9 % 55.4 % November 2019
Piedmont 2020 South Carolina Rate Stabilization Adjustment Filing 7 9.8 % 52.3 % November 2020
Piedmont 2020 Tennessee Natural Gas Base Rate Case 16 9.8 % 50.5 % January 2021
Piedmont 2021 North Carolina Natural Gas Base Rate Case 67 9.6 % 51.6 % November 2021
Piedmont 2021 South Carolina Rate Stabilization Adjustment Filing 7 9.8 % 52.2 % November 2021
Duke Energy Kentucky 2021 Natural Gas Base Rate Case 9 9.38 % 51.3 % January 2022
(a)    An ROE of 9.375% for natural gas base rates and 9.3% for natural gas riders was approved.
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure has IMR mechanisms in North Carolina and Tennessee designed to separately track and recover certain costs
associated with capital investments incurred to comply with federal pipeline safety and integrity programs. The following table summarizes
information related to the recently approved IMR filing.
Cumulative Annual Effective
(in millions) Investment Revenues Date
Piedmont 2021 IMR Filing – North Carolina $ 61 $ 4 December 2021
In Piedmont's Tennessee rate case settled in February 2021, the company included projected IMR investment through December 31, 2021, in its rate
base. The recovery of integrity investment was requested in the rate case and not through the Tennessee IMR mechanism.
For more information on rate matters and other regulatory proceedings, see Note 3 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Regulatory Matters.”
Federal
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure is subject to various federal regulations, including regulations that are particular to the natural gas industry. These
federal regulations include but are not limited to the following:
• Regulations of the FERC affect the certification and siting of new interstate natural gas pipeline projects, the purchase and sale of, the prices
paid for, and the terms and conditions of service for the interstate transportation and storage of natural gas.
• Regulations of the PHMSA affect the design, construction, operation, maintenance, integrity, safety and security of natural gas distribution and
transmission systems.
• Regulations of the EPA relate to the environment including proposed air emissions regulations that would expand to include emissions of
methane.
Regulations of the FERC and the state gas utility commissions govern access to regulated natural gas and other data by nonregulated entities and
services provided between regulated and nonregulated energy affiliates. These regulations affect the activities of nonregulated affiliates with Gas
Utilities and Infrastructure.(a)
18
BUSINESS
Environmental
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure is subject to the jurisdiction of the EPA and state and local environmental agencies. For a discussion of environmental
regulation, see “Environmental Matters” in this section. See “Other Matters” section of Item 7 Management's Discussion and Analysis for a discussion
about potential Global Climate Change legislation and other EPA regulations under development and the potential impacts such legislation and
regulation could have on Duke Energy’s operations.
COMMERCIAL RENEWABLES
Commercial Renewables primarily acquires, develops, builds, operates and owns wind and solar renewable generation throughout the continental
U.S. Commercial Renewables also enters into strategic transactions including minority ownership and tax equity structures in wind and solar
generation. The portfolio includes nonregulated renewable energy and energy storage businesses.
Commercial Renewables' renewable energy includes utility-scale wind and solar generation assets, distributed solar generation assets, distributed
fuel cell assets and battery storage projects, which total 3,554 MW across 22 states from 23 wind facilities, 178 solar projects, 71 fuel cell locations
and two battery storage facilities. Revenues are primarily generated by selling the power produced from renewable generation through long-term
contracts to utilities, electric cooperatives, municipalities and corporate customers. In most instances, these customers have obligations under state-
mandated renewable energy portfolio standards or similar state or local renewable energy goals. Energy and renewable energy credits generated by
wind and solar projects are generally sold at contractual prices. The following map shows the locations of renewable generation facilities of which
Commercial Renewables has an ownership interest as of December 31, 2021.
As eligible projects are placed in service, Commercial Renewables generally recognizes either PTCs as power is generated by wind projects over 10
years or ITCs over the useful life of solar or fuel cell projects. Benefits of the tax basis adjustment due to the ITC are recognized as a reduction to
income tax expense in the year in which the project is placed in service. Under the current law, the ITC for solar and fuel cells is being phased down
from a rate of 30% for projects that began construction before 2020 to a permanent 10% rate for solar, and no ITC is available for fuel cells if
construction begins after 2023. The PTC for onshore wind is currently phased out for projects beginning construction after 2021, but remains
available for projects that began construction in 2021 or earlier.
Commercial Renewables has entered into agreements for certain of its generating assets that are held by LLCs whose members include a
noncontrolling tax equity investor. The allocation of tax attributes and cash flows to the tax equity investor are governed by the provisions of the LLC
agreements. The GAAP earnings allocations to the tax equity investors can result in variability in earnings to Duke Energy as a result of the
application of the HLBV method in allocating income or loss to the owners. As part of its growth strategy, Commercial Renewables expects to enter
into these arrangements for future generating assets.
For additional information on Commercial Renewables' generation facilities, see Item 2, “Properties.”
19
BUSINESS
Market Environment and Competition
Commercial Renewables primarily competes for wholesale contracts for the generation and sale of electricity from generation assets it either
develops or acquires and owns. The market price of commodities and services, along with the quality and reliability of services provided, drive
competition in the wholesale energy business. The number and type of competitors may vary based on location, generation type and project size.
Commercial Renewables' main competitors include other nonregulated generators and wholesale power providers.
Sources of Electricity
Commercial Renewables relies on wind, solar, fuel cells and battery resources for its generation of electric energy.
Regulation
Commercial Renewables is subject to regulation at the federal level, primarily from the FERC. Regulations of the FERC govern access to regulated
market information by nonregulated entities and services provided between regulated and nonregulated utilities.
OTHER
The remainder of Duke Energy’s operations is presented as Other. While it is not a business segment, Other primarily includes interest expense on
holding company debt, unallocated corporate costs including costs to achieve strategic acquisitions, amounts related to certain companywide
initiatives and contributions made to the Duke Energy Foundation. Other also includes Bison and an investment in NMC.
The Duke Energy Foundation is a nonprofit organization funded by Duke Energy shareholders that makes charitable contributions to selected
nonprofits and government subdivisions.
Bison, a wholly owned subsidiary of Duke Energy, is a captive insurance company with the principal activity of providing Duke Energy subsidiaries
with indemnification for financial losses primarily related to property, workers’ compensation and general liability.
Duke Energy owns a 17.5% equity interest in NMC. The joint venture company has production facilities in Jubail, Saudi Arabia, where it manufactures
certain petrochemicals and plastics. The company annually produces approximately 1 million metric tons each of MTBE and methanol and has the
capacity to produce 50,000 metric tons of polyacetal. The main feedstocks to produce these products are natural gas and butane. Duke Energy
records the investment activity of NMC using the equity method of accounting and retains 25% of NMC's board of directors' representation and voting
rights.
Human Capital Management
Governance
Our employees are critical to the success of our company. Our Human Resources organization is responsible for our human capital management
strategy, which includes recruiting and hiring, onboarding and training, diversity and inclusion, workforce planning, talent and succession planning,
performance management and employee development. Key areas of focus include fostering a high-performance and inclusive culture built on strong
leadership and highly engaged and diverse employees, building a pipeline of skilled workers and ensuring knowledge transfer as employees retire.
Our Board of Directors provides oversight on certain human capital management matters, primarily through the Compensation and People
Development Committee, which is responsible for reviewing strategies and policies related to human capital management, including with respect to
matters such as diversity and inclusion, employee engagement and talent development. The Compensation and People Development Committee
also receives updates on employee engagement surveys and action plans.
Employees
On December 31, 2021, Duke Energy had a total of 27,605 full-time, part-time and temporary employees, the overwhelming majority of which were
full-time employees. The total includes 5,064 employees who are represented by labor unions under various collective bargaining agreements that
generally cover wages, benefits, working practices, and other terms and conditions of employment.
Compensation
The company seeks to attract and retain an appropriately qualified workforce and leverages Duke Energy’s leadership imperatives to foster a culture
focused on customers, innovation, and highly engaged employees. Our compensation program is market driven and designed to link pay to
performance with the goal of attracting and retaining talented employees, rewarding individual performance, and encouraging long-term commitment
to our business. Our market competitive pay program includes short-term and long-term variable pay components that help to align the interests of
Duke Energy to our customers and shareholders. In addition to competitive base pay, we provide eligible employees with compensation and benefits
under a variety of plans and programs, including with respect to health care benefits, retirement savings, pension, health savings and flexible
spending accounts, wellness, family leaves, employee assistance, as well as other benefits including a charitable matching program. The company is
committed to providing market competitive, fair, and equitable compensation and regularly conducts internal pay equity reviews, and benchmarking
against peer companies to ensure our pay is competitive.
Diversity and Inclusion
Duke Energy is committed to continuing to build a diverse workforce that reflects the communities we serve while strengthening a culture of inclusion
where employees and customers feel respected and valued. Our Enterprise Diversity and Inclusion Council, chaired by our Chief Operating Officer,
monitors the effectiveness and execution of our diversity and inclusion strategy and programs. Employee-led councils are also embedded across the
company in our business units and focus on the specific diversity and inclusion needs of the business and help drive inclusion deeper into the
employee experience. Leaders and individual contributors also have the opportunity to participate in diversity and inclusion training programs and
facilitated conversations on thought provoking topics offered to further our commitment to building and enabling an inclusive work environment.
20
BUSINESS
Our aspirational goals include achieving workforce representation of at least 25% female and 20% racial and ethnic diversity. We continue to make
strides toward reaching these aspirational goals and as of December 31, 2021, our workforce consisted of approximately 23.9% female and 19.6%
racial and ethnic diversity.
The company also has a number of Employee Resource Groups (ERGs), which are networks of employees formed around a common dimension of
diversity whose goals and objectives align with the company's goals and objectives. These groups focus on employee professional development and
networking, community outreach, cultural awareness, recruiting and retention. They also serve as a resource to the company for advocacy and
community outreach and improving customer service through innovation. ERG-sponsored forums include networking events, mentoring, scholarship
banquets for aspiring college students, and workshops on topics such as time management, stress reduction, career planning and work-life balance.
Our ERGs are open to all employees.
Among other efforts, the company has developed partnerships with community organizations, community colleges and historically Black colleges and
universities to support our strategy of building a diverse and highly skilled talent pipeline.
Operational Excellence
The foundation for our growth and success is our continued focus on operational excellence, the leading indicator of which is safety. As such, the
safety of our workforce remains our top priority. The company closely monitors the total incident case rate (TICR), which is a metric based on strict
OSHA definitions that measures the number of occupational injuries and illnesses per 100 employees. This objective emphasizes our focus on
achieving an event-free and injury-free workplace. As an indication of our commitment to safety, we include safety metrics in both the short-term and
long-term incentive plans based on the TICR for employees. Our employees delivered strong safety results in 2021, consistent with our industry-
leading performance levels from 2016 through 2020.
21
BUSINESS
Information about Our Executive Officers
The following table sets forth the individuals who currently serve as executive officers. Executive officers serve until their successors are duly elected
or appointed.
Name Age Current and Recent Positions Held
Lynn J. Good 62 Chair, President and Chief Executive Officer. Ms. Good has served as Chair, President and Chief Executive
Officer of Duke Energy since January 1, 2016, and was Vice Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer of
Duke Energy from July 2013 through December 2015. Prior to that, she served as Executive Vice President and
Chief Financial Officer since 2009.
Steven K. Young 63 Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer. Mr. Young assumed his current position in August
2013. Prior to that he served as Vice President, Chief Accounting Officer and Controller, assuming the role of
Chief Accounting Officer in July 2012 and the role of Controller in December 2006.
Melody Birmingham 50 Senior Vice President and Chief Administrative Officer. Ms. Birmingham assumed her current position in
May 2021, Prior to that, Ms. Birmingham served as Senior Vice President, Supply Chain and Chief Procurement
Officer since 2018; State President of Duke Energy Indiana’s operations from 2015 to 2018, and Senior Vice
President, Midwest Delivery from 2012 to 2015.
Kodwo Ghartey-Tagoe 58 Executive Vice President, Chief Legal Officer and Corporate Secretary. Mr. Ghartey-Tagoe assumed the
position of Executive Vice President, Chief Legal Officer and Corporate Secretary in May 2020. He was
appointed Executive Vice President and Chief Legal Officer in October 2019 after serving as President, South
Carolina since 2017. Mr. Ghartey-Tagoe joined Duke Energy in 2002, and has held numerous management
positions in Duke Energy’s Legal Department, including Duke Energy's Senior Vice President of State and
Federal Regulatory Legal Support.
R. Alexander Glenn 56 Senior Vice President and Chief Executive Officer, Duke Energy Florida and Midwest. Mr. Glenn assumed
his current position in May 2021. Prior to that, Mr. Glenn served as Senior Vice President, State and Federal
Regulatory Legal Support since 2017 and as State President of Duke Energy Florida's operations from 2012 to
2017.
Dhiaa M. Jamil 65 Executive Vice President and Chief Operating Officer. Mr. Jamil assumed the role of Chief Operating Officer
in May 2016. Prior to his current position, he held the title Executive Vice President and President, Regulated
Generation and Transmission since June 2015. Prior to that, he served as Executive Vice President and
President, Regulated Generation since August 2014. He served as Executive Vice President and President of
Duke Energy Nuclear from March 2013 to August 2014, and was Chief Nuclear Officer from February 2008 to
February 2013.
Julia S. Janson 57 Executive Vice President and Chief Executive Officer, Duke Energy Carolinas. Ms. Janson assumed her
current position in May 2021. Prior to that she held the position of Executive Vice President, External Affairs and
President, Carolinas Region since October 2019 and the position of Executive Vice President, External Affairs
and Chief Legal Officer since November 2018. She originally assumed the position of Executive Vice President,
Chief Legal Officer and Corporate Secretary in December 2012, and then assumed the responsibilities for
External Affairs in February 2016.
Cynthia S. Lee 55 Vice President, Chief Accounting Officer and Controller. Ms. Lee assumed her role as Vice President, Chief
Accounting Officer and Controller in May 2021. Prior to that, she served as Director, Investor Relations since
June 2019 and in various roles within the Corporate Controller's organization after joining the Corporation and
its affiliates in 2002.
Ronald R. Reising 61 Senior Vice President and Chief Human Resources Officer. Mr. Reising assumed his current position in July
2020. Prior to that, he served as Senior Vice President of Operations Support since 2014. Prior to that he
served as Chief Procurement Officer since 2006.
Louis E. Renjel 48 Senior Vice President, External Affairs and Communications. Mr. Renjel his current position in May 2021.
Prior to that he served as Senior Vice President of Federal Government and Corporate Affairs since 2019, and
as Vice President, Federal Government Affairs and Strategic Policy since he joined Duke Energy in March 2017
until 2019. Prior to joining Duke Energy, Mr. Renjel served as Vice President of Strategic Infrastructure since
2009 for CSX Corp and as their Director of Environmental and Government Affairs from 2006 to 2008.
Brian D. Savoy 46 Executive Vice President, Chief Strategy and Commercial Officer. Mr. Savoy assumed the position of
Executive Vice President, Chief Strategy and Commercial Officer in May 2021. Prior to that he held the position
of Senior Vice President, Chief Transformation and Administrative Officer from October 2019 through April 2021;
Senior Vice President, Business Transformation and Technology from May 2016 through September 2019;
Senior Vice President, Controller and Chief Accounting Officer from September 2013 to May 2016; Director,
Forecasting and Analysis from 2009 to September 2013; and Vice President and Controller of the Commercial
Power segment from 2006 to 2009.
Harry K. Sideris 51 Executive Vice President, Customer Experience, Solutions and Services. Mr. Sideris assumed his current
position in October 2019. Prior to that, he served as Senior Vice President and Chief Distribution Officer since
June 2018; State President, Florida from January 2017 to June 2018; Senior Vice President of Environmental
Health and Safety from August 2014 to January 2017; and Vice President of Power Generations for the
company's Fossil/Hydro Operations in the western portions of North Carolina and South Carolina from July
2012 to August 2014.
(a)    The ages of the officers provided are as of January 31, 2022.
There are no family relationships between any of the executive officers, nor any arrangement or understanding between any executive officer and
any other person involved in officer selection.(a)
22
BUSINESS
Environmental Matters
The Duke Energy Registrants are subject to federal, state and local laws and regulations with regard to air and water quality, hazardous and solid
waste disposal and other environmental matters. Environmental laws and regulations affecting the Duke Energy Registrants include, but are not
limited to:
• The Clean Air Act, as well as state laws and regulations impacting air emissions, including State Implementation Plans related to existing
and new national ambient air quality standards for ozone and particulate matter. Owners and/or operators of air emission sources are
responsible for obtaining permits and for annual compliance and reporting.
• The Clean Water Act, which requires permits for facilities that discharge wastewaters into navigable waters.
• The Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act, which can require any individual or entity that currently
owns or in the past owned or operated a disposal site, as well as transporters or generators of hazardous substances sent to a disposal
site, to share in remediation costs.
• The National Environmental Policy Act, which requires federal agencies to consider potential environmental impacts in their permitting and
licensing decisions, including siting approvals.
• Coal Ash Act, as amended, which establishes requirements regarding the use and closure of existing ash basins, the disposal of ash at
active coal plants and the handling of surface water and groundwater impacts from ash basins in North Carolina.
• The Solid Waste Disposal Act, as amended by RCRA, which creates a framework for the proper management of hazardous and
nonhazardous solid waste; classifies CCR as nonhazardous waste; and establishes standards for landfill and surface impoundment
placement, design, operation and closure, groundwater monitoring, corrective action, and post-closure care.
• The Toxic Substances Control Act, which gives EPA the authority to require reporting, recordkeeping and testing requirements, and to place
restrictions relating to chemical substances and/or mixtures, including polychlorinated biphenyls.
For more information on environmental matters, see Notes 4 and 9 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Commitments and Contingencies –
Environmental” and "Asset Retirement Obligations," respectively, and the “Other Matters” section of Item 7 Management's Discussion and Analysis.
Except as otherwise described in these sections, costs to comply with current federal, state and local provisions regulating the discharge of materials
into the environment or other potential costs related to protecting the environment are incorporated into the routine cost structure of our various
business segments and are not expected to have a material adverse effect on the competitive position, consolidated results of operations, cash flows
or financial position of the Duke Energy Registrants.
The "Other Matters" section of Item 7 Management's Discussion and Analysis includes more information on certain environmental regulations and a
discussion of Global Climate Change including the potential impact of current and future legislation related to GHG emissions on the Duke Energy
Registrants' operations. Recently passed and potential future environmental statutes and regulations could have a significant impact on the Duke
Energy Registrants’ results of operations, cash flows or financial position. However, if and when such statutes and regulations become effective, the
Duke Energy Registrants will seek appropriate regulatory recovery of costs to comply within its regulated operations.
DUKE ENERGY CAROLINAS
Duke Energy Carolinas is a regulated public utility primarily engaged in the generation, transmission, distribution and sale of electricity in portions of
North Carolina and South Carolina. Duke Energy Carolinas’ service area covers approximately 24,000 square miles and supplies electric service to
2.8 million residential, commercial and industrial customers. For information about Duke Energy Carolinas’ generating facilities, see Item 2,
“Properties.” Duke Energy Carolinas is subject to the regulatory provisions of the NCUC, PSCSC, NRC and FERC.
Substantially all of Duke Energy Carolinas' operations are regulated and qualify for regulatory accounting. Duke Energy Carolinas operates one
reportable business segment, Electric Utilities and Infrastructure. For additional information regarding this business segment, including financial
information, see Note 2 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Business Segments.”
PROGRESS ENERGY
Progress Energy is a public utility holding company primarily engaged in the regulated electric utility business and is subject to regulation by the
FERC. Progress Energy conducts operations through its wholly owned subsidiaries, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida. When
discussing Progress Energy’s financial information, it necessarily includes the results of Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida.
Substantially all of Progress Energy’s operations are regulated and qualify for regulatory accounting. Progress Energy operates one reportable
business segment, Electric Utilities and Infrastructure. For additional information regarding this business segment, including financial information, see
Note 2 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Business Segments.”
DUKE ENERGY PROGRESS
Duke Energy Progress is a regulated public utility primarily engaged in the generation, transmission, distribution and sale of electricity in portions of
North Carolina and South Carolina. Duke Energy Progress’ service area covers approximately 29,000 square miles and supplies electric service to
approximately 1.7 million residential, commercial and industrial customers. For information about Duke Energy Progress’ generating facilities, see
Item 2, “Properties.” Duke Energy Progress is subject to the regulatory provisions of the NCUC, PSCSC, NRC and FERC.
Substantially all of Duke Energy Progress’ operations are regulated and qualify for regulatory accounting. Duke Energy Progress operates one
reportable business segment, Electric Utilities and Infrastructure. For additional information regarding this business segment, including financial
information, see Note 2 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Business Segments.”
23
PART I
DUKE ENERGY FLORIDA
Duke Energy Florida is a regulated public utility primarily engaged in the generation, transmission, distribution and sale of electricity in portions of
Florida. Duke Energy Florida’s service area covers approximately 13,000 square miles and supplies electric service to approximately 1.9 million
residential, commercial and industrial customers. For information about Duke Energy Florida’s generating facilities, see Item 2, “Properties.” Duke
Energy Florida is subject to the regulatory provisions of the FPSC, NRC and FERC.
Substantially all of Duke Energy Florida’s operations are regulated and qualify for regulatory accounting. Duke Energy Florida operates one
reportable business segment, Electric Utilities and Infrastructure. For additional information regarding this business segment, including financial
information, see Note 2 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Business Segments.”
DUKE ENERGY OHIO
Duke Energy Ohio is a regulated public utility primarily engaged in the transmission and distribution of electricity in portions of Ohio and Kentucky, in
the generation and sale of electricity in portions of Kentucky and the transportation and sale of natural gas in portions of Ohio and Kentucky. Duke
Energy Ohio also conducts competitive auctions for retail electricity supply in Ohio whereby recovery of the energy price is from retail customers.
Operations in Kentucky are conducted through its wholly owned subsidiary, Duke Energy Kentucky. References herein to Duke Energy Ohio include
Duke Energy Ohio and its subsidiaries, unless otherwise noted. Duke Energy Ohio is subject to the regulatory provisions of the PUCO, KPSC,
PHMSA and FERC.
Duke Energy Ohio’s service area covers approximately 3,000 square miles and supplies electric service to approximately 880,000 residential,
commercial and industrial customers and provides transmission and distribution services for natural gas to approximately 550,000 customers. For
information about Duke Energy Ohio's generating facilities, see Item 2, “Properties.”
KO Transmission, a wholly owned subsidiary of Duke Energy Ohio, is an interstate pipeline company engaged in the business of transporting natural
gas and is subject to the rules and regulations of FERC. KO Transmission's 90-mile pipeline supplies natural gas to Duke Energy Ohio and
interconnects with the Columbia Gulf Transmission pipeline and Tennessee Gas Pipeline. An approximately 70-mile portion of KO Transmission's
pipeline facilities is co-owned by Columbia Gas Transmission Corporation.
Substantially all of Duke Energy Ohio's operations are regulated and qualify for regulatory accounting. Duke Energy Ohio has two reportable
segments, Electric Utilities and Infrastructure and Gas Utilities and Infrastructure. For additional information on these business segments, including
financial information, see Note 2 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Business Segments.”
DUKE ENERGY INDIANA
Duke Energy Indiana is a regulated public utility primarily engaged in the generation, transmission, distribution and sale of electricity in portions of
Indiana. Duke Energy Indiana’s service area covers 23,000 square miles and supplies electric service to 870,000 residential, commercial and
industrial customers. For information about Duke Energy Indiana's generating facilities, see Item 2, “Properties.” Duke Energy Indiana is subject to
the regulatory provisions of the IURC and FERC.
In 2021, Duke Energy completed the first phase of the investment in Duke Energy Indiana by GIC. For additional information, see Note 1 to the
Consolidated Financial Statements, "Summary of Significant Accounting Policies."
Substantially all of Duke Energy Indiana’s operations are regulated and qualify for regulatory accounting. Duke Energy Indiana operates one
reportable business segment, Electric Utilities and Infrastructure. For additional information regarding this business segment, including financial
information, see Note 2 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Business Segments.”
PIEDMONT
Piedmont is a regulated public utility primarily engaged in the distribution of natural gas to over 1.1 million residential, commercial, industrial and
power generation customers in portions of North Carolina, South Carolina and Tennessee, including customers served by municipalities who are
wholesale customers. For information about Piedmont's natural gas distribution facilities, see Item 2, "Properties." Piedmont is subject to the
regulatory provisions of the NCUC, PSCSC, TPUC, PHMSA and FERC.
Substantially all of Piedmont’s operations are regulated and qualify for regulatory accounting. Piedmont operates one reportable business segment,
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure. For additional information regarding this business segment, including financial information, see Note 2 to the
Consolidated Financial Statements, “Business Segments.”
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
In addition to other disclosures within this Form 10-K, including "Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of
Operations – Matters Impacting Future Results" for each registrant in Item 7, and other documents filed with the SEC from time to time, the following
factors should be considered in evaluating Duke Energy and its subsidiaries. Such factors could affect actual results of operations and cause results
to differ substantially from those currently expected or sought. Unless otherwise indicated, risk factors discussed below generally relate to risks
associated with all of the Duke Energy Registrants. Risks identified at the Subsidiary Registrant level are generally applicable to Duke Energy.
24
RISK FACTORS
BUSINESS STRATEGY RISKS
Duke Energy’s future results could be adversely affected if it is unable to implement its business strategy including achieving its carbon
emissions reduction goals.
Duke Energy’s results of operations depend, in significant part, on the extent to which it can implement its business strategy successfully. Duke
Energy's clean energy strategy, which includes achieving net-zero carbon emissions from electricity generation by 2050, modernizing the regulatory
construct, transforming the customer experience, and digital transformation, is subject to business, policy, regulatory, technology, economic and
competitive uncertainties and contingencies, many of which are beyond its control and may make those goals difficult to achieve.
Federal or state policies could be enacted that restrict the availability of fuels or generation technologies, such as natural gas or nuclear power, that
enable Duke Energy to reduce its carbon emissions. Supportive policies may be needed to facilitate the siting and cost recovery of transmission and
distribution upgrades needed to accommodate the build out of large volumes of renewables and energy storage. Further, the approval of our state
regulators will be necessary for the company to continue to retire existing carbon emitting assets or make investments in new generating capacity.
The company may be constrained by the ability to procure resources or labor needed to build new generation at a reasonable price as well as to
construct projects on time. In addition, new technologies that are not yet commercially available or are unproven at utility scale will be needed. If
these technologies are not developed or are not available at reasonable prices, or if we invest in early-stage technologies that are then supplanted by
technological breakthroughs, Duke Energy’s ability to achieve a net-zero target by 2050 at a cost-effective price could be at risk.
Achieving our carbon reduction goals will require continued operation of our existing carbon-free technologies including nuclear and renewables. The
rapid transition to and expansion of certain low-carbon resources, such as renewables without cost-effective storage, may challenge our ability to
meet customer expectations of reliability in a carbon constrained environment, Our nuclear fleet is central to our ability to meet these objectives and
customer expectations. We are continuing to seek to renew the operating licenses of the 11 reactors we operate at six nuclear stations for an
additional 20 years, extending their operating lives to and beyond midcentury. Failure to receive approval from the NRC for the relicensing of any of
these reactors could affect our ability to achieve a net-zero target by 2050.
As a consequence, Duke Energy may not be able to fully implement or realize the anticipated results of its strategy, which may have an adverse
effect on its financial condition.
REGULATORY, LEGISLATIVE AND LEGAL RISKS
The Duke Energy Registrants’ regulated utility revenues, earnings and results are dependent on state legislation and regulation that affect
electric generation, electric and natural gas transmission, distribution and related activities, which may limit their ability to recover costs.
The Duke Energy Registrants’ regulated electric and natural gas utility businesses are regulated on a cost-of-service/rate-of-return basis subject to
statutes and regulatory commission rules and procedures of North Carolina, South Carolina, Florida, Ohio, Tennessee, Indiana and Kentucky. If the
Duke Energy Registrants’ regulated utility earnings exceed the returns established by the state utility commissions, retail electric and natural gas
rates may be subject to review and possible reduction by the commissions, which may decrease the Duke Energy Registrants’ earnings. Additionally,
if regulatory bodies do not allow recovery of costs incurred in providing service, or do not do so on a timely basis, the Duke Energy Registrants’
earnings could be negatively impacted. Differences in regulation between jurisdictions with concurrent operations, such as North Carolina and South
Carolina in Duke Energy Carolinas' and Duke Energy Progress' service territory, may also result in failure to recover costs.
If legislative and regulatory structures were to evolve in such a way that the Duke Energy Registrants’ exclusive rights to serve their regulated
customers were eroded, their earnings could be negatively impacted. Federal and state regulations, laws, commercialization and reduction of costs
and other efforts designed to promote and expand the use of EE measures and distributed generation technologies, such as private solar and battery
storage, in Duke Energy service territories could reduce recovery of fixed costs in Duke Energy service territories or result in customers leaving the
electric distribution system and an increase in customer net energy metering, which allows customers with private solar to receive bill credits for
surplus power at the full retail amount. Over time, customer adoption of these technologies could result in Duke Energy not being able to fully recover
the costs and investment in generation.
State regulators have approved various mechanisms to stabilize natural gas utility margins, including margin decoupling in North Carolina and rate
stabilization in South Carolina. State regulators have approved other margin stabilizing mechanisms that, for example, allow for recovery of margin
losses associated with negotiated transactions designed to retain large volume customers that could use alternative fuels or that may otherwise
directly access natural gas supply through their own connection to an interstate pipeline. If regulators decided to discontinue the Duke Energy
Registrants' use of tariff mechanisms, it would negatively impact results of operations, financial position and cash flows. In addition, regulatory
authorities also review whether natural gas costs are prudently incurred and can disallow the recovery of a portion of natural gas costs that the Duke
Energy Registrants seek to recover from customers, which would adversely impact earnings.
The rates that the Duke Energy Registrants’ regulated utility businesses are allowed to charge are established by state utility commissions
in rate case proceedings, which may limit their ability to recover costs and earn an appropriate return on investment.
The rates that the Duke Energy Registrants’ regulated utility business are allowed to charge significantly influences the results of operations, financial
position and cash flows of the Duke Energy Registrants. The regulation of the rates that the regulated utility businesses charge customers is
determined, in large part, by state utility commissions in rate case proceedings. Negative decisions made by these regulators, or by any court on
appeal of a rate case proceeding, could have a material adverse effect on the Duke Energy Registrants’ results of operations, financial position or
cash flows and affect the ability of the Duke Energy Registrants to recover costs and an appropriate return on the significant infrastructure
investments being made.
25
RISK FACTORS
Deregulation or restructuring in the electric industry may result in increased competition and unrecovered costs that could adversely
affect the Duke Energy Registrants’ results of operations, financial position or cash flows and their utility businesses.
Increased competition resulting from deregulation or restructuring legislation could have a significant adverse impact on the Duke Energy Registrants’
results of operations, financial position or cash flows. If the retail jurisdictions served by the Duke Energy Registrants become subject to deregulation,
the impairment of assets, loss of retail customers, lower profit margins or increased costs of capital, and recovery of stranded costs could have a
significant adverse financial impact on the Duke Energy Registrants. Stranded costs primarily include the generation assets of the Duke Energy
Registrants whose value in a competitive marketplace may be less than their current book value, as well as above-market purchased power
commitments from QFs from whom the Duke Energy Registrants are legally obligated to purchase energy at an avoided cost rate under PURPA. The
Duke Energy Registrants cannot predict the extent and timing of entry by additional competitors into the electric markets. The Duke Energy
Registrants cannot predict if or when they will be subject to changes in legislation or regulation, nor can they predict the impact of these changes on
their results of operations, financial position or cash flows.
The Duke Energy Registrants’ businesses are subject to extensive federal regulation and a wide variety of laws and governmental policies,
including taxes and environmental regulations, that may change over time in ways that affect operations and costs.
The Duke Energy Registrants are subject to regulations under a wide variety of U.S. federal and state regulations and policies, including by FERC,
NRC, EPA and various other federal agencies as well as the North American Electric Reliability Corporation. Regulation affects almost every aspect
of the Duke Energy Registrants’ businesses, including, among other things, their ability to: take fundamental business management actions;
determine the terms and rates of transmission and distribution services; make acquisitions; issue equity or debt securities; engage in transactions
with other subsidiaries and affiliates; and pay dividends upstream to the Duke Energy Registrants. Changes to federal regulations are continuous and
ongoing. There can be no assurance that laws, regulations and policies will not be changed in ways that result in material modifications of business
models and objectives or affect returns on investment by restricting activities and products, subjecting them to escalating costs, causing delays, or
prohibiting them outright.
The Duke Energy Registrants are subject to numerous environmental laws and regulations requiring significant capital expenditures that
can increase the cost of operations, and which may impact or limit business plans, or cause exposure to environmental liabilities.
The Duke Energy Registrants are subject to numerous environmental laws and regulations affecting many aspects of their present and future
operations, including CCRs, air emissions, water quality, wastewater discharges, solid waste and hazardous waste. These laws and regulations can
result in increased capital, operating and other costs. These laws and regulations generally require the Duke Energy Registrants to obtain and
comply with a wide variety of environmental licenses, permits, inspections and other approvals. Compliance with environmental laws and regulations
can require significant expenditures, including expenditures for cleanup costs and damages arising from contaminated properties. Failure to comply
with environmental regulations may result in the imposition of fines, penalties and injunctive measures affecting operating assets. The steps the Duke
Energy Registrants could be required to take to ensure their facilities are in compliance could be prohibitively expensive. As a result, the Duke Energy
Registrants may be required to shut down or alter the operation of their facilities, which may cause the Duke Energy Registrants to incur losses.
Further, the Duke Energy Registrants may not be successful in recovering capital and operating costs incurred to comply with new environmental
regulations through existing regulatory rate structures and their contracts with customers. Also, the Duke Energy Registrants may not be able to
obtain or maintain from time to time all required environmental regulatory approvals for their operating assets or development projects. Delays in
obtaining any required environmental regulatory approvals, failure to obtain and comply with them or changes in environmental laws or regulations to
more stringent compliance levels could result in additional costs of operation for existing facilities or development of new facilities being prevented,
delayed or subject to additional costs. Although it is not expected that the costs to comply with current environmental regulations will have a material
adverse effect on the Duke Energy Registrants’ results of operations, financial position and cash flows due to regulatory cost recovery, the Duke
Energy Registrants are at risk that the costs of complying with environmental regulations in the future will have such an effect.
The EPA has enacted or proposed federal regulations governing the management of cooling water intake structures, wastewater and CO emissions.
New state legislation could impose carbon reduction goals that are more aggressive than the company's plans. These regulations may require the
Duke Energy Registrants to make additional capital expenditures and increase operating and maintenance costs.
The Duke Energy Registrants' operations, capital expenditures and financial results may be affected by regulatory changes related to the
impacts of global climate change.
There is continued concern, and increasing activism, both nationally and internationally, about climate change. The EPA and state regulators may
adopt and implement regulations to restrict emissions of GHGs to address global climate change. Certain local and state jurisdictions have also
enacted laws to restrict or prevent new gas infrastructure. Increased regulation of GHG emissions could impose significant additional costs on the
Duke Energy Registrants' electric and natural gas operations, their suppliers and customers and affect demand for energy conservation and
renewable products, which could impact both our electric and natural gas businesses. Regulatory changes could also result in generation facilities to
be retired earlier than planned to meet our net-zero 2050 goal. Though we would plan to seek cost recovery for investments related to GHG
emissions reductions through regulatory rate structures, changes in the regulatory climate could result in the failure to fully recover such costs and
investment in generation.
OPERATIONAL RISKS
The Duke Energy Registrants’ operations have been and may be affected by COVID-19 in ways listed below and in ways the registrants
cannot predict at this time.
The COVID-19 pandemic has immaterially impacted and could impact the Duke Energy Registrants' business strategy, results of operations, financial
position and cash flows in the future as a result of delays in rate cases or other legal proceedings, an inability to obtain labor or equipment necessary
for the construction of large capital projects, an inability to procure satisfactory levels of fuels or other necessary equipment for the continued
production of electricity and delivery of natural gas, and the health and availability of our critical personnel and their ability to perform business
functions.2
26
RISK FACTORS
The Duke Energy Registrants’ results of operations may be negatively affected by overall market, economic and other conditions that are
beyond their control.
Sustained downturns or sluggishness in the economy generally affect the markets in which the Duke Energy Registrants operate and negatively
influence operations. Declines in demand for electricity or natural gas as a result of economic downturns in the Duke Energy Registrants’ regulated
service territories will reduce overall sales and lessen cash flows, especially as industrial customers reduce production and, therefore, consumption
of electricity and the use of natural gas. Although the Duke Energy Registrants’ regulated electric and natural gas businesses are subject to regulated
allowable rates of return and recovery of certain costs, such as fuel and purchased natural gas costs, under periodic adjustment clauses, overall
declines in electricity or natural gas sold as a result of economic downturn or recession could reduce revenues and cash flows, thereby diminishing
results of operations. The Duke Energy Registrants also monitor the impacts of inflation on the procurement of goods and services and seek to
minimize its effects in future periods through pricing strategies, productivity improvements, and cost reductions. Rapidly rising prices as a result of
inflation or other factors may impact the ability of the company to recover costs timely or execute on its business strategy including the achievement
of growth objectives. Additionally, prolonged economic downturns that negatively impact the Duke Energy Registrants’ results of operations and cash
flows could result in future material impairment charges to write-down the carrying value of certain assets, including goodwill, to their respective fair
values.
The Duke Energy Registrants also sell electricity into the spot market or other competitive power markets on a contractual basis. With respect to such
transactions, the Duke Energy Registrants are not guaranteed any rate of return on their capital investments through mandated rates, and revenues
and results of operations are likely to depend, in large part, upon prevailing market prices. These market prices may fluctuate substantially over
relatively short periods of time and could reduce the Duke Energy Registrants’ revenues and margins, thereby diminishing results of operations.
Factors that could impact sales volumes, generation of electricity and market prices at which the Duke Energy Registrants are able to sell electricity
and natural gas are as follows:
• weather conditions, including abnormally mild winter or summer weather that cause lower energy or natural gas usage for heating or
cooling purposes, as applicable, and periods of low rainfall that decrease the ability to operate facilities in an economical manner;
• supply of and demand for energy commodities;
• transmission or transportation constraints or inefficiencies that impact nonregulated energy operations;
• availability of competitively priced alternative energy sources, which are preferred by some customers over electricity produced from coal,
nuclear or natural gas plants, and customer usage of energy-efficient equipment that reduces energy demand;
• natural gas, crude oil and refined products production levels and prices;
• ability to procure satisfactory levels of inventory, including materials, supplies, and fuel such as coal, natural gas and uranium; and
• capacity and transmission service into, or out of, the Duke Energy Registrants’ markets.
Natural disasters or operational accidents may adversely affect the Duke Energy Registrants’ operating results.
Natural disasters or operational accidents within the company or industry (such as forest fires, earthquakes, hurricanes or natural gas transmission
pipeline explosions) could have direct or indirect impacts to the Duke Energy Registrants or to key contractors and suppliers. Further, the generation
of electricity and the transportation and storage of natural gas involve inherent operating risks that may result in accidents involving serious injury or
loss of life, environmental damage or property damage. Such events could impact the Duke Energy Registrants through changes to policies, laws
and regulations whose compliance costs have a significant impact on the Duke Energy Registrants’ results of operations, financial position and cash
flows. In addition, if a serious operational accident were to occur, existing insurance policies may not cover all of the potential exposures or the actual
amount of loss incurred, including potential litigation awards. Any losses not covered by insurance, or any increases in the cost of applicable
insurance as a result of such accident, could have a material adverse effect on the results of operations, financial position, cash flows and reputation
of the Duke Energy Registrants.
The reputation and financial condition of the Duke Energy Registrants could be negatively impacted due to their obligations to comply
with federal and state regulations, laws, and other legal requirements that govern the operations, assessments, storage, closure,
remediation, disposal and monitoring relating to CCR, the high costs and new rate impacts associated with implementing these new CCR-
related requirements and the strategies and methods necessary to implement these requirements in compliance with these legal
obligations.
As a result of electricity produced for decades at coal-fired power plants, the Duke Energy Registrants manage large amounts of CCR that are
primarily stored in dry storage within landfills or combined with water in surface impoundments, all in compliance with applicable regulatory
requirements. A CCR-related operational incident could have a material adverse impact on the reputation and results of operations, financial position
and cash flows of the Duke Energy Registrants.
27
RISK FACTORS
During 2015, EPA regulations were enacted related to the management of CCR from power plants. These regulations classify CCR as nonhazardous
waste under the RCRA and apply to electric generating sites with new and existing landfills and, new and existing surface impoundments, and
establish requirements regarding landfill design, structural integrity design and assessment criteria for surface impoundments, groundwater
monitoring, protection and remedial procedures and other operational and reporting procedures for the disposal and management of CCR. In addition
to the federal regulations, CCR landfills and surface impoundments will continue to be regulated by existing state laws, regulations and permits, as
well as additional legal requirements that may be imposed in the future, such as the settlement reached with the NCDEQ to excavate seven of the
nine remaining coal ash basins in North Carolina, and partially excavate the remaining two, and EPA's January 11, 2022, issuance of a letter
interpreting the CCR Rule, including its applicability and closure provisions. These federal and state laws, regulations and other legal requirements
may require or result in additional expenditures, including increased operating and maintenance costs, which could affect the results of operations,
financial position and cash flows of the Duke Energy Registrants. The Duke Energy Registrants will continue to seek full cost recovery for
expenditures through the normal ratemaking process with state and federal utility commissions, who permit recovery in rates of necessary and
prudently incurred costs associated with the Duke Energy Registrants’ regulated operations, and through other wholesale contracts with terms that
contemplate recovery of such costs, although there is no guarantee of full cost recovery. In addition, the timing for and amount of recovery of such
costs could have a material adverse impact on Duke Energy's cash flows.
The Duke Energy Registrants have recognized significant AROs related to these CCR-related requirements. Closure activities began in 2015 at the
four sites specified as high priority by the Coal Ash Act and at the W.S. Lee Steam Station site in South Carolina in connection with other legal
requirements. Excavation at these sites involves movement of CCR materials to off-site locations for use as structural fill, to appropriate engineered
off-site or on-site lined landfills or conversion of the ash for beneficial use. Duke Energy has completed excavation of coal ash at three of the four
high priority sites. At other sites, planning and closure methods have been studied and factored into the estimated retirement and management costs,
and closure activities have commenced. As the closure and CCR management work progresses and final closure plans and corrective action
measures are developed and approved at each site, the scope and complexity of work and the amount of CCR material could be greater than
estimates and could, therefore, materially increase compliance expenditures and rate impacts.
The Duke Energy Registrants’ results of operations, financial position and cash flows may be negatively affected by a lack of growth or
slower growth in the number of customers, or decline in customer demand or number of customers.
Growth in customer accounts and growth of customer usage each directly influence demand for electricity and natural gas and the need for additional
power generation and delivery facilities. Customer growth and customer usage are affected by several factors outside the control of the Duke Energy
Registrants, such as mandated EE measures, demand-side management goals, distributed generation resources and economic and demographic
conditions, such as population changes, job and income growth, housing starts, new business formation and the overall level of economic activity.
Certain regulatory and legislative bodies have introduced or are considering requirements and/or incentives to reduce energy consumption by certain
dates in response to concerns related to climate change. Additionally, technological advances driven by federal laws mandating new levels of EE in
end-use electric and natural gas devices or other improvements in or applications of technology could lead to declines in per capita energy
consumption.
Advances in distributed generation technologies that produce power, including fuel cells, microturbines, wind turbines and solar cells, may reduce the
cost of alternative methods of producing power to a level competitive with central power station electric production utilized by the Duke Energy
Registrants. In addition, the electrification of buildings and appliances currently relying on natural gas could reduce the number of customers in our
natural gas distribution business.
Some or all of these factors could result in a lack of growth or decline in customer demand for electricity or number of customers and may cause the
failure of the Duke Energy Registrants to fully realize anticipated benefits from significant capital investments and expenditures, which could have a
material adverse effect on their results of operations, financial position and cash flows.
Furthermore, the Duke Energy Registrants currently have EE riders in place to recover the cost of EE programs in North Carolina, South Carolina,
Florida, Indiana, Ohio and Kentucky. Should the Duke Energy Registrants be required to invest in conservation measures that result in reduced sales
from effective conservation, regulatory lag in adjusting rates for the impact of these measures could have a negative financial impact.
The Duke Energy Registrants future results may be impacted by changing expectations and demands including heightened emphasis on
environmental, social and governance concerns.
Duke Energy’s ability to execute its strategy and achieve anticipated financial outcomes are influenced by the expectations of our customers,
regulators, investors, and stakeholders. Those expectations are based in part on the core fundamentals of reliability and affordability but are also
increasingly focused on our ability to meet rapidly changing demands for new and varied products, services and offerings. Additionally, the risks of
global climate change continues to shape our customers’ sustainability goals and energy needs as well as the investment and financing criteria of
investors. Failure to meet these increasing expectations or to adequately address the risks and external pressures from regulators, customers,
investors and other stakeholders may impact Duke Energy’s reputation and affect its ability to achieve favorable outcomes in future rate cases and
the results of operations for the Duke Energy Registrants. Furthermore, the increasing use of social media may accelerate and increase the potential
scope of negative publicity we might receive and could increase the negative impact on our reputation, business, results of operations, and financial
condition.
As it relates to electric generation, a diversified fleet with increasingly clean generation resources may facilitate more efficient financing and lower
costs. Conversely, jurisdictions utilizing more carbon-intensive generation such as coal may experience difficulty attracting certain investors and
obtaining the most economical financing terms available. Furthermore, with this heightened emphasis on environmental, social, and governance
concerns, and climate change in particular, there is an increased risk of litigation by activists.
28
RISK FACTORS
The Duke Energy Registrants’ operating results may fluctuate on a seasonal and quarterly basis and can be negatively affected by
changes in weather conditions and severe weather, including extreme weather conditions and changes in weather patterns from climate
change.
Electric power generation and natural gas distribution are generally seasonal businesses. In most parts of the U.S., the demand for power peaks
during the warmer summer months, with market prices also typically peaking at that time. In other areas, demand for power peaks during the winter.
Demand for natural gas peaks during the winter months. Further, changing frequency or magnitude of extreme weather conditions such as
hurricanes, droughts, heat waves, winter storms and severe weather, including from climate change, could cause these seasonal fluctuations to be
more pronounced. As a result, the overall operating results of the Duke Energy Registrants’ businesses may fluctuate substantially on a seasonal and
quarterly basis and thus make period-to-period comparison less relevant.
Sustained severe drought conditions could impact generation by hydroelectric plants, as well as fossil and nuclear plant operations, as these facilities
use water for cooling purposes and for the operation of environmental compliance equipment. Furthermore, destruction caused by severe weather
events, such as hurricanes, flooding, tornadoes, severe thunderstorms, snow and ice storms, including from climate change, can result in lost
operating revenues due to outages, property damage, including downed transmission and distribution lines, and additional and unexpected expenses
to mitigate storm damage. The cost of storm restoration efforts may not be fully recoverable through the regulatory process.
The Duke Energy Registrants’ sales may decrease if they are unable to gain adequate, reliable and affordable access to transmission
assets.
The Duke Energy Registrants depend on transmission and distribution facilities owned and operated by utilities and other energy companies to
deliver electricity sold to the wholesale market. In addition, the growth of renewables and energy storage will put strains on existing transmission
assets and require transmission and distribution upgrades. The FERC’s power transmission regulations require wholesale electric transmission
services to be offered on an open-access, non-discriminatory basis. If transmission is disrupted, or if transmission capacity is inadequate, the Duke
Energy Registrants’ ability to sell and deliver products may be hindered.
The different regional power markets have changing regulatory structures, which could affect growth and performance in these regions. In addition,
the ISOs who oversee the transmission systems in regional power markets have imposed in the past, and may impose in the future, price limitations
and other mechanisms to address volatility in the power markets. These types of price limitations and other mechanisms may adversely impact the
profitability of the Duke Energy Registrants’ wholesale power marketing business.
The availability of adequate interstate pipeline transportation capacity and natural gas supply may decrease.
The Duke Energy Registrants purchase almost all of their natural gas supply from interstate sources that must be transported to the applicable
service territories. Interstate pipeline companies transport the natural gas to the Duke Energy Registrants' systems under firm service agreements
that are designed to meet the requirements of their core markets. A significant disruption to interstate pipelines capacity or reduction in natural gas
supply due to events including, but not limited to, operational failures or disruptions, hurricanes, tornadoes, floods, freeze off of natural gas wells,
terrorist or cyberattacks or other acts of war or legislative or regulatory actions or requirements, including remediation related to integrity inspections
or regulations and laws enacted to address climate change, could reduce the normal interstate supply of natural gas and thereby reduce earnings.
Moreover, if additional natural gas infrastructure, including, but not limited to, exploration and drilling rigs and platforms, processing and gathering
systems, offshore pipelines, interstate pipelines and storage, cannot be built at a pace that meets demand, then growth opportunities could be
limited.
Fluctuations in commodity prices or availability may adversely affect various aspects of the Duke Energy Registrants’ operations as well
as their results of operations, financial position and cash flows.
The Duke Energy Registrants are exposed to the effects of market fluctuations in the price of natural gas, coal, fuel oil, nuclear fuel, electricity and
other energy-related commodities as a result of their ownership of energy-related assets. Fuel costs are recovered primarily through cost recovery
clauses, subject to the approval of state utility commissions.
Additionally, the Duke Energy Registrants are exposed to risk that counterparties will not be able to fulfill their obligations. Disruption in the delivery of
fuel, including disruptions as a result of, among other things, bankruptcies, transportation delays, weather, labor relations, force majeure events or
environmental regulations affecting any of these fuel suppliers, could limit the Duke Energy Registrants' ability to operate their facilities. Should
counterparties fail to perform, the Duke Energy Registrants might be forced to replace the underlying commitment at prevailing market prices possibly
resulting in losses in addition to the amounts, if any, already paid to the counterparties.
Certain of the Duke Energy Registrants’ hedge agreements may result in the receipt of, or posting of, collateral with counterparties, depending on the
daily market-based calculation of financial exposure of the derivative positions. Fluctuations in commodity prices that lead to the return of collateral
received and/or the posting of collateral with counterparties could negatively impact liquidity. Downgrades in the Duke Energy Registrants’ credit
ratings could lead to additional collateral posting requirements. The Duke Energy Registrants continually monitor derivative positions in relation to
market price activity.
29
RISK FACTORS
Cyberattacks and data security breaches could adversely affect the Duke Energy Registrants' businesses.
Cybersecurity risks have increased in recent years as a result of the proliferation of new technologies and the increased sophistication, magnitude
and frequency of cyberattacks and data security breaches. Duke Energy relies on the continued operation of sophisticated digital information
technology systems and network infrastructure, which are part of an interconnected regional grid. Additionally, connectivity to the internet continues to
increase through grid modernization and other operational excellence initiatives. Because of the critical nature of the infrastructure, increased
connectivity to the internet and technology systems’ inherent vulnerability to disability or failures due to hacking, viruses, acts of war or terrorism or
other types of data security breaches, the Duke Energy Registrants face a heightened risk of cyberattack from foreign or domestic sources and have
been subject, and will likely continue to be subject, to attempts to gain unauthorized access to information and/or information systems or to disrupt
utility operations through computer viruses and phishing attempts either directly or indirectly through its material vendors or related third parties. In
the event of a significant cybersecurity breach on either the Duke Energy Registrants or with one of our material vendors or related third parties, the
Duke Energy Registrants could (i) have business operations disrupted, including the disruption of the operation of our natural gas and electric assets
and the power grid, theft of confidential company, employee, retiree, shareholder, vendor or customer information, and general business systems and
process interruption or compromise, including preventing the Duke Energy Registrants from servicing customers, collecting revenues or the
recording, processing and/or reporting financial information correctly, (ii) experience substantial loss of revenues, repair and restoration costs,
penalties and costs for lack of compliance with relevant regulations, implementation costs for additional security measures to avert future
cyberattacks and other financial loss and (iii) be subject to increased regulation, litigation and reputational damage. While Duke Energy maintains
insurance relating to cybersecurity events, such insurance is subject to a number of exclusions and may be insufficient to offset any losses, costs or
damage experienced. Also, the market for cybersecurity insurance is relatively new and coverage available for cybersecurity events is evolving as the
industry matures.
The Duke Energy Registrants are subject to standards enacted by the North American Electric Reliability Corporation and enforced by FERC
regarding protection of the physical and cyber security of critical infrastructure assets required for operating North America's bulk electric system. The
Duke Energy Registrants are also subject to regulations set by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission regarding the protection of digital computer and
communication systems and networks required for the operation of nuclear power plants. The Duke Energy Registrants that operate designated
critical pipelines that transport natural gas are also subject to security directives issued by the Department of Homeland Security's Transportation
Security Administration (TSA) requiring such registrants to implement specific cybersecurity mitigation measures. While the Duke Energy Registrants
believe they are in compliance with, or, in the case of the recent TSA security directives, are in the process of implementing such standards and
regulations, the Duke Energy Registrants have from time to time been, and may in the future be, found to be in violation of such standards and
regulations. In addition, compliance with or changes in the applicable standards and regulations may subject the Duke Energy Registrants to higher
operating costs and/or increased capital expenditures as well as substantial fines for non-compliance.
Duke Energy Ohio’s and Duke Energy Indiana’s membership in an RTO presents risks that could have a material adverse effect on their
results of operations, financial position and cash flows.
The rules governing the various regional power markets may change, which could affect Duke Energy Ohio’s and Duke Energy Indiana’s costs and/or
revenues. To the degree Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana incur significant additional fees and increased costs to participate in an RTO,
their results of operations may be impacted. Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana may be allocated a portion of the cost of transmission
facilities built by others due to changes in RTO transmission rate design. Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana may be required to expand
their transmission system according to decisions made by an RTO rather than their own internal planning process. In addition, RTOs have been
developing rules associated with the allocation and methodology of assigning costs associated with improved transmission reliability, reduced
transmission congestion and firm transmission rights that may have a financial impact on the results of operations, financial position and cash flows
of Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana.
As members of an RTO, Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana are subject to certain additional risks, including those associated with the
allocation among RTO members, of losses caused by unreimbursed defaults of other participants in the RTO markets and those associated with
complaint cases filed against an RTO that may seek refunds of revenues previously earned by RTO members.
The Duke Energy Registrants may not recover costs incurred to begin construction on projects that are canceled.
Duke Energy’s long-term strategy requires the construction of new projects, either wholly owned or partially owned, which involve a number of risks,
including construction delays, nonperformance by equipment and other third-party suppliers, and increases in equipment and labor costs. To limit the
risks of these construction projects, the Duke Energy Registrants enter into equipment purchase orders and construction contracts and incur
engineering and design service costs in advance of receiving necessary regulatory approvals and/or siting or environmental permits. If any of these
projects are canceled for any reason, including failure to receive necessary regulatory approvals and/or siting or environmental permits, significant
cancellation penalties under the equipment purchase orders and construction contracts could occur. In addition, if any construction work or
investments have been recorded as an asset, an impairment may need to be recorded in the event the project is canceled.
The Duke Energy Registrants are subject to risks associated with their ability to obtain adequate insurance at acceptable costs.
The financial condition of some insurance companies, actual or threatened physical or cyberattacks, and natural disasters, among other things, could
have disruptive effects on insurance markets. The availability of insurance covering risks that the Duke Energy Registrants and their respective
competitors typically insure against may decrease, and the insurance that the Duke Energy Registrants are able to obtain may have higher
deductibles, higher premiums, and more restrictive policy terms. Further, the insurance policies may not cover all of the potential exposures or the
actual amount of loss incurred. Any losses not covered by insurance, or any increases in the cost of applicable insurance, could adversely affect the
results of operations, financial position or cash flows of the affected Duke Energy Registrant.
Our business could be negatively affected as a result of actions of activist shareholders.
While we strive to maintain constructive communications with our shareholders, activist shareholders may, from time to time, engage in proxy
solicitations or advance shareholder proposals, or otherwise attempt to affect changes and assert influence on our Board and management.
Perceived uncertainties as to the future direction or governance of the company may cause concern to our current or potential regulators, vendors or
strategic partners, or make it more difficult to execute on our strategy or to attract and retain qualified personnel, which may have a material impact
on our business and operating results.
30
RISK FACTORS
In addition, actions such as those described above could cause fluctuations in the trading price of our common stock, based on temporary or
speculative market perceptions or other factors that do not necessarily reflect the underlying fundamentals and prospects of our business.
NUCLEAR GENERATION RISKS
Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida may incur substantial costs and liabilities due to their ownership
and operation of nuclear generating facilities.
Ownership interests in and operation of nuclear stations by Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida subject them to
various risks. These risks include, among other things: the potential harmful effects on the environment and human health resulting from the current
or past operation of nuclear facilities and the storage, handling and disposal of radioactive materials; limitations on the amounts and types of
insurance commercially available to cover losses that might arise in connection with nuclear operations; and uncertainties with respect to the
technological and financial aspects of decommissioning nuclear plants at the end of their licensed lives.
Ownership and operation of nuclear generation facilities requires compliance with licensing and safety-related requirements imposed by the NRC. In
the event of non-compliance, the NRC may increase regulatory oversight, impose fines or shut down a unit depending upon its assessment of the
severity of the situation. Revised security and safety requirements promulgated by the NRC, which could be prompted by, among other things, events
within or outside of the control of Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida, such as a serious nuclear incident at a
facility owned by a third party, could necessitate substantial capital and other expenditures, as well as assessments to cover third-party losses. In
addition, if a serious nuclear incident were to occur, it could have a material adverse effect on the results of operations, financial position, cash flows
and reputation of the Duke Energy Registrants.
LIQUIDITY, CAPITAL REQUIREMENTS AND COMMON STOCK RISKS
The Duke Energy Registrants rely on access to short-term borrowings and longer-term debt and equity markets to finance their capital
requirements and support their liquidity needs. Access to those markets can be adversely affected by a number of conditions, many of
which are beyond the Duke Energy Registrants’ control.
The Duke Energy Registrants’ businesses are significantly financed through issuances of debt and equity. The maturity and repayment profile of debt
used to finance investments often does not correlate to cash flows from their assets. Accordingly, as a source of liquidity for capital requirements not
satisfied by the cash flows from their operations and to fund investments originally financed through debt instruments with disparate maturities, the
Duke Energy Registrants rely on access to short-term money markets as well as longer-term capital markets. The Subsidiary Registrants also rely on
access to short-term intercompany borrowings. If the Duke Energy Registrants are not able to access debt or equity at competitive rates or at all, the
ability to finance their operations and implement their strategy and business plan as scheduled could be adversely affected. An inability to access
debt and equity may limit the Duke Energy Registrants’ ability to pursue improvements or acquisitions that they may otherwise rely on for future
growth.
Market disruptions may increase the cost of borrowing or adversely affect the ability to access one or more financial markets. Such disruptions could
include: economic downturns, the bankruptcy of an unrelated energy company, unfavorable capital market conditions, market prices for electricity and
natural gas, the generation mix of individual utilities, actual or threatened terrorist attacks, or the overall health of the energy industry. The availability
of credit under Duke Energy’s Master Credit Facility depends upon the ability of the banks providing commitments under the facility to provide funds
when their obligations to do so arise. Systemic risk of the banking system and the financial markets could prevent a bank from meeting its obligations
under the facility agreement.
Duke Energy maintains a revolving credit facility to provide backup for its commercial paper program and letters of credit to support variable rate
demand tax-exempt bonds that may be put to the Duke Energy Registrant issuer at the option of the holder. The facility includes borrowing sublimits
for the Duke Energy Registrants, each of whom is a party to the credit facility, and financial covenants that limit the amount of debt that can be
outstanding as a percentage of the total capital for the specific entity. Failure to maintain these covenants at a particular entity could preclude Duke
Energy from issuing commercial paper or the Duke Energy Registrants from issuing letters of credit or borrowing under the Master Credit Facility.
The Duke Energy Registrants must meet credit quality standards and there is no assurance they will maintain investment grade credit
ratings. If the Duke Energy Registrants are unable to maintain investment grade credit ratings, they would be required under credit
agreements to provide collateral in the form of letters of credit or cash, which may materially adversely affect their liquidity.
Each of the Duke Energy Registrants’ senior long-term debt issuances is currently rated investment grade by various rating agencies. The Duke
Energy Registrants cannot ensure their senior long-term debt will be rated investment grade in the future.
If the rating agencies were to rate the Duke Energy Registrants below investment grade, borrowing costs would increase, perhaps significantly. In
addition, the potential pool of investors and funding sources would likely decrease. Further, if the short-term debt rating were to fall, access to the
commercial paper market could be significantly limited.
A downgrade below investment grade could also require the posting of additional collateral in the form of letters of credit or cash under various credit,
commodity and capacity agreements and trigger termination clauses in some interest rate derivative agreements, which would require cash
payments. All of these events would likely reduce the Duke Energy Registrants’ liquidity and profitability and could have a material effect on their
results of operations, financial position and cash flows.
Non-compliance with debt covenants or conditions could adversely affect the Duke Energy Registrants’ ability to execute future
borrowings.
The Duke Energy Registrants’ debt and credit agreements contain various financial and other covenants. Failure to meet those covenants beyond
applicable grace periods could result in accelerated due dates and/or termination of the agreements.
31
RISK FACTORS
Market performance and other changes may decrease the value of the NDTF investments of Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress
and Duke Energy Florida, which then could require significant additional funding.
Ownership and operation of nuclear generation facilities also requires the maintenance of funded trusts that are intended to pay for the
decommissioning costs of the respective nuclear power plants. The performance of the capital markets affects the values of the assets held in trust to
satisfy these future obligations. Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida have significant obligations in this area and
hold significant assets in these trusts. These assets are subject to market fluctuations and will yield uncertain returns, which may fall below projected
rates of return. Although a number of factors impact funding requirements, a decline in the market value of the assets may increase the funding
requirements of the obligations for decommissioning nuclear plants. If Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida are
unable to successfully manage their NDTF assets, their results of operations, financial position and cash flows could be negatively affected.
Poor investment performance of the Duke Energy pension plan holdings and other factors impacting pension plan costs could
unfavorably impact the Duke Energy Registrants’ liquidity and results of operations.
The costs of providing non-contributory defined benefit pension plans are dependent upon a number of factors, such as the rates of return on plan
assets, discount rates, the level of interest rates used to measure the required minimum funding levels of the plans, future government regulation and
required or voluntary contributions made to the plans. The Subsidiary Registrants are allocated their proportionate share of the cost and obligations
related to these plans. Without sustained growth in the pension investments over time to increase the value of plan assets and, depending upon the
other factors impacting costs as listed above, Duke Energy could be required to fund its plans with significant amounts of cash. Such cash funding
obligations, and the Subsidiary Registrants’ proportionate share of such cash funding obligations, could have a material impact on the Duke Energy
Registrants’ results of operations, financial position and cash flows.
Duke Energy is a holding company and depends on the cash flows from its subsidiaries to meet its financial obligations.
Because Duke Energy is a holding company with no operations or cash flows of its own, its ability to meet its financial obligations, including making
interest and principal payments on outstanding indebtedness and to pay dividends on its common stock, is primarily dependent on the net income
and cash flows of its subsidiaries and the ability of those subsidiaries to pay upstream dividends or to repay borrowed funds. Prior to funding Duke
Energy, its subsidiaries have regulatory restrictions and financial obligations that must be satisfied. These subsidiaries are separate legal entities and
have no obligation to provide Duke Energy with funds. In addition, Duke Energy may provide capital contributions or debt financing to its subsidiaries
under certain circumstances, which would reduce the funds available to meet its financial obligations, including making interest and principal
payments on outstanding indebtedness and to pay dividends on Duke Energy’s common stock.
GENERAL RISKS
The failure of Duke Energy information technology systems, or the failure to enhance existing information technology systems and
implement new technology, could adversely affect the Duke Energy Registrants’ businesses.
Duke Energy’s operations are dependent upon the proper functioning of its internal systems, including the information technology systems that
support our underlying business processes. Any significant failure or malfunction of such information technology systems may result in disruptions of
our operations. In the ordinary course of business, we rely on information technology systems, including the internet and third-party hosted services,
to support a variety of business processes and activities and to store sensitive data, including (i) intellectual property, (ii) proprietary business
information, (iii) personally identifiable information of our customers, employees, retirees and shareholders and (iv) data with respect to invoicing and
the collection of payments, accounting, procurement, and supply chain activities. Our information technology systems are dependent upon global
communications and cloud service providers, as well as their respective vendors, many of whom have at some point experienced significant system
failures and outages in the past and may experience such failures and outages in the future. These providers’ systems are susceptible to
cybersecurity and data breaches, outages from fire, floods, power loss, telecommunications failures, break-ins and similar events. Failure to prevent
or mitigate data loss from system failures or outages could materially affect the results of operations, financial position and cash flows of the Duke
Energy Registrants.
In addition to maintaining our current information technology systems, Duke Energy believes the digital transformation of its business is key to driving
internal efficiencies as well as providing additional capabilities to customers. Duke Energy’s information technology systems are critical to cost-
effective, reliable daily operations and our ability to effectively serve our customers. We expect our customers to continue to demand more
sophisticated technology-driven solutions and we must enhance or replace our information technology systems in response. This involves significant
development and implementation costs to keep pace with changing technologies and customer demand. If we fail to successfully implement critical
technology, or if it does not provide the anticipated benefits or meet customer demands, such failure could materially adversely affect our business
strategy as well as impact the results of operations, financial position and cash flows of the Duke Energy Registrants.
Potential terrorist activities, or military or other actions, could adversely affect the Duke Energy Registrants’ businesses.
The continued threat of terrorism and the impact of retaliatory military and other action by the U.S. and its allies may lead to increased political,
economic and financial market instability and volatility in prices for natural gas and oil, which may have material adverse effects in ways the Duke
Energy Registrants cannot predict at this time. In addition, future acts of terrorism and possible reprisals as a consequence of action by the U.S. and
its allies could be directed against companies operating in the U.S. Information technology systems, transportation systems for our fuel sources
including natural gas pipelines, transmission and distribution and generation facilities such as nuclear plants could be potential targets of terrorist
activities or harmful activities by individuals or groups that could have a material adverse effect on Duke Energy Registrants' businesses. In particular,
the Duke Energy Registrants may experience increased capital and operating costs to implement increased security for their information technology
systems, transmission and distribution and generation facilities, including nuclear power plants under the NRC’s design basis threat requirements.
These increased costs could include additional physical plant security and security personnel or additional capability following a terrorist incident.
32
RISK FACTORS
Failure to attract and retain an appropriately qualified workforce could unfavorably impact the Duke Energy Registrants’ results of
operations.
Certain events, such as an aging workforce, mismatch of skill set or complement to future needs, or unavailability of contract resources may lead to
operating challenges and increased costs. The challenges include lack of resources, loss of knowledge base and the lengthy time required for skill
development. In this case, costs, including costs for contractors to replace employees, productivity costs and safety costs, may increase. Failure to
hire and adequately train replacement employees, including the transfer of significant internal historical knowledge and expertise to new employees,
or future availability and cost of contract labor may adversely affect the ability to manage and operate the business, especially considering the
workforce needs associated with nuclear generation facilities and new skills required to operate a modernized, technology-enabled power grid. If the
Duke Energy Registrants are unable to successfully attract and retain an appropriately qualified workforce, their results of operations, financial
position and cash flows could be negatively affected.
ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS
None.
33
PROPERTIES
ITEM 2. PROPERTIES
ELECTRIC UTILITIES AND INFRASTRUCTURE
The following table provides information related to the Electric Utilities and Infrastructure's generation stations as of December 31, 2021. The MW
displayed in the table below are based on summer capacity. Ownership interest in all facilities is 100% unless otherwise indicated.
Owned MW
Facility Plant Type Primary Fuel Location Capacity
Duke Energy Carolinas
Oconee Nuclear Uranium SC 2,554 
McGuire Nuclear Uranium NC 2,316 
Catawba Nuclear Uranium SC 445 
Belews Creek Fossil Coal/Gas NC 2,220 
Marshall Fossil Coal/Gas NC 2,058 
J.E. Rogers Fossil Coal/Gas NC 1,388 
Lincoln Combustion Turbine (CT) Fossil Gas/Oil NC 1,161 
Allen Fossil Coal NC 840 
Rockingham CT Fossil Gas/Oil NC 825 
W.S. Lee Combined Cycle (CC) Fossil Gas SC 686 
Buck CC Fossil Gas NC 668 
Dan River CC Fossil Gas NC 662 
Mill Creek CT Fossil Gas/Oil SC 563 
W.S. Lee Fossil Gas SC 170 
W.S. Lee CT Fossil Gas/Oil SC 84 
Clemson CHP Fossil Gas SC 13 
Bad Creek Hydro Water SC 1,520 
Jocassee Hydro Water SC 780 
Cowans Ford Hydro Water NC 324 
Keowee Hydro Water SC 152 
Other small facilities (19 plants) Hydro Water NC/SC 581 
Distributed generation Renewable Solar NC 71 
Total Duke Energy Carolinas 20,081 
Owned MW
Facility Plant Type Primary Fuel Location Capacity
Duke Energy Progress
Brunswick Nuclear Uranium NC 1,870 
Harris Nuclear Uranium NC 964 
Robinson Nuclear Uranium SC 759 
Roxboro Fossil Coal NC 2,439 
Smith CC Fossil Gas/Oil NC 1,083 
H.F. Lee CC Fossil Gas/Oil NC 888 
Wayne County CT Fossil Gas/Oil NC 822 
Smith CT Fossil Gas/Oil NC 772 
Mayo Fossil Coal NC 704 
L.V. Sutton CC Fossil Gas/Oil NC 607 
Asheville CC Fossil Gas/Oil NC 476 
Asheville CT Fossil Gas/Oil NC 320 
Darlington CT Fossil Gas/Oil SC 234 
Weatherspoon CT Fossil Gas/Oil NC 124 
L.V. Sutton CT (Black Start) Fossil Gas/Oil NC 84 
Blewett CT Fossil Oil NC 52 
Walters Hydro Water NC 112 
Other small facilities (3) Hydro Water NC 116 
Distributed generation Renewable Solar NC 35 
Asheville – Rock Hill Battery Renewable Storage NC 7 
Total Duke Energy Progress 12,468 (a)
(b)
34
PROPERTIES
Owned MW
Facility Plant Type Primary Fuel Location Capacity
Duke Energy Florida
Hines CC Fossil Gas/Oil FL 2,061 
Citrus County CC Fossil Gas FL 1,610 
Crystal River Fossil Coal FL 1,410 
Bartow CC Fossil Gas/Oil FL 1,112 
Anclote Fossil Gas FL 1,013 
Intercession City CT Fossil Gas/Oil FL 931 
Osprey CC Fossil Gas/Oil FL 583 
DeBary CT Fossil Gas/Oil FL 524 
Tiger Bay CC Fossil Gas/Oil FL 193 
Bayboro CT Fossil Oil FL 171 
Bartow CT Fossil Gas/Oil FL 168 
Suwannee River CT Fossil Gas FL 145 
University of Florida CoGen CT Fossil Gas FL 44 
Distributed generation Renewable Solar FL 323 
Total Duke Energy Florida 10,288 
Owned MW
Facility Plant Type Primary Fuel Location Capacity
Duke Energy Ohio
East Bend Fossil Coal KY 600 
Woodsdale CT Fossil Gas/Propane OH 476 
Total Duke Energy Ohio 1,076 
Owned MW
Facility Plant Type Primary Fuel Location Capacity
Duke Energy Indiana
Gibson Fossil Coal IN 2,822 
Cayuga Fossil Coal/Oil IN 1,005 
Edwardsport Fossil Coal IN 595 
Madison CT Fossil Gas OH 566 
Wheatland CT Fossil Gas IN 444 
Vermillion CT Fossil Gas IN 360 
Noblesville CC Fossil Gas/Oil IN 264 
Henry County CT Fossil Gas/Oil IN 129 
Cayuga CT Fossil Gas/Oil IN 84 
Markland Hydro Water IN 54 
Distributed generation Renewable Solar IN 11 
Camp Atterbury Battery Renewable Storage IN 4 
Nabb Battery Renewable Storage IN 4 
Crane Battery Renewable Storage IN 4 
Total Duke Energy Indiana 6,346 
Owned MW
Totals by Type Capacity
Total Electric Utilities 50,259 
Totals by Plant Type
Nuclear 8,908 
Fossil 37,252 
Hydro 3,639 
Renewable 460 
Total Electric Utilities 50,259 (c)
(d)
(e)
35
PROPERTIES
(a) Jointly owned with North Carolina Municipal Power Agency Number 1, NCEMC and PMPA. Duke Energy Carolinas' ownership is 19.25% of
the facility.
(b) Jointly owned with NCEMC. Duke Energy Carolinas' ownership is 87.27% of the facility.
(c) Duke Energy Indiana owns and operates Gibson Station Units 1 through 4 and is a joint owner of unit 5 with WVPA and IMPA. Duke
Energy Indiana operates unit 5 and owns 50.05%.
(d) Includes Cayuga Internal Combustion.
(e) Jointly owned with WVPA. Duke Energy Indiana's ownership is 62.5% of the facility.
The following table provides information related to Electric Utilities and Infrastructure's electric transmission and distribution properties as of
December 31, 2021.
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Energy Energy Energy Energy
Energy Carolinas Progress Florida Ohio Indiana
Electric Transmission Lines
Miles of 500 to 525 kilovolt (kV) 1,100 600 300 200 — — 
Miles of 345 kV 1,100 — — — 400 700 
Miles of 230 kV 8,500 2,700 3,400 1,700 — 700 
Miles of 100 to 161 kV 12,400 6,800 2,600 900 700 1,400 
Miles of 13 to 69 kV 8,200 2,900 — 2,200 600 2,500 
Total conductor miles of electric transmission lines 31,300 13,000 6,300 5,000 1,700 5,300 
Electric Distribution Lines
Miles of overhead lines 173,400 66,600 46,400 25,200 13,300 21,900 
Miles of underground line 109,800 40,000 32,600 21,500 6,300 9,400 
Total conductor miles of electric distribution lines 283,200 106,600 79,000 46,700 19,600 31,300 
Number of electric transmission and distribution substations 3,000 1,200 500 500 500 300 
Substantially all of Electric Utilities and Infrastructure's electric plant in service is mortgaged under indentures relating to Duke Energy Carolinas’,
Duke Energy Progress', Duke Energy Florida's, Duke Energy Ohio’s and Duke Energy Indiana’s various series of First Mortgage Bonds.
GAS UTILITIES AND INFRASTRUCTURE
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure owns transmission pipelines and distribution mains that are generally underground, located near public streets and
highways, or on property owned by others for which Duke Energy Ohio and Piedmont have obtained the necessary legal rights to place and operate
facilities on such property located within the Gas Utilities and Infrastructure service territories. The following table provides information related to Gas
Utilities and Infrastructure's natural gas distribution.
Duke
Duke Energy
Energy Ohio Piedmont
Miles of natural gas distribution and transmission pipelines 34,800 7,500 27,300 
Miles of natural gas service lines 27,700 6,500 21,200 
36
PROPERTIES
COMMERCIAL RENEWABLES
The following table provides information related to Commercial Renewables' electric generation facilities as of December 31, 2021. The MW
displayed in the table below are based on nameplate capacity.
Owned MW Ownership
Facility Plant Type Primary FuelLocation Capacity Interest (%)
Commercial Renewables – Wind
Los Vientos (five sites) Renewable Wind TX 465 51 %
Frontier Windpower II Renewable Wind OK 352 100 %
Mesteno Renewable Wind TX 202 100 %
Maryneal Renewable Wind TX 182 100 %
Sweetwater IV Renewable Wind TX 113 47 %
Frontier Windpower Renewable Wind OK 103 51 %
Top of the World Renewable Wind WY 102 51 %
Notrees Renewable Wind TX 78 51 %
Mesquite Creek Renewable Wind TX 54 26 %
Campbell Hill Renewable Wind WY 50 51 %
Ironwood Renewable Wind KS 43 26 %
Sweetwater V Renewable Wind TX 38 47 %
North Allegheny Renewable Wind PA 36 51 %
Laurel Hill Renewable Wind PA 35 51 %
Cimarron II Renewable Wind KS 34 26 %
Kit Carson Renewable Wind CO 26 51 %
Silver Sage Renewable Wind WY 21 51 %
Happy Jack Renewable Wind WY 15 51 %
Shirley Renewable Wind WI 10 51 %
Total Renewables – Wind 1,959 
Owned MW Ownership
Facility Plant TypePrimary FuelLocation Capacity Interest (%)
Commercial Renewables – Solar
Holstein Renewable Solar TX 200 100 %
Rambler Renewable Solar TX 200 100 %
North Rosamond Renewable Solar CA 150 100 %
Pflugerville Renewable Solar TX 144 100 %
Lapetus Renewable Solar TX 100 100 %
Conetoe II Renewable Solar NC 80 100 %
Palmer Renewable Solar CO 60 100 %
Broad River Renewable Solar NC 50 100 %
Seville I & II Renewable Solar CA 34 67 %
Rio Bravo I & II Renewable Solar CA 27 67 %
Wildwood I & II Renewable Solar CA 23 67 %
Speedway Renewable Solar NC 23 100 %
Kelford Renewable Solar NC 22 100 %
Dogwood Renewable Solar NC 20 100 %
Halifax Airport Renewable Solar NC 20 100 %
Pasquotank Renewable Solar NC 20 100 %
Shawboro Renewable Solar NC 20 100 %
Caprock Renewable Solar NM 17 67 %
Creswell Alligood Renewable Solar NC 14 100 %
Pumpjack Renewable Solar CA 13 67 %
Longboat Renewable Solar CA 13 67 %
Shoreham Renewable Solar NY 13 51 %
Washington White Post Renewable Solar NC 12 100 %
Whitakers Renewable Solar NC 12 100 %
Highlander I & II Renewable Solar CA 11 51 %
Other small solar Renewable Solar Various 233 Various
Total Renewables – Solar 1,531 (a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
37
PROPERTIES
Owned MW Ownership
Facility Plant TypePrimary FuelLocation Capacity Interest (%)
Commercial Renewables – Fuel Cells Renewable Fuel Cell Various 44 100 %
Total Renewables – Fuel Cells 44 
Owned MW Ownership
Facility Plant TypePrimary FuelLocation Capacity Interest (%)
Commercial Renewables – Energy Storage
Notrees Battery Storage Renewable Storage TX 18 51 %
Beckjord Battery Storage Renewable Storage OH 2 100 %
Total Renewables – Energy Storage 20 
Owned MW
Totals by Type Capacity
Wind 1,959 
Solar 1,531 
Fuel Cells 44 
Energy Storage 20 
Total Commercial Renewables 3,554 
(a)     Certain projects, including projects within Other small solar, are in tax-equity structures where investors have differing interests in the project's
economic attributes. 100% of the tax-equity project's capacity is included in the table above.
(b)    Net proportion of MW capacity in operation is 4,729, which represents the amount managed or owned by Duke Energy.
OTHER
Duke Energy owns approximately 8 million square feet and, after exiting the Duke Energy Center in 2021, leases approximately 1.5 million square
feet of corporate, regional and district office space spread throughout its service territories. See Note 10, "Property, Plant and Equipment," for further
information.
ITEM 3. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS
For information regarding legal proceedings, including regulatory and environmental matters, see Note 3, “Regulatory Matters,” and Note 4,
“Commitments and Contingencies,” to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
MTBE Litigation
On December 15, 2017, the state of Maryland filed suit in Baltimore City Circuit Court against Duke Energy Merchants and other defendants alleging
contamination of state waters by MTBE leaking from gasoline storage tanks. MTBE is a gasoline additive intended to increase the oxygen levels in
gasoline and make it burn cleaner. The case was removed from Baltimore City Circuit Court to federal District Court. Initial motions to dismiss filed by
the defendants were denied by the court on September 4, 2019, and the matter is now in discovery. On December 18, 2020, the plaintiff and
defendants selected 50 focus sites, none of which have any ties to Duke Energy Merchants. Discovery will be specific to those sites. At this time,
Duke Energy Merchants has not engaged in settlement negotiations with the plaintiff and the plaintiff has not reached a settlement agreement with
any defendant. Duke Energy cannot predict the outcome of this matter.
ITEM 4. MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES
This is not applicable for any of the Duke Energy Registrants.(a)
(b)
38
SECURITIES INFORMATION
ITEM 5. MARKET FOR REGISTRANT'S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND ISSUER
PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES
The common stock of Duke Energy is listed and traded on the NYSE (ticker symbol DUK). As of January 31, 2022, there were 131,590 Duke Energy
common stockholders of record. For information on dividends, see the "Dividend Payments" section of Management's Discussion and Analysis.
There is no market for the common equity securities of the Subsidiary Registrants, all of which are directly or indirectly owned by Duke Energy. See
Note 1, "Summary of Significant Accounting Policies," to the Consolidated Financial Statements for information on the 2021 investment of a minority
interest in Duke Energy Indiana.
Securities Authorized for Issuance Under Equity Compensation Plans
See Item 12 of Part III within this Annual Report for information regarding Securities Authorized for Issuance Under Equity Compensation Plans.
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities for Fourth Quarter 2021
There were no repurchases of equity securities during the fourth quarter of 2021.
Stock Performance Graph
The following performance graph compares the cumulative TSR from Duke Energy Corporation common stock, as compared with the Standard &
Poor's 500 Stock Index (S&P 500) and the Philadelphia Utility Index for the past five years. The graph assumes an initial investment of $100 on
December 31, 2016, in Duke Energy common stock, in the S&P 500 and in the Philadelphia Utility Index and that all dividends were reinvested. The
stockholder return shown below for the five-year historical period may not be indicative of future performance.
NYSE CEO Certification
Duke Energy has filed the certification of its Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of
2002 as exhibits to this Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2021.
ITEM 6. SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA
This is not applicable for any of the Duke Energy Registrants.
39
MD&A DUKE ENERGY
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF
OPERATIONS
Management’s Discussion and Analysis includes financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP in the U.S., as well as certain non-GAAP
financial measures such as adjusted earnings and adjusted EPS discussed below. Generally, a non-GAAP financial measure is a numerical measure
of financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes (or includes) amounts that are included in (or excluded from) the most directly
comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP. The non-GAAP financial measures should be viewed as a supplement to,
and not a substitute for, financial measures presented in accordance with GAAP. Non-GAAP measures as presented herein may not be comparable
to similarly titled measures used by other companies.
The following combined Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations is separately filed by Duke Energy
Corporation and its subsidiaries. Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC, Progress Energy, Inc., Duke Energy Progress, LLC, Duke Energy Florida, LLC, Duke
Energy Ohio, Inc., Duke Energy Indiana, LLC and Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc. However, none of the registrants make any representation as
to information related solely to Duke Energy or the subsidiary registrants of Duke Energy other than itself.
Management’s Discussion and Analysis should be read in conjunction with the Consolidated Financial Statements and Notes for the years ended
December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019.
See "Item 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations," in Duke Energy's Annual Report on Form 10-
K for the year ended December 31, 2020, filed with the SEC on February 25, 2021, for a discussion of variance drivers for the year ended
December 31, 2020, as compared to December 31, 2019.
DUKE ENERGY
Duke Energy is an energy company headquartered in Charlotte, North Carolina. Duke Energy operates in the U.S. primarily through its direct and
indirect subsidiaries, Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Florida, Duke Energy Ohio, Duke Energy Indiana and Piedmont.
When discussing Duke Energy’s consolidated financial information, it necessarily includes the results of the Subsidiary Registrants, which along with
Duke Energy, are collectively referred to as the Duke Energy Registrants.
Executive Overview
At Duke Energy the fundamentals of our business are strong and allow us to deliver growth in earnings and dividends in a low-risk, predictable and
transparent way. In 2021, we continued to make progress, meeting our near-term financial commitments, executing on strategic priorities, and
continuing to provide safe and reliable service while managing the ongoing impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic.
In 2021, we continued to position the company for sustainable long-term growth, working with stakeholders to achieve comprehensive bipartisan
energy legislation in North Carolina, executing an important North Carolina coal ash settlement agreement, and closing the first phase of the $2
billion investment of a minority interest in Duke Energy Indiana. We remain focused on executing on our clean energy transformation and a business
portfolio that will deliver a reliable and growing dividend with 2021 representing the 95th consecutive year Duke Energy paid a cash dividend on its
common stock.
Financial Results
(a) See Results of Operations below for Duke Energy’s definition of adjusted earnings and adjusted EPS as well as a reconciliation of this non-
GAAP financial measure to net income available to Duke Energy and net income available to Duke Energy per basic share.
40
MD&A DUKE ENERGY
Duke Energy's 2021 Net Income Available to Duke Energy Corporation (GAAP Reported Earnings) were impacted by favorable rate case outcomes
and improved volumes offset by charges which management believes are not indicative of ongoing performance, including impairments related to
workplace and workforce realignment and regulatory settlements. See “Results of Operations” below for a detailed discussion of the consolidated
results of operations and a detailed discussion of financial results for each of Duke Energy’s reportable business segments, as well as Other.
2021 Areas of Focus and Accomplishments
Clean Energy Transformation. Our industry has been undergoing an incredible transformation and 2021 was a watershed year for our company
where we executed on strategic priorities and delivered on our vision.
Coal Ash Settlement
In January 2021, we reached an agreement with the North Carolina Attorney General, the North Carolina Public Staff, and the Sierra Club on costs
related to coal ash management and safe basin closure, resolving the last remaining major issues on coal ash management in North Carolina. This
settlement is significant as it resolves pending issues in the multiyear coal ash basin closure debate in North Carolina, which is critical for paving the
way toward our clean energy future. The agreement brought financial clarity to approximately $9 billion of mitigation costs, supporting coal ash cost
recovery in North Carolina for Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress with a rate of return for the company. We agreed to reduce North
Carolina customers’ costs by approximately $1 billion, while maintaining our ability to achieve our long-term financial goals and our transition to
cleaner energy. The settlement agreement resolved all coal ash prudence and cost recovery issues in connection with the 2019 rate cases filed by
Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress with the NCUC, as well as the equitable sharing issue on remand from the 2017 Duke Energy
Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress North Carolina rate cases.
Minority Interest Investment in Duke Energy Indiana
In a significant move to support the company’s path to net-zero strategy, in September 2021 we completed the first phase of the investment of a
19.9% minority interest in Duke Energy Indiana by an affiliate of GIC, transferring 11.05% ownership interest in exchange for approximately $1.025
billion. The proceeds from the two-phase $2.05 billion investment are expected to partially fund the company’s $63 billion capital and investment
expenditure plan. This plan includes grid improvement, investments in clean energy and an improved customer experience – keys to our strategy to
reduce carbon emissions from electricity generation to net-zero by 2050.
North Carolina Energy Legislation
In October 2021, North Carolina House Bill 951 was signed into law after legislative leaders announced bipartisan support for and the General
Assembly passed this new legislation. House Bill 951 reflects new state policy that would accelerate a clean energy transition for generation serving
customers in the Carolinas, including providing a framework for a goal of 70% carbon reduction in electric generation in the state from 2005 levels by
2030 and carbon neutrality by 2050 while continuing to prioritize affordability and reliability for our customers, who are located in North Carolina and
South Carolina. The legislation establishes a framework overseen by the NCUC to advance state CO emission reductions through the use of least
cost planning, including stakeholder involvement, and also introduces modernized recovery mechanisms, including multiyear rate plans, that promote
more efficient recovery of investments and align incentives between the company and the state’s energy policy objectives.
Generating Cleaner Energy
We’re targeting energy generated from coal to represent less than 5% by 2030 and a full exit by 2035, subject to regulatory approvals. We’ve made
strong progress to date in reducing carbon emissions from electricity generation (a 44% reduction from 2005) and have committed to do more (at
least 50% reduction by 2030 and net-zero by 2050). We’ve filed and refined comprehensive IRPs consistent with this strategy in multiple jurisdictions
and updated the enterprise capital plan through 2026 to increase planned investments to $63 billion with over 80% of this capital plan funding
investments in the grid and clean energy transition. The increased capital plan will allow us to accelerate coal plant retirements, make needed grid
investments to enable renewables and energy storage, increase resiliency, and allow for dynamic power flows.
Our commitment for 2030 includes retiring higher-emitting plants, operating our existing carbon-free resources and investing in renewables, our
energy delivery system, and natural gas infrastructure. In 2021, we passed the milestone of 10,000 MW of solar and wind resources and plan to own
or purchase 16,000 MW of renewables by 2025 and 24,000 MW by 2030. In June, we filed an application with the NRC to renew Oconee Nuclear
Station's operating licenses for an additional 20 years and we intend to seek 20-year extensions and renewal of operating licenses for all 11 reactors.
As we look beyond 2030, we will need additional tools to continue our progress. We will work actively to advocate for research and development and
deployment of carbon-free, dispatchable resources. That includes longer-duration energy storage, advanced nuclear technologies, carbon capture
and zero-carbon fuels.
Modernizing the Power Grid and Natural Gas Infrastructure
Our grid improvement programs continue to be a key component of our growth strategy. Modernization of the electric grid, including smart meters,
storm hardening, self-healing and targeted undergrounding, helps to ensure the system is better prepared for severe weather, improves the system's
reliability and flexibility, and provides better information and services for customers. We continue to expand our self-optimizing grid capabilities, and in
2021, smart, self-healing technologies helped to avoid more than 700,000 extended customer outages across our six-state electric service area,
saving customers more than 1.2 million hours of lost outage time. We added 60 new self-healing networks in 2021 across our six-state service area
and upgraded many existing systems to improve their smart capabilities and self-healing efficiency. Additionally, we expect to invest $100 million in
electric vehicle charging over the next three years. Duke Energy has a demonstrated track record of driving efficiencies and productivity into the
business and we continue to leverage new technology, digital tools and data analytics across the business in response to a transforming landscape.2
41
MD&A DUKE ENERGY
Recognizing the continued importance of natural gas to our plans, we continue to work toward a net-zero methane emission goal by 2030 related to
our natural gas distribution business. In August 2021, we announced a partnership with Accenture and Microsoft to develop a novel technology
platform with the intent of measuring baseline methane emissions from natural gas distribution systems with a high level of accuracy in near real
time. Once deployed, we expect the use of satellite technology and the new platform will increase the speed of a field response team’s ability to
identify and repair methane leaks along distribution lines and systems.
Constructive Regulatory and Legislative Outcomes. One of our long-term strategic goals is to achieve modernized regulatory constructs in our
jurisdictions. Modernized constructs provide benefits, which include improved earnings and cash flows through more timely recovery of investments,
as well as stable pricing for customers. As highlighted above, House Bill 951 provides the framework for many of these benefits in North Carolina
under the direction of the NCUC. Also, in October 2021, the Southeast Energy Exchange Market (SEEM) received clearance from the FERC. The
new SEEM platform will facilitate sub-hourly, bilateral trading, allowing participants to buy and sell power close to the time the energy is consumed,
utilizing available unreserved transmission. Southeastern electricity customers are expected to see cost, reliability and environmental benefits.
In 2021, we received constructive rate case orders related to our 2019 North Carolina rate cases for both Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy
Progress and also reached constructive settlement agreements in our natural gas businesses in Kentucky, North Carolina, and Tennessee. In
October 2021, Duke Energy Ohio filed a request to review the company’s electric distribution rates. We have a multiyear rate plan in Florida and in
January 2021, we reached a constructive settlement agreement with key consumer groups to bring additional certainty to rates through 2024. In
addition, grid investment riders in the Midwest and Florida enable more timely cost recovery and earnings growth.
Customer Satisfaction. Duke Energy continues to transform the customer experience through our use of customer data to better inform operational
priorities and performance levels. This data-driven approach allows us to identify the investments that are the most important to the customer
experience. We successfully implemented the first three jurisdictional releases of Customer Connect, a new system that consolidates four legacy
billing systems into one customer-service platform, allowing us to deliver the universal experience customers expect. Our work has been recognized
by our customers and we have maintained our above-target performance throughout the year, despite the resumption of standard billing and payment
practices in most jurisdictions.
Operational Excellence, Safety and Reliability. The reliable and safe operation of our power plants, electric distribution system and natural gas
infrastructure in our communities is foundational to our customers, our financial results and our credibility with stakeholders. Our regulated generation
fleet and nuclear sites had strong performance throughout the year and our electric distribution system performed well. The safety of our workforce is
a core value. Our employees delivered strong safety results in 2021, and we are at or near the top of our industry.
Storm activity was limited in our regulated service territories in 2021, but we supported Entergy Louisiana, sending approximately 500 workers to aid
in restoring power after Hurricane Ida. The February winter storm in Texas adversely impacted Duke Energy Renewables’ operations. In addition to
operating at reduced capacity, we were required to purchase power at scarcity pricing levels to meet fixed volume commitments. Enterprisewide
lessons learned were formed immediately following the Texas weather event to identify opportunities to ensure readiness for extreme weather. Our
ability to effectively handle all facets of the 2021 storm response efforts, including navigating ongoing COVID-19 protocols, is a testament to our
team’s extensive preparation and coordination, applying lessons learned from previous storms, and to on-the-ground management throughout the
restoration efforts. Duke Energy has received over 20 Emergency Response Awards since EEI began recognizing storm response in 1998 (including
eight for assisting other utilities, and eight in our service territories over the last decade).
Leading Through COVID-19. COVID-19 continued to impact all that we accomplished in 2021 and demonstrated our resiliency and agility:
• In addition to achieving financial results in the upper half of our original guidance, we have continued our cost-management journey – focused
on driving productivity, increasing flexibility and prioritizing spend based on risk and strategic value to our customers and investors. In 2021, we
maintained approximately $200 million of O&M savings identified during the earliest days of the pandemic. We also have successfully navigated
supply chain challenges and the impacts of inflation. Our procurement teams have created action plans to enhance planning, augment supply,
amend operations and leverage our scale to mitigate these risks to the extent possible.
• Duke Energy kept electricity and natural gas flowing while continuing to voluntarily make significant accommodations for our customers. To
continue to support our customers, we extended the COVID-19 payment flexibility policies we developed in 2020 without compromising our
financial performance. We extended payment arrangements for new arrearages, modified reconnection policies and increased the time
customers had to restructure agreements. We analyzed each state’s regulatory environment to identify additional state-specific solutions. To
better connect customers to federal and state assistance dollars: a dedicated Agency team was created to help local customer assistance
agencies in making pledges for Duke Energy customers; a small team was established to work directly with state and federal agencies; and a
team of “payment navigators” was piloted to work directly with customers to connect them with available assistance dollars in their local
communities.
• We implemented safety procedures designed to provide physical safety for our workers and provided support for our employees. Throughout the
year, we aligned with local, state, and federal policies on COVID-19 protocols.
• In May, we announced that the Duke Energy Plaza, a 40-floor office tower currently under construction in Uptown Charlotte, will become the
company’s new corporate headquarters, allowing us to reduce occupied space in the Charlotte area by approximately 60% to optimize our real
estate footprint. We've rolled out our new hybrid workplace model (WorkSmart) with about 85% of our office-based workforce working in the
WorkSmart model. The WorkSmart team has prepared our buildings to ensure employees return to work safely and have put in place the tools
and technologies needed to ensure the most effective transition.
42
MD&A DUKE ENERGY
Duke Energy Objectives – 2022 and Beyond
Duke Energy will continue to deliver exceptional value to customers, be an integral part of the communities in which we do business and provide
attractive returns to investors. We have an achievable, long-term strategy in place, and it is producing tangible results, yet the industry in which we
operate is becoming more and more dynamic. We are adjusting, where necessary, and accelerating our focus in key areas to ensure the company is
well positioned to be successful for many decades into the future. As we look ahead to 2022, our plans include:
• Continuing to place the customer at the center of all that we do, which includes providing customized products and solutions
• Strengthening our relationships with our stakeholders in the communities in which we operate and invest
• Generating cleaner energy and working to achieve net-zero carbon emissions by 2050 and net-zero methane emissions by 2030
• Modernizing and strengthening a green-enabled energy grid and our natural gas infrastructure
• Maintaining the safety of our communities and employees
• Deploying digital tools across our business
• Working to encourage greenhouse gas emission reductions in our supply chain as we implement the update to our goals to include Scope 2 and
certain Scope 3 emissions in our 2050 net-zero goal. The Scope 3 emissions included in our goal include emissions from upstream fossil fuel
procurement, production of power purchased for resale, and from downstream use of sold products in our natural gas distribution business.
Matters Impacting Future Results
The matters discussed herein could materially impact the future operating results, financial condition and cash flows of the Duke Energy Registrants
and Business Segments.
Regulatory Matters
Coal Ash Costs
Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress have approximately $1.2 billion and $1.4 billion, respectively, in regulatory assets related to coal
ash retirement obligations as of December 31, 2021. Future spending, including amounts recorded for depreciation and liability accretion, is expected
to continue to be deferred. The majority of spend is expected to occur over the next 15-20 years.
Duke Energy Indiana has interpreted the CCR rule to identify the coal ash basin sites impacted and has assessed the amounts of coal ash subject to
the rule and a method of compliance. In 2020, the Hoosier Environmental Council filed a petition challenging the Indiana Department of
Environmental Management's (IDEM) partial approval of five of Duke Energy Indiana’s ash pond site closure plans at Gallagher Station. The petition
does not challenge the other basin closures approved by IDEM at other Indiana stations. Interpretation of the requirements of the CCR rule is subject
to further legal challenges and regulatory approvals, which could result in additional ash basin closure requirements, higher costs of compliance and
greater AROs. Additionally, Duke Energy Indiana has retired facilities that are not subject to the CCR rule. Duke Energy Indiana may incur costs at
these facilities to comply with environmental regulations or to mitigate risks associated with on-site storage of coal ash. Duke Energy Indiana has
approximately $749 million in regulatory assets related to coal ash asset retirement obligations as of December 31, 2021. In January 2022, Duke
Energy Indiana received a letter from the EPA regarding interpretation of the CCR rule. See Note 4 to the Consolidated Financial Statements,
"Commitments and Contingencies" for more information.
MGP
Duke Energy Ohio and other parties have filed with the PUCO a Stipulation and Recommendation that would resolve all open issues regarding
manufactured gas plant remediation costs incurred between 2013 and 2019, including Duke Energy Ohio's request for additional deferral authority
beyond 2019, and the pending issues related to the Tax Act as it relates to Duke Energy Ohio's natural gas operations. These impacts, if approved by
the PUCO, are not expected to have a material impact on Duke Energy Ohio's financial statements. Duke Energy Ohio has approximately $104
million in regulatory assets related to MGP as of December 31, 2021. Failure to approve the Stipulation and Recommendation, disallowance of costs
incurred, failure to complete the work by the deadline or failure to obtain an extension from the PUCO could result in an adverse impact.
For additional information, see Note 3 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Regulatory Matters."
Commercial Renewables
Duke Energy continues to monitor recoverability of renewable merchant plants located in the Electric Reliability Council of Texas West market and in
the PJM West market, due to fluctuating market pricing and long-term forecasted energy prices. Based on the most recent recoverability test, the
carrying value approximated the aggregate estimated future undiscounted cash flows for the assets under review. A continued decline in energy
market pricing or other factors unfavorably impacting the economics would likely result in a future impairment. Duke Energy has approximately
$200 million in property, plant and equipment related to these assets as of December 31, 2021. Impairment of these assets could result in adverse
impacts. For additional information, see Note 10 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Property, Plant and Equipment."
In February 2021, a severe winter storm impacted certain Commercial Renewables assets in Texas. Extreme weather conditions limited the ability for
these solar and wind facilities to generate and sell electricity into the Electric Reliability Council of Texas market. Lost revenues and higher than
expected purchased power costs have negatively impacted the operating results of these generating units. In addition, Duke Energy has been named
in multiple lawsuits arising out of this winter storm. For more information, see Notes 2 and 4 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Business
Segments" and "Commitments and Contingencies," respectively.
43
MD&A DUKE ENERGY
Duke Energy is also monitoring supply chain disruptions, including the cost and availability of key components of planned generating facilities, which
could impact the timing of in-service or economics of commercial renewables projects and may result in adverse impacts on operating results.
Results of Operations
Non-GAAP Measures
Management evaluates financial performance in part based on non-GAAP financial measures, including adjusted earnings and adjusted EPS. These
items represent income from continuing operations available to Duke Energy common stockholders in dollar and per share amounts, adjusted for the
dollar and per share impact of special items. As discussed below, special items include certain charges and credits, which management believes are
not indicative of Duke Energy's ongoing performance. Management believes the presentation of adjusted earnings and adjusted EPS provides useful
information to investors, as it provides them with an additional relevant comparison of Duke Energy’s performance across periods.
Management uses these non-GAAP financial measures for planning and forecasting, and for reporting financial results to the Board of Directors,
employees, stockholders, analysts and investors. Adjusted EPS is also used as a basis for employee incentive bonuses. The most directly
comparable GAAP measures for adjusted earnings and adjusted EPS are GAAP Reported Earnings and EPS Available to Duke Energy Corporation
common stockholders (GAAP Reported EPS), respectively.
Special items included in the periods presented include the following, which management believes do not reflect ongoing costs:
• Workplace and Workforce Realignment represents costs attributable to business transformation, including long-term real estate strategy
changes and workforce realignment.
• Regulatory Settlements represents an impairment charge related to the South Carolina Supreme Court decision on coal ash, insurance
proceeds, the Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress coal ash settlement and the partial settlements in the 2019 North Carolina rate
cases.
• Gas Pipeline Investments represents costs related to the cancellation of the ACP investment and additional exit obligations.
• Severance represents the reversal of 2018 Severance charges, which were deferred as a result of a partial settlement in the Duke Energy
Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress 2019 North Carolina rate cases.
Duke Energy’s adjusted earnings and adjusted EPS may not be comparable to similarly titled measures of another company because other
companies may not calculate the measures in the same manner.
Reconciliation of GAAP Reported Amounts to Adjusted Amounts
The following table presents a reconciliation of adjusted earnings and adjusted EPS to the most directly comparable GAAP measures.
 Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020
(in millions, except per share amounts) Earnings EPS Earnings EPS
GAAP Reported Earnings/EPS $ 3,802 $ 4.94 $ 1,270 $ 1.72 
Adjustments to Reported:
Workplace and Workforce Realignment 148 0.20 — — 
Regulatory Settlements 69 0.09 872 1.19 
Gas Pipeline Investments 15 0.02 1,711 2.32 
Severance — — (75) (0.10)
Discontinued Operations (7) (0.01) (7) (0.01)
Adjusted Earnings/Adjusted EPS $ 4,027 $ 5.24 $ 3,771 $ 5.12 
(a)    Net of tax benefit of $44 million.
(b)    Net of tax benefit of $21 million and tax benefit of $263 million for the years ended December 31, 2021, and 2020, respectively.
(c)    Net of tax benefit of $5 million and tax benefit of $399 million for the years ended December 31, 2021, and 2020, respectively.
(d)    Net of tax expense of $23 million.
Year Ended December 31, 2021, as compared to 2020
GAAP Reported EPS was $4.94 for the year ended December 31, 2021, compared to $1.72 for the year ended December 31, 2020. The increase in
GAAP Reported Earnings/EPS was primarily due to prior year charges related to the cancellation of the ACP pipeline and the CCR Settlement
Agreement filed with the NCUC, partially offset by workplace and workforce realignment costs in the current year.
As discussed and shown in the table above, management also evaluates financial performance based on adjusted EPS. Duke Energy’s adjusted
EPS was $5.24 for the year ended December 31, 2021, compared to $5.12 for the year ended December 31, 2020. The increase in Adjusted
Earnings/Adjusted EPS was primarily due to positive rate case contributions and higher volumes, partially offset by higher operation and
maintenance expenses, lower Commercial Renewables earnings and share dilution from equity issuances.(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
44
MD&A SEGMENT RESULTS
SEGMENT RESULTS
The remaining information presented in this discussion of results of operations is on a GAAP basis. Management evaluates segment performance
based on segment income. Segment income is defined as income from continuing operations net of income attributable to noncontrolling interests
and preferred stock dividends. Segment income includes intercompany revenues and expenses that are eliminated in the Consolidated Financial
Statements.
Duke Energy's segment structure includes the following segments: Electric Utilities and Infrastructure, Gas Utilities and Infrastructure and
Commercial Renewables. The remainder of Duke Energy’s operations is presented as Other. See Note 2 to the Consolidated Financial Statements,
“Business Segments,” for additional information on Duke Energy’s segment structure.
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 Variance
Operating Revenues $ 22,603 $ 21,720 $ 883 
Operating Expenses
Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power 6,332 6,128 204 
Operations, maintenance and other 5,340 5,391 (51)
Depreciation and amortization 4,251 4,068 183 
Property and other taxes 1,233 1,188 45 
Impairment of assets and other charges 204 971 (767)
Total operating expenses 17,360 17,746 (386)
Gains on Sales of Other Assets and Other, net 13 11 2 
Operating Income 5,256 3,985 1,271 
Other Income and Expenses, net 534 344 190 
Interest Expense 1,432 1,320 112 
Income Before Income Taxes 4,358 3,009 1,349 
Income Tax Expense 494 340 154 
Less: Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interest 14 — 14 
Segment Income $ 3,850 $ 2,669 $ 1,181 
Duke Energy Carolinas GWh sales 87,796 84,574 3,222 
Duke Energy Progress GWh sales 66,797 65,240 1,557 
Duke Energy Florida GWh sales 42,422 42,490 (68)
Duke Energy Ohio GWh sales 24,129 23,484 645 
Duke Energy Indiana GWh sales 31,388 30,528 860 
Total Electric Utilities and Infrastructure GWh sales 252,532 246,316 6,216 
Net proportional MW capacity in operation 49,871 50,419 (548)
Year Ended December 31, 2021, as compared to 2020
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure’s variance is due to higher revenues from rate cases in various jurisdictions, higher retail sales volumes and the
prior year coal ash settlement agreement filed with the NCUC, partially offset by an impairment charge related to the South Carolina Supreme Court
decision on coal ash, higher depreciation and amortization and interest expense. The following is a detailed discussion of the variance drivers by line
item.
Operating Revenues. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $420 million increase in retail base rate pricing due to general rate cases in Indiana and North Carolina net of rider impacts as well as
annual increases from the multiyear settlement rate adjustments in Florida;
• a $192 million increase in weather-normal retail sales volumes;
• a $172 million increase in fuel revenues primarily driven by higher sales volumes; and
• a $145 million increase in wholesale revenues primarily due to a prior year coal ash settlement agreement filed with the NCUC.
Partially offset by:
• a $140 million decrease in storm revenues due to full recovery of Hurricane Dorian costs in the prior year.
45
MD&A SEGMENT RESULTS - ELECTRIC UTILITIES AND INFRASTRUCTURE
Operating Expenses. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $767 million decrease in impairment of assets and other charges primarily due to the prior year CCR Settlement Agreement filed with the
NCUC in January 2021, partially offset by the South Carolina Supreme Court decision on coal ash at Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke
Energy Progress in the current year; and
• a $51 million decrease in operations, maintenance and other driven by decreased storm amortization at Duke Energy Florida and lower
COVID-19 costs, partially offset by higher employee-related expenses.
Partially offset by:
• a $204 million increase in fuel used in electric generation and purchased power primarily due to higher sales volumes;
• a $183 million increase in depreciation and amortization primarily due to resolution of rate cases and higher plant in service, partially offset
by lower depreciation related to the extension of the lives of nuclear facilities at Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress; and
• a $45 million increase in property and other taxes primarily due to higher property taxes at Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Ohio
and a prior year sales and use tax refund at Duke Energy Carolinas.
Other Income and Expenses, net. The increase is primarily due to coal ash insurance litigation proceeds at Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke
Energy Progress and lower non-service pension costs.
Interest Expense. The variance was primarily driven by interest expense on excess deferred tax liabilities removed from rate base as a result of the
North Carolina rate cases, debt returns on a lower coal ash regulatory asset balance resulting from the CCR Settlement Agreement as well lower
debt returns resulting from the Indiana rate case.
Income Tax Expense. The increase in tax expense was primarily due to an increase in pretax income, partially offset by an increase in the
amortization of excess deferred taxes.
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 Variance
Operating Revenues $ 2,112 $ 1,748 $ 364 
Operating Expenses
Cost of natural gas 705 460 245 
Operation, maintenance and other 442 430 12 
Depreciation and amortization 303 258 45 
Property and other taxes 120 112 8 
Impairment of assets and other charges 19 7 12 
Total operating expenses 1,589 1,267 322 
Operating Income 523 481 42 
Other Income and Expenses
Equity in earnings (losses) of unconsolidated affiliates 8 (2,017) 2,025 
Other Income and Expenses, net 62 56 6 
Total other income and expenses 70 (1,961) 2,031 
Interest Expense 142 135 7 
Income (Loss) Before Income Taxes 451 (1,615) 2,066 
Income Tax Expense (Benefit) 55 (349) 404 
Segment Income (Loss) $ 396 $ (1,266)$ 1,662 
Piedmont Local Distribution Company (LDC) throughput (Dth) 542,759,891 490,071,039 52,688,852 
Duke Energy Midwest LDC throughput (MCF) 85,787,624 84,160,162 1,627,462 
Year Ended December 31, 2021, as compared to 2020
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure’s results were impacted primarily by the cancellation of the ACP pipeline in the prior year and margin growth, partially
offset by higher depreciation expense. The following is a detailed discussion of the variance drivers by line item.
Operating Revenues. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $245 million increase due to higher natural gas costs passed through to customers, higher volumes and increased off-system sales
natural gas costs;
• a $52 million increase due to base rate increases;
• a $22 million increase due to rider revenues related to the Ohio Capital Expenditure Program (CEP);
46
MD&A SEGMENT RESULTS - GAS UTILITIES AND INFRASTRUCTURE
• a $12 million increase due to customer growth; and
• an $11 million increase due to North Carolina IMR.
Operating Expenses. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $245 million increase in cost of natural gas due to higher natural gas prices, higher volumes and increased off-system sales natural gas
costs;
• a $45 million increase in depreciation due to additional plant in service and depreciation adjustments; and
• a $12 million increase in impairment of assets and other charges related to the propane caverns in Ohio and Kentucky, partially offset by an
impairment of ACP redelivery projects in the prior year.
Equity in earnings (losses) of unconsolidated affiliates. The variance was driven primarily by the cancellation of the ACP pipeline in the prior
year.
Income Tax Expense. The increase in tax expense was primarily due to the cancellation of the ACP pipeline project recorded in the prior year.
Commercial Renewables
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 Variance
Operating Revenues $ 476 $ 502 $ (26)
Operating Expenses
Operation, maintenance and other 342 285 57 
Depreciation and amortization 225 199 26 
Property and other taxes 34 27 7 
Impairment of assets and other charges — 6 (6)
Total operating expenses 601 517 84 
Losses on Sales of Other Assets and Other, net — (1) 1 
Operating Loss (125) (16) (109)
Other Income and Expenses, net (24) 7 (31)
Interest Expense 72 66 6 
Loss Before Income Taxes (221) (75) (146)
Income Tax Benefit (78) (65) (13)
Add: Loss Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests 344 296 48 
Segment Income $ 201 $ 286 $ (85)
Renewable plant production, GWh 10,701 10,204 497 
Net proportional MW capacity in operation 4,729 3,937 792 
(a)    Certain projects are included in tax-equity structures where investors have differing interests in the project's economic attributes. Amounts
shown represent 100% of the tax-equity project's capacity.
Year Ended December 31, 2021, as compared to 2020
Commercial Renewables' results were unfavorable to prior year primarily driven by the impacts from Texas Storm Uri, which resulted in a $35 million
pretax loss, as well as lower earnings from unfavorable wind resource and fewer projects financed with tax equity being placed in service in the
current year.
Operating Revenues. The variance was primarily driven by a $19 million decrease due to lower wind resource and operating downtime, a $15
million decrease for lower market prices in the current year impacting the wind portfolio, and a $4 million decrease due to fewer distributed energy
projects placed into service. This was partially offset by an $8 million increase for market sales in excess of market purchases during Texas Storm Uri
and a $6 million increase due to growth of new projects.
Operating Expenses. The variance was primarily due to $49 million for higher operating expenses, depreciation expense and property tax expense
as a result of the growth in new projects placed in service since prior year, $31 million increase for higher operating expenses attributed to
maintenance at several wind and solar facilities, an $8 million increase for higher engineering and construction costs within the distributed energy
portfolio, and a $2 million increase associated with Texas Storm Uri. This was partially offset by a $6 million decrease related to an impairment charge
in the prior year for a non-contracted wind project.
Other Income and Expenses, net. The variance was primarily driven by a $29 million loss in equity earnings due to the impacts of Texas Storm Uri.
Income Tax Benefit. The increase in the tax benefit was primarily driven by an increase in pretax losses partially offset by an increase in taxes
associated with tax equity investments and a decrease in PTCs generated.
Loss Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests. The variance was primarily driven by the net increase of losses allocated to tax equity members of
$60 million from existing and new projects financed with tax equity, partially offset by a $12 million loss resulting from Texas Storm Uri.(a)
47
MD&A SEGMENT RESULTS - OTHER
Other
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 Variance
Operating Revenues $ 111 $ 97 $ 14 
Operating Expenses 412 12 400 
Losses on Sales of Other Assets and Other, net (1) — (1)
Operating (Loss) Income (302) 85 (387)
Other Income and Expenses, net 121 92 29 
Interest Expense 643 657 (14)
Loss Before Income Taxes (824) (480) (344)
Income Tax Benefit (279) (162) (117)
Less: Net Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests 1 1 — 
Less: Preferred Dividends 106 107 (1)
Net Loss $ (652)$ (426)$ (226)
Year Ended December 31, 2021, as compared to 2020
The higher net loss was driven by asset impairments to optimize the company's real estate portfolio and reduce office space as parts of the business
move to a hybrid and remote workforce strategy as well as a reversal of severance costs in the prior year.
Operating Expenses. The increase in operations, maintenance and other of $248 million was primarily due to a reversal of severance costs in the
prior year and higher obligations to the Duke Energy Foundation in the current year. The increase in impairment of assets and other charges of $132
million was due to asset impairments taken in order to optimize the company's real estate portfolio and reduce office space as parts of the business
move to a hybrid and remote workforce strategy.
Other Income and Expenses, net. The variance was primarily due to higher equity earnings from the NMC investment.
Income Tax Benefit. The increase in the tax benefit was primarily driven by an increase in pretax losses and a reduction of a valuation allowance
relating to a capital loss carryforward, partially offset by lower state tax expense in the prior year.
48
MD&A DUKE ENERGY CAROLINAS
SUBSIDIARY REGISTRANTS
Basis of Presentation
The results of operations and variance discussion for the Subsidiary Registrants is presented in a reduced disclosure format in accordance with
General Instruction (I)(2)(a) of Form 10-K.
DUKE ENERGY CAROLINAS
Results of Operations
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 Variance
Operating Revenues $ 7,102 $ 7,015 $ 87 
Operating Expenses
Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power 1,601 1,682 (81)
Operation, maintenance and other 1,833 1,743 90 
Depreciation and amortization 1,468 1,462 6 
Property and other taxes 320 299 21 
Impairment of assets and other charges 227 476 (249)
Total operating expenses 5,449 5,662 (213)
Gains on Sales of Other Assets and Other, net 2 1 1 
Operating Income 1,655 1,354 301 
Other Income and Expenses, net 270 177 93 
Interest Expense 538 487 51 
Income Before Income Taxes 1,387 1,044 343 
Income Tax Expense 51 88 (37)
Net Income $ 1,336 $ 956 $ 380 
The following table shows the percent changes in GWh sales and average number of customers for Duke Energy Carolinas. The below percentages
for retail customer classes represent billed sales only. Total sales includes billed and unbilled retail sales and wholesale sales to incorporated
municipalities, public and private utilities and power marketers. Amounts are not weather-normalized.
Increase (Decrease) over prior year 2021
Residential sales 4.6 %
General service sales 2.7 %
Industrial sales 5.2 %
Wholesale power sales 4.5 %
Joint dispatch sales 2.8 %
Total sales 3.8 %
Average number of customers 2.3 %
Year Ended December 31, 2021, as compared to 2020
Operating Revenues. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $98 million increase in weather-normal retail sales volumes;
• a $53 million increase in wholesale revenue primarily driven by the CCR Settlement Agreement filed with the NCUC in January 2021;
• a $51 million increase due to higher pricing from the North Carolina retail rate case, net of a return of EDIT to customer; and
• a $13 million increase in retail sales due to more favorable weather.
Partially offset by:
• an $87 million decrease in fuel revenues due to lower prices, partially offset by higher retail sales volumes; and
• a $26 million decrease in rider revenues primarily due to energy efficiency programs.
Operating Expenses. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $249 million decrease in impairment of assets and other charges due to the prior year CCR Settlement Agreement filed with the NCUC in
January 2021, partially offset by the South Carolina Supreme Court decision on coal ash and optimization of the company's real estate
portfolio and reduction of office space as parts of the business move to a hybrid and remote workforce strategy; and
• an $81 million decrease in fuel used in electric generation and purchased power primarily associated with the recovery of fuel expenses,
partially offset by higher natural gas prices and changes in the generation mix.
49
MD&A DUKE ENERGY CAROLINAS
Partially offset by:
• a $90 million increase in operation, maintenance and other expense primarily due to higher employee-related expenses; and
• a $21 million increase in property and other taxes primarily due to property tax valuation adjustments and a prior year sales and use tax
refund, partially offset by sales and use tax refunds in the current year and lower payroll tax due to the CARES Act employee retention
credits.
Other Income and Expense, net. The variance was primarily due to coal ash insurance litigation proceeds and lower non-service pension costs.
Interest Expense. The variance was driven by interest expense on excess deferred tax liabilities removed from rate base as a result of the North
Carolina rate case and debt returns on a lower coal ash regulatory asset balance resulting from the CCR Settlement Agreement.
Income Tax Expense. The decrease in tax expense was primarily due to an increase in the amortization of excess deferred taxes, partially offset by
an increase in pretax income.
PROGRESS ENERGY
Results of Operations
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 Variance
Operating Revenues $ 11,057 $ 10,627 $ 430 
Operating Expenses
Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power 3,584 3,479 105 
Operation, maintenance and other 2,529 2,479 50 
Depreciation and amortization 1,929 1,818 111 
Property and other taxes 542 545 (3)
Impairment of assets and other charges 82 495 (413)
Total operating expenses 8,666 8,816 (150)
Gains on Sales of Other Assets and Other, net 14 9 5 
Operating Income 2,405 1,820 585 
Other Income and Expenses, net 215 129 86 
Interest Expense 794 790 4 
Income Before Income Taxes 1,826 1,159 667 
Income Tax Expense 227 113 114 
Net Income 1,599 1,046 553 
Less: Net Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests 1 1 — 
Net Income Attributable to Parent $ 1,598 $ 1,045 $ 553 
Year Ended December 31, 2021, as compared to 2020
Operating Revenues. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $223 million increase in retail pricing due to the North Carolina rate case and base rate adjustments at Duke Energy Florida related to
annual increases from the 2017 Settlement Agreement and the solar base rate adjustment;
• a $176 million increase in fuel cost recovery driven by higher volumes in the current year and accelerated recovery of retired Crystal River
coal units;
• a $70 million increase in weather-normal retail sales volumes;
• a $58 million increase in wholesale revenues, net of fuel, primarily driven by a prior year coal ash settlement and higher capacity volumes
at Duke Energy Progress, partially offset by a restructured capacity contract at Duke Energy Florida;
• a $25 million increase in other revenues at Duke Energy Florida primarily due to higher transmission revenues and higher customer
charges that were waived due to COVID-19 in the prior year; and
• a $20 million increase in rider revenues at Duke Energy Florida primarily due to increased retail sales volumes.
Partially offset by:
• a $140 million decrease in storm revenues at Duke Energy Florida due to full recovery of Hurricane Dorian costs in the prior year.
Operating Expenses. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $413 million decrease in impairment of assets and other charges primarily due to the prior year CCR Settlement Agreement filed with the
NCUC in January 2021, partially offset by the current year South Carolina Supreme Court decision on coal ash at Duke Energy Progress
and optimization of the company's real estate portfolio and reduction of office space as parts of the business move to a hybrid and remote
workforce strategy.
50
MD&A PROGRESS ENERGY
Partially offset by:
• a $111 million increase in depreciation and amortization primarily due to accelerated depreciation of retired Crystal River coal units and an
increase in plant base at Duke Energy Florida, partially offset by the extension of the lives at nuclear facilities at Duke Energy Progress;
• a $105 million increase in fuel used in electric generation and purchased power primarily due to higher demand, changes in generation mix
and recognition of RECs used for compliance at Duke Energy Progress and outside fuel purchases during a major plant outage; and
• a $50 million increase in operation, maintenance and other expense driven by higher employee-related costs, a prior year severance cost
adjustment related to the 2019 North Carolina retail rate case and outage costs, partially offset by reduced storm amortization at Duke
Energy Florida.
Other Income and Expenses, net. The increase is primarily due to coal ash insurance litigation proceeds at Duke Energy Progress, lower non-
service pension costs and unrealized gains on the nuclear decommissioning trust fund at Duke Energy Florida.
Income Tax Expense. The increase in tax expense was primarily due to an increase in pretax income, partially offset by an increase in the
amortization of excess deferred taxes.
DUKE ENERGY PROGRESS
Results of Operations
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 Variance
Operating Revenues $ 5,780 $ 5,422 $ 358 
Operating Expenses
Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power 1,778 1,743 35 
Operation, maintenance and other 1,467 1,332 135 
Depreciation and amortization 1,097 1,116 (19)
Property and other taxes 159 167 (8)
Impairment of assets and other charges 63 499 (436)
Total operating expenses 4,564 4,857 (293)
Gains on Sales of Other Assets and Other, net 13 8 5 
Operating Income 1,229 573 656 
Other Income and Expenses, net 143 75 68 
Interest Expense 306 269 37 
Income Before Income Taxes 1,066 379 687 
Income Tax Expense (Benefit) 75 (36) 111 
Net Income $ 991 $ 415 $ 576 
The following table shows the percent changes in GWh sales and average number of customers for Duke Energy Progress. The below percentages
for retail customer classes represent billed sales only. Total sales includes billed and unbilled retail sales and wholesale sales to incorporated
municipalities, public and private utilities and power marketers. Amounts are not weather-normalized.
Increase (Decrease) over prior year 2021
Residential sales 6.0 %
General service sales (0.4)%
Industrial sales (7.7)%
Wholesale power sales 4.0 %
Joint dispatch sales (2.2)%
Total sales 2.4 %
Average number of customers 1.5 %
Year Ended December 31, 2021, as compared to 2020
Operating Revenues. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $140 million increase due to higher pricing from the North Carolina retail rate case, net of a return of EDIT to customers;
• an $80 million increase in wholesale revenues, net of fuel, primarily due to a coal ash settlement in the prior year, and higher capacity
volumes, partially offset by lower recovery of coal ash costs;
• a $58 million increase in weather-normal retail sales volumes in the current year;
51
MD&A DUKE ENERGY PROGRESS
• a $44 million increase in retail sales due to more favorable weather; and
• a $14 million increase in fuel cost recovery driven by higher fuel prices and volumes in the current year.
Operating Expenses. The variance was driven primarily by:
•  a $436 million decrease in impairment of assets and other charges primarily due to the prior year CCR Settlement Agreement filed with the
NCUC in January 2021; and
• a $19 million decrease in depreciation and amortization expense, primarily driven by the extension of the lives of nuclear facilities.
Partially offset by:
• a $135 million increase in operation, maintenance and other expense primarily due to higher employee-related costs and a prior year
severance cost adjustment related to the 2019 North Carolina retail rate case, increased outage costs and energy efficiency program costs;
and
• a $35 million increase in fuel used in electric generation and purchased power primarily due to higher demand and changes in generation
mix as well as recognition of RECs used for compliance.
Other Income and Expense, net. The increase is primarily due to coal ash insurance litigation proceeds and lower non-service pension costs.
Interest Expense. The variance was driven by interest expense on excess deferred tax liabilities removed from rate base as a result of the North
Carolina rate case and debt returns on a lower coal ash regulatory asset balance resulting from the CCR Settlement Agreement.
Income Tax Expense. The increase in tax expense was primarily due to an increase in in pretax income, partially offset by the amortization of
excess deferred taxes.
DUKE ENERGY FLORIDA
Results of Operations
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 Variance
Operating Revenues $ 5,259 $ 5,188 $ 71 
Operating Expenses
Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power 1,806 1,737 69 
Operation, maintenance and other 1,048 1,131 (83)
Depreciation and amortization 831 702 129 
Property and other taxes 383 381 2 
Impairment of assets and other charges 19 (4) 23 
Total operating expenses 4,087 3,947 140 
Gains on Sales of Other Assets and Other, net 1 1 — 
Operating Income 1,173 1,242 (69)
Other Income and Expenses, net 71 53 18 
Interest Expense 319 326 (7)
Income Before Income Taxes 925 969 (44)
Income Tax Expense 187 198 (11)
Net Income $ 738 $ 771 $ (33)
The following table shows the percent changes in GWh sales and average number of customers for Duke Energy Florida. The below percentages for
retail customer classes represent billed sales only. Wholesale power sales include both billed and unbilled sales. Total sales includes billed and
unbilled retail sales and wholesale sales to incorporated municipalities, public and private utilities and power marketers. Amounts are not weather-
normalized.
Increase (Decrease) over prior year 2021
Residential sales (1.2)%
General service sales 2.3 %
Industrial sales 4.6 %
Wholesale power sales 22.6 %
Total sales (0.2)%
Average number of customers 1.5 %
52
MD&A DUKE ENERGY FLORIDA
Year Ended December 31, 2021, as compared to 2020
Operating Revenues. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $162 million increase in fuel and capacity revenues primarily due to higher retail sales volumes and accelerated recovery of the retired
coal units Crystal River 1 and 2;
• an $83 million increase in retail pricing due to base rate adjustments related to annual increases from the 2017 Settlement Agreement and
the solar base rate adjustment;
• a $25 million increase in other revenues primarily due to lower revenues in the prior year due to the moratorium on customer late payments
and service charges in response to the COVID-19 pandemic, lower outdoor lighting equipment rentals in the prior year, and higher
transmission revenues due to prior year customer settlement and the increased network billing rates;
• a $20 million increase in rider revenues primarily due to increased volumes; and
• a $12 million increase in weather-normal retail sales volumes.
Partially offset by:
• a $140 million decrease in storm revenues due to full recovery of Hurricane Dorian costs in the prior year;
• a $63 million decrease in retail sales, net of fuel revenues, due to unfavorable weather in the current year; and
• a $22 million decrease in wholesale power revenues, net of fuel, primarily due to a restructured capacity contract.
Operating Expenses. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $129 million increase in depreciation and amortization primarily due to accelerated depreciation of retired coal units Crystal River 1 and 2
and an increase in plant base;
• a $69 million increase in fuel used in electric generation and purchased power primarily due to higher natural gas prices, and outside fuel
purchases during a major plant outage at the Hines facility; and
• a $23 million increase in impairment of assets and other charges to optimize the company's real estate portfolio and reduce office space as
parts of the business move to a hybrid and remote workforce strategy.
Partially offset by:
• an $83 million decrease in operation, maintenance and other expense primarily due to decreased storm amortization costs, partially offset
by outage maintenance costs at Hines and the timing of Customer Connect costs including training and labor.
Other Income and Expense, net. The increase is primarily due to lower non-service pension costs and gains on the nuclear decommissioning trust
fund.
Income Tax Expense. The decrease in tax expense was primarily due to a decrease in pretax income.
53
MD&A DUKE ENERGY OHIO
DUKE ENERGY OHIO
Results of Operations
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 Variance
Operating Revenues
Regulated electric $ 1,493 $ 1,405 $ 88 
Regulated natural gas 544 453 91 
Total operating revenues 2,037 1,858 179 
Operating Expenses
Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power 409 339 70 
Cost of natural gas 136 73 63 
Operation, maintenance and other 479 463 16 
Depreciation and amortization 307 278 29 
Property and other taxes 355 324 31 
Impairment of assets and other charges 25 — 25 
Total operating expenses 1,711 1,477 234 
Gains on Sales of Other Assets and Other, net 1 — 1 
Operating Income 327 381 (54)
Other Income and Expenses, net 18 16 2 
Interest Expense 111 102 9 
Income Before Income Taxes 234 295 (61)
Income Tax Expense 30 43 (13)
Net Income $ 204 $ 252 $ (48)
The following table shows the percent changes in GWh sales of electricity, MCF of natural gas delivered and average number of electric and natural
gas customers for Duke Energy Ohio. The below percentages for retail customer classes represent billed sales only. Total sales includes billed and
unbilled retail sales and wholesale sales to incorporated municipalities, public and private utilities and power marketers. Amounts are not weather-
normalized.
Electric Natural Gas
Increase (Decrease) over prior year 2021 2021
Residential sales 2.7 % — %
General service sales 3.0 % 4.8 %
Industrial sales 4.0 % 3.2 %
Wholesale electric power sales 45.8 % n/a
Other natural gas sales n/a 1.6 %
Total sales 2.7 % 1.9 %
Average number of customers 0.6 % 0.8 %
Year Ended December 31, 2021, as compared to 2020
Operating Revenues. The variance was driven primarily by:
• an $88 million increase in fuel-related revenues primarily due to higher natural gas prices and increased volumes;
• a $35 million increase in revenues related to OVEC collections and OVEC sales into PJM;
• a $22 million increase due to revenues related the Ohio CEP;
• an $18 million increase in PJM transmission revenues as a result of increased capital spend;
• a $12 million increase in retail pricing primarily due to the Duke Energy Kentucky electric general rate case; and
• a $5 million increase in revenues due to favorable weather.
Operating Expenses. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $133 million increase in fuel expense primarily driven by higher retail prices and increased volumes for natural gas and purchased power;
• a $31 million increase in property and other taxes primarily due to increased plant in service, and higher kilowatt and natural gas
distribution taxes due to increased usage;
54
MD&A DUKE ENERGY OHIO
• a $28 million increase in depreciation and amortization primarily driven by an increase in distribution plant in service and decreased Ohio
CEP deferrals; and
• a $25 million increase in impairment of assets and other charges related to the propane caverns in Ohio and Kentucky and other charges
to optimize the company's real estate portfolio and reduce office space as parts of the business move to a hybrid and remote workforce
strategy.
Income Tax Expense. The decrease in tax expense was primarily due to a decrease in pretax income.
DUKE ENERGY INDIANA
Results of Operations
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 Variance
Operating Revenues $ 3,174 $ 2,795 $ 379 
Operating Expenses
Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power 985 767 218 
Operation, maintenance and other 750 762 (12)
Depreciation and amortization 615 569 46 
Property and other taxes 73 81 (8)
Impairment of assets and other charges 9 — 9 
Total operating expenses 2,432 2,179 253 
Operating Income 742 616 126 
Other Income and Expenses, net 42 37 5 
Interest Expense 196 161 35 
Income Before Income Taxes 588 492 96 
Income Tax Expense 107 84 23 
Net Income $ 481 $ 408 $ 73 
The following table shows the percent changes in GWh sales and average number of customers for Duke Energy Indiana. The below percentages for
retail customer classes represent billed sales only. Total sales includes billed and unbilled retail sales and wholesale sales to incorporated
municipalities, public and private utilities and power marketers. Amounts are not weather-normalized.
Increase (Decrease) over prior year 2021
Residential sales 3.0 %
General service sales 4.3 %
Industrial sales 2.9 %
Wholesale power sales 5.8 %
Total sales 2.8 %
Average number of customers 1.1 %
Year Ended December 31, 2021, as compared to 2020
Operating Revenues. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $175 million increase in fuel revenues primarily due to higher fuel cost recovery driven by customer demand and fuel prices;
• a $134 million increase primarily due to higher base rate pricing from the Indiana retail rate case, net of lower rider revenues;
• a $34 million increase in wholesale revenues primarily related to higher rates in the current year;
• a $22 million increase in weather-normal retail sales volumes driven by higher nonresidential customer demand; and
• a $14 million increase in retail sales due to favorable weather in the current year.
Operating Expenses. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $218 million increase in fuel used in electric generation and purchased power expense primarily due to higher natural gas prices and
increased purchased power;
• a $46 million increase in depreciation and amortization primarily due to a change in depreciation rates from the Indiana retail rate case,
amortization of deferred coal ash pond ARO and additional plant in service; and
• a $9 million increase in impairment of assets and other charges to optimize the company’s real estate portfolio and reduce office space as
parts of the business move to a hybrid workforce strategy.
55
MD&A DUKE ENERGY INDIANA
Partially offset by:
• a $12 million decrease in operation, maintenance and other primarily due to major outage costs incurred in the prior year and outage
delays in the current year; and
• an $8 million decrease in property and other taxes attributable to property tax true ups for prior periods, utility receipts tax refunds and
lower payroll tax due to the CARES Act employee retention credits.
Interest Expense. The variance is primarily driven by lower post-in-service carrying costs and higher debt returns in the prior year on ash basin
closure costs resulting from the Indiana retail rate case.
Income Tax Expense. The increase in tax expense was primarily due to an increase in pretax income.
PIEDMONT
Results of Operations
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 Variance
Operating Revenues $ 1,569 $ 1,297 $ 272 
Operating Expenses
Cost of natural gas 569 386 183 
Operation, maintenance and other 327 322 5 
Depreciation and amortization 213 180 33 
Property and other taxes 55 53 2 
Impairment of assets and other charges 10 7 3 
Total operating expenses 1,174 948 226 
Operating Income 395 349 46 
Equity in earnings of unconsolidated affiliates 9 9 — 
Other income and expenses, net 55 51 4 
Total other income and expenses 64 60 4 
Interest Expense 119 118 1 
Income Before Income Taxes 340 291 49 
Income Tax Expense 30 18 12 
Net Income $ 310 $ 273 $ 37 
The following table shows the percent changes in Dth delivered and average number of customers. The percentages for all throughput deliveries
represent billed and unbilled sales. Amounts are not weather-normalized.
Increase (Decrease) over prior year 2021
Residential deliveries 7.0 %
Commercial deliveries 6.9 %
Industrial deliveries 4.1 %
Power generation deliveries 14.0 %
For resale 13.2 %
Total throughput deliveries 10.8 %
Secondary market volumes 37.2 %
Average number of customers 1.9 %
The margin decoupling mechanism adjusts for variations in residential and commercial use per customer, including those due to weather and
conservation. The weather normalization adjustment mechanisms mostly offset the impact of weather on bills rendered, but do not ensure full
recovery of approved margin during periods when winter weather is significantly warmer or colder than normal.
Year Ended December 31, 2021, as compared to 2020
Operating Revenues. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $183 million increase due to higher natural gas costs passed through to customers, higher volumes, and increased off-system sales
natural gas costs;
• a $52 million increase due to base rate increases;
• a $12 million increase due to customer growth; and
• an $11 million increase due to North Carolina IMR.
56
MD&A PIEDMONT
Operating Expenses. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $183 million increase due to higher natural gas costs passed through to customers, higher volumes, and increased off-system sales
natural gas costs; and
• a $33 million increase in depreciation expense due to additional plant in service and depreciation adjustments.
Income Tax Expense. The increase in tax expense was primarily due to an increase in pretax income.
CRITICAL ACCOUNTING POLICIES AND ESTIMATES
Preparation of financial statements requires the application of accounting policies, judgments, assumptions and estimates that can significantly affect
the reported results of operations, cash flows or the amounts of assets and liabilities recognized in the financial statements. Judgments made include
the likelihood of success of particular projects, possible legal and regulatory challenges, earnings assumptions on pension and other benefit fund
investments and anticipated recovery of costs, especially through regulated operations. 
Management discusses these policies, estimates and assumptions with senior members of management on a regular basis and provides periodic
updates on management decisions to the Audit Committee. Management believes the areas described below require significant judgment in the
application of accounting policy or in making estimates and assumptions that are inherently uncertain and that may change in subsequent periods.
For further information, see Note 1 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Summary of Significant Accounting Policies."
Regulated Operations Accounting
Substantially all of Duke Energy’s regulated operations meet the criteria for application of regulated operations accounting treatment. As a result,
Duke Energy is required to record assets and liabilities that would not be recorded for nonregulated entities. Regulatory assets generally represent
incurred costs that have been deferred because such costs are probable of future recovery in customer rates. Regulatory liabilities are recorded
when it is probable that a regulator will require Duke Energy to make refunds to customers or reduce rates to customers for previous collections or
deferred revenue for costs that have yet to be incurred.
Management continually assesses whether recorded regulatory assets are probable of future recovery by considering factors such as:
• applicable regulatory environment changes;
• historical regulatory treatment for similar costs in Duke Energy’s jurisdictions;
• litigation of rate orders;
• recent rate orders to other regulated entities;
• levels of actual return on equity compared to approved rates of return on equity; and
• the status of any pending or potential deregulation legislation.
If future recovery of costs ceases to be probable, asset write-offs would be recognized in operating income. Additionally, regulatory agencies can
provide flexibility in the manner and timing of the depreciation of property, plant and equipment, recognition of asset retirement costs and amortization
of regulatory assets, or may disallow recovery of all or a portion of certain assets.
As required by regulated operations accounting rules, significant judgment can be required to determine if an otherwise recognizable incurred cost
qualifies to be deferred for future recovery as a regulatory asset. Significant judgment can also be required to determine if revenues previously
recognized are for entity specific costs that are no longer expected to be incurred or have not yet been incurred and are therefore a regulatory
liability.
For further information, see Note 3 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Regulatory Matters."
Goodwill Impairment Assessments
Duke Energy performed its annual goodwill impairment tests for all reporting units as of August 31, 2021. Additionally, Duke Energy monitors all
relevant events and circumstances during the year to determine if an interim impairment test is required. Such events and circumstances include an
adverse regulatory outcome, declining financial performance and deterioration of industry or market conditions. As of August 31, 2021, all of the
reporting units' estimated fair value of equity substantially exceeded the carrying value of equity. The fair values of the reporting units were calculated
using a weighted combination of the income approach, which estimates fair value based on discounted cash flows, and the market approach, which
estimates fair value based on market comparables within the utility and energy industries.
Estimated future cash flows under the income approach are based on Duke Energy’s internal business plan. Significant assumptions used are growth
rates, future rates of return expected to result from ongoing rate regulation and discount rates. Management determines the appropriate discount rate
for each of its reporting units based on the WACC for each individual reporting unit. The WACC takes into account both the after-tax cost of debt and
cost of equity. A major component of the cost of equity is the current risk-free rate on 20-year U.S. Treasury bonds. In the 2021 impairment tests,
Duke Energy considered implied WACCs for certain peer companies in determining the appropriate WACC rates to use in its analysis. As each
reporting unit has a different risk profile based on the nature of its operations, including factors such as regulation, the WACC for each reporting unit
may differ. Accordingly, the WACCs were adjusted, as appropriate, to account for company specific risk premiums. The discount rates used for
calculating the fair values as of August 31, 2021, for each of Duke Energy’s reporting units ranged from 5.4% to 5.8%. The underlying assumptions
and estimates are made as of a point in time. Subsequent changes, particularly changes in the discount rates, authorized regulated rates of return or
growth rates inherent in management’s estimates of future cash flows, could result in future impairment charges.
57
MD&A CRITICAL ACCOUNTING POLICIES AND ESTIMATES
One of the most significant assumptions utilized in determining the fair value of reporting units under the market approach is implied market multiples
for certain peer companies. Management selects comparable peers based on each peer’s primary business mix, operations, and market
capitalization compared to the applicable reporting unit and calculates implied market multiples based on available projected earnings guidance and
peer company market values as of August 31. The implied market multiples used for calculating the fair values as of August 31, 2021, for each of
Duke Energy's reporting units ranged from 9.7 to 12.7.
Duke Energy primarily operates in environments that are rate-regulated. In such environments, revenue requirements are adjusted periodically by
regulators based on factors including levels of costs, sales volumes and costs of capital. Accordingly, Duke Energy’s regulated utilities operate to
some degree with a buffer from the direct effects, positive or negative, of significant swings in market or economic conditions. However, significant
changes in discount rates or implied market multiples over a prolonged period may have a material impact on the fair value of equity.
Duke Energy has approximately $19.3 billion in Goodwill at both December 31, 2021, and 2020. For further information, see Note 11 to the
Consolidated Financial Statements, "Goodwill and Intangible Assets."
Asset Retirement Obligations
AROs are recognized for legal obligations associated with the retirement of property, plant and equipment at the present value of the projected
liability in the period in which it is incurred, if a reasonable estimate of fair value can be made. Duke Energy has approximately $12.8 billion and $13
billion of AROs as of December 31, 2021, and 2020, respectively. See Note 9, "Asset Retirement Obligations," for further details including a
rollforward of related liabilities.
The present value of the initial obligation and subsequent updates are based on discounted cash flows, which include estimates regarding the
amount and timing of future cash flows, regulatory, legal, and legislative decisions, selection of discount rates and cost escalation rates, among other
factors. These estimates are subject to change.
Obligations for nuclear decommissioning are based on site-specific cost studies. Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress assume prompt
dismantlement of the nuclear facilities after operations are ceased. During 2020, Duke Energy Florida, closed an agreement for the accelerated
decommissioning of the Crystal River Unit 3 nuclear power station after receiving approval from the NRC and FPSC. The retirement obligations for
the decommissioning of Crystal River Unit 3 nuclear power station are measured based on accelerated decommissioning from 2020 continuing
through 2027. Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida also assume that spent fuel will be stored on-site until such
time that it can be transferred to a yet to be built DOE facility.
Obligations for closure of ash basins are based upon discounted cash flows of estimated costs for site-specific plans. Certain ash basins have had
probability weightings applied to them based on different potential closure methods and the probabilities surrounding pending legal changes.
For further information, see Notes 3, 4 and 9 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Regulatory Matters," "Commitments and Contingencies" and
"Asset Retirement Obligations."
Long-Lived Asset Impairment Assessments, Excluding Regulated Operations
Duke Energy evaluates property, plant and equipment for impairment when events or changes in circumstances (such as a significant change in cash
flow projections or the determination that it is more likely than not that an asset or asset group will be sold) indicate the carrying value of such assets
may not be recoverable. The determination of whether an impairment has occurred is based on an estimate of undiscounted future cash flows
attributable to the assets, as compared with their carrying value.
Performing an impairment evaluation involves a significant degree of estimation and judgment in areas such as identifying circumstances that
indicate an impairment may exist, identifying and grouping affected assets and developing the undiscounted future cash flows. If an impairment has
occurred, the amount of the impairment recognized is determined by estimating the fair value and recording a loss if the carrying value is greater than
the fair value. Additionally, determining fair value requires probability weighting future cash flows to reflect expectations about possible variations in
their amounts or timing and the selection of an appropriate discount rate. Although cash flow estimates are based on relevant information available at
the time the estimates are made, estimates of future cash flows are, by nature, highly uncertain and may vary significantly from actual results. When
determining whether an asset or asset group has been impaired, management groups assets at the lowest level that has discrete cash flows.
During 2021, Duke Energy evaluated recoverability of certain renewable merchant plants due to changing market pricing and declining long-term
forecasted energy prices, primarily driven by lower long-term forecasted natural gas prices, capital cost of new renewables and increased renewable
penetration. It was determined the assets were all recoverable as the carrying value of the assets approximated or were less than the aggregate
estimated future cash flows. Duke Energy has approximately $200 million and $210 million in Property, plant and equipment related to these assets
as of December 31, 2021, and 2020, respectively.
Workplace and workforce realignment has been a focus for the company and costs have been incurred attributable to business transformation,
including long-term real estate strategy changes and workforce realignment. For further information, see Notes 2 and 10 to the Consolidated
Financial Statements, "Business Segments" and "Property, Plant and Equipment."
Pension and Other Post-Retirement Benefits
The calculation of pension expense, other post-retirement benefit expense and net pension and other post-retirement assets or liabilities require the
use of assumptions and election of permissible accounting alternatives. Changes in assumptions can result in different expense and reported asset
or liability amounts and future actual experience can differ from the assumptions. Duke Energy believes the most critical assumptions for pension and
other post-retirement benefits are the expected long-term rate of return on plan assets and the assumed discount rate applied to future projected
benefit payments.
58
MD&A CRITICAL ACCOUNTING POLICIES AND ESTIMATES
Duke Energy elects to amortize net actuarial gain or loss amounts that are in excess of 10% of the greater of the market-related value of plan assets
or the plan's projected benefit obligation, into net pension or other post-retirement benefit expense over the average remaining service period of
active participants expected to benefit under the plan. If all or almost all of a plan's participants are inactive, the average remaining life expectancy of
the inactive participants is used instead of average remaining service period. Prior service cost or credit, which represents an increase or decrease in
a plan's pension benefit obligation resulting from plan amendment, is amortized on a straight-line basis over the average expected remaining service
period of active participants expected to benefit under the plan. If all or almost all of a plan's participants are inactive, the average remaining life
expectancy of the inactive participants is used instead of average remaining service period.
As of December 31, 2021, Duke Energy assumes pension and other post-retirement plan assets will generate a long-term rate of return of 6.50%.
The expected long-term rate of return was developed using a weighted average calculation of expected returns based primarily on future expected
returns across asset classes considering the use of active asset managers, where applicable. The asset allocation targets were set after considering
the investment objective and the risk profile. Equity securities are held for their higher expected returns. Debt securities are primarily held to hedge
the qualified pension liability. Real assets, return-seeking fixed income, hedge funds and other global securities are held for diversification.
Investments within asset classes are diversified to achieve broad market participation and reduce the impact of individual managers on investments.
Duke Energy discounted its future U.S. pension and other post-retirement obligations using a rate of 2.90% as of December 31, 2021. Discount rates
used to measure benefit plan obligations for financial reporting purposes reflect rates at which pension benefits could be effectively settled. As of
December 31, 2021, Duke Energy determined its discount rate for U.S. pension and other post-retirement obligations using a bond selection-
settlement portfolio approach. This approach develops a discount rate by selecting a portfolio of high-quality corporate bonds that generate sufficient
cash flow to provide for projected benefit payments of the plan. The selected bond portfolio is derived from a universe of non-callable corporate
bonds rated Aa quality or higher. After the bond portfolio is selected, a single interest rate is determined that equates the present value of the plan’s
projected benefit payments discounted at this rate with the market value of the bonds selected.
Future changes in plan asset returns, assumed discount rates and various other factors related to the participants in Duke Energy’s pension and
post-retirement plans will impact future pension expense and liabilities. Duke Energy cannot predict with certainty what these factors will be in the
future. The following table presents the approximate effect on Duke Energy’s 2022 pretax pension expense, pretax other post-retirement expense,
pension obligation and other post-retirement benefit obligation if a 0.25% change in rates were to occur.
Qualified and Non- Other Post-Retirement
 Qualified Pension Plans Plans
(in millions) 0.25 % (0.25)% 0.25 % (0.25)%
Effect on 2022 pretax pension and other post-retirement expense:    
Expected long-term rate of return $ (21) $ 21 $ — $ — 
Discount rate (6) 6 1 (1)
Effect on pension and other post-retirement benefit obligation at December 31,
2022:
Discount rate (189) 193 (11) 12 
For further information, see Note 22 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Employee Benefit Plans.”
LIQUIDITY AND CAPITAL RESOURCES
Sources and Uses of Cash
Duke Energy relies primarily upon cash flows from operations, debt and equity issuances and its existing cash and cash equivalents to fund its
liquidity and capital requirements. Duke Energy’s capital requirements arise primarily from capital and investment expenditures, repaying long-term
debt and paying dividends to shareholders. Additionally, due to its existing tax attributes, Duke Energy does not expect to be a significant federal
cash taxpayer until around 2030.
59
MD&A LIQUIDITY AND CAPITAL RESOURCES
Capital Expenditures
Duke Energy continues to focus on reducing risk and positioning its business for future success and will invest principally in its strongest business
sectors. Duke Energy’s projected capital and investment expenditures, including AFUDC debt and capitalized interest, for the next three fiscal years
are included in the table below.
(in millions) 2022 2023 2024
New generation $ 14 $ 156 $ 445 
Regulated renewables 742 1,194 1,346 
Environmental 780 580 461 
Nuclear fuel 453 366 385 
Major nuclear 252 186 48 
Customer additions 596 591 605 
Grid modernization and other transmission and distribution projects 4,154 4,377 4,526 
Maintenance and other 2,959 3,050 2,609 
Total Electric Utilities and Infrastructure 9,950 10,500 10,425 
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure 1,350 1,375 1,150 
Commercial Renewables and Other 1,050 1,100 650 
Total projected capital and investment expenditures $ 12,350 $ 12,975 $ 12,225 
Debt
Long-term debt maturities and the interest payable on long-term debt each represent a significant cash requirement for the Duke Energy Registrants.
See Note 6 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Debt and Credit Facilities,” for information regarding the Duke Energy Registrants' long-term
debt at December 31, 2021, the weighted average interest rate applicable to each long-term debt category and a schedule of long-term debt
maturities over the next five years.
Fuel and Purchased Power
Fuel and purchased power includes firm capacity payments that provide Duke Energy with uninterrupted firm access to electricity transmission
capacity and natural gas transportation contracts, as well as undesignated contracts and contracts that qualify as NPNS. Duke Energy’s contractual
cash obligations for fuel and purchased power as of December 31, 2021, are as follows:
Payments Due by Period
(in millions) TotalLess than 1
year (2022)2-3 years
(2023 &
2024)4-5 years
(2025 &
2026)More than 5
years (2027
& beyond)
Fuel and purchased power $ 19,976 $ 4,594 $ 6,071 $ 3,618 $ 5,693 
Other Purchase Obligations
Other purchase obligations includes contracts for software, telephone, data and consulting or advisory services, contractual obligations for EPC costs
for new generation plants, wind and solar facilities, plant refurbishments, maintenance and day-to-day contract work and commitments to buy certain
products. Amount excludes certain open purchase orders for services that are provided on demand for which the timing of the purchase cannot be
determined. Total cash commitments for related other purchase obligation expenditures are $7,941 million, with $7,526 million expected to be paid in
the next 12 months.
See Note 5 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Leases” for a schedule of both finance lease and operating lease payments over the next five
years. See Note 9 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Asset Retirement Obligations” for information on nuclear decommissioning trust
funding obligations and the closure of ash impoundments.
Duke Energy performs ongoing assessments of its respective guarantee obligations to determine whether any liabilities have been incurred as a
result of potential increased nonperformance risk by third parties for which Duke Energy has issued guarantees. See Note 7 to the Consolidated
Financial Statements, “Guarantees and Indemnifications,” for further details of the guarantee arrangements. Issuance of these guarantee
arrangements is not required for the majority of Duke Energy’s operations. Thus, if Duke Energy discontinued issuing these guarantees, there would
not be a material impact to the consolidated results of operations, cash flows or financial position. Other than the guarantee arrangements discussed
in Note 7 and off-balance sheet debt related to non-consolidated VIEs, Duke Energy does not have any material off-balance sheet financing entities
or structures. For additional information, see Note 17 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Variable Interest Entities."
Cash and Liquidity
The Subsidiary Registrants generally maintain minimal cash balances and use short-term borrowings to meet their working capital needs and other
cash requirements. The Subsidiary Registrants, excluding Progress Energy, support their short-term borrowing needs through participation with Duke
Energy and certain of its other subsidiaries in a money pool arrangement. The companies with short-term funds may provide short-term loans to
affiliates participating under this arrangement. See Note 6 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Debt and Credit Facilities,” for additional
discussion of the money pool arrangement.
60
MD&A LIQUIDITY AND CAPITAL RESOURCES
Duke Energy and the Subsidiary Registrants, excluding Progress Energy, may also use short-term debt, including commercial paper and the money
pool, as a bridge to long-term debt financings. The levels of borrowing may vary significantly over the course of the year due to the timing of long-
term debt financings and the impact of fluctuations in cash flows from operations. From time to time, Duke Energy’s current liabilities exceed current
assets resulting from the use of short-term debt as a funding source to meet scheduled maturities of long-term debt, as well as cash needs, which
can fluctuate due to the seasonality of its businesses.
As of December 31, 2021, Duke Energy had approximately $343 million of cash on hand, $5.0 billion available under its $8 billion Master Credit
Facility and $500 million available under the $1 billion Three-Year Revolving Credit Facility. Duke Energy expects to have sufficient liquidity in the
form of cash on hand, cash from operations and available credit capacity to support its funding needs. Additionally, by January 2023, Duke Energy is
expecting another $1,025 million from GIC for the second closing of the investment in Duke Energy Indiana. Proceeds from the minority interest
investment are expected to partially fund Duke Energy's $63 billion capital and investment expenditure plan. Refer to Notes 6 and 19 to the
Consolidated Financial Statements, "Debt and Credit Facilities" and "Stockholders' Equity," respectively, for information regarding Duke Energy's debt
and equity issuances, debt maturities and available credit facilities including the Master Credit Facility.
Credit Facilities and Registration Statements
See Note 6 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Debt and Credit Facilities," for further information regarding credit facilities and shelf
registration statements available to Duke Energy and the Duke Energy Registrants.
Dividend Payments
In 2021, Duke Energy paid quarterly cash dividends for the 95th consecutive year and expects to continue its policy of paying regular cash dividends
in the future. There is no assurance as to the amount of future dividends because they depend on future earnings, capital requirements, financial
condition and are subject to the discretion of the Board of Directors.
Duke Energy targets a dividend payout ratio of between 65% and 75%, based upon adjusted EPS. Duke Energy increased the dividend by
approximately 2% annually in both 2021 and 2020, and the company remains committed to continued growth of the dividend.
Dividend and Other Funding Restrictions of Duke Energy Subsidiaries
As discussed in Note 3 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Regulatory Matters,” Duke Energy’s wholly owned public utility operating
companies have restrictions on the amount of funds that can be transferred to Duke Energy through dividends, advances or loans as a result of
conditions imposed by various regulators in conjunction with merger transactions. Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida also have
restrictions imposed by their first mortgage bond indentures and Articles of Incorporation, which in certain circumstances, limit their ability to make
cash dividends or distributions on common stock. Additionally, certain other Duke Energy subsidiaries have other restrictions, such as minimum
working capital and tangible net worth requirements pursuant to debt and other agreements that limit the amount of funds that can be transferred to
Duke Energy. At December 31, 2021, the amount of restricted net assets of wholly owned subsidiaries of Duke Energy that may not be distributed to
Duke Energy in the form of a loan or dividend does not exceed a material amount of Duke Energy’s net assets. Duke Energy does not have any legal
or other restrictions on paying common stock dividends to shareholders out of its consolidated equity accounts. Although these restrictions cap the
amount of funding the various operating subsidiaries can provide to Duke Energy, management does not believe these restrictions will have a
significant impact on Duke Energy’s ability to access cash to meet its payment of dividends on common stock and other future funding obligations.
Cash Flows From Operating Activities
Cash flows from operations of Electric Utilities and Infrastructure and Gas Utilities and Infrastructure are primarily driven by sales of electricity and
natural gas, respectively, and costs of operations. These cash flows from operations are relatively stable and comprise a substantial portion of Duke
Energy’s operating cash flows. Weather conditions, working capital and commodity price fluctuations and unanticipated expenses including
unplanned plant outages, storms, legal costs and related settlements can affect the timing and level of cash flows from operations.
As part of Duke Energy’s continued effort to improve its cash flows from operations and liquidity, Duke Energy works with vendors to improve terms
and conditions, including the extension of payment terms. To support this effort, Duke Energy established a supply chain finance program (the
“program”) in 2020, under which suppliers, at their sole discretion, may sell their receivables from Duke Energy to the participating financial
institution. The financial institution administers the program. Duke Energy does not issue any guarantees with respect to the program and does not
participate in negotiations between suppliers and the financial institution. Duke Energy does not have an economic interest in the supplier’s decision
to participate in the program and receives no interest, fees or other benefit from the financial institution based on supplier participation in the program.
Suppliers’ decisions on which invoices are sold do not impact Duke Energy’s payment terms, which are based on commercial terms negotiated
between Duke Energy and the supplier regardless of program participation. A significant deterioration in the credit quality of Duke Energy, economic
downturn or changes in the financial markets could limit the financial institutions willingness to participate in the program. Duke Energy does not
believe such risk would have a material impact on our cash flows from operations or liquidity, as substantially all our payments are made outside the
program.
Duke Energy believes it has sufficient liquidity resources through the commercial paper markets, and ultimately, the Master Credit Facility, to support
these operations. Cash flows from operations are subject to a number of other factors, including, but not limited to, regulatory constraints, economic
trends and market volatility (see Item 1A, “Risk Factors,” for additional information).
Debt Issuances
Depending on availability based on the issuing entity, the credit rating of the issuing entity, and market conditions, the Subsidiary Registrants prefer to
issue first mortgage bonds and secured debt, followed by unsecured debt. This preference is the result of generally higher credit ratings for first
mortgage bonds and secured debt, which typically result in lower interest costs. Duke Energy Corporation primarily issues unsecured debt.
61
MD&A LIQUIDITY AND CAPITAL RESOURCES
In 2022, Duke Energy anticipates issuing additional securities of $9.5 billion through debt capital markets. In certain instances Duke Energy may
utilize instruments other than senior notes, including equity-content securities such as subordinated debt or preferred stock. Proceeds will primarily
be for the purpose of funding capital expenditures and debt maturities. See to Note 6 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Debt and Credit
Facilities," for further information regarding significant debt issuances in 2021.
Duke Energy’s capitalization is balanced between debt and equity as shown in the table below.
 Projected 2022 Actual 2021 Actual 2020
Equity 42 % 43 % 44 %
Debt 58 % 57 % 56 %
Restrictive Debt Covenants
Duke Energy’s debt and credit agreements contain various financial and other covenants. Duke Energy's Master Credit Facility contains a covenant
requiring the debt-to-total capitalization ratio to not exceed 65% for each borrower, excluding Piedmont, and 70% for Piedmont. Failure to meet those
covenants beyond applicable grace periods could result in accelerated due dates and/or termination of the agreements or sublimits thereto. As of
December 31, 2021, each of the Duke Energy Registrants was in compliance with all covenants related to their debt agreements. In addition, some
credit agreements may allow for acceleration of payments or termination of the agreements due to nonpayment, or acceleration of other significant
indebtedness of the borrower or some of its subsidiaries. None of the debt or credit agreements contain material adverse change clauses.
Credit Ratings
Moody’s Investors Service, Inc. and S&P provide credit ratings for various Duke Energy Registrants. The following table includes Duke Energy and
certain subsidiaries’ credit ratings and ratings outlook as of February 2022.
 Moody's S&P
Duke Energy Corporation Stable Stable
Issuer Credit Rating Baa2 BBB+
Senior Unsecured Debt Baa2 BBB
Junior Subordinated Debt/Preferred Stock Baa3/Ba1 BBB-
Commercial Paper P-2 A-2
Duke Energy Carolinas Stable Stable
Senior Secured Debt Aa3 A
Senior Unsecured Debt A2 BBB+
Progress Energy Stable Stable
Senior Unsecured Debt Baa1 BBB
Duke Energy Progress Stable Stable
Senior Secured Debt Aa3 A
Duke Energy Florida Stable Stable
Senior Secured Debt A1 A
Senior Unsecured Debt A3 BBB+
Duke Energy Ohio Stable Stable
Senior Secured Debt A2 A
Senior Unsecured Debt Baa1 BBB+
Duke Energy Indiana Stable Stable
Senior Secured Debt Aa3 A
Senior Unsecured Debt A2 BBB+
Duke Energy Kentucky Stable Stable
Senior Unsecured Debt Baa1 BBB+
Piedmont Natural Gas Stable Stable
Senior Unsecured A3 BBB+
Credit ratings are intended to provide credit lenders a framework for comparing the credit quality of securities and are not a recommendation to buy,
sell or hold. The Duke Energy Registrants’ credit ratings are dependent on the rating agencies’ assessments of their ability to meet their debt principal
and interest obligations when they come due. If, as a result of market conditions or other factors, the Duke Energy Registrants are unable to maintain
current balance sheet strength, or if earnings and cash flow outlook materially deteriorates, credit ratings could be negatively impacted.
62
MD&A LIQUIDITY AND CAPITAL RESOURCES
Cash Flow Information
The following table summarizes Duke Energy’s cash flows for the two most recently completed fiscal years.
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020
Cash flows provided by (used in):
Operating activities $ 8,290 $ 8,856 
Investing activities (10,935) (10,604)
Financing activities 2,609 1,731 
Net decrease in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash (36) (17)
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at beginning of period 556 573 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at end of period $ 520 $ 556 
OPERATING CASH FLOWS
The following table summarizes key components of Duke Energy’s operating cash flows for the two most recently completed fiscal years.
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 Variance
Net income $3,579 $1,082 $ 2,497 
Non-cash adjustments to net income 5,941 8,353 (2,412)
Payments for AROs (540) (610) 70 
Refund of AMT credit carryforwards — 572 (572)
Working capital (690) (541) (149)
Net cash provided by operating activities $8,290 $8,856 $ (566)
The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $572 million refund of AMT credit carryforwards in the prior year; and
• a $149 million increase in cash outflows from working capital primarily due to an increase in under collected fuel used in generation due to
higher pricing, partially offset by coal ash insurance litigation proceeds, fluctuations in accounts payable levels and timing of property tax
accruals and payments in the current year.
Partially offset by:
• an $85 million increase in net income after adjustment for non-cash items primarily due to higher revenues from rate cases in various
jurisdictions, higher retail sales volumes and the prior year coal ash settlement agreement filed with the NCUC, partially offset by an
impairment charge related to the South Carolina Supreme Court Decision on coal ash, higher depreciation, amortization and accretion and
interest expense; and
• a $70 million decrease in payments for AROs.
INVESTING CASH FLOWS
The following table summarizes key components of Duke Energy’s investing cash flows for the two most recently completed fiscal years.
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 Variance
Capital, investment and acquisition expenditures, net of return of investment capital $(9,752)$(10,144)$ 392 
Debt and equity securities, net 5 (62) 67 
Disbursements to canceled equity method investments (855) — (855)
Other investing items (333) (398) 65 
Net cash used in investing activities $(10,935)$(10,604)$ (331)
63
MD&A LIQUIDITY AND CAPITAL RESOURCES
The variance relates primarily to a payment made to fund ACP's outstanding debt, partially offset by a decrease in capital expenditures due to lower
overall investments in the Commercial Renewables segment. The primary use of cash related to investing activities is typically capital, investment
and acquisition expenditures, net of return of investment capital detailed by reportable business segment in the following table.
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 Variance
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure $ 7,653 $ 7,612 $ 41 
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure 1,271 1,303 (32)
Commercial Renewables 543 965 (422)
Other 285 264 21 
Total capital, investment and acquisition expenditures, net of return of investment capital $ 9,752 $10,144 $ (392)
FINANCING CASH FLOWS
The following table summarizes key components of Duke Energy’s financing cash flows for the two most recently completed fiscal years.
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 Variance
Issuance of common stock $ 5 $ 2,745 $ (2,740)
Issuances of long-term debt, net 3,758 1,824 1,934 
Notes payable and commercial paper 479 (319) 798 
Dividends paid (3,114) (2,812) (302)
Contributions from noncontrolling interests 1,575 426 1,149 
Other financing items (94) (133) 39 
Net cash provided by financing activities $ 2,609 $ 1,731 $ 878 
The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $1,934 million net increase in proceeds from issuances of long-term debt, primarily due to timing of issuances and redemptions of long-
term debt;
• a $1,149 million increase in contributions from noncontrolling interests, primarily due to a $1,025 million receipt from GIC to make an
indirect minority interest investment of 11.05% in Duke Energy Indiana; and
• a $798 million increase in net borrowings from notes payable and commercial paper.
Partially offset by:
• a $2,740 million decrease in proceeds from the issuance of common stock.
QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK
Risk Management Policies
The Enterprise Risk Management policy framework at Duke Energy includes strategy, operational, project execution and financial or transaction
related risks. Enterprise Risk Management includes market risk as part of the financial and transaction related risks in its framework.
Duke Energy is exposed to market risks associated with commodity prices, interest rates and equity prices. Duke Energy has established
comprehensive risk management policies to monitor and manage these market risks. Duke Energy’s Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial
Officer are responsible for the overall approval of market risk management policies and the delegation of approval and authorization levels. The
Finance and Risk Management Committee of the Board of Directors receives periodic updates from the Chief Risk Officer and other members of
management on market risk positions, corporate exposures and overall risk management activities. The Chief Risk Officer is responsible for the
overall governance of managing commodity price risk, including monitoring exposure limits.
The following disclosures about market risk contain forward-looking statements that involve estimates, projections, goals, forecasts, assumptions,
risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those expressed in the forward-looking statements. See
Item 1A, “Risk Factors,” and “Cautionary Statement Regarding Forward-Looking Information” for a discussion of the factors that may impact any such
forward-looking statements made herein.
Commodity Price Risk
Price risk represents the potential risk of loss from adverse changes in the market price of electricity or other energy commodities. Duke Energy’s
exposure to commodity price risk is influenced by a number of factors, including the effects of regulation, commodity contract size and length, market
liquidity, market conditions, location and unique or specific contract terms. Duke Energy is exposed to the impact of market fluctuations in the prices
of electricity, coal, natural gas and other energy-related products marketed and purchased as a result of its ownership of energy-related assets.
64
MD&A QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK
Duke Energy’s exposure to these fluctuations through its regulated utility operations is limited since these operations are subject to cost-based
regulation and are typically allowed to recover substantially all of these costs through various cost recovery clauses, including fuel clauses, formula-
based contracts, or other cost-sharing mechanisms. While there may be a delay in timing between when these costs are incurred and when they are
recovered through rates, changes from year to year generally do not have a material impact on operating results of these regulated operations.
Within Duke Energy’s Commercial Renewables segment, the company has exposure to market price fluctuations in prices of electricity or other
energy-related products as a result of its ownership of renewable assets, although its exposure to the market price of power is generally limited by
entering into contracts with third parties to sell the production of these assets, usually for a term of 10 to 15 years from commercial operation.
Duke Energy employs established policies and procedures to manage risks associated with these market fluctuations, which may include using
various commodity derivatives, such as swaps, futures, forwards and options. For additional information, see Note 14 to the Consolidated Financial
Statements, “Derivatives and Hedging.”
Generation Portfolio Risks
For the Electric Utilities and Infrastructure segment, the generation portfolio not utilized to serve retail operations or committed load is subject to
commodity price fluctuations. However, the impact on the Consolidated Statements of Operations is limited due to mechanisms in these regulated
jurisdictions that result in the sharing of most of the net profits from these activities with retail customers.
The majority of the energy assets in Duke Energy’s Commercial Renewables segment operate in regions managed by RTOs and are therefore
governed and dispatched under the rules of the applicable RTO. Depending on the structure of power sale agreements with third parties, these
assets may be exposed to basis risk associated with different locational marginal prices based on the specific delivery locations and requirements
specified in the agreements. Additionally, these assets may be subject to operational constraints under the RTO rules and may be exposed to market
price risk.
Hedging Strategies
Duke Energy monitors risks associated with commodity price changes on its future operations and, where appropriate, uses various commodity
instruments such as electricity, coal and natural gas hedging contracts and options to mitigate the effect of such fluctuations on operations. Duke
Energy’s primary use of energy commodity derivatives is to hedge against exposure to the prices of power, fuel for generation and natural gas for
customers. Additionally, Duke Energy’s Commercial Renewables business may enter into short-term or long-term hedge agreements to manage price
risk associated with project output to the extent such output is not under contract to third parties.
Duke Energy also manages its exposure to basis risk through the use of congestion hedge products in RTOs such as financial transmission rights
(PJM) and congestion revenue rights (ERCOT), which result in payments based on differentials in locational marginal prices. The majority of
instruments used to manage Duke Energy’s commodity price exposure are either not designated as hedges or do not qualify for hedge accounting.
These instruments are referred to as undesignated contracts. Mark-to-market changes for undesignated contracts entered into by regulated
businesses are reflected as regulatory assets or liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. Undesignated contracts entered into by nonregulated
businesses are marked-to-market each period, with changes in the fair value of the derivative instruments reflected in earnings.
Duke Energy may also enter into other contracts that qualify for the NPNS exception. When a contract meets the criteria to qualify as NPNS, Duke
Energy applies such exception. Income recognition and realization related to NPNS contracts generally coincide with the physical delivery of the
commodity. For contracts qualifying for the NPNS exception, no recognition of the contract’s fair value in the Consolidated Financial Statements is
required until settlement of the contract as long as the transaction remains probable of occurring.
Interest Rate Risk
Duke Energy is exposed to risk resulting from changes in interest rates as a result of its issuance or anticipated issuance of variable and fixed-rate
debt and commercial paper. Duke Energy manages interest rate exposure by limiting variable-rate exposures to a percentage of total debt and by
monitoring the effects of market changes in interest rates. Duke Energy also enters into financial derivative instruments, which may include
instruments such as, but not limited to, interest rate swaps, swaptions and U.S. Treasury lock agreements to manage and mitigate interest rate risk
exposure. See Notes 1, 6, 14 and 16 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Summary of Significant Accounting Policies,” “Debt and Credit
Facilities,” “Derivatives and Hedging,” and “Fair Value Measurements.”
Duke Energy had $7.5 billion of unhedged long- and short-term floating interest rate exposure at December 31, 2021. The impact of a 100-basis point
change in interest rates on pretax income is approximately $75 million at December 31, 2021. This amount was estimated by considering the impact
of the hypothetical interest rates on variable-rate securities outstanding, adjusted for interest rate hedges as of December 31, 2021.
Certain Duke Energy Registrants have variable-rate debt and manage interest rate risk by entering into financial contracts including interest rate
swaps. See Notes 6 and 14 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Debt and Credit Facilities" and "Derivatives and Hedging." Such financial
arrangements generally are indexed based upon LIBOR, which is expected to be fully phased out in 2023. The Secured Overnight Financing Rate
(SOFR) has been identified by regulators and industry participants as the preferred successor rate for U.S. dollar-based LIBOR. Impacted financial
arrangements extending beyond the phaseout of LIBOR may require contractual amendment or termination and renegotiation to fully adapt to a post-
LIBOR environment, and there may be uncertainty regarding the effectiveness of any such alternative index methodologies. Alternative index
provisions are being assessed and incorporated into new financial arrangements that extend beyond the phaseout of LIBOR. Additionally, the
progress of the phaseout is being monitored, including proposed transition relief from the FASB.
Credit Risk
Credit risk represents the loss that the Duke Energy Registrants would incur if a counterparty fails to perform under its contractual obligations. Where
exposed to credit risk, the Duke Energy Registrants analyze the counterparty's financial condition prior to entering into an agreement and monitor
exposure on an ongoing basis. The Duke Energy Registrants establish credit limits where appropriate in the context of contractual arrangements and
monitor such limits.
65
MD&A QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK
To reduce credit exposure, the Duke Energy Registrants seek to include netting provisions with counterparties, which permit the offset of receivables
and payables with such counterparties. The Duke Energy Registrants also frequently use master agreements with credit support annexes to further
mitigate certain credit exposures. The master agreements provide for a counterparty to post cash or letters of credit to the exposed party for
exposure in excess of an established threshold. The threshold amount represents a negotiated unsecured credit limit for each party to the
agreement, determined in accordance with the Duke Energy Registrants’ internal corporate credit practices and standards. Collateral agreements
generally also provide that the failure to post collateral when required is sufficient cause to terminate transactions and liquidate all positions.
The Duke Energy Registrants also obtain cash, letters of credit, or surety bonds from certain counterparties to provide credit support outside of
collateral agreements, where appropriate, based on a financial analysis of the counterparty and the regulatory or contractual terms and conditions
applicable to each transaction. See Note 14 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Derivatives and Hedging,” for additional information regarding
credit risk related to derivative instruments.
The Duke Energy Registrants’ principal counterparties for its electric and natural gas businesses are RTOs, distribution companies, municipalities,
electric cooperatives and utilities located throughout the U.S. Exposure to these entities consists primarily of amounts due to Duke Energy
Registrants for delivered electricity. Additionally, there may be potential risks associated with remarketing of energy and capacity in the event of
default by wholesale power customers. The Duke Energy Registrants have concentrations of receivables from certain of such entities that may affect
the Duke Energy Registrants’ credit risk.
The Duke Energy Registrants are also subject to credit risk from transactions with their suppliers that involve prepayments or milestone payments in
conjunction with outsourcing arrangements, major construction projects and certain commodity purchases. The Duke Energy Registrants’ credit
exposure to such suppliers may take the form of increased costs or project delays in the event of nonperformance. The Duke Energy Registrants'
frequently require guarantees or letters of credit from suppliers to mitigate this credit risk.
Credit risk associated with the Duke Energy Registrants’ service to residential, commercial and industrial customers is generally limited to
outstanding accounts receivable. The Duke Energy Registrants mitigate this credit risk by requiring tariff customers to provide a cash deposit, letter of
credit or surety bond until a satisfactory payment history is established, subject to the rules and regulations in effect in each retail jurisdiction at which
time the deposit is typically refunded. Charge-offs for retail customers have historically been insignificant to the operations of the Duke Energy
Registrants and are typically recovered through retail rates. Management continually monitors customer charge-offs, payment patterns and the
impact of current economic conditions on customers' ability to pay their outstanding balance to ensure the adequacy of bad debt reserves.
In response to the COVID-19 pandemic, in March 2020, the Duke Energy Registrants announced a suspension of disconnections for nonpayment as
a result of the national emergency. While disconnections have resumed, the company continued to offer flexible options to customers struggling with
the pandemic and the economic fallout, including extended payment arrangements to satisfy delinquent balances through June 2021. Since then, the
company has resumed standard payment arrangement options . The Duke Energy Registrants are still monitoring the effects of the resultant
economic slowdown on counterparties’ abilities to perform under their contractual obligations. The Duke Energy Registrants have observed a
significant increase in utility account arrears as of December 31, 2021. There is an expectation of an increase in charge-offs in the future and the
Duke Energy Registrants have reserved for these losses in the allowance for doubtful account balance. See Notes 3 and 18 to the Consolidated
Financial Statements, "Regulatory Matters" and "Revenue," respectively, for more information. Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana sell
certain of their accounts receivable and related collections through CRC, a Duke Energy consolidated VIE. Losses on collection are first absorbed by
the equity of CRC and next by the subordinated retained interests held by Duke Energy Ohio, Duke Energy Kentucky and Duke Energy Indiana. See
Note 17 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Variable Interest Entities.”
The Duke Energy Registrants provide certain non-tariff services, primarily to large commercial and industrial customers in which incurred costs,
including invested capital, are intended to be recovered from the individual customer and therefore are not subject to rate recovery in the event of
customer default. Customer creditworthiness is assessed prior to entering into these transactions. Credit concentration related to these transactions
exists for certain of these customers.
Duke Energy’s Commercial Renewables segment enters into long-term agreements with certain creditworthy buyers that may not include the right to
call for collateral in the event of a credit rating downgrade. Credit concentration exists to certain counterparties on these agreements, including
entities that could be subject to wildfire liability. Additionally, Commercial Renewables may invest in projects for which buyers are below investment
grade, although such buyers are required to post negotiated amounts of credit support. Also, power sales agreements and/or hedges of project
output are generally for an initial term that does not cover the entire life of the asset. As a result, Commercial Renewables is exposed to market price
risk and credit risk related to these agreements.
Duke Energy Carolinas has third-party insurance to cover certain losses related to asbestos-related injuries and damages above an aggregate self-
insured retention. See Note 4 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Commitments and Contingencies" for information on asbestos-related
injuries and damages claims.
The Duke Energy Registrants also have credit risk exposure through issuance of performance and financial guarantees, letters of credit and surety
bonds on behalf of less than wholly owned entities and third parties. Where the Duke Energy Registrants have issued these guarantees, it is possible
that they could be required to perform under these guarantee obligations in the event the obligor under the guarantee fails to perform. Where the
Duke Energy Registrants have issued guarantees related to assets or operations that have been disposed of via sale, they attempt to secure
indemnification from the buyer against all future performance obligations under the guarantees. See Note 7 to the Consolidated Financial
Statements, “Guarantees and Indemnifications,” for further information on guarantees issued by the Duke Energy Registrants.
Based on the Duke Energy Registrants’ policies for managing credit risk, their exposures and their credit and other reserves, the Duke Energy
Registrants do not currently anticipate a materially adverse effect on their consolidated financial position or results of operations as a result of
nonperformance by any counterparty.
66
MD&A QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK
Marketable Securities Price Risk
As described further in Note 15 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Investments in Debt and Equity Securities,” Duke Energy invests in debt
and equity securities as part of various investment portfolios to fund certain obligations. The vast majority of investments in equity securities are
within the NDTF and assets of the various pension and other post-retirement benefit plans.
Pension Plan Assets
Duke Energy maintains investments to facilitate funding the costs of providing non-contributory defined benefit retirement and other post-retirement
benefit plans. These investments are exposed to price fluctuations in equity markets and changes in interest rates. The equity securities held in these
pension plans are diversified to achieve broad market participation and reduce the impact of any single investment, sector or geographic region.
Duke Energy has established asset allocation targets for its pension plan holdings, which take into consideration the investment objectives and the
risk profile with respect to the trust in which the assets are held. See Note 22 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Employee Benefit Plans,” for
additional information regarding investment strategy of pension plan assets.
A significant decline in the value of plan asset holdings could require Duke Energy to increase funding of its pension plans in future periods, which
could adversely affect cash flows in those periods. Additionally, a decline in the fair value of plan assets, absent additional cash contributions to the
plan, could increase the amount of pension cost required to be recorded in future periods, which could adversely affect Duke Energy’s results of
operations in those periods.
Nuclear Decommissioning Trust Funds
As required by the NRC, NCUC, PSCSC and FPSC, subsidiaries of Duke Energy maintain trust funds to fund the costs of nuclear decommissioning.
As of December 31, 2021, these funds were invested primarily in domestic and international equity securities, debt securities, cash and cash
equivalents and short-term investments. Per the NRC, Internal Revenue Code, NCUC, PSCSC and FPSC requirements, these funds may be used
only for activities related to nuclear decommissioning. These investments are exposed to price fluctuations in equity markets and changes in interest
rates. Duke Energy actively monitors its portfolios by benchmarking the performance of its investments against certain indices and by maintaining,
and periodically reviewing, target allocation percentages for various asset classes.
Accounting for nuclear decommissioning recognizes that costs are recovered through retail and wholesale rates; therefore, fluctuations in investment
prices do not materially affect the Consolidated Statements of Operations, as changes in the fair value of these investments are primarily deferred as
regulatory assets or regulatory liabilities pursuant to Orders by the NCUC, PSCSC, FPSC and FERC. Earnings or losses of the funds will ultimately
impact the amount of costs recovered through retail and wholesale rates. See Note 9 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Asset Retirement
Obligations,” for additional information regarding nuclear decommissioning costs. See Note 15 to the Consolidated Financial Statements,
“Investments in Debt and Equity Securities,” for additional information regarding NDTF assets.
OTHER MATTERS
Environmental Regulations
The Duke Energy Registrants are subject to federal, state and local regulations regarding air and water quality, hazardous and solid waste disposal,
coal ash and other environmental matters. These regulations can be changed from time to time and result in new obligations of the Duke Energy
Registrants.
The following sections outline various proposed and recently enacted legislation and regulations that may impact the Duke Energy Registrants. Refer
to Note 3 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Regulatory Matters," for further information regarding potential plant retirements and regulatory
filings related to the Duke Energy Registrants.
Coal Combustion Residuals
In April 2015, EPA published a rule to regulate the disposal of CCR from electric utilities as solid waste. The federal regulation classifies CCR as
nonhazardous waste and allows for beneficial use of CCR with some restrictions. The regulation applies to all new and existing landfills, new and
existing surface impoundments receiving CCR and existing surface impoundments located at stations generating electricity (regardless of fuel
source), which were no longer receiving CCR but contained liquids as of the effective date of the rule. The rule establishes requirements regarding
landfill design, structural integrity design and assessment criteria for surface impoundments, groundwater monitoring, protection and remedial
procedures and other operational and reporting procedures to ensure the safe disposal and management of CCR.
On July 17, 2018, EPA issued a final rule (Phase 1, Part 1) revising certain closure deadlines and groundwater protection standards in the CCR rule.
The rule does not change the primary requirements for groundwater monitoring, corrective action, inspections and maintenance, and closure, and
thus does not materially affect Duke Energy’s coal ash basin closure plans or compliance obligations under the CCR rule. On October 22, 2018, a
coalition of environmental groups filed a petition for review in the U.S. Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia (D.C. Circuit Court) challenging
EPA's final Phase 1, Part 1 revisions to the CCR rule. On March 13, 2019, the D.C. Circuit Court issued an order in the Phase 1, Part 1 litigation
granting EPA’s motion to remand the rule without vacatur. To date, EPA has finalized two notice-and-comment rulemakings to implement the court’s
decision on remand. The “Part A” rule, which was promulgated on August 28, 2020, establishes an April 11, 2021 deadline to cease placement of
CCR and non-CCR waste streams into unlined ash basins and initiate closure, and the “Part B” rule, which was promulgated on November 12, 2020,
establishes procedures to allow facilities to request approval to operate an existing CCR surface impoundment with an alternate liner.
In addition to the requirements of the federal CCR rule, CCR landfills and surface impoundments will continue to be regulated by the states. Cost
recovery for future expenditures will be pursued through the normal ratemaking process with federal and state utility commissions and via wholesale
contracts, which permit recovery of necessary and prudently incurred costs associated with Duke Energy’s regulated operations. For more
information, see Notes 3 and 9 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Regulatory Matters" and "Asset Retirement Obligations," respectively.
67
MD&A OTHER MATTERS
Coal Ash Act
AROs recorded on the Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress Consolidated Balance Sheets at December 31, 2021, and December 31,
2020, include the legal obligation for closure of coal ash basins and the disposal of related ash as a result of the Coal Ash Act, the EPA CCR rule and
other agreements. The Coal Ash Act includes a variance procedure for compliance deadlines and other issues surrounding the management of CCR
and CCR surface impoundments and prohibits cost recovery in customer rates for unlawful discharge of ash impoundment waters occurring after
January 1, 2014. The Coal Ash Act leaves the decision on cost recovery determinations related to closure of ash impoundments to the normal
ratemaking processes before utility regulatory commissions.
Consistent with the requirements of the Coal Ash Act, Duke Energy previously submitted comprehensive site assessments and groundwater
corrective action plans to NCDEQ. In addition, on December 31, 2019, Duke Energy submitted updated groundwater corrective action plans and site-
specific coal ash impoundment closure plans to NCDEQ.
On April 1, 2019, NCDEQ issued a closure determination requiring Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress to excavate all remaining coal
ash impoundments at the Allen, Belews Creek, Rogers, Marshall, Mayo and Roxboro facilities in North Carolina. On April 26, 2019, Duke Energy
Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress filed Petitions for Contested Case Hearings in the Office of Administrative Hearings to challenge NCDEQ's April
1 Order. On December 31, 2019, Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress entered into a settlement agreement with NCDEQ and certain
community groups under which Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress agreed to excavate seven of the nine remaining coal ash basins
at these sites with ash moved to on-site lined landfills, including two at Allen, one at Belews Creek, one at Mayo, one at Roxboro, and two at Rogers.
At the two remaining basins at Marshall and Roxboro, uncapped basin ash will be excavated and moved to lined landfills. Those portions of the
basins at Marshall and Roxboro, which were previously filled with ash and on which permitted facilities were constructed, will not be disturbed and will
be closed pursuant to other state regulations.
Following NCDEQ's April 1 Order, Duke Energy estimated the incremental undiscounted cost to close the nine remaining impoundments by
excavation would be approximately $4 billion to $5 billion, potentially increasing the total estimated costs to permanently close all ash basins in North
Carolina and South Carolina to $9.5 billion to $10.5 billion. The settlement lowers the estimated total undiscounted cost to close the nine remaining
basins by excavation by approximately $1.5 billion as compared to Duke Energy’s original estimate that followed the order. As a result, the estimated
total cost to permanently close all ash basins in North Carolina and South Carolina is approximately $8 billion to $9 billion of which approximately
$3.1 billion has been spent through 2021. The majority of the remaining spend is expected to occur over the next 15 to 20 years.
Duke Energy has completed excavation of all coal ash at the Riverbend, Dan River and Sutton plants.
For further information on ash basins and recovery, see Notes 3 and 9 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Regulatory Matters" and “Asset
Retirement Obligations,” respectively.
North Carolina House Bill 951
On October 13, 2021, North Carolina Governor Roy Cooper signed into law legislation passed by the North Carolina House of Representatives and
Senate (the “Legislation”). This Legislation establishes a framework overseen by the NCUC to advance state CO emissions reductions through the
use of least cost planning while providing for continued reliability and affordable rates for customers served by such generation. It also authorizes the
use of performance-based regulation in North Carolina. Among other things, the Legislation requires the NCUC to:
• develop an initial carbon plan that would target a 70% reduction in CO emissions from public utilities' electric generation in the state by 2030
and carbon neutrality by 2050, considering all resource options and the latest technology;
• adopt rules to implement the requirements of the Legislation authorizing performance-based regulation that includes multiyear rate plans with a
maximum three-year term, performance incentive mechanisms to track utility performance, and revenue decoupling for the residential customer
class;
• establish rules to securitize costs associated with the early retirement of subcritical coal-fired electric generating facilities necessary to achieve
the authorized carbon reduction goals at 50% of remaining net book value, with the remaining net book value recovered through normal cost of
service basis; and
• initiate a process for updating rates and terms of certain existing solar power purchase agreements executed under PURPA.
Other Environmental Regulations
The Duke Energy Registrants are also subject to various federal, state and local laws regarding air and water quality, hazardous and solid waste
disposal and other environmental matters. Duke Energy continues to comply with enacted environmental statutes and regulations even as certain of
these regulations are in various stages of clarification, revision or legal challenge. The Duke Energy Registrants cannot predict the outcome of these
matters.
Global Climate Change and Regulation of GHG Emissions
In 2021, President Biden recommitted the United States to the Paris Agreement and announced a new target for the United States of 50% - 52%
reduction in economywide net GHG emissions from 2005 levels by 2030. The U.S. submittal to support this Paris target includes a goal for 100%
carbon-free electricity by 2035. These actions have been supplemented by a number of executive orders by President Biden and an indication by a
number of regulatory agencies, including the EPA, that they would impose additional regulations on CO and methane emissions to which Duke
Energy will be subject. The Duke Energy Registrants are monitoring these matters and cannot predict the outcome, however, there could be a
material impact on our climate strategy.2
2
2
68
MD&A OTHER MATTERS
CO Emissions Reductions
The Duke Energy Registrants’ direct GHG emissions consist primarily of CO that results primarily from operating a fleet of coal-fired and natural gas-
fired power plants to serve its customers reliably and affordably. On September 17, 2019, Duke Energy announced an updated climate strategy with
new goals of at least 50% reduction in carbon emissions from electric generation by 2030 and net-zero carbon emissions from electric generation by
2050. The Duke Energy Registrants have taken actions that have resulted in a reduction of CO emissions over time. Between 2005 and 2021, the
Duke Energy Registrants have collectively lowered the CO emissions from their electricity generation by 44%. Timelines and initiatives, as well as
implementation of new technologies, for future reductions of GHG emissions will vary in each state in which the company operates and will involve
collaboration with regulators, customers and other stakeholders. The goals announced in 2019, as well as the actions taken to reduce CO
emissions, potentially lower the exposure to any future mandatory CO emission reduction requirements, whether as a result of federal legislation,
EPA regulation, state regulation or other as yet unknown emission reduction requirement.
Actions to reduce CO emissions have included the retirement of 56 coal-fired electric generating units with a combined generating capacity of 7,500
MW, while investing in renewables and state-of-the-art highly efficient natural gas-fired generation that produces far fewer CO emissions per unit of
electricity generated than coal. Duke Energy also has made investments to increase EE offerings and ensure continued operations of its zero-CO
emissions hydropower and nuclear plants. These efforts have diversified its system and significantly reduced CO emissions.
Duke Energy will continue to explore the use of currently available and commercially demonstrated technology to reduce CO emissions, including
EE, wind, solar and storage, as well as evolving technologies like carbon capture, utilization and storage, the use of hydrogen and other low-carbon
fuels, long-duration storage and advanced nuclear, in its efforts to achieve its net-zero goal as well as to comply with any future regulations. Duke
Energy plans to adjust to and incorporate evolving and innovative technologies in a way that balances the reliability and affordability while meeting
regulatory requirements and customer demands. Under any future scenario involving mandatory CO limitations, the Duke Energy Registrants would
plan to seek recovery of their compliance costs through appropriate regulatory mechanisms. Future levels of GHG emissions by the Duke Energy
Registrants will be influenced by variables that include capacity needs in the jurisdictions in which they operate, public policy, tax incentives,
economic conditions that affect electricity demand, fuel prices, market prices, availability of resources and labor, compliance with new or existing
regulations, the ability to make enhancements to transmission and distribution systems to support increased renewables, and the existence of new
technologies that can be deployed to generate the electricity necessary to meet customer demand.
Currently, the Duke Energy Registrants do not purchase carbon credits or offsets for use in connection with the company's net-zero emissions goals.
Though they may purchase carbon credits or offsets for such uses in the future , the amount or cost of which is not expected to be material at this
time.
Generation Mix Planning Process
The Duke Energy Registrants annually, biennially or triennially prepare lengthy, forward-looking IRPs. These detailed, highly technical plans are
based on the company’s thorough analysis of numerous factors that can impact the cost of producing and delivering electricity that influence long-
term generation resource planning decisions. The IRP process helps to evaluate a range of options, taking into account stakeholder input as well as
forecasts of future electricity demand, fuel prices, transmission improvements, new generating capacity, integration of renewables, energy storage,
EE and demand response initiatives. The IRP process also helps evaluate potential environmental and regulatory scenarios to better mitigate policy
and economic risks. The IRPs we file with regulators look out 10 to 20 years depending on the jurisdiction.
For a number of years, the Duke Energy Registrants have included a price on CO emissions in their IRP planning process to account for the
potential regulation of CO emissions. Incorporating a price on CO emissions in the IRPs allows for the evaluation of existing and future resource
needs against potential climate change policy risk in the absence of policy certainty. One of the challenges with using a CO price, especially in the
absence of a clear and certain policy, is determining the appropriate price to use. To address this uncertainty and ensure the company remains agile,
the Duke Energy Registrants typically use a range of potential CO prices to reflect a range of potential policy outcomes.
In September 2020, Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress filed their IRPs in North Carolina and South Carolina, and, in December
2021, Duke Energy Indiana filed its IRP, outlining an accelerated energy transition which aligns with the company's 2030 COemissions goal. In
December 2021 the PSCSC rejected Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress’ preferred accelerated coal retirements IRP scenario and
instead found that the base case without a price on CO2 emissions was the most reasonable IRP scenario.
In 2021, the State of North Carolina passed HB 951, which among other things, directs the NCUC to develop and approve a carbon reduction plan by
the end of 2022 that would target a 70% reduction in CO emissions from Duke Energy Progress' and Duke Energy Carolinas' electric generation in
the state by 2030 and carbon neutrality by 2050, considering all resource options and the latest technology. In light of this legislation, in November
2021, the NCUC declined to make a determination on the portfolios presented in the 2020 IRP noting that the legislation may impact the schedule for
coal plant retirements and new resources and limited its order to short term actions for use on an interim basis pending preparation of the carbon
plan. The NCUC's carbon reduction plan will be informed by Duke Energy's initial carbon plan, which will be filed with the NCUC by May 16, 2022,
building on the IRPs that were filed in 2020 by Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress and incorporating feedback from extensive
stakeholder engagement.
CO and Methane Emissions Reductions from the Natural Gas Distribution Business
In addition to CO emissions resulting primarily from our operations of coal-fired and natural gas-fired power plants, the Duke Energy Registrants are
also responsible for certain methane emissions from the distribution of natural gas to customers. On October 9, 2020, Duke Energy announced a
new goal to achieve net-zero methane emissions from its natural gas distribution business by 2030. The Duke Energy Registrants have taken actions
that have resulted in methane emission reductions, including the replacement of cast iron and bare steel pipelines and associated services with
plastic or coated steel, advanced methane leak detection efforts, reducing time to repair nonhazardous leaks and operational releases of methane,
and investment in renewable natural gas.
Timelines and initiatives, as well as implementation of new technologies, for future reductions of upstream methane emissions will vary in each state
in which the company’s natural gas distribution business operates and will involve collaboration with regulators, customers and other stakeholders.
EPA has also proposed regulations that would require reduction of methane emissions upstream of the Duke Energy Registrants' natural gas
distribution business. The impact of these regulations on natural gas fuel prices is not currently quantifiable.2
2
2
2
2
2
2
2
2
2
2
2
2
2 2
2
2
2 
2
2
2
69
MD&A OTHER MATTERS
In addition to possible EPA regulation of methane emissions, certain local governments, none within the jurisdictions in which the Duke Energy
Registrants operate, have enacted or are considering initiatives to eliminate natural gas use in new buildings and focus on electrification. Enactment
of similar regulations in the areas in which the Duke Energy Registrants' natural gas distribution operates could have a significant impact on the
natural gas distribution business and its operations. At this time, such impacts are not able to be quantified; however, the net-zero methane goals
announced in 2020 for the natural gas distribution business, as well as the actions taken to reduce these GHG emissions, potentially lowers the
exposure to any future mandatory GHG emission reduction requirements. The Duke Energy Registrants would plan to seek recovery of their
compliance costs with any new regulations through the regulatory process.
Physical Impacts of Climate Change
The Duke Energy Registrants recognize that scientists associate severe weather events with increasing levels of GHGs in the atmosphere. It is
possible that these weather events could have a material impact on future results of operations should they occur more frequently and with greater
severity. However, the uncertain nature of potential changes in extreme weather events (such as increased frequency, duration and severity), the long
period of time over which any potential changes might take place and the inability to predict potential changes with any degree of accuracy, make
estimating with any certainty any potential future financial risk to the Duke Energy Registrants’ operations difficult. Additionally, the Duke Energy
Registrants would plan to continue to seek recovery of storm costs through the appropriate regulatory mechanisms. For more information on storm
securitization in North Carolina and storm cost recovery in Florida, see Note 3 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Regulatory Matters."
The Duke Energy Registrants routinely take steps to reduce the potential impact of severe weather events on their electric transmission and
distribution systems and natural gas facilities. The steps include modernizing the electric grid through smart meters, storm hardening, self-healing
systems and targeted undergrounding and applying lessons learned from previous storms to restoration efforts. The Duke Energy Registrants’
electric generating facilities and natural gas facilities are designed to withstand extreme weather events without significant damage. The Duke Energy
Registrants maintain inventories of coal, oil and liquified natural gas to mitigate the effects of any potential short-term disruption in fuel supply so they
can continue to provide customers with an uninterrupted supply of electricity and/or natural gas.
New Accounting Standards
See Note 1 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Summary of Significant Accounting Policies,” for a discussion of the impact of new accounting
standards.
ITEM 7A. QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK
See “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Results of Operations and Financial Condition – Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About
Market Risk.”
70
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
Duke Energy  
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 73
Consolidated Statements of Operations 75
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income 76
Consolidated Balance Sheets 77
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 78
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity 79
Duke Energy Carolinas  
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 80
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income 82
Consolidated Balance Sheets 83
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 84
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity 85
Progress Energy  
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 86
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income 88
Consolidated Balance Sheets 89
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 90
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity 91
Duke Energy Progress  
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 92
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income 94
Consolidated Balance Sheets 95
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 96
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity 97
Duke Energy Florida  
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 98
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income 100
Consolidated Balance Sheets 101
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 102
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity 103
Duke Energy Ohio  
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 104
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income 106
Consolidated Balance Sheets 107
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 108
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity 109
Duke Energy Indiana  
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 110
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income 112
Consolidated Balance Sheets 113
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 114
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity 115
Piedmont  
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 116
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income 118
Consolidated Balance Sheets 119
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 120
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity 121
71
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Combined Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements  
Note 1 – Summary of Significant Accounting Policies 122
Note 2 – Business Segments 131
Note 3 – Regulatory Matters 135
Note 4 – Commitments and Contingencies 154
Note 5 – Leases 159
Note 6 – Debt and Credit Facilities 164
Note 7 – Guarantees and Indemnifications 170
Note 8 – Joint Ownership of Generating and Transmission Facilities 170
Note 9 – Asset Retirement Obligations 171
Note 10 – Property, Plant and Equipment 174
Note 11 – Goodwill and Intangible Assets 176
Note 12 – Investments in Unconsolidated Affiliates 177
Note 13 – Related Party Transactions 179
Note 14 – Derivatives and Hedging 180
Note 15 – Investments in Debt and Equity Securities 185
Note 16 – Fair Value Measurements 189
Note 17 – Variable Interest Entities 195
Note 18 – Revenue 199
Note 19 – Stockholders' Equity 204
Note 20 – Severance 206
Note 21 – Stock-Based Compensation 207
Note 22 – Employee Benefit Plans 209
Note 23 – Income Taxes 222
Note 24 – Other Income and Expenses, Net 228
Note 25 – Subsequent Events 229
72
REPORTS
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the shareholders and the Board of Directors of Duke Energy Corporation
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Duke Energy Corporation and subsidiaries (the "Company") as of December
31, 2021 and 2020, the related consolidated statements of operations, comprehensive income, changes in equity, and cash flows, for each of the
three years in the period ended December 31, 2021, and the related notes (collectively referred to as the "financial statements"). In our opinion,
the financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the Company as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, and the
results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2021, in conformity with accounting
principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
We have also audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB), the
Company's internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2021, based on criteria established in Internal Control — Integrated
Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission and our report dated February 24, 2022,
expressed an unqualified opinion on the Company's internal control over financial reporting.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company's
financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with
respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and
Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain
reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. Our audits
included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and
performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and
disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by
management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the financial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for
our opinion.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters arising from the current-period audit of the financial statements that were
communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (1) relate to accounts or disclosures that are material to the
financial statements and (2) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters
does not alter in any way our opinion on the financial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matters
below, providing separate opinions on the critical audit matters or on the accounts or disclosures to which they relate.
Regulatory Matters – Impact of Rate Regulation on the Financial Statements – Refer to Notes 1, 3, and 9 to the financial
statements.
Critical Audit Matter Description
The Company is subject to regulation by federal and state utility regulatory agencies (the “Commissions”), which have jurisdiction with respect to
the rates of the Company’s electric and natural gas distribution companies. Management has determined it meets the criteria for the application
of regulated operations accounting in preparing its financial statements under accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of
America. Significant judgment can be required to determine if otherwise recognizable incurred costs qualify to be presented as a regulatory
asset and deferred because such costs are probable of future recovery in customer rates. As discussed in Note 3, regulatory proceedings in
recent years in North Carolina and South Carolina have focused on the recoverability of asset retirement obligations specific to coal ash. As a
result, assessing the potential outcomes of future regulatory orders in North Carolina and South Carolina requires significant management
judgment. As of December 31, 2021, the Company has approximately $14.6 billion recorded as regulatory assets.
We identified the impact of rate regulation related to regulatory assets as a critical audit matter due to the significant judgments made by
management, including assumptions regarding the outcome of future decisions by the Commissions, to support its assertions on the likelihood of
future recovery for deferred costs. Given that management’s accounting judgments are based on assumptions about the outcome of future
decisions by the Commissions, auditing these judgments required specialized knowledge of accounting for rate regulation and the ratemaking
process due to its inherent complexities as it relates to regulatory assets.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the recovery of regulatory assets included the following, among others:
• We tested the effectiveness of management’s controls over the evaluation of the likelihood of the recovery in future rates and the
monitoring and evaluation of regulatory developments that may affect the likelihood of recovering costs in future rates.
• We evaluated the Company’s disclosures related to the impacts of rate regulation including the balances recorded and regulatory
developments.
73
REPORTS
• We read relevant regulatory orders issued by the Commissions, regulatory statutes, interpretations, procedural memorandums, filings
made by intervenors, and other publicly available information to assess the likelihood of recovery in future rates based on precedents of
the Commissions’ treatment of similar costs under similar circumstances. We also evaluated the external information and compared it
to management’s recorded balances for completeness.
• For regulatory matters in process, we inspected the Company’s and intervenors’ filings with the Commissions, that may impact the
Company’s future rates, for any evidence that might contradict management’s assertions.
• We evaluated the reasonableness of management’s judgments regarding the recoverability of regulatory asset balances by
performing the following:
– We inquired of management regarding changes in regulatory orders and regulatory asset balances during the year.
– We evaluated the reasonableness of such changes based on our knowledge of commission-approved amortization,
expected incurred costs, and recently approved regulatory orders, as applicable.
– We utilized trend analyses to evaluate the historical consistency of regulatory asset balances.
– We compared the recorded regulatory asset balance to an independently developed expectation of the corresponding
balance.
• We obtained an analysis from management and letters from internal legal counsel for asset retirement obligations specific to coal ash
costs, regarding probability of recovery for deferred costs not yet addressed in a regulatory order to assess management’s assertion
that amounts are probable of recovery.
• We obtained representation from management asserting that regulatory assets recorded in the financial statements are probable of
recovery.
Noncontrolling Interests - Minority Interest Investment in Duke Energy Indiana – Refer to Note 1 to the financial statements
Critical Audit Matter Description
On January 28, 2021, the Company executed an agreement providing for an investment by an affiliate of GIC Private Limited in Duke Energy
Indiana in exchange for a 19.9% minority interest issued by Duke Energy Indiana Holdco, LLC, the holding company for Duke Energy Indiana.
The transaction will be completed following two closings for an aggregate purchase price of approximately $2 billion. The first closing occurred on
September 8, 2021 and resulted in Duke Energy Indiana Holdco, LLC issuing 11.05% of its membership interests in exchange for 50% of the
purchase price. The Company retained indirect control of these assets, and, therefore, no gain or loss was recognized on the Consolidated
Statements of Operations. The difference between the net cash consideration received and the carrying value of the noncontrolling interest was
recorded as an increase to equity. The Company has the discretion to determine the timing of the second closing, but the closing will occur no
later than January 2023.
We identified the minority interest investment in Duke Energy Indiana as a critical audit matter because of the extensive audit effort required to
audit the transaction, including the need to involve professionals in our firm with the appropriate expertise to assist us in evaluating
management’s conclusions that there should be no gain or loss associated with this transaction recognized on the Consolidated Statements of
Operations for the year ended December 31, 2021.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the minority interest investment in Duke Energy Indiana included the following, among others:
• We tested the effectiveness of controls over the accounting assessment of significant and non- routine transactions, including the
controls over the income tax treatment of such transactions.
• We evaluated management’s conclusions related to accounting for the transaction by:
–Obtaining and reading the agreement providing for the minority investment,
–Involving professionals in our firm with the appropriate expertise to evaluate the work performed by management’s expert related
to the tax treatment of the transaction,
–Assessing management’s documentation for accounting for the transaction.
• We evaluated the appropriateness of the Company’s disclosures related to the minority interest investment.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Charlotte, North Carolina
February 24, 2022 
We have served as the Company's auditor since 1947.
74
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions, except per share amounts) 2021 2020 2019
Operating Revenues
Regulated electric $ 22,319 $ 21,461 $ 22,615 
Regulated natural gas 2,008 1,642 1,759 
Nonregulated electric and other 770 765 705 
Total operating revenues 25,097 23,868 25,079 
Operating Expenses
Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power 6,255 6,051 6,826 
Cost of natural gas 705 460 627 
Operation, maintenance and other 6,042 5,788 6,066 
Depreciation and amortization 4,990 4,705 4,548 
Property and other taxes 1,389 1,337 1,307 
Impairment of assets and other charges 356 984 (8)
Total operating expenses 19,737 19,325 19,366 
Gains (Losses) on Sales of Other Assets and Other, net 13 10 (4)
Operating Income 5,373 4,553 5,709 
Other Income and Expenses
Equity in earnings (losses) of unconsolidated affiliates 28 (2,005) 162 
Other income and expenses, net 643 453 430 
Total other income and expenses 671 (1,552) 592 
Interest Expense 2,280 2,162 2,204 
Income From Continuing Operations Before Income Taxes 3,764 839 4,097 
Income Tax Expense (Benefit) From Continuing Operations 192 (236) 519 
Income From Continuing Operations 3,572 1,075 3,578 
Income (Loss) From Discontinued Operations, net of tax 7 7 (7)
Net Income 3,579 1,082 3,571 
Add: Net Loss Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests 329 295 177 
Net Income Attributable to Duke Energy Corporation 3,908 1,377 3,748 
Less: Preferred Dividends 106 107 41 
Net Income Available to Duke Energy Corporation Common Stockholders $ 3,802 $ 1,270 $ 3,707 
Earnings Per Share – Basic and Diluted
Income from continuing operations available to Duke Energy Corporation common stockholders
Basic and Diluted $ 4.93 $ 1.71 $ 5.07 
Income (Loss) from discontinued operations attributable to Duke Energy Corporation common
stockholders
Basic and Diluted $ 0.01 $ 0.01 $ (0.01)
Net income available to Duke Energy Corporation common stockholders
Basic and Diluted $ 4.94 $ 1.72 $ 5.06 
Weighted average shares outstanding
Basic 769 737 729 
Diluted 769 738 729 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
75
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 2019
Net Income $ 3,579 $ 1,082 $ 3,571 
Other Comprehensive Income (Loss), net of tax
Pension and OPEB adjustments 7 6 9 
Net unrealized losses on cash flow hedges (68) (138) (47)
Reclassification into earnings from cash flow hedges 13 11 6 
Unrealized (losses) gains on available-for-sale securities (8) 3 8 
Other Comprehensive Loss, net of tax (56) (118) (24)
Comprehensive Income 3,523 964 3,547 
Add: Comprehensive Loss Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests 319 306 177 
Comprehensive Income Attributable to Duke Energy Corporation 3,842 1,270 3,724 
Less: Preferred Dividends 106 107 41 
Comprehensive Income Available to Duke Energy Corporation Common Stockholders $ 3,736 $ 1,163 $ 3,683 
(a)     Net of income tax impacts of approximately $17 million and $35 million for the years ended December 31, 2021, and 2020, respectively. Tax
impacts are immaterial for other periods presented.
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements(a)
76
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020
ASSETS
Current Assets
Cash and cash equivalents $ 343 $ 259 
Receivables (net of allowance for doubtful accounts of $46 at 2021 and $29 at 2020) 1,173 1,009 
Receivables of VIEs (net of allowance for doubtful accounts of $76 at 2021 and $117 at 2020) 2,437 2,144 
Inventory 3,199 3,167 
Regulatory assets (includes $105 at 2021 and $53 at 2020 related to VIEs) 2,150 1,641 
Other (includes $256 at 2021 and $296 at 2020 related to VIEs) 638 462 
Total current assets 9,940 8,682 
Property, Plant and Equipment
Cost 161,819 155,580 
Accumulated depreciation and amortization (50,555) (48,827)
Facilities to be retired, net 144 29 
Net property, plant and equipment 111,408 106,782 
Other Noncurrent Assets
Goodwill 19,303 19,303 
Regulatory assets (includes $1,823 at 2021 and $937 at 2020 related to VIEs) 12,487 12,421 
Nuclear decommissioning trust funds 10,401 9,114 
Operating lease right-of-use assets, net 1,266 1,524 
Investments in equity method unconsolidated affiliates 970 961 
Other (includes $92 at 2021 and $81 at 2020 related to VIEs) 3,812 3,601 
Total other noncurrent assets 48,239 46,924 
Total Assets $ 169,587 $ 162,388 
LIABILITIES AND EQUITY
Current Liabilities
Accounts payable $ 3,629 $ 3,144 
Notes payable and commercial paper 3,304 2,873 
Taxes accrued 749 482 
Interest accrued 533 537 
Current maturities of long-term debt (includes $243 at 2021 and $472 at 2020 related to VIEs) 3,387 4,238 
Asset retirement obligations 647 718 
Regulatory liabilities 1,211 1,377 
Other 2,471 2,936 
Total current liabilities 15,931 16,305 
Long-Term Debt (includes $4,854 at 2021 and $3,535 at 2020 related to VIEs) 60,448 55,625 
Other Noncurrent Liabilities
Deferred income taxes 9,379 9,244 
Asset retirement obligations 12,129 12,286 
Regulatory liabilities 16,152 15,029 
Operating lease liabilities 1,074 1,340 
Accrued pension and other post-retirement benefit costs 855 969 
Investment tax credits 833 687 
Other (includes $319 at 2021 and $316 at 2020 related to VIEs) 1,650 1,719 
Total other noncurrent liabilities 42,072 41,274 
Commitments and Contingencies
Equity
Preferred stock, Series A, $0.001 par value, 40 million depositary shares authorized and outstanding at 2021 and
2020 973 973 
Preferred stock, Series B, $0.001 par value, 1 million shares authorized and outstanding at 2021 and 2020 989 989 
Common stock, $0.001 par value, 2 billion shares authorized; 769 million shares outstanding at 2021 and 2020 1 1 
Additional paid-in capital 44,371 43,767 
Retained earnings 3,265 2,471 
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (303) (237)
Total Duke Energy Corporation stockholders' equity 49,296 47,964 
Noncontrolling interests 1,840 1,220 
Total equity 51,136 49,184 
Total Liabilities and Equity $ 169,587 $ 162,388 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
77
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 2019
CASH FLOWS FROM OPERATING ACTIVITIES
Net income $ 3,579 $ 1,082 $ 3,571 
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:
Depreciation, amortization and accretion (including amortization of nuclear fuel) 5,663 5,486 5,176 
Equity in (earnings) losses of unconsolidated affiliates (28) 2,005 (162)
Equity component of AFUDC (171) (154) (139)
Impairment of assets and other charges 356 984 (8)
Deferred income taxes 191 54 806 
Payments for asset retirement obligations (540) (610) (746)
Provision for rate refunds (70) (22) 60 
Refund of AMT credit carryforwards — 572 573 
(Increase) decrease in
Net realized and unrealized mark-to-market and hedging transactions 50 63 (48)
Receivables (297) (56) 78 
Inventory (34) 66 (122)
Other current assets (1,136) 205 10 
Increase (decrease) in
Accounts payable 249 (21) (164)
Taxes accrued 284 117 (224)
Other current liabilities (13) (65) 172 
Other assets 112 (408) (555)
Other liabilities 95 (442) (69)
Net cash provided by operating activities 8,290 8,856 8,209 
CASH FLOWS FROM INVESTING ACTIVITIES
Capital expenditures (9,715) (9,907) (11,122)
Contributions to equity method investments (81) (370) (324)
Return of investment capital 44 133 11 
Purchases of debt and equity securities (6,098) (8,011) (3,348)
Proceeds from sales and maturities of debt and equity securities 6,103 7,949 3,343 
Disbursements to canceled equity method investments (855) — — 
Other (333) (398) (517)
Net cash used in investing activities (10,935) (10,604) (11,957)
CASH FLOWS FROM FINANCING ACTIVITIES
Proceeds from the:
Issuance of long-term debt 9,052 6,330 7,091 
Issuance of preferred stock — — 1,962 
Issuance of common stock 5 2,745 384 
Payments for the redemption of long-term debt (5,294) (4,506) (3,476)
Proceeds from the issuance of short-term debt with original maturities greater than 90 days 332 3,009 397 
Payments for the redemption of short-term debt with original maturities greater than 90 days (997) (2,147) (479)
Notes payable and commercial paper 1,144 (1,181) (298)
Contributions from noncontrolling interests 1,575 426 843 
Dividends paid (3,114) (2,812) (2,668)
Other (94) (133) (26)
Net cash provided by financing activities 2,609 1,731 3,730 
Net decrease in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash (36) (17) (18)
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at beginning of period 556 573 591 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at end of period $ 520 $ 556 $ 573 
Supplemental Disclosures:
Cash paid for interest, net of amount capitalized $ 2,248 $ 2,186 $ 2,195 
Cash received from income taxes (3) (585) (651)
Significant non-cash transactions:
Accrued capital expenditures 1,325 1,116 1,356 
Non-cash dividends — 110 108 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
78
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CHANGES IN EQUITY
Duke Energy Corporation
Stockholders'
Accumulated Other
Comprehensive
Income (Loss)
Net
Unrealized Total
Net
GainsGains
(Losses) Duke Energy
Common Additional(Losses)
onon
Available-Pension and Corporation
Preferred StockCommon Paid-inRetainedCash
Flow for-Sale- OPEBStockholders'Noncontrolling Total
(in millions) StockShares Stock CapitalEarningsHedges SecuritiesAdjustments Equity Interests Equity
Balance at December
31, 2018 $ — 727 $ 1 $40,795 $3,113 $ (14)$ (3)$ (75)$ 43,817 $ 17 $43,834 
Net income (loss) — — — — 3,707 — — — 3,707 (177) 3,530 
Other comprehensive
(loss) income — — — — — (41) 8 9 (24) — (24)
Preferred stock, Series
A, issuances, net of
issuance costs 973 — — — — — — — 973 — 973 
Preferred stock, Series
B, issuances, net of
issuance costs 989 — — — — — — — 989 — 989 
Common stock
issuances, including
dividend reinvestment
and employee benefits — 6 — 552 — — — — 552 — 552 
Common stock
dividends — — — — (2,735) — — — (2,735) — (2,735)
Sale of noncontrolling
interest — — — (466) — 10 — — (456) 863 407 
Contribution from
noncontrolling interest— — — — — — — — — 428 428 
Distributions to
noncontrolling interest
in subsidiaries — — — — — — — — — (4) (4)
Other — — — — 23 (6) (2) (16) (1) 2 1 
Balance at December
31, 2019 $1,962 733 $ 1 $40,881 $4,108 $ (51)$ 3 $ (82)$ 46,822 $ 1,129 $47,951 
Net income — — — — 1,270 — — — 1,270 (295) 975 
Other comprehensive
(loss) Income — — — — — (116) 3 6 (107) (11) (118)
Common stock
issuances, including
dividend reinvestment
and employee benefits — 36 — 2,902 — — — — 2,902 — 2,902 
Common stock
dividends — — — — (2,815) — — — (2,815) — (2,815)
Contribution from
noncontrolling interest — — — (17) — — — — (17) 426 409 
Distributions to
noncontrolling interest
in subsidiaries — — — — — — — — — (30) (30)
Other — — — 1 (92) — — — (91) 1 (90)
Balance at December
31, 2020 $1,962 769 $ 1 $43,767 $2,471 $(167)$ 6 $ (76)$ 47,964 $ 1,220 $49,184 
Net income — — — — 3,802 — — — 3,802 (329) 3,473 
Other comprehensive
(loss) income — — — — — (65) (8) 7 (66) 10 (56)
Common stock
issuances, including
dividend reinvestment
and employee benefits — — — 68 — — — — 68 — 68 
Common stock
dividends — — — — (3,008) — — — (3,008) — (3,008)
Sale of noncontrolling
interest — — — 545 — — — — 545 454 999 
Contribution from
noncontrolling interest,
net of transaction
costs — — — — — — — — — 550 550 
Distributions to
noncontrolling interests
in subsidiaries — — — — — — — — — (66) (66)
Other — — — (9) — — — — (9) 1 (8)
Balance at December
31, 2021 $1,962 769 $ 1 $44,371 $3,265 $(232)$ (2)$ (69)$ 49,296 $ 1,840 $51,136 
(a)     Duke Energy issued 40 million depositary shares of preferred stock, Series A, in the first quarter of 2019 and 1 million shares of preferred stock, Series B, in the third
quarter of 2019.
(b)    Relates to the sale of a noncontrolling interest in the Commercial Renewables segment. See Note 1 for additional discussion of the transaction.
(c)    Amounts in Retained Earnings and AOCI primarily represent impacts to accumulated other comprehensive income due to implementation of a new accounting
standard related to Reclassification of Certain Tax Effects from Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income.
(d)     Amounts in Retained earnings primarily represent impacts due to implementation of a new accounting standard related to Current Estimated Credit Losses. See
Note 1 for additional discussion.(a)
(a)
(b)
(f)
(c)
(f)
(d)
(e)
(f)
(e)    Relates to the sale of a noncontrolling interest in Duke Energy Indiana. See Note 1 for additional discussion.
(f)    Relates to tax equity financing activity in the Commercial Renewables segment.
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
79
REPORTS
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the shareholder and the Board of Directors of Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC and subsidiaries (the "Company") as of
December 31, 2021 and 2020, the related consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income, changes in equity, and cash flows,
for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2021, and the related notes (collectively referred to as the "financial statements"). In
our opinion, the financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the Company as of December 31, 2021 and
2020, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2021, in conformity with
accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company's
financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board
(United States) (PCAOB) and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws
and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain
reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. The Company is
not required to have, nor were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over financial reporting. As part of our audits, we are required
to obtain an understanding of internal control over financial reporting but not for the purpose of expressing an opinion on the effectiveness of the
Company’s internal control over financial reporting. Accordingly, we express no such opinion.
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements, whether due to error or fraud,
and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts
and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by
management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the financial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for
our opinion.
Critical Audit Matter
The critical audit matter communicated below is a matter arising from the current-period audit of the financial statements that was communicated
or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (1) relates to accounts or disclosures that are material to the financial statements
and (2) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any
way our opinion on the financial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matter below, providing a
separate opinion on the critical audit matter or on the accounts or disclosures to which it relates.
Regulatory Matters – Impact of Rate Regulation on the Financial Statements – Refer to Notes 1, 3, and 9 to the financial
statements.
Critical Audit Matter Description
The Company is subject to rate regulation by the North Carolina Utilities Commission and by the South Carolina Public Service Commission
(collectively the “Commissions”), which have jurisdiction with respect to the electric rates of the Company. Management has determined it meets
the criteria for the application of regulated operations accounting in preparing its financial statements under accounting principles generally
accepted in the United States of America. Significant judgment can be required to determine if otherwise recognizable incurred costs qualify to be
presented as a regulatory asset and deferred because such costs are probable of future recovery in customer rates. As discussed in Note 3,
regulatory proceedings in recent years in North Carolina and South Carolina have focused on the recoverability of asset retirement obligations
specific to coal ash. As a result, assessing the potential outcomes of future regulatory orders in North Carolina and South Carolina requires
significant management judgment. As of December 31, 2021, the Company has approximately $3.5 billion recorded as regulatory assets.
We identified the impact of rate regulation related to regulatory assets as a critical audit matter due to the significant judgments made by
management, including assumptions regarding the outcome of future decisions by the Commissions, to support its assertions on the likelihood of
future recovery for deferred costs. Given that management’s accounting judgments are based on assumptions about the outcome of future
decisions by the Commissions, auditing these judgments required specialized knowledge of accounting for rate regulation and the ratemaking
process due to its inherent complexities as it relates to regulatory assets.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the recovery of regulatory assets included the following, among others:
• We tested the effectiveness of management’s controls over the evaluation of the likelihood of the recovery in future rates and the
monitoring and evaluation of regulatory developments that may affect the likelihood of recovering costs in future rates.
• We evaluated the Company’s disclosures related to the impacts of rate regulation, including the balances recorded and
regulatory developments.
80
REPORTS
• We read relevant regulatory orders issued by the Commissions, regulatory statutes, interpretations, procedural
memorandums, filings made by intervenors, and other publicly available information to assess the likelihood of recovery in
future rates based on precedents of the Commissions’ treatment of similar costs under similar circumstances. We evaluated
the external information and compared it to management’s recorded balances for completeness.
• For regulatory matters in process, we inspected the Company’s and intervenors’ filings with the Commissions, that may impact the
Company’s future rates, for any evidence that might contradict management’s assertions.
• We evaluated the reasonableness of management’s judgments regarding the recoverability of regulatory asset balances by
performing the following:
– We inquired of management regarding changes in regulatory orders and regulatory asset balances during the year.
– We evaluated the reasonableness of such changes based on our knowledge of commission-approved
amortization, expected incurred costs, and recently approved regulatory orders, as applicable.
– We utilized trend analyses to evaluate the historical consistency of regulatory asset balances.
– We compared the recorded regulatory asset balance to an independently developed expectation of the
corresponding balance.
• We obtained an analysis from management and letters from internal legal counsel for asset retirement obligations specific to coal
ash costs, regarding probability of recovery for deferred costs not yet addressed in a regulatory order to assess management’s
assertion that amounts are probable of recovery.
• We obtained representation from management asserting that regulatory assets recorded in the financial statements are
probable of recovery.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Charlotte, North Carolina
February 24, 2022
We have served as the Company's auditor since 1947.
81
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY CAROLINAS, LLC
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS AND COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 2019
Operating Revenues $ 7,102 $ 7,015 $ 7,395 
Operating Expenses    
Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power 1,601 1,682 1,804 
Operation, maintenance and other 1,833 1,743 1,868 
Depreciation and amortization 1,468 1,462 1,388 
Property and other taxes 320 299 292 
Impairment of assets and other charges 227 476 17 
Total operating expenses 5,449 5,662 5,369 
Gains on Sales of Other Assets and Other, net 2 1 — 
Operating Income 1,655 1,354 2,026 
Other Income and Expenses, net 270 177 151 
Interest Expense 538 487 463 
Income Before Income Taxes 1,387 1,044 1,714 
Income Tax Expense 51 88 311 
Net Income $ 1,336 $ 956 $ 1,403 
Other Comprehensive Income, net of tax    
Net unrealized gain on cash flow hedges 1 — — 
Other Comprehensive Income, net of tax 1 — — 
Comprehensive Income $ 1,337 $ 956 $ 1,403 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
82
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY CAROLINAS, LLC
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
 December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020
ASSETS   
Current Assets   
Cash and cash equivalents $ 7 $ 21 
Receivables (net of allowance for doubtful accounts of $1 at 2021 and 2020) 300 247 
Receivables of VIEs (net of allowance for doubtful accounts of $41 at 2021 and $22 at 2020) 844 696 
Receivables from affiliated companies 190 124 
Inventory 1,026 1,010 
Regulatory assets (includes $12 at 2021 related to VIEs) 544 473 
Other 95 20 
Total current assets 3,006 2,591 
Property, Plant and Equipment   
Cost 51,874 50,640 
Accumulated depreciation and amortization (17,854) (17,453)
Facilities to be retired, net 102 — 
Net property, plant and equipment 34,122 33,187 
Other Noncurrent Assets
Regulatory assets (includes $220 at 2021 related to VIEs) 2,935 2,996 
Nuclear decommissioning trust funds 5,759 4,977 
Operating lease right-of-use assets, net 92 110 
Other 1,248 1,187 
Total other noncurrent assets 10,034 9,270 
Total Assets $ 47,162 $ 45,048 
LIABILITIES AND EQUITY   
Current Liabilities   
Accounts payable $ 988 $ 1,000 
Accounts payable to affiliated companies 266 199 
Notes payable to affiliated companies 226 506 
Taxes accrued 274 76 
Interest accrued 125 117 
Current maturities of long-term debt (includes $5 at 2021 related to VIEs) 362 506 
Asset retirement obligations 249 264 
Regulatory liabilities 487 473 
Other 546 546 
Total current liabilities 3,523 3,687 
Long-Term Debt (includes $703 at 2021 related to VIEs) 12,595 11,412 
Long-Term Debt Payable to Affiliated Companies 318 300 
Other Noncurrent Liabilities   
Deferred income taxes 3,634 3,842 
Asset retirement obligations 5,052 5,086 
Regulatory liabilities 7,198 6,535 
Operating lease liabilities 78 97 
Accrued pension and other post-retirement benefit costs 50 73 
Investment tax credits 287 236 
Other 536 626 
Total other noncurrent liabilities 16,835 16,495 
Commitments and Contingencies
Equity   
Member's equity 13,897 13,161 
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (6) (7)
Total equity 13,891 13,154 
Total Liabilities and Equity $ 47,162 $ 45,048 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
83
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY CAROLINAS, LLC
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 2019
CASH FLOWS FROM OPERATING ACTIVITIES    
Net income $ 1,336 $ 956 $ 1,403 
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:
Depreciation and amortization (including amortization of nuclear fuel) 1,743 1,731 1,671 
Equity component of AFUDC (65) (62) (42)
Impairment of assets and other charges 227 476 17 
Deferred income taxes (213) (260) 133 
Payments for asset retirement obligations (182) (162) (278)
Provision for rate refunds (46) (5) 36 
(Increase) decrease in
Net realized and unrealized mark-to-market and hedging transactions — (4) (8)
Receivables (99) 52 (21)
Receivables from affiliated companies (66) (10) 68 
Inventory (16) (14) (48)
Other current assets (309) 209 (73)
Increase (decrease) in
Accounts payable 5 55 (50)
Accounts payable to affiliated companies 85 (11) (20)
Taxes accrued 206 30 (127)
Other current liabilities (39) (56) 127 
Other assets 21 (102) (42)
Other liabilities 116 (47) (37)
Net cash provided by operating activities 2,704 2,776 2,709 
CASH FLOWS FROM INVESTING ACTIVITIES
Capital expenditures (2,693) (2,669) (2,714)
Purchases of debt and equity securities (3,425) (1,602) (1,658)
Proceeds from sales and maturities of debt and equity securities 3,425 1,602 1,658 
Other (177) (164) (204)
Net cash used in investing activities (2,870) (2,833) (2,918)
CASH FLOWS FROM FINANCING ACTIVITIES
Proceeds from the issuance of long-term debt 1,651 998 886 
Payments for the redemption of long-term debt (617) (813) (6)
Notes payable to affiliated companies (280) 477 (410)
Distributions to parent (600) (600) (275)
Other (1) (2) (1)
Net cash provided by financing activities 153 60 194 
Net (decrease) increase in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash (13) 3 (15)
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at beginning of period 21 18 33 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at end of period $ 8 $ 21 $ 18 
Supplemental Disclosures:
Cash paid for interest, net of amount capitalized $ 508 $ 481 $ 433 
Cash paid for income taxes 233 321 122 
Significant non-cash transactions:
Accrued capital expenditures 359 365 347 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
84
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY CAROLINAS, LLC
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CHANGES IN EQUITY
Accumulated Other
  Comprehensive  
Income (Loss)
Net Gains
(Losses) on
Member's Cash Flow Total
(in millions) Equity Hedges Equity
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ 11,689 $ (6)$ 11,683 
Net income 1,403 — 1,403 
Distributions to parent (275) — (275)
Other 1 (1) — 
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ 12,818 $ (7)$ 12,811 
Net income 956 — 956 
Distributions to parent (600) — (600)
Other (13) — (13)
Balance at December 31, 2020 $ 13,161 $ (7)$ 13,154 
Net income 1,336 — 1,336 
Other comprehensive income — 1 1 
Distributions to parent (600) — (600)
Balance at December 31, 2021 $ 13,897 $ (6)$ 13,891 
(a)     Amounts primarily represent impacts due to implementation of a new accounting standard related to Credit Losses. See Note 1 for additional
discussion.
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements(a)
85
REPORTS
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the shareholder and the Board of Directors of Progress Energy, Inc.
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Progress Energy, Inc. and subsidiaries (the "Company") as of December 31,
2021 and 2020, the related consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income, changes in equity, and cash flows, for each of the
three years in the period ended December 31, 2021, and the related notes (collectively referred to as the "financial statements"). In our opinion,
the financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the Company as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, and the
results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2021, in conformity with accounting
principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company's
financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board
(United States) (PCAOB) and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws
and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain
reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. The Company is
not required to have, nor were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over financial reporting. As part of our audits, we are required
to obtain an understanding of internal control over financial reporting but not for the purpose of expressing an opinion on the effectiveness of the
Company’s internal control over financial reporting. Accordingly, we express no such opinion.
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements, whether due to error or fraud,
and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts
and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by
management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the financial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for
our opinion.
Critical Audit Matter
The critical audit matter communicated below is a matter arising from the current-period audit of the financial statements that was communicated
or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (1) relates to accounts or disclosures that are material to the financial statements
and (2) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any
way our opinion on the financial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matter below, providing a
separate opinion on the critical audit matter or on the accounts or disclosures to which it relates.
Regulatory Matters – Impact of Rate Regulation on the Financial Statements – Refer to Notes 1, 3, and 9 to the financial
statements.
Critical Audit Matter Description
The Company is subject to rate regulation by the North Carolina Utilities Commission, South Carolina Public Service Commission and Florida
Public Service Commission (collectively the “Commissions”), which have jurisdiction with respect to the electric rates of the Company.
Management has determined it meets the criteria for the application of regulated operations accounting in preparing its financial statements under
accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America. Significant judgment can be required to determine if otherwise
recognizable incurred costs qualify to be presented as a regulatory asset and deferred because such costs are probable of future recovery in
customer rates. As discussed in Note 3, regulatory proceedings in recent years in North Carolina and South Carolina have focused on the
recoverability of asset retirement obligations specific to coal ash. As a result, assessing the potential outcomes of future regulatory orders in North
Carolina and South Carolina requires significant management judgment. As of December 31, 2021, the Company has approximately $6.9 billion
recorded as regulatory assets.
We identified the impact of rate regulation related to regulatory assets as a critical audit matter due to the significant judgments made by
management, including assumptions regarding the outcome of future decisions by the Commissions, to support its assertions on the likelihood of
future recovery for deferred costs. Given that management’s accounting judgments are based on assumptions about the outcome of future
decisions by the Commissions, auditing these judgments required specialized knowledge of accounting for rate regulation and the ratemaking
process due to its inherent complexities as it relates to regulatory assets.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the recovery of regulatory assets included the following, among others:
• We tested the effectiveness of management’s controls over the evaluation of the likelihood of the recovery in future rates and the
monitoring and evaluation of regulatory developments that may affect the likelihood of recovering costs in future rates.
• We evaluated the Company’s disclosures related to the impacts of rate regulation, including the balances recorded and regulatory
developments.
• We read relevant regulatory orders issued by the Commissions, regulatory statutes, interpretations, procedural memorandums, filings
made by intervenors, and other publicly available information to assess the likelihood of recovery in future rates based on precedents
of the Commissions’ treatment of similar costs under similar circumstances. We evaluated the external information and compared it to
management’s recorded balances for completeness.
86
REPORTS
• For regulatory matters in process, we inspected the Company’s and intervenors’ filings with the Commissions, that may impact the
Company’s future rates, for any evidence that might contradict management’s assertions.
• We evaluated the reasonableness of management’s judgments regarding the recoverability of regulatory asset balances by
performing the following:
– We inquired of management regarding changes in regulatory orders and regulatory asset balances during the year
– We evaluated the reasonableness of such changes based on our knowledge of commission-approved amortization, expected
incurred costs, and recently approved regulatory orders, as applicable.
– We utilized trend analyses to evaluate the historical consistency of regulatory asset balances.
– We compared the recorded regulatory asset balance to an independently developed expectation of the corresponding balance.
• We obtained an analysis from management and letters from internal legal counsel for asset retirement obligations specific to coal ash
costs, regarding probability of recovery for deferred costs not yet addressed in a regulatory order to assess management’s assertion
that amounts are probable of recovery.
• We obtained representation from management asserting that regulatory assets recorded in the financial statements are probable of
recovery.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Charlotte, North Carolina
February 24, 2022
We have served as the Company's auditor since 1930.
87
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
PROGRESS ENERGY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS AND COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 2019
Operating Revenues $ 11,057 $ 10,627 $ 11,202 
Operating Expenses    
Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power 3,584 3,479 4,024 
Operation, maintenance and other 2,529 2,479 2,495 
Depreciation and amortization 1,929 1,818 1,845 
Property and other taxes 542 545 561 
Impairment of assets and other charges 82 495 (24)
Total operating expenses 8,666 8,816 8,901 
Gains on Sales of Other Assets and Other, net 14 9 — 
Operating Income 2,405 1,820 2,301 
Other Income and Expenses, net 215 129 141 
Interest Expense 794 790 862 
Income Before Income Taxes 1,826 1,159 1,580 
Income Tax Expense 227 113 253 
Net Income 1,599 1,046 1,327 
Less: Net Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests 1 1 — 
Net Income Attributable to Parent $ 1,598 $ 1,045 $ 1,327 
Net Income $ 1,599 $ 1,046 $ 1,327 
Other Comprehensive Income, net of tax    
Pension and OPEB adjustments 1 (1) 2 
Net unrealized gain on cash flow hedges 3 5 5 
Unrealized (losses) gains on available-for-sale securities — (1) 1 
Other Comprehensive Income, net of tax 4 3 8 
Comprehensive Income 1,603 1,049 1,335 
Less: Comprehensive Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests 1 1 — 
Comprehensive Income Attributable to Parent $ 1,602 $ 1,048 $ 1,335 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
88
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
PROGRESS ENERGY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
 December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020
ASSETS   
Current Assets   
Cash and cash equivalents $ 70 $ 59 
Receivables (net of allowance for doubtful accounts of $11 at 2021 and $8 at 2020) 247 228 
Receivables of VIEs (net of allowance for doubtful accounts of $25 at 2021 and $29 at 2020) 1,006 901 
Receivables from affiliated companies 121 157 
Inventory 1,398 1,375 
Regulatory assets (includes $93 at 2021 and $53 at 2020 related to VIEs) 1,030 758 
Other (includes $39 at 2021 and 2020 related to VIEs) 125 109 
Total current assets 3,997 3,587 
Property, Plant and Equipment   
Cost 60,894 57,892 
Accumulated depreciation and amortization (19,214) (18,368)
Facilities to be retired, net 26 29 
Net property, plant and equipment 41,706 39,553 
Other Noncurrent Assets   
Goodwill 3,655 3,655 
Regulatory assets (includes $1,603 at 2021 and $937 at 2020 related to VIEs) 5,909 5,775 
Nuclear decommissioning trust funds 4,642 4,137 
Operating lease right-of-use assets, net 691 690 
Other 1,242 1,227 
Total other noncurrent assets 16,139 15,484 
Total Assets $ 61,842 $ 58,624 
LIABILITIES AND EQUITY   
Current Liabilities   
Accounts payable $ 1,099 $ 919 
Accounts payable to affiliated companies 506 289 
Notes payable to affiliated companies 2,809 2,969 
Taxes accrued 128 121 
Interest accrued 192 202 
Current maturities of long-term debt (includes $71 at 2021 and $305 at 2020 related to VIEs) 1,082 1,426 
Asset retirement obligations 275 283 
Regulatory liabilities 478 640 
Other 868 793 
Total current liabilities 7,437 7,642 
Long-Term Debt (includes $2,293 at 2021 and $1,252 at 2020 related to VIEs) 19,591 17,688 
Long-Term Debt Payable to Affiliated Companies 150 150 
Other Noncurrent Liabilities   
Deferred income taxes 4,564 4,396 
Asset retirement obligations 5,837 5,866 
Regulatory liabilities 5,566 5,051 
Operating lease liabilities 606 623 
Accrued pension and other post-retirement benefit costs 417 505 
Other 526 462 
Total other noncurrent liabilities 17,516 16,903 
Commitments and Contingencies
Equity   
Common stock, $0.01 par value, 100 shares authorized and outstanding at 2021 and 2020 — — 
Additional paid-in capital 9,149 9,143 
Retained earnings 8,007 7,109 
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (11) (15)
Total Progress Energy, Inc. stockholder's equity 17,145 16,237 
Noncontrolling interests 3 4 
Total equity 17,148 16,241 
Total Liabilities and Equity $ 61,842 $ 58,624 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
89
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
PROGRESS ENERGY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 2019
CASH FLOWS FROM OPERATING ACTIVITIES    
Net income $ 1,599 $ 1,046 $ 1,327 
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:    
Depreciation, amortization and accretion (including amortization of nuclear fuel) 2,302 2,327 2,207 
Equity component of AFUDC (51) (42) (66)
Impairment of assets and other charges 82 495 (24)
Deferred income taxes 247 (197) 433 
Payments for asset retirement obligations (288) (384) (412)
Provision for rate refunds (36) 2 15 
(Increase) decrease in
Net realized and unrealized mark-to-market and hedging transactions 51 (9) (34)
Receivables (97) (69) 47 
Receivables from affiliated companies 18 (81) 81 
Inventory (26) 49 62 
Other current assets (551) 223 184 
Increase (decrease) in
Accounts payable 59 (62) (4)
Accounts payable to affiliated companies 217 (21) (50)
Taxes accrued 13 75 (74)
Other current liabilities (32) 139 25 
Other assets (110) (137) (341)
Other liabilities (99) (177) (167)
Net cash provided by operating activities 3,298 3,177 3,209 
CASH FLOWS FROM INVESTING ACTIVITIES    
Capital expenditures (3,668) (3,488) (3,952)
Purchases of debt and equity securities (2,233) (5,998) (1,511)
Proceeds from sales and maturities of debt and equity securities 2,322 6,010 1,504 
Notes receivable from affiliated companies — 164 (164)
Other (156) (160) (190)
Net cash used in investing activities (3,735) (3,472) (4,313)
CASH FLOWS FROM FINANCING ACTIVITIES    
Proceeds from the issuance of long-term debt 3,095 1,791 2,187 
Payments for the redemption of long-term debt (1,883) (2,157) (1,667)
Notes payable to affiliated companies (160) 1,148 586 
Dividends to parent (700) (400) — 
Other (2) (13) 12 
Net cash provided by financing activities 350 369 1,118 
Net (decrease) increase in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash (87) 74 14 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at beginning of period 200 126 112 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at end of period $ 113 $ 200 $ 126 
Supplemental Disclosures:    
Cash paid for interest, net of amount capitalized $ 813 $ 819 $ 892 
Cash paid for (received from) income taxes 14 149 (79)
Significant non-cash transactions:
Accrued capital expenditures 501 363 447 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
90
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
PROGRESS ENERGY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CHANGES IN EQUITY
   Accumulated Other Comprehensive
Income (Loss)    
Net GainsNet
UnrealizedTotal
Progress
Additional(Losses)
onGains
(Losses)Pension and Energy, Inc.
Paid-inRetainedCash Flowon Available-
for- OPEBStockholder'sNoncontrolling Total
(in millions) CapitalEarnings HedgesSale
SecuritiesAdjustments Equity Interests Equity
Balance at December 31, 2018$9,143 $5,131 $ (12)$ (1)$ (7)$ 14,254 $ 3 $14,257 
Net income — 1,327 — — — 1,327 — 1,327 
Other comprehensive income — — 5 1 2 8 — 8 
Other — 7 (3) (1) (2) 1 — 1 
Balance at December 31, 2019$9,143 $6,465 $ (10)$ (1)$ (7)$ 15,590 $ 3 $15,593 
Net income — 1,045 — — — 1,045 1 1,046 
Other comprehensive income
(loss) — — 5 (1) (1) 3 — 3 
Dividends to parent — (400) — — — (400) — (400)
Other — (1) — — — (1) — (1)
Balance at December 31, 2020$9,143 $7,109 $ (5)$ (2)$ (8)$ 16,237 $ 4 $16,241 
Net income — 1,598 — — — 1,598 1 1,599 
Other comprehensive income — — 3 — 1 4 — 4 
Distributions to noncontrolling
interests — — — — — — (1) (1)
Dividends to parent — (700) — — — (700) — (700)
Other 6 — — — — 6 (1) 5 
Balance at December 31, 2021$9,149 $8,007 $ (2)$ (2)$ (7)$ 17,145 $ 3 $17,148 
(a)    Amounts in Retained Earnings and AOCI primarily represent impacts to accumulated other comprehensive income due to implementation of a
new accounting standard related to Reclassification of Certain Tax Effects from Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income.
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements(a)
91
REPORTS
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the shareholder and the Board of Directors of Duke Energy Progress, LLC
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Duke Energy Progress, LLC and subsidiaries (the "Company") as of
December 31, 2021 and 2020, the related consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income, changes in equity, and cash flows,
for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2021, and the related notes (collectively referred to as the "financial statements"). In
our opinion, the financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the Company as of December 31, 2021 and
2020, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2021, in conformity with
accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company's
financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board
(United States) (PCAOB) and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws
and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain
reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. The Company is
not required to have, nor were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over financial reporting. As part of our audits, we are required
to obtain an understanding of internal control over financial reporting but not for the purpose of expressing an opinion on the effectiveness of the
Company’s internal control over financial reporting. Accordingly, we express no such opinion.
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements, whether due to error or fraud,
and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts
and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by
management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the financial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for
our opinion.
Critical Audit Matter
The critical audit matter communicated below is a matter arising from the current-period audit of the financial statements that was communicated
or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (1) relates to accounts or disclosures that are material to the financial statements
and (2) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any
way our opinion on the financial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matter below, providing a
separate opinion on the critical audit matter or on the accounts or disclosures to which it relates.
Regulatory Matters – Impact of Rate Regulation on the Financial Statements – Refer to Notes 1, 3, and 9 to the financial
statements.
Critical Audit Matter Description
The Company is subject to rate regulation by the North Carolina Utilities Commission and by the South Carolina Public Service Commission
(collectively the “Commissions”), which have jurisdiction with respect to the electric rates of the Company. Management has determined it meets
the criteria for the application of regulated operations accounting in preparing its financial statements under accounting principles generally
accepted in the United States of America. Significant judgment can be required to determine if otherwise recognizable incurred costs qualify to
be presented as a regulatory asset and deferred because such costs are probable of future recovery in customer rates. As discussed in Note 3,
regulatory proceedings in recent years in North Carolina and South Carolina have focused on the recoverability of asset retirement obligations
specific to coal ash. As a result, assessing the potential outcomes of future regulatory orders in North Carolina and South Carolina requires
significant management judgment. As of December 31, 2021, the Company has approximately $4.7 billion recorded as regulatory assets.
We identified the impact of rate regulation related to regulatory assets as a critical audit matter due to the significant judgments made by
management, including assumptions regarding the outcome of future decisions by the Commissions, to support its assertions on the likelihood of
future recovery for deferred costs. Given that management’s accounting judgments are based on assumptions about the outcome of future
decisions by the Commissions, auditing these judgments required specialized knowledge of accounting for rate regulation and the ratemaking
process due to its inherent complexities as it relates to regulatory assets.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the recovery of regulatory assets included the following, among others:
• We tested the effectiveness of management’s controls over the evaluation of the likelihood of the recovery in future rates and the
monitoring and evaluation of regulatory developments that may affect the likelihood of recovering costs in future rates.
• We evaluated the Company’s disclosures related to the impacts of rate regulation, including the balances recorded and regulatory
developments.
• We read relevant regulatory orders issued by the Commissions, regulatory statutes, interpretations, procedural memorandums, filings
made by intervenors, and other publicly available information to assess the likelihood of recovery in future rates based on precedents
of the Commissions’ treatment of similar costs under similar circumstances. We evaluated the external information and compared it to
management’s recorded balances for completeness.
92
REPORTS
• For regulatory matters in process, we inspected the Company’s and intervenors’ filings with the Commissions, that may impact the
Company’s future rates, for any evidence that might contradict management’s assertions.
• We evaluated the reasonableness of management’s judgments regarding the recoverability of regulatory asset balances by
performing the following:
– We inquired of management regarding changes in regulatory orders and regulatory asset balances during the year.
– We evaluated the reasonableness of such changes based on our knowledge of commission-approved amortization,
expected incurred costs, and recently approved regulatory orders, as applicable.
– We utilized trend analyses to evaluate the historical consistency of regulatory asset balances.
– We compared the recorded regulatory asset balance to an independently developed expectation of the corresponding
balance.
• We obtained an analysis from management and letters from internal legal counsel for asset retirement obligations specific to coal ash
costs, regarding probability of recovery for deferred costs not yet addressed in a regulatory order to assess management’s assertion
that amounts are probable of recovery.
• We obtained representation from management asserting that regulatory assets recorded in the financial statements are probable of
recovery.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Charlotte, North Carolina
February 24, 2022
We have served as the Company's auditor since 1930.
93
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY PROGRESS, LLC
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS AND COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 2019
Operating Revenues $ 5,780 $ 5,422 $ 5,957 
Operating Expenses    
Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power 1,778 1,743 2,012 
Operation, maintenance and other 1,467 1,332 1,446 
Depreciation and amortization 1,097 1,116 1,143 
Property and other taxes 159 167 176 
Impairment of assets and other charges 63 499 12 
Total operating expenses 4,564 4,857 4,789 
Gains on Sales of Other Assets and Other, net 13 8 — 
Operating Income 1,229 573 1,168 
Other Income and Expenses, net 143 75 100 
Interest Expense 306 269 306 
Income Before Income Taxes 1,066 379 962 
Income Tax Expense (Benefit) 75 (36) 157 
Net Income and Comprehensive Income $ 991 $ 415 $ 805 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
94
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY PROGRESS, LLC
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
 December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020
ASSETS   
Current Assets   
Cash and cash equivalents $ 35 $ 39 
Receivables (net of allowance for doubtful accounts of $4 at 2021 and $4 at 2020) 127 132 
Receivables of VIEs (net of allowance for doubtful accounts of $17 at 2021 and $19 at 2020) 574 500 
Receivables from affiliated companies 65 50 
Inventory 921 911 
Regulatory assets (includes $39 at 2021 related to VIEs) 533 492 
Other 83 60 
Total current assets 2,338 2,184 
Property, Plant and Equipment
Cost 37,018 35,759 
Accumulated depreciation and amortization (13,387) (12,801)
Facilities to be retired, net 26 29 
Net property, plant and equipment 23,657 22,987 
Other Noncurrent Assets
Regulatory assets (includes $720 at 2021 related to VIEs) 4,118 3,976 
Nuclear decommissioning trust funds 4,089 3,500 
Operating lease right-of-use assets, net 389 346 
Other 792 740 
Total other noncurrent assets 9,388 8,562 
Total Assets $ 35,383 $ 33,733 
LIABILITIES AND EQUITY
Current Liabilities
Accounts payable $ 476 $ 454 
Accounts payable to affiliated companies 310 215 
Notes payable to affiliated companies 172 295 
Taxes accrued 163 85 
Interest accrued 96 99 
Current maturities of long-term debt (includes $15 at 2021 related to VIEs) 556 603 
Asset retirement obligations 274 283 
Regulatory liabilities 381 530 
Other 448 411 
Total current liabilities 2,876 2,975 
Long-Term Debt (includes $1,097 at 2021 related to VIEs) 9,543 8,505 
Long-Term Debt Payable to Affiliated Companies 150 150 
Other Noncurrent Liabilities
Deferred income taxes 2,208 2,298 
Asset retirement obligations 5,401 5,352 
Regulatory liabilities 4,868 4,394 
Operating lease liabilities 350 323 
Accrued pension and other post-retirement benefit costs 221 242 
Investment tax credits 128 132 
Other 87 102 
Total other noncurrent liabilities 13,263 12,843 
Commitments and Contingencies
Equity
Member's Equity 9,551 9,260 
Total Liabilities and Equity $ 35,383 $ 33,733 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
95
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY PROGRESS, LLC
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 2019
CASH FLOWS FROM OPERATING ACTIVITIES    
Net income $ 991 $ 415 $ 805 
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:    
Depreciation and amortization (including amortization of nuclear fuel) 1,286 1,299 1,329 
Equity component of AFUDC (34) (29) (60)
Impairment of assets and other charges 63 499 12 
Deferred income taxes (46) (234) 197 
Payments for asset retirement obligations (187) (304) (390)
Provisions for rate refunds (36) 2 12 
(Increase) decrease in
Net realized and unrealized mark-to-market and hedging transactions 48 1 (6)
Receivables (52) (4) 21 
Receivables from affiliated companies (33) 2 (29)
Inventory (11) 23 20 
Other current assets (147) 98 101 
Increase (decrease) in
Accounts payable 12 (127) 32 
Accounts payable to affiliated companies 95 12 (75)
Taxes accrued 83 68 (46)
Other current liabilities (23) 157 68 
Other assets (37) (215) (205)
Other liabilities (16) 3 37 
Net cash provided by operating activities 1,956 1,666 1,823 
CASH FLOWS FROM INVESTING ACTIVITIES    
Capital expenditures (1,746) (1,581) (2,108)
Purchases of debt and equity securities (1,931) (1,555) (842)
Proceeds from sales and maturities of debt and equity securities 1,914 1,516 810 
Other (20) (57) (119)
Net cash used in investing activities (1,783) (1,677) (2,259)
CASH FLOWS FROM FINANCING ACTIVITIES
Proceeds from the issuance of long-term debt 1,959 1,296 1,269 
Payments for the redemption of long-term debt (1,308) (1,085) (605)
Notes payable to affiliated companies (123) 229 (228)
Distributions to parent (700) (400) — 
Other (1) (12) (1)
Net cash (used in) provided by financing activities (173) 28 435 
Net increase (decrease) in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash — 17 (1)
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at beginning of period 39 22 23 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at end of period $ 39 $ 39 $ 22 
Supplemental Disclosures:    
Cash paid for interest, net of amount capitalized $ 335 $ 301 $ 331 
Cash paid for (received from) income taxes 83 123 (30)
Significant non-cash transactions:
Accrued capital expenditures 163 149 175 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
96
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY PROGRESS, LLC
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CHANGES IN EQUITY
 Member's
(in millions) Equity
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ 8,441 
Net income 805 
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ 9,246 
Net income 415 
Distribution to parent (400)
Other (1)
Balance at December 31, 2020 $ 9,260 
Net income 991 
Distribution to parent (700)
Balance at December 31, 2021 $ 9,551 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
97
REPORTS
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the shareholder and the Board of Directors of Duke Energy Florida, LLC
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Duke Energy Florida, LLC and subsidiaries (the "Company") as of December
31, 2021 and 2020, the related consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income, changes in equity, and cash flows, for each of
the three years in the period ended December 31, 2021, and the related notes (collectively referred to as the "financial statements"). In our
opinion, the financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the Company as of December 31, 2021 and 2020,
and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2021, in conformity with
accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company's
financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board
(United States) (PCAOB) and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws
and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain
reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. The Company is
not required to have, nor were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over financial reporting. As part of our audits, we are required
to obtain an understanding of internal control over financial reporting but not for the purpose of expressing an opinion on the effectiveness of the
Company’s internal control over financial reporting. Accordingly, we express no such opinion.
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements, whether due to error or fraud,
and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts
and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by
management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the financial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for
our opinion.
Critical Audit Matter
The critical audit matter communicated below is a matter arising from the current-period audit of the financial statements that was communicated
or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (1) relates to accounts or disclosures that are material to the financial statements
and (2) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any
way our opinion on the financial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matter below, providing a
separate opinion on the critical audit matter or on the accounts or disclosures to which it relates.
Regulatory Matters — Impact of Rate Regulation on the Financial Statements — Refer to Notes 1 and 3 to the financial statements.
Critical Audit Matter Description
The Company is subject to rate regulation by the Florida Public Service Commission (the “Commission”), which has jurisdiction with respect to the
electric rates of the Company. Management has determined it meets the criteria for the application of regulated operations accounting in
preparing its financial statements under accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America. Significant judgment can be
required to determine if otherwise recognizable incurred costs qualify to be presented as a regulatory asset and deferred because such costs are
probable of future recovery in customer rates. As of December 31, 2021, the Company has approximately $2.3 billion recorded as regulatory
assets.
We identified the impact of rate regulation related to regulatory assets as a critical audit matter due to the significant judgments made by
management, including assumptions regarding the outcome of future decisions by the Commission, to support its assertions on the likelihood of
future recovery for deferred costs. Given that management’s accounting judgments are based on assumptions about the outcome of future
decisions by the Commission, auditing these judgments required specialized knowledge of accounting for rate regulation and the ratemaking
process due to its inherent complexities as it relates to regulatory assets.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the recovery of regulatory assets included the following, among others:
• We tested the effectiveness of management’s controls over the evaluation of the likelihood of the recovery in future rates and the
monitoring and evaluation of regulatory developments that may affect the likelihood of recovering costs in future rates.
• We evaluated the Company’s disclosures related to the impacts of rate regulation, including the balances recorded and regulatory
developments.
• We read relevant regulatory orders issued by the Commission, regulatory statutes, interpretations, procedural memorandums, filings made
by intervenors, and other publicly available information to assess the likelihood of recovery in future rates based on precedents of the
Commission’s treatment of similar costs under similar circumstances. We evaluated the external information and compared it to
management’s recorded balances for completeness.
• For regulatory matters in process, we inspected the Company’s and intervenors’ filings with the Commission, that may impact the
Company’s future rates, for any evidence that might contradict management’s assertions.
98
REPORTS
• We evaluated the reasonableness of management’s judgments regarding the recoverability of regulatory asset balances by
performing the following:
– We inquired of management regarding changes in regulatory orders and regulatory asset balances during the year.
– We evaluated the reasonableness of such changes based on our knowledge of commission- approved amortization, expected
incurred costs, and recently approved regulatory orders, as applicable.
– We utilized trend analyses to evaluate the historical consistency of regulatory asset balances.
– We compared the recorded regulatory asset balance to an independently developed expectation of the corresponding
balance.
• We obtained representation from management asserting that regulatory assets recorded in the financial statements are probable of
recovery.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Charlotte, North Carolina
February 24, 2022
We have served as the Company's auditor since 2001.
99
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY FLORIDA, LLC
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS AND COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 2019
Operating Revenues $ 5,259 $ 5,188 $ 5,231 
Operating Expenses    
Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power 1,806 1,737 2,012 
Operation, maintenance and other 1,048 1,131 1,034 
Depreciation and amortization 831 702 702 
Property and other taxes 383 381 392 
Impairment of assets and other charges 19 (4) (36)
Total operating expenses 4,087 3,947 4,104 
Gains on Sales of Other Assets and Other, net 1 1 — 
Operating Income 1,173 1,242 1,127 
Other Income and Expenses, net 71 53 48 
Interest Expense 319 326 328 
Income Before Income Taxes 925 969 847 
Income Tax Expense 187 198 155 
Net Income $ 738 $ 771 $ 692 
Other Comprehensive Income (Loss), net of tax    
Unrealized (losses) gains on available-for-sale securities (1) (1) 1 
Other Comprehensive (Loss) Income, net of tax (1) (1) 1 
Comprehensive Income $ 737 $ 770 $ 693 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
100
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY FLORIDA, LLC
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
 December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020
ASSETS   
Current Assets   
Cash and cash equivalents $ 23 $ 11 
Receivables (net of allowance for doubtful accounts of $8 at 2021 and $4 at 2020) 117 94 
Receivables of VIEs (net of allowance for doubtful accounts of $8 at 2021 and $10 at 2020) 432 401 
Receivables from affiliated companies 16 3 
Inventory 477 464 
Regulatory assets (includes $54 at 2021 and $53 at 2020 related to VIEs) 497 265 
Other (includes $39 at 2021 and 2020 related to VIEs) 80 41 
Total current assets 1,642 1,279 
Property, Plant and Equipment   
Cost 23,865 22,123 
Accumulated depreciation and amortization (5,819) (5,560)
Net property, plant and equipment 18,046 16,563 
Other Noncurrent Assets   
Regulatory assets (includes $883 at 2021 and $937 at 2020 related to VIEs) 1,791 1,799 
Nuclear decommissioning trust funds 553 637 
Operating lease right-of-use assets, net 302 344 
Other 399 335 
Total other noncurrent assets 3,045 3,115 
Total Assets $ 22,733 $ 20,957 
LIABILITIES AND EQUITY   
Current Liabilities   
Accounts payable $ 623 $ 465 
Accounts payable to affiliated companies 209 85 
Notes payable to affiliated companies 199 196 
Taxes accrued 51 82 
Interest accrued 68 69 
Current maturities of long-term debt (includes $56 at 2021 and $305 at 2020 related to VIEs) 76 823 
Asset retirement obligations 1 — 
Regulatory liabilities 98 110 
Other 408 374 
Total current liabilities 1,733 2,204 
Long-Term Debt (includes $1,196 at 2021 and $1,002 at 2020 related to VIEs) 8,406 7,092 
Other Noncurrent Liabilities   
Deferred income taxes 2,434 2,191 
Asset retirement obligations 436 514 
Regulatory liabilities 698 658 
Operating lease liabilities 256 300 
Accrued pension and other post-retirement benefit costs 166 231 
Other 309 209 
Total other noncurrent liabilities 4,299 4,103 
Commitments and Contingencies
Equity   
Member's equity 8,298 7,560 
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (3) (2)
Total equity 8,295 7,558 
Total Liabilities and Equity $ 22,733 $ 20,957 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
101
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY FLORIDA, LLC
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 2019
CASH FLOWS FROM OPERATING ACTIVITIES    
Net income $ 738 $ 771 $ 692 
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:    
Depreciation, amortization and accretion 1,011 1,019 869 
Equity component of AFUDC (16) (12) (6)
Impairment of assets and other charges 19 (4) (36)
Deferred income taxes 279 27 180 
Payments for asset retirement obligations (101) (80) (22)
(Increase) decrease in
Net realized and unrealized mark-to-market and hedging transactions — (14) (33)
Receivables (45) (64) 26 
Receivables from affiliated companies (13) (3) 17 
Inventory (15) 26 42 
Other current assets (451) 40 156 
Increase (decrease) in
Accounts payable 47 66 (36)
Accounts payable to affiliated companies 124 (46) 40 
Taxes accrued (30) 39 (31)
Other current liabilities (7) (7) (36)
Other assets (69) 84 (131)
Other liabilities (69) (181) (213)
Net cash provided by operating activities 1,402 1,661 1,478 
CASH FLOWS FROM INVESTING ACTIVITIES
Capital expenditures (1,923) (1,907) (1,844)
Purchases of debt and equity securities (302) (4,443) (669)
Proceeds from sales and maturities of debt and equity securities 408 4,495 695 
Notes receivable from affiliated companies — 173 (173)
Other (136) (103) (67)
Net cash used in investing activities (1,953) (1,785) (2,058)
CASH FLOWS FROM FINANCING ACTIVITIES
Proceeds from the issuance of long-term debt 1,135 495 918 
Payments for the redemption of long-term debt (575) (572) (262)
Notes payable to affiliated companies 3 196 (108)
Other — (1) 13 
Net cash provided by financing activities 563 118 561 
Net increase (decrease) in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash 12 (6) (19)
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at beginning of period 50 56 75 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at end of period $ 62 $ 50 $ 56 
Supplemental Disclosures:    
Cash paid for interest, net of amount capitalized $ 308 $ 321 $ 332 
Cash (received from) paid for income taxes (15) 138 1 
Significant non-cash transactions:
Accrued capital expenditures 337 214 272 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
102
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY FLORIDA, LLC
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CHANGES IN EQUITY
Accumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income (Loss)
Net Unrealized
Gains (Losses) on
 Member's Available-for- Total
(in millions) Equity Sale Securities Equity
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ 6,097 $ (2)$ 6,095 
Net income 692 — 692 
Other comprehensive income — 1 1 
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ 6,789 $ (1)$ 6,788 
Net income 771 — 771 
Other comprehensive loss — (1) (1)
Balance at December 31, 2020 $ 7,560 $ (2)$ 7,558 
Net income 738 — 738 
Other comprehensive loss — (1) (1)
Balance at December 31, 2021 $ 8,298 $ (3)$ 8,295 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
103
REPORTS
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the shareholder and the Board of Directors of Duke Energy Ohio, Inc.
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Duke Energy Ohio, Inc. and subsidiaries (the "Company") as of December
31, 2021 and 2020, the related consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income, changes in equity, and cash flows, for each of
the three years in the period ended December 31, 2021, and the related notes (collectively referred to as the "financial statements"). In our
opinion, the financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the Company as of December 31, 2021 and 2020,
and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2021, in conformity with
accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company's
financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board
(United States) (PCAOB) and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws
and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain
reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. The Company is
not required to have, nor were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over financial reporting. As part of our audits, we are required
to obtain an understanding of internal control over financial reporting but not for the purpose of expressing an opinion on the effectiveness of the
Company’s internal control over financial reporting. Accordingly, we express no such opinion.
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements, whether due to error or fraud,
and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts
and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by
management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the financial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for
our opinion.
Critical Audit Matter
The critical audit matter communicated below is a matter arising from the current-period audit of the financial statements that was communicated
or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (1) relates to accounts or disclosures that are material to the financial statements
and (2) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any
way our opinion on the financial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matter below, providing a
separate opinion on the critical audit matter or on the accounts or disclosures to which it relates.
Regulatory Matters – Impact of Rate Regulation on the Financial Statements – Refer to Notes 1 and 3 to the financial statements.
Critical Audit Matter Description
The Company is subject to rate regulation by the Public Utilities Commission of Ohio and by the Kentucky Public Service Commission
(collectively the “Commissions”), which have jurisdiction with respect to the electric and gas rates of the Company. Management has
determined it meets the criteria for the application of regulated operations accounting in preparing its financial statements under accounting
principles generally accepted in the United States of America. Significant judgment can be required to determine if otherwise recognizable
incurred costs qualify to be presented as a regulatory asset and deferred because such costs are probable of future recovery in customer rates.
As of December 31, 2021, the Company has approximately $707 million recorded as regulatory assets.
We identified the impact of rate regulation related to regulatory assets as a critical audit matter due to the significant judgments made by
management, including assumptions regarding the outcome of future decisions by the Commissions, to support its assertions on the likelihood of
future recovery for deferred costs. Given that management’s accounting judgments are based on assumptions about the outcome of future
decisions by the Commissions, auditing these judgments required specialized knowledge of accounting for rate regulation and the ratemaking
process due to its inherent complexities as it relates to regulatory assets.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the recovery of regulatory assets included the following, among others:
• We tested the effectiveness of management’s controls over the evaluation of the likelihood of recovery in future rates and the monitoring
and evaluation of regulatory developments that may affect the likelihood of recovering costs in future rates.
• We evaluated the Company’s disclosures related to the impacts of rate regulation, including the balances recorded and regulatory
developments.
• We read relevant regulatory orders issued by the Commissions, regulatory statutes, interpretations, procedural memorandums, filings made
by intervenors, and other publicly available information to assess the likelihood of recovery in future rates based on precedents of the
Commissions’ treatment of similar costs under similar circumstances. We evaluated the external information and compared it to
management’s recorded balances for completeness.
• For regulatory matters in process, we inspected the Company’s and intervenors’ filings with the Commissions, that may impact the
Company’s future rates, for any evidence that might contradict management’s assertions.
104
REPORTS
• We evaluated the reasonableness of management’s judgments regarding the recoverability of regulatory asset balances by
performing the following:
– We inquired of management regarding changes in regulatory orders and regulatory asset balances during the year.
– We evaluated the reasonableness of such changes based on our knowledge of commission- approved amortization, expected
incurred costs, and recently approved regulatory orders, as applicable.
– We utilized trend analyses to evaluate the historical consistency of regulatory asset balances.
– We compared the recorded regulatory asset balance to an independently developed expectation of the corresponding
balance.
• We obtained representation from management asserting that regulatory assets recorded in the financial statements are probable of
recovery.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Charlotte, North Carolina
February 24, 2022
We have served as the Company's auditor since 2002.
105
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY OHIO, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS AND COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 2019
Operating Revenues    
Regulated electric $ 1,493 $ 1,405 $ 1,456 
Regulated natural gas 544 453 484 
Total operating revenues 2,037 1,858 1,940 
Operating Expenses    
Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power 409 339 388 
Cost of natural gas 136 73 95 
Operation, maintenance and other 479 463 520 
Depreciation and amortization 307 278 265 
Property and other taxes 355 324 308 
Impairment of assets and other charges 25 — — 
Total operating expenses 1,711 1,477 1,576 
Gains on Sales of Other Assets and Other, net 1 — — 
Operating Income 327 381 364 
Other Income and Expenses, net 18 16 24 
Interest Expense 111 102 109 
Income From Continuing Operations Before Income Taxes 234 295 279 
Income Tax Expense From Continuing Operations 30 43 40 
Income From Continuing Operations 204 252 239 
Loss From Discontinued Operations, net of tax — — (1)
Net Income and Comprehensive Income $ 204 $ 252 $ 238 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
106
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY OHIO, INC.
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
 December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020
ASSETS   
Current Assets   
Cash and cash equivalents $ 13 $ 14 
Receivables (net of allowance for doubtful accounts of $4 at 2021 and 2020) 96 98 
Receivables from affiliated companies 122 102 
Notes receivable from affiliated companies 15 — 
Inventory 116 110 
Regulatory assets 72 39 
Other 57 31 
Total current assets 491 394 
Property, Plant and Equipment   
Cost 11,725 11,022 
Accumulated depreciation and amortization (3,106) (3,013)
Facilities to be retired, net 6 — 
Net property, plant and equipment 8,625 8,009 
Other Noncurrent Assets   
Goodwill 920 920 
Regulatory assets 635 610 
Operating lease right-of-use assets, net 19 20 
Other 84 72 
Total other noncurrent assets 1,658 1,622 
Total Assets $ 10,774 $ 10,025 
LIABILITIES AND EQUITY   
Current Liabilities   
Accounts payable $ 348 $ 279 
Accounts payable to affiliated companies 64 68 
Notes payable to affiliated companies 103 169 
Taxes accrued 275 247 
Interest accrued 30 31 
Current maturities of long-term debt — 50 
Asset retirement obligations 13 3 
Regulatory liabilities 62 65 
Other 82 70 
Total current liabilities 977 982 
Long-Term Debt 3,168 3,014 
Long-Term Debt Payable to Affiliated Companies 25 25 
Other Noncurrent Liabilities   
Deferred income taxes 1,050 981 
Asset retirement obligations 123 108 
Regulatory liabilities 739 748 
Operating lease liabilities 18 20 
Accrued pension and other post-retirement benefit costs 109 113 
Other 101 99 
Total other noncurrent liabilities 2,140 2,069 
Commitments and Contingencies
Equity   
Common stock, $8.50 par value, 120 million shares authorized; 90 million shares outstanding at 2021 and 2020 762 762 
Additional paid-in capital 3,100 2,776 
Retained earnings 602 397 
Total equity 4,464 3,935 
Total Liabilities and Equity $ 10,774 $ 10,025 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
107
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY OHIO, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 2019
CASH FLOWS FROM OPERATING ACTIVITIES    
Net income $ 204 $ 252 $ 238 
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:    
Depreciation, amortization and accretion 311 283 269 
Equity component of AFUDC (7) (7) (13)
Impairment of assets and other charges 25 — — 
Deferred income taxes 42 31 81 
Payments for asset retirement obligations (2) (2) (8)
Provision for rate refunds 16 14 7 
(Increase) decrease in    
Receivables 6 (13) 20 
Receivables from affiliated companies (25) 9 22 
Inventory (6) 25 (9)
Other current assets (60) (18) (5)
Increase (decrease) in    
Accounts payable 38 2 (17)
Accounts payable to affiliated companies (4) — (10)
Taxes accrued 26 30 17 
Other current liabilities 11 3 1 
Other assets (43) (32) (26)
Other liabilities 27 (2) (41)
Net cash provided by operating activities 559 575 526 
CASH FLOWS FROM INVESTING ACTIVITIES    
Capital expenditures (848) (834) (952)
Notes receivable from affiliated companies (10) (19) — 
Other (60) (48) (68)
Net cash used in investing activities (918) (901) (1,020)
CASH FLOWS FROM FINANCING ACTIVITIES    
Proceeds from the issuance of long-term debt 150 467 1,003 
Payments for the redemption of long-term debt (50) — (551)
Notes payable to affiliated companies (67) (144) 38 
Capital contribution from parent 325 — — 
Net cash provided by financing activities 358 323 490 
Net decrease in cash and cash equivalents (1) (3) (4)
Cash and cash equivalents at beginning of period 14 17 21 
Cash and cash equivalents at end of period $ 13 $ 14 $ 17 
Supplemental Disclosures:    
Cash paid for interest, net of amount capitalized $ 107 $ 97 $ 97 
Cash paid for (received from) income taxes 9 — (37)
Significant non-cash transactions:
Accrued capital expenditures 135 104 109 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
108
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY OHIO, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CHANGES IN EQUITY
Additional Retained
Common Paid-in Earnings Total
(in millions) Stock Capital (Deficit) Equity
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ 762 $ 2,776 $ (93)$ 3,445 
Net income — — 238 238 
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ 762 $ 2,776 $ 145 $ 3,683 
Net income — — 252 252 
Balance at December 31, 2020 $ 762 $ 2,776 $ 397 $ 3,935 
Net income — — 204 204 
Contribution from parent — 325 — 325 
Other — (1) 1 — 
Balance at December 31, 2021 $ 762 $ 3,100 $ 602 $ 4,464 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
109
REPORTS
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the shareholder and the Board of Directors of Duke Energy Indiana, LLC
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Duke Energy Indiana, LLC and subsidiary (the "Company") as of December
31, 2021 and 2020, the related consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income, changes in equity, and cash flows, for each of
the three years in the period ended December 31, 2021, and the related notes (collectively referred to as the "financial statements"). In our
opinion, the financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the Company as of December 31, 2021 and 2020,
and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2021, in conformity with
accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company's
financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board
(United States) (PCAOB) and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws
and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain
reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. The Company is
not required to have, nor were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over financial reporting. As part of our audits, we are required
to obtain an understanding of internal control over financial reporting but not for the purpose of expressing an opinion on the effectiveness of the
Company’s internal control over financial reporting. Accordingly, we express no such opinion.
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements, whether due to error or fraud,
and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts
and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by
management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the financial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for
our opinion.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters arising from the current-period audit of the financial statements that were
communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (1) relate to accounts or disclosures that are material to the
financial statements and (2) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters
does not alter in any way our opinion on the financial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matters
below, providing separate opinions on the critical audit matters or on the accounts or disclosures to which they relate.
Regulatory Matters – Impact of Rate Regulation on the Financial Statements – Refer to Notes 1 and 3 to the financial statements.
Critical Audit Matter Description
The Company is subject to rate regulation by the Indiana Utility Regulatory Commission (the “Commission”), which has jurisdiction with respect to
the electric rates of the Company. Management has determined it meets the criteria for the application of regulated operations accounting in
preparing its financial statements under accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America. Significant judgment can be
required to determine if otherwise recognizable incurred costs qualify to be presented as a regulatory asset and deferred because such costs are
probable of future recovery in customer rates. As of December 31, 2021, the Company has approximately $1.6 billion recorded as regulatory
assets.
We identified the impact of rate regulation related to regulatory assets as a critical audit matter due to the significant judgments made by
management, including assumptions regarding the outcome of future decisions by the Commission, to support its assertions on the likelihood of
future recovery for deferred costs. Given that management’s accounting judgments are based on assumptions about the outcome of future
decisions by the Commission, auditing these judgments required specialized knowledge of accounting for rate regulation and the ratemaking
process due to its inherent complexities as it relates to regulatory assets.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the recovery of regulatory assets included the following, among others:
• We tested the effectiveness of management’s controls over the evaluation of the likelihood of the recovery in future rates and the
monitoring and evaluation of regulatory developments that may affect the likelihood of recovering costs in future rates.
• We evaluated the Company’s disclosures related to the impacts of rate regulation, including the balances recorded and regulatory
developments.
• We read relevant regulatory orders issued by the Commission, regulatory statutes, interpretations, procedural memorandums, filings made
by intervenors, and other publicly available information to assess the likelihood of recovery in future rates based on precedents of the
Commission’s treatment of similar costs under similar circumstances. We evaluated the external information and compared it to
management’s recorded balances for completeness.
• For regulatory matters in process, we inspected the Company’s and intervenors’ filings with the Commission, that may impact the
Company’s future rates, for any evidence that might contradict management’s assertions.
110
REPORTS
• We evaluated the reasonableness of management’s judgments regarding the recoverability of regulatory asset balances by
performing the following:
– We inquired of management regarding changes in regulatory orders and regulatory asset balances during the year.
– We evaluated the reasonableness of such changes based on our knowledge of commission- approved amortization, expected
incurred costs, and recently approved regulatory orders, as applicable.
– We utilized trend analyses to evaluate the historical consistency of regulatory asset balances.
– We compared the recorded regulatory asset balance to an independently developed expectation of the corresponding
balance.
• We obtained representation from management asserting that regulatory assets recorded in the financial statements are probable of
recovery.
Duke Energy Indiana Coal Ash Asset Retirement Obligations – Refer to Notes 1, 4, and 9 to the financial statements.
Critical Audit Matter Description
Duke Energy Indiana has asset retirement obligations associated with coal ash impoundments at operating and retired coal generation facilities.
These legal obligations are the result of Indiana state and federal regulations. There is significant judgment in determining the methods to close
each site since Duke Energy Indiana does not have approved closure plans for certain sites. Management has applied probability weightings for
the cash flows for certain sites based the likelihood of implementing potential closure methods. Probability weightings for the cash flows
associated with the different potential closure methods (“probability weightings”) creates estimation uncertainty. The liability for coal ash asset
retirement obligations at Duke Energy Indiana was $949 million at December 31, 2021.
We identified the asset retirement obligations associated with coal ash impoundments at Duke Energy Indiana as a critical audit matter because
of the significant management estimates and assumptions, including the different potential closure methods and the probability weightings as a
result of pending legal challenges. The audit procedures to evaluate the reasonableness of management’s estimates and assumptions related to
the probability weightings for the cash flows associated with the different potential closure methods required a high degree of auditor judgment
and an increased extent of effort, including the need to involve our environmental specialists.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the probability weightings for the cash flows associated with the different potential closure methods for coal
ash asset retirement obligations at Duke Energy Indiana included the following, among others:
• We tested the effectiveness of controls over management’s coal ash asset retirement obligation estimate, including those over
management’s determination of the probability weightings.
• We tested the mathematical accuracy of management’s coal ash asset retirement obligation calculations, including the application
of probability weightings.
• We made inquiries of internal and external legal counsel regarding the status of the legal matters associated with the probability
weightings.
• We inspected the opinions from internal and external legal counsel supporting the probability weightings.
• With the assistance of professionals in our firm with the appropriate expertise, we inspected the Company’s filings with and orders from the
Indiana Department of Environmental Management, for evidence that might contradict management’s assertions regarding the probability
weightings.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Charlotte, North Carolina
February 24, 2022
We have served as the Company's auditor since 2002.
111
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY INDIANA, LLC
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS AND COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 2019
Operating Revenues $ 3,174 $ 2,795 $ 3,004 
Operating Expenses    
Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power 985 767 935 
Operation, maintenance and other 750 762 790 
Depreciation and amortization 615 569 525 
Property and other taxes 73 81 69 
Impairment of assets and other charges 9 — — 
Total operating expenses 2,432 2,179 2,319 
Operating Income 742 616 685 
Other Income and Expenses, net 42 37 41 
Interest Expense 196 161 156 
Income Before Income Taxes 588 492 570 
Income Tax Expense 107 84 134 
Net Income and Comprehensive Income $ 481 $ 408 $ 436 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
112
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY INDIANA, LLC
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
 December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020
ASSETS   
Current Assets   
Cash and cash equivalents $ 6 $ 7 
Receivables (net of allowance for doubtful accounts of $3 at 2021 and 2020) 100 55 
Receivables from affiliated companies 98 112 
Notes receivable from affiliated companies 134 — 
Inventory 418 473 
Regulatory assets 277 125 
Other 68 37 
Total current assets 1,101 809 
Property, Plant and Equipment   
Cost 17,343 17,382 
Accumulated depreciation and amortization (5,583) (5,661)
Net property, plant and equipment 11,760 11,721 
Other Noncurrent Assets  
Regulatory assets 1,278 1,203 
Operating lease right-of-use assets, net 53 55 
Other 296 253 
Total other noncurrent assets 1,627 1,511 
Total Assets $ 14,488 $ 14,041 
LIABILITIES AND EQUITY   
Current Liabilities   
Accounts payable $ 282 $ 188 
Accounts payable to affiliated companies 221 88 
Notes payable to affiliated companies — 131 
Taxes accrued 73 62 
Interest accrued 49 51 
Current maturities of long-term debt 84 70 
Asset retirement obligations 110 168 
Regulatory liabilities 127 111 
Other 105 83 
Total current liabilities 1,051 952 
Long-Term Debt 4,089 3,871 
Long-Term Debt Payable to Affiliated Companies 150 150 
Other Noncurrent Liabilities   
Deferred income taxes 1,303 1,228 
Asset retirement obligations 877 1,008 
Regulatory liabilities 1,565 1,627 
Operating lease liabilities 50 53 
Accrued pension and other post-retirement benefit costs 167 171 
Investment tax credits 177 168 
Other 44 30 
Total other noncurrent liabilities 4,183 4,285 
Commitments and Contingencies
Equity   
Member's Equity 5,015 4,783 
Total Liabilities and Equity $ 14,488 $ 14,041 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
113
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY INDIANA, LLC
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 2019
CASH FLOWS FROM OPERATING ACTIVITIES    
Net income $ 481 $ 408 $ 436 
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:    
Depreciation, amortization and accretion 619 572 531 
Equity component of AFUDC (27) (23) (18)
Impairment of assets and other charges 9 — — 
Deferred income taxes 34 29 156 
Payments for asset retirement obligations (67) (63) (48)
(Increase) decrease in    
Receivables (33) 8 (8)
Receivables from affiliated companies — — 41 
Inventory 55 44 (95)
Other current assets (181) (3) 76 
Increase (decrease) in    
Accounts payable 76 (12) (10)
Accounts payable to affiliated companies 8 1 4 
Taxes accrued 12 13 (25)
Other current liabilities 13 6 15 
Other assets 20 (68) (74)
Other liabilities (15) 26 16 
Net cash provided by operating activities 1,004 938 997 
CASH FLOWS FROM INVESTING ACTIVITIES    
Capital expenditures (818) (888) (876)
Purchases of debt and equity securities (142) (37) (26)
Proceeds from sales and maturities of debt and equity securities 65 22 20 
Notes receivable from affiliated companies (120) (33) — 
Other 36 48 (49)
Net cash used in investing activities (979) (888) (931)
CASH FLOWS FROM FINANCING ACTIVITIES    
Proceeds from the issuance of long-term debt 300 544 485 
Payments for the redemption of long-term debt (70) (513) (213)
Notes payable to affiliated companies (131) 101 (137)
Distributions to parent (125) (200) (200)
Net cash used in financing activities (26) (68) (65)
Net (decrease) increase in cash and cash equivalents (1) (18) 1 
Cash and cash equivalents at beginning of period 7 25 24 
Cash and cash equivalents at end of period $ 6 $ 7 $ 25 
Supplemental Disclosures:    
Cash paid for interest, net of amount capitalized $ 194 $ 164 $ 150 
Cash paid for (received from) income taxes 56 36 (6)
Significant non-cash transactions:
Accrued capital expenditures 118 101 102 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
114
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY INDIANA, LLC
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CHANGES IN EQUITY
Member's
(in millions) Equity
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ 4,339 
Net income 436 
Distributions to parent (200)
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ 4,575 
Net income 408 
Distributions to parent (200)
Balance at December 31, 2020 $ 4,783 
Net income 481 
Distributions to parent (250)
Other 1 
Balance at December 31, 2021 $ 5,015 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements  
115
REPORTS
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the shareholder and the Board of Directors of Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc.
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc. and subsidiaries (the "Company") as of
December 31, 2021 and 2020, the related consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income, changes in equity, and cash flows,
for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2021, and the related notes (collectively referred to as the "financial statements").
In our opinion, the financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the Company as of December 31, 2021 and
2020 and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2021, in conformity with
accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company's
financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board
(United States) (PCAOB) and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws
and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain
reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. The Company is
not required to have, nor were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over financial reporting. As part of our audits, we are required
to obtain an understanding of internal control over financial reporting but not for the purpose of expressing an opinion on the effectiveness of the
Company’s internal control over financial reporting. Accordingly, we express no such opinion.
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements, whether due to error or fraud,
and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts
and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by
management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the financial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for
our opinion.
Critical Audit Matter
The critical audit matter communicated below is a matter arising from the current-period audit of the financial statements that was communicated
or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (1) relates to accounts or disclosures that are material to the financial statements
and (2) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any
way our opinion on the financial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matter below, providing a
separate opinion on the critical audit matter or on the accounts or disclosures to which it relates.
Regulatory Matters – Impact of Rate Regulation on the Financial Statements – Refer to Notes 1 and 3 to the financial statements.
Critical Audit Matter Description
The Company is subject to rate regulation by the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of South Carolina, and the
Tennessee Public Utility Commission (collectively the “Commissions”), which have jurisdiction with respect to the gas rates of the Company.
Management has determined it meets the criteria for the application of regulated operations accounting in preparing its financial statements under
accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America. Significant judgment can be required to determine if otherwise
recognizable incurred costs qualify to be presented as a regulatory asset and deferred because such costs are probable of future recovery in
customer rates. As of December 31, 2021, the Company has approximately $456.8 million recorded as regulatory assets.
We identified the impact of rate regulation related to regulatory assets as a critical audit matter due to the significant judgments made by
management, including assumptions regarding the outcome of future decisions by the Commissions, to support its assertions on the likelihood of
future recovery for deferred costs. Given that management’s accounting judgments are based on assumptions about the outcome of future
decisions by the Commissions, auditing these judgments required specialized knowledge of accounting for rate regulation and the ratemaking
process due to its inherent complexities as it relates to regulatory assets.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the recovery of regulatory assets included the following, among others:
• We tested the effectiveness of management’s controls over the evaluation of the likelihood of recovery in future rates and the monitoring
and evaluation of regulatory developments that may affect the likelihood of recovering costs in future rates.
• We evaluated the Company’s disclosures related to the impacts of rate regulation, including the balances recorded and regulatory
developments.
• We read relevant regulatory orders issued by the Commission, regulatory statutes, interpretations, procedural memorandums, filings made
by intervenors, and other publicly available information to assess the likelihood of recovery in future rates based on precedents of the
Commissions’ treatment of similar costs under similar circumstances. We evaluated the external information and compared it to
management’s recorded balances for completeness.
• For regulatory matters in process, we inspected the Company’s and intervenors’ filings with the Commissions, that may impact the
Company’s future rates, for any evidence that might contradict management’s assertions.
116
REPORTS
• We evaluated the reasonableness of management’s judgments regarding the recoverability of regulatory asset balances by
performing the following:
– We inquired of management regarding changes in regulatory orders and regulatory asset balances during the year.
– We evaluated the reasonableness of such changes based on our knowledge of commission- approved amortization, expected
incurred costs, and recently approved regulatory orders, as applicable.
– We utilized trend analyses to evaluate the historical consistency of regulatory asset balances.
– We compared the recorded regulatory asset balance to an independently developed expectation of the corresponding
balance.
• We obtained representation from management asserting that regulatory assets recorded in the financial statements are probable of
recovery.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Charlotte, North Carolina
February 24, 2022
We have served as the Company's auditor since 1951.
117
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
PIEDMONT NATURAL GAS COMPANY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS AND COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 2019
Operating Revenues
Regulated natural gas $ 1,555 $ 1,286 $ 1,369 
Nonregulated natural gas and other 14 11 12 
Total operating revenues 1,569 1,297 1,381 
Operating Expenses  
Cost of natural gas 569 386 532 
Operation, maintenance and other 327 322 328 
Depreciation and amortization 213 180 172 
Property and other taxes 55 53 45 
Impairment of assets and other charges 10 7 — 
Total operating expenses 1,174 948 1,077 
Operating Income 395 349 304 
Equity in earnings of unconsolidated affiliates 9 9 8 
Other income and expense, net 55 51 20 
Total other income and expenses 64 60 28 
Interest Expense 119 118 87 
Income Before Income Taxes 340 291 245 
Income Tax Expense 30 18 43 
Net Income and Comprehensive Income $ 310 $ 273 $ 202 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
118
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
PIEDMONT NATURAL GAS COMPANY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020
ASSETS
Current Assets
Receivables (net of allowance for doubtful accounts of $15 at 2021 and $12 at 2020) $ 318 $ 250 
Receivables from affiliated companies 11 10 
Inventory 109 68 
Regulatory assets 141 153 
Other 9 20 
Total current assets 588 501 
Property, Plant and Equipment
Cost 9,918 9,134 
Accumulated depreciation and amortization (1,899) (1,749)
Facilities to be retired, net 11 — 
Net property, plant and equipment 8,030 7,385 
Other Noncurrent Assets
Goodwill 49 49 
Regulatory assets 316 302 
Operating lease right-of-use assets, net 16 20 
Investments in equity method unconsolidated affiliates 95 88 
Other 288 270 
Total other noncurrent assets 764 729 
Total Assets $ 9,382 $ 8,615 
LIABILITIES AND EQUITY
Current Liabilities
Accounts payable $ 196 $ 230 
Accounts payable to affiliated companies 40 79 
Notes payable to affiliated companies 518 530 
Taxes accrued 63 23 
Interest accrued 37 34 
Current maturities of long-term debt — 160 
Regulatory liabilities 56 88 
Other 81 69 
Total current liabilities 991 1,213 
Long-Term Debt 2,968 2,620 
Other Noncurrent Liabilities
Deferred income taxes 815 821 
Asset retirement obligations 22 20 
Regulatory liabilities 1,058 1,044 
Operating lease liabilities 14 19 
Accrued pension and other post-retirement benefit costs 7 8 
Other 158 155 
Total other noncurrent liabilities 2,074 2,067 
Commitments and Contingencies
Equity
Common stock, no par value: 100 shares authorized and outstanding at 2021 and 2020 1,635 1,310 
Retained earnings 1,714 1,405 
Total equity 3,349 2,715 
Total Liabilities and Equity $ 9,382 $ 8,615 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
119
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
PIEDMONT NATURAL GAS COMPANY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 2019
CASH FLOWS FROM OPERATING ACTIVITIES
Net income $ 310 $ 273 $ 202 
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:
Depreciation and amortization 216 182 174 
Equity component of AFUDC (20) (19) — 
Impairment of assets and other charges 10 7 — 
Deferred income taxes 4 53 136 
Equity in (earnings) losses from unconsolidated affiliates (9) (9) (8)
Provision for rate refunds (4) (33) 2 
(Increase) decrease in
Receivables (77) 10 28 
Receivables from affiliated companies (1) — 12 
Inventory (40) 3 (2)
Other current assets 33 (66) (25)
Increase (decrease) in
Accounts payable (25) 16 (7)
Accounts payable to affiliated companies (39) 76 (35)
Taxes accrued 37 3 (60)
Other current liabilities (26) (11) 1 
Other assets 26 (11) 1 
Other liabilities (4) 7 (10)
Net cash provided by operating activities 391 481 409 
CASH FLOWS FROM INVESTING ACTIVITIES
Capital expenditures (850) (901) (1,053)
Contributions to equity method investments (9) — (16)
Other (31) (28) (14)
Net cash used in investing activities (890) (929) (1,083)
CASH FLOWS FROM FINANCING ACTIVITIES
Proceeds from the issuance of long-term debt 347 394 596 
Payments for the redemption of long-term debt (160) — (350)
Notes payable to affiliated companies (13) 54 278 
Capital contribution from parent 325 — 150 
Net cash provided by financing activities 499 448 674 
Net decrease in cash and cash equivalents — — — 
Cash and cash equivalents at beginning of period — — — 
Cash and cash equivalents at end of period $ — $ — $ — 
Supplemental Disclosures:
Cash paid for interest, net of amount capitalized $ 114 $ 115 $ 84 
Cash received from income taxes (13) (36) (31)
Significant non-cash transactions:
Accrued capital expenditures 97 106 109 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
120
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
PIEDMONT NATURAL GAS COMPANY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CHANGES IN EQUITY
Common Retained Total
(in millions) Stock Earnings Equity
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ 1,160 $ 931 $ 2,091 
Net income — 202 202 
Contribution from parent 150 — 150 
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ 1,310 $ 1,133 $ 2,443 
Net income — 273 273 
Other — (1) (1)
Balance at December 31, 2020 $ 1,310 $ 1,405 $ 2,715 
Net income — 310 310 
Contribution from parent 325 — 325 
Other — (1) (1)
Balance at December 31, 2021 $ 1,635 $ 1,714 $ 3,349 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
121
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Index to Combined Notes To Consolidated Financial Statements
The notes to the consolidated financial statements are a combined presentation. The following table indicates the registrants to which the notes
apply.
 Applicable Notes
Registrant 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425
Duke Energy ••••••••••••  ••••••••••••
Duke Energy Carolinas •••••• ••••  ••••••  ••••••
Progress Energy •••••• •••  ••••••  ••••••
Duke Energy Progress •••••• •••  ••••••  ••••••
Duke Energy Florida •••••• •••  ••••••  ••••••
Duke Energy Ohio •••••• •••  ••  •••  ••••••
Duke Energy Indiana •••••• ••••  ••••••  ••••••
Piedmont •••••• •••••• • • ••••••
Tables within the notes may not sum across due to (i) Progress Energy's consolidation of Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Florida and other
subsidiaries that are not registrants and (ii) subsidiaries that are not registrants but included in the consolidated Duke Energy balances.
1. SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Nature of Operations and Basis of Consolidation
Duke Energy is an energy company headquartered in Charlotte, North Carolina, subject to regulation by the FERC and other regulatory agencies
listed below. Duke Energy operates in the U.S. primarily through its direct and indirect subsidiaries. Certain Duke Energy subsidiaries are also
subsidiary registrants, including Duke Energy Carolinas; Progress Energy; Duke Energy Progress; Duke Energy Florida; Duke Energy Ohio; Duke
Energy Indiana and Piedmont. When discussing Duke Energy’s consolidated financial information, it necessarily includes the results of its separate
Subsidiary Registrants, which along with Duke Energy, are collectively referred to as the Duke Energy Registrants.
The information in these combined notes relates to each of the Duke Energy Registrants as noted in the Index to Combined Notes to Consolidated
Financial Statements. However, none of the Subsidiary Registrants make any representation as to information related solely to Duke Energy or the
Subsidiary Registrants of Duke Energy other than itself.
These Consolidated Financial Statements include, after eliminating intercompany transactions and balances, the accounts of the Duke Energy
Registrants and subsidiaries or VIEs where the respective Duke Energy Registrants have control. See Note 17 for additional information on VIEs.
These Consolidated Financial Statements also reflect the Duke Energy Registrants’ proportionate share of certain jointly owned generation and
transmission facilities. See Note 8 for additional information on joint ownership. Substantially all of the Subsidiary Registrants' operations qualify for
regulatory accounting.
Duke Energy Carolinas is a regulated public utility primarily engaged in the generation, transmission, distribution and sale of electricity in portions of
North Carolina and South Carolina. Duke Energy Carolinas is subject to the regulatory provisions of the NCUC, PSCSC, NRC and FERC.
Progress Energy is a public utility holding company, which conducts operations through its wholly owned subsidiaries, Duke Energy Progress and
Duke Energy Florida. Progress Energy is subject to regulation by FERC and other regulatory agencies listed below.
Duke Energy Progress is a regulated public utility primarily engaged in the generation, transmission, distribution and sale of electricity in portions of
North Carolina and South Carolina. Duke Energy Progress is subject to the regulatory provisions of the NCUC, PSCSC, NRC and FERC.
Duke Energy Florida is a regulated public utility primarily engaged in the generation, transmission, distribution and sale of electricity in portions of
Florida. Duke Energy Florida is subject to the regulatory provisions of the FPSC, NRC and FERC.
Duke Energy Ohio is a regulated public utility primarily engaged in the transmission and distribution of electricity in portions of Ohio and Kentucky, the
generation and sale of electricity in portions of Kentucky and the transportation and sale of natural gas in portions of Ohio and Kentucky. Duke
Energy Ohio conducts competitive auctions for retail electricity supply in Ohio whereby the energy price is recovered from retail customers and
recorded in Operating Revenues on the Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income. Operations in Kentucky are conducted
through its wholly owned subsidiary, Duke Energy Kentucky. References herein to Duke Energy Ohio collectively include Duke Energy Ohio and its
subsidiaries, unless otherwise noted. Duke Energy Ohio is subject to the regulatory provisions of the PUCO, KPSC and FERC.
Duke Energy Indiana is a regulated public utility primarily engaged in the generation, transmission, distribution and sale of electricity in portions of
Indiana. Duke Energy Indiana is subject to the regulatory provisions of the IURC and FERC.
Piedmont is a regulated public utility primarily engaged in the distribution of natural gas in portions of North Carolina, South Carolina and Tennessee.
Piedmont is subject to the regulatory provisions of the NCUC, PSCSC, TPUC and FERC.
Certain prior year amounts have been reclassified to conform to the current year presentation.
122
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Other Current Assets and Liabilities
The following table provides a description of amounts included in Other within Current Assets or Current Liabilities that exceed 5% of total Current
Assets or Current Liabilities on the Duke Energy Registrants' Consolidated Balance Sheets at either December 31, 2021, or 2020.
December 31,
(in millions) Location 2021 2020
Duke Energy
Accrued compensation Current Liabilities$ 915 $ 662 
Other accrued liabilities Current Liabilities 649 1,455 
Duke Energy Carolinas
Accrued compensation Current Liabilities$ 277 $ 213 
Duke Energy Progress  
Customer deposits Current Liabilities$ 144 $ 144 
Other accrued liabilities Current Liabilities 163 132 
Duke Energy Florida    
Customer deposits Current Liabilities$ 200 $ 203 
Other accrued liabilities Current Liabilities 89 81 
Duke Energy Ohio    
Gas Storage Current Assets$ 25 $ 21 
Collateral liabilities Current Liabilities 57 41 
Discontinued Operations
Duke Energy has elected to present cash flows of discontinued operations combined with cash flows of continuing operations. Unless otherwise
noted, the notes to these consolidated financial statements exclude amounts related to discontinued operations for all periods presented. For the
years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, the Income (Loss) From Discontinued Operations, net of tax on Duke Energy's Consolidated
Statements of Operations is entirely attributable to controlling interest.
Noncontrolling Interest
Duke Energy maintains a controlling financial interest in certain less than wholly owned nonregulated subsidiaries. As a result, Duke Energy
consolidates these subsidiaries and presents the third-party investors' portion of Duke Energy's net income (loss), net assets and comprehensive
income (loss) as noncontrolling interest. Noncontrolling interest is included as a component of equity on the Consolidated Balance Sheet.
Several operating agreements of Duke Energy's subsidiaries with noncontrolling interest are subject to allocations of tax attributes and cash flows in
accordance with contractual agreements that vary throughout the lives of the subsidiaries. Therefore, Duke Energy and the other investors' (the
owners) interests in the subsidiaries are not fixed, and the subsidiaries apply the HLBV method in allocating income or loss and other comprehensive
income or loss (all measured on a pretax basis) to the owners. The HLBV method measures the amounts that each owner would hypothetically claim
at each balance sheet reporting date, including tax benefits realized by the owners, most of which is over the IRS recapture period, upon a
hypothetical liquidation of the subsidiary at the net book value of its underlying assets. The change in the amount that each owner would
hypothetically receive at the reporting date compared to the amount it would have received on the previous reporting date represents the amount of
income or loss allocated to each owner for the reporting period.
Other operating agreements of Duke Energy's subsidiaries with noncontrolling interest allocate profit and loss based on their pro rata shares of the
ownership interest in the respective subsidiary. Therefore, Duke Energy allocates net income or loss and other comprehensive income or loss of
these subsidiaries to the owners based on their pro rata shares.
In 2019, Duke Energy completed a sale of minority interest in a portion of certain renewable assets within the Commercial Renewables Segment for
pretax proceeds to Duke Energy of $415 million. The portion of Duke Energy's commercial renewables energy portfolio sold includes 49% of 37
operating wind, solar and battery storage assets and 33% of 11 operating solar assets across the U.S. Duke Energy retained control of these assets,
and, therefore, no gain or loss was recognized on the Consolidated Statements of Operations. The difference between the consideration received
and the carrying value of the noncontrolling interest claim on net assets was $466 million, net of tax benefit of $8 million, and was recorded to equity.
The following table presents allocated losses to noncontrolling interest for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019.
December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 2019
Noncontrolling Interest Allocation of Income
Allocated losses to noncontrolling tax equity members utilizing the HLBV method $ 298 $ 271 $ 165 
Allocated losses to noncontrolling members based on pro rata shares of ownership 31 24 12 
Total Noncontrolling Interest Allocated Losses $ 329 $ 295 $ 177 
123
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
2021 Sale of Minority Interest in Duke Energy Indiana
On January 28, 2021, Duke Energy executed an agreement providing for an investment by an affiliate of GIC in Duke Energy Indiana in exchange for
a 19.9% minority interest issued by Duke Energy Indiana Holdco, LLC, the holding company for Duke Energy Indiana. The transaction will be
completed following two closings for an aggregate purchase price of approximately $2 billion. The first closing, which occurred on September 8,
2021, resulted in Duke Energy Indiana Holdco, LLC issuing 11.05% of its membership interests in exchange for approximately $1,025 million or 50%
of the purchase price. Duke Energy retained indirect control of these assets, and, therefore, no gain or loss was recognized on the Consolidated
Statements of Operations. The difference between the cash consideration received, net of transaction costs of approximately $27 million, and the
carrying value of the noncontrolling interest is $545 million and was recorded as an increase to equity. Under the terms of the agreement, Duke
Energy has the discretion to determine the timing of the second closing, but it will occur no later than January 2023. At the second closing, Duke
Energy will issue and sell additional membership interests such that GIC will own 19.9% of the membership interests for the remaining 50% of the
purchase price.
Acquisitions
The Duke Energy Registrants consolidate assets and liabilities from acquisitions as of the purchase date and include earnings from acquisitions in
consolidated earnings after the purchase date.
Significant Accounting Policies
Use of Estimates
In preparing financial statements that conform to GAAP, the Duke Energy Registrants must make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported
amounts of assets and liabilities, the reported amounts of revenues and expenses and the disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of
the financial statements. Actual results could differ from those estimates.
Regulatory Accounting
The majority of the Duke Energy Registrants’ operations are subject to price regulation for the sale of electricity and natural gas by state utility
commissions or FERC. When prices are set on the basis of specific costs of the regulated operations and an effective franchise is in place such that
sufficient natural gas or electric services can be sold to recover those costs, the Duke Energy Registrants apply regulatory accounting. Regulatory
accounting changes the timing of the recognition of costs or revenues relative to a company that does not apply regulatory accounting. As a result,
regulatory assets and regulatory liabilities are recognized on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. Regulatory assets and liabilities are amortized
consistent with the treatment of the related cost in the ratemaking process. Regulatory assets are reviewed for recoverability each reporting period. If
a regulatory asset is no longer deemed probable of recovery, the deferred cost is charged to earnings. See Note 3 for further information.
Regulatory accounting rules also require recognition of a disallowance (also called "impairment") loss if it becomes probable that part of the cost of a
plant under construction (or a recently completed plant or an abandoned plant) will be disallowed for ratemaking purposes and a reasonable estimate
of the amount of the disallowance can be made. For example, if a cost cap is set for a plant still under construction, the amount of the disallowance is
a result of a judgment as to the ultimate cost of the plant. These disallowances can require judgments on allowed future rate recovery.
When it becomes probable that regulated generation, transmission or distribution assets will be abandoned, the cost of the asset is removed from
plant in service. The value that may be retained as a regulatory asset on the balance sheet for the abandoned property is dependent upon amounts
that may be recovered through regulated rates, including any return. As such, an impairment charge could be partially or fully offset by the
establishment of a regulatory asset if rate recovery is probable. The impairment charge for a disallowance of costs for regulated plants under
construction, recently completed or abandoned is based on discounted cash flows.
The Duke Energy Registrants utilize cost-tracking mechanisms, commonly referred to as fuel adjustment clauses or PGA clauses. These clauses
allow for the recovery of fuel and fuel-related costs, portions of purchased power, natural gas costs and hedging costs through surcharges on
customer rates. The difference between the costs incurred and the surcharge revenues is recorded either as an adjustment to Operating Revenues,
Operating Expenses – Fuel used in electric generation or Operating Expenses – Cost of natural gas on the Consolidated Statements of Operations,
with an off-setting impact on regulatory assets or liabilities.
124
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Cash, Cash Equivalents and Restricted Cash
All highly liquid investments with maturities of three months or less at the date of acquisition are considered cash equivalents. Duke Energy, Progress
Energy and Duke Energy Florida have restricted cash balances related primarily to collateral assets, escrow deposits and VIEs. Duke Energy
Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress have restricted cash balances related to VIEs from storm recovery bonds issued in 2021. See Note 17 for
additional information. Restricted cash amounts are included in Other within Current Assets and Other Noncurrent Assets on the Consolidated
Balance Sheets. The following table presents the components of cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash included in the Consolidated Balance
Sheets.
December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy
Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida
Current Assets
Cash and cash equivalents $ 343 $ 7 $ 70 $ 35 $ 23 
Other 170 — 39 — 39 
Other Noncurrent Assets
Other 7 1 4 4 — 
Total cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash $ 520 $ 8 $ 113 $ 39 $ 62 
December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy
Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida
Current Assets
Cash and cash equivalents $ 259 $ 21 $ 59 $ 39 $ 11 
Other 194 — 39 — 39 
Other Noncurrent Assets
Other 103 — 102 — — 
Total cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash $ 556 $ 21 $ 200 $ 39 $ 50 
Inventory
Inventory related to regulated operations is valued at historical cost. Inventory related to nonregulated operations is valued at the lower of cost or
market. Inventory is charged to expense or capitalized to property, plant and equipment when issued, primarily using the average cost method.
Excess or obsolete inventory is written down to the lower of cost or net realizable value. Once inventory has been written down, it creates a new cost
basis for the inventory that is not subsequently written up. Provisions for inventory write-offs were not material at December 31, 2021, and 2020,
respectively. The components of inventory are presented in the tables below.
 December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Materials and supplies $ 2,397 $ 793 $ 1,067 $ 729 $ 338 $ 80 $ 311 $ 14 
Coal 486 195 167 94 73 19 105 — 
Natural gas, oil and other 316 38 164 98 66 17 2 95 
Total inventory $ 3,199 $ 1,026 $ 1,398 $ 921 $ 477 $ 116 $ 418 $ 109 
 December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Materials and supplies $ 2,312 $ 785 $ 999 $ 673 $ 325 $ 78 $ 307 $ 12 
Coal 561 186 193 131 63 16 165 — 
Natural gas, oil and other 294 39 183 107 76 16 1 56 
Total inventory $ 3,167 $ 1,010 $ 1,375 $ 911 $ 464 $ 110 $ 473 $ 68 
125
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Investments in Debt and Equity Securities
The Duke Energy Registrants classify investments in equity securities as FV-NI and investments in debt securities as AFS. Both categories are
recorded at fair value on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. Realized and unrealized gains and losses on securities classified as FV-NI are reported
through net income. Unrealized gains and losses for debt securities classified as AFS are included in AOCI until realized, unless it is determined the
carrying value of an investment has a credit loss. For certain investments of regulated operations, such as substantially all of the NDTF, realized and
unrealized gains and losses (including any credit losses) on debt securities are recorded as a regulatory asset or liability. The credit loss portion of
debt securities of nonregulated operations are included in earnings. Investments in debt and equity securities are classified as either current or
noncurrent based on management’s intent and ability to sell these securities, taking into consideration current market liquidity. See Note 15 for further
information.
Goodwill
Duke Energy, Progress Energy, Duke Energy Ohio and Piedmont perform annual goodwill impairment tests as of August 31 each year at the
reporting unit level, which is determined to be a business segment or one level below. Duke Energy, Progress Energy, Duke Energy Ohio and
Piedmont update these tests between annual tests if events or circumstances occur that would more likely than not reduce the fair value of a
reporting unit below its carrying value. See Note 11 for further information.
Intangible Assets
Intangible assets are included in Other in Other Noncurrent Assets on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. Generally, intangible assets are amortized
using an amortization method that reflects the pattern in which the economic benefits of the intangible asset are consumed or on a straight-line basis
if that pattern is not readily determinable. Amortization of intangibles is reflected in Depreciation and amortization on the Consolidated Statements of
Operations. Intangible assets are subject to impairment testing and if impaired, the carrying value is accordingly reduced.
RECs are used to measure compliance with renewable energy standards and are held primarily for consumption. See Note 11 for further information.
Long-Lived Asset Impairments
The Duke Energy Registrants evaluate long-lived assets, excluding goodwill, for impairment when circumstances indicate the carrying value of those
assets may not be recoverable. An impairment exists when a long-lived asset’s carrying value exceeds the estimated undiscounted cash flows
expected to result from the use and eventual disposition of the asset. The estimated cash flows may be based on alternative expected outcomes that
are probability weighted. If the carrying value of the long-lived asset is not recoverable based on these estimated future undiscounted cash flows, the
carrying value of the asset is written down to its then current estimated fair value and an impairment charge is recognized.
The Duke Energy Registrants assess fair value of long-lived assets using various methods, including recent comparable third-party sales, internally
developed discounted cash flow analysis and analysis from outside advisors. Triggering events to reassess cash flows may include, but are not
limited to, significant changes in commodity prices, the condition of an asset or management’s interest in selling the asset.
Equity Method Investment Impairments
Investments in affiliates that are not controlled by Duke Energy, but over which it has significant influence, are accounted for using the equity method.
Equity method investments are assessed for impairment whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of the
investment may not be recoverable. If the decline in value is considered to be other than temporary, the investment is written down to its estimated
fair value, which establishes a new cost basis in the investment.
Impairment assessments use a discounted cash flow income approach and include consideration of the severity and duration of any decline in the
fair value of the investments. The estimated cash flows may be based on alternative expected outcomes that are probability weighted. Key inputs that
involve estimates and significant management judgment include cash flow projections, selection of a discount rate, probability weighting of potential
outcomes, and whether any decline in value is considered temporary.
126
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Property, Plant and Equipment
Property, plant and equipment are stated at the lower of depreciated historical cost net of any disallowances or fair value, if impaired. The Duke
Energy Registrants capitalize all construction-related direct labor and material costs, as well as indirect construction costs such as general
engineering, taxes and financing costs. See “Allowance for Funds Used During Construction and Interest Capitalized” section below for information
on capitalized financing costs. Costs of renewals and betterments that extend the useful life of property, plant and equipment are also capitalized.
The cost of repairs, replacements and major maintenance projects, which do not extend the useful life or increase the expected output of the asset,
are expensed as incurred. Depreciation is generally computed over the estimated useful life of the asset using the composite straight-line method.
Depreciation studies are conducted periodically to update composite rates and are approved by state utility commissions and/or the FERC when
required. The composite weighted average depreciation rates, excluding nuclear fuel, are included in the table that follows.
 Years Ended December 31,
 2021 2020 2019
Duke Energy 2.9 % 3.0 % 3.1 %
Duke Energy Carolinas 2.7 % 2.8 % 2.8 %
Progress Energy 3.1 % 3.2 % 3.1 %
Duke Energy Progress 3.0 % 3.1 % 3.1 %
Duke Energy Florida 3.3 % 3.3 % 3.1 %
Duke Energy Ohio 2.9 % 2.9 % 2.6 %
Duke Energy Indiana 3.6 % 3.5 % 3.3 %
Piedmont 2.1 % 2.3 % 2.4 %
In general, when the Duke Energy Registrants retire regulated property, plant and equipment, the original cost plus the cost of retirement, less
salvage value and any depreciation already recognized, is charged to accumulated depreciation. However, when it becomes probable the asset will
be retired substantially in advance of its original expected useful life or is abandoned, the cost of the asset and the corresponding accumulated
depreciation is recognized as a separate asset. If the asset is still in operation, the net amount is classified as Facilities to be retired, net on the
Consolidated Balance Sheets. If the asset is no longer operating, the net amount is classified in Regulatory assets on the Consolidated Balance
Sheets if deemed recoverable (see discussion of long-lived asset impairments above). The carrying value of the asset is based on historical cost if
the Duke Energy Registrants are allowed to recover the remaining net book value and a return equal to at least the incremental borrowing rate. If not,
an impairment is recognized to the extent the net book value of the asset exceeds the present value of future revenues discounted at the incremental
borrowing rate.
When the Duke Energy Registrants sell entire regulated operating units, or retire or sell nonregulated properties, the original cost and accumulated
depreciation and amortization balances are removed from Property, Plant and Equipment on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. Any gain or loss is
recorded in earnings, unless otherwise required by the applicable regulatory body. See Note 10 for additional information.
Leases
Duke Energy determines if an arrangement is a lease at contract inception based on whether the arrangement involves the use of a physically
distinct identified asset and whether Duke Energy has the right to obtain substantially all of the economic benefits from the use of the asset
throughout the period as well as the right to direct the use of the asset. As a policy election, Duke Energy does not evaluate arrangements with initial
contract terms of less than one year as leases.
Operating leases are included in Operating lease ROU assets, net, Other current liabilities and Operating lease liabilities on the Consolidated
Balance Sheets. Finance leases are included in Property, plant and equipment, Current maturities of long-term debt and Long-Term Debt on the
Consolidated Balance Sheets.
For lessee and lessor arrangements, Duke Energy has elected a policy to not separate lease and non-lease components for all asset classes. For
lessor arrangements, lease and non-lease components are only combined under one arrangement and accounted for under the lease accounting
framework if the non-lease components are not the predominant component of the arrangement and the lease component would be classified as an
operating lease.
Nuclear Fuel
Nuclear fuel is classified as Property, Plant and Equipment on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
Nuclear fuel in the front-end fuel processing phase is considered work in progress and not amortized until placed in service. Amortization of nuclear
fuel is included within Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power on the Consolidated Statements of Operations. Amortization is recorded
using the units-of-production method.
Allowance for Funds Used During Construction and Interest Capitalized
For regulated operations, the debt and equity costs of financing the construction of property, plant and equipment are reflected as AFUDC and
capitalized as a component of the cost of property, plant and equipment. AFUDC equity is reported on the Consolidated Statements of Operations as
non-cash income in Other income and expenses, net. AFUDC debt is reported as a non-cash offset to Interest Expense. After construction is
completed, the Duke Energy Registrants are permitted to recover these costs through their inclusion in rate base and the corresponding subsequent
depreciation or amortization of those regulated assets.
AFUDC equity, a permanent difference for income taxes, reduces the ETR when capitalized and increases the ETR when depreciated or amortized.
See Note 23 for additional information.
127
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
For nonregulated operations, interest is capitalized during the construction phase with an offsetting non-cash credit to Interest Expense on the
Consolidated Statements of Operations.
Asset Retirement Obligations
AROs are recognized for legal obligations associated with the retirement of property, plant and equipment. Substantially all AROs are related to
regulated operations. When recording an ARO, the present value of the projected liability is recognized in the period in which it is incurred, if a
reasonable estimate of fair value can be made. The liability is accreted over time. For operating plants, the present value of the liability is added to
the cost of the associated asset and depreciated over the remaining life of the asset. For retired plants, the present value of the liability is recorded as
a regulatory asset unless determined not to be probable of recovery.
The present value of the initial obligation and subsequent updates are based on discounted cash flows, which include estimates regarding timing of
future cash flows, selection of discount rates and cost escalation rates, among other factors. These estimates are subject to change. Depreciation
expense is adjusted prospectively for any changes to the carrying amount of the associated asset. The Duke Energy Registrants receive amounts to
fund the cost of the ARO for regulated operations through a combination of regulated revenues and earnings on the NDTF. As a result, amounts
recovered in regulated revenues, earnings on the NDTF, accretion expense and depreciation of the associated asset are netted and deferred as a
regulatory asset or liability.
Accounts Payable
During 2020, Duke Energy established a supply chain finance program (the “program”) with a global financial institution. The program is voluntary
and allows Duke Energy suppliers, at their sole discretion, to sell their receivables from Duke Energy to the financial institution at a rate that
leverages Duke Energy’s credit rating and, which may result in favorable terms compared to the rate available to the supplier on their own credit
rating. Suppliers participating in the program, determine at their sole discretion which invoices they will sell to the financial institution. Suppliers’
decisions on which invoices are sold do not impact Duke Energy’s payment terms, which are based on commercial terms negotiated between Duke
Energy and the supplier regardless of program participation. The commercial terms negotiated between Duke Energy and its suppliers are consistent
regardless of whether the supplier elects to participate in the program. Duke Energy does not issue any guarantees with respect to the program and
does not participate in negotiations between suppliers and the financial institution. Duke Energy does not have an economic interest in the supplier’s
decision to participate in the program and receives no interest, fees or other benefit from the financial institution based on supplier participation in the
program.
The following table presents the outstanding accounts payable balance sold to the financial institution by our suppliers and the supplier invoices sold
to the financial institution under the program included within Net cash provided by operating activities on the Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
as of December 31, 2021, and December 31, 2020.
 December 31, 2021 December 30, 2020
Duke Duke Duke
DukeProgress Energy Energy Duke Energy
(in millions) Energy Energy Florida OhioPiedmont Energy OhioPiedmont
Outstanding Accounts Payable Balance Sold$ 19 $ 9 $ 9 $ 6 $ 4 $ 15 $ 1 $ 14 
Suppliers Invoices Settled Through The
Program 122 10 10 12 100 45 9 36 
Revenue Recognition
Duke Energy recognizes revenue as customers obtain control of promised goods and services in an amount that reflects consideration expected in
exchange for those goods or services. Generally, the delivery of electricity and natural gas results in the transfer of control to customers at the time
the commodity is delivered and the amount of revenue recognized is equal to the amount billed to each customer, including estimated volumes
delivered when billings have not yet occurred. See Note 18 for further information.
Derivatives and Hedging
Derivative and non-derivative instruments may be used in connection with commodity price and interest rate activities, including swaps, futures,
forwards and options. All derivative instruments, except those that qualify for the NPNS exception, are recorded on the Consolidated Balance Sheets
at fair value. Qualifying derivative instruments may be designated as either cash flow hedges or fair value hedges. Other derivative instruments
(undesignated contracts) either have not been designated or do not qualify as hedges. The effective portion of the change in the fair value of cash
flow hedges is recorded in AOCI. The effective portion of the change in the fair value of a fair value hedge is offset in net income by changes in the
hedged item. For activity subject to regulatory accounting, gains and losses on derivative contracts are reflected as regulatory assets or liabilities and
not as other comprehensive income or current period income. As a result, changes in fair value of these derivatives have no immediate earnings
impact.
Formal documentation, including transaction type and risk management strategy, is maintained for all contracts accounted for as a hedge. At
inception and at least every three months thereafter, the hedge contract is assessed to see if it is highly effective in offsetting changes in cash flows
or fair values of hedged items.
See Note 14 for further information.
Captive Insurance Reserves
Duke Energy has captive insurance subsidiaries that provide coverage, on an indemnity basis, to the Subsidiary Registrants as well as certain third
parties, on a limited basis, for financial losses, primarily related to property, workers’ compensation and general liability. Liabilities include provisions
for estimated losses incurred but not reported (IBNR), as well as estimated provisions for known claims. IBNR reserve estimates are primarily based
upon historical loss experience, industry data and other actuarial assumptions. Reserve estimates are adjusted in future periods as actual losses
differ from experience.
128
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Duke Energy, through its captive insurance entities, also has reinsurance coverage with third parties for certain losses above a per occurrence and/or
aggregate retention. Receivables for reinsurance coverage are recognized when realization is deemed probable.
Unamortized Debt Premium, Discount and Expense
Premiums, discounts and expenses incurred with the issuance of outstanding long-term debt are amortized over the term of the debt issue. The gain
or loss on extinguishment associated with refinancing higher-cost debt obligations in the regulated operations is amortized over the remaining life of
the original instrument. Amortization expense is recorded as Interest Expense in the Consolidated Statements of Operations and is reflected as
Depreciation, amortization and accretion within Net cash provided by operating activities on the Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows.
Premiums, discounts and expenses are presented as an adjustment to the carrying value of the debt amount and included in Long-Term Debt on the
Consolidated Balance Sheets presented.
Preferred Stock
Preferred stock is reviewed to determine the appropriate balance sheet classification and embedded features, such as call options, are evaluated to
determine if they should be bifurcated and accounted for separately. Costs directly related to the issuance of preferred stock are recorded as a
reduction of the proceeds received. The liability for the dividend is recognized when declared. The accumulated dividends on the cumulative
preferred stock is recognized to net income available to Duke Energy Corporation in the EPS calculation. See Note 19 for further information.
Loss Contingencies and Environmental Liabilities
Contingent losses are recorded when it is probable a loss has occurred and the loss can be reasonably estimated. When a range of the probable loss
exists and no amount within the range is a better estimate than any other amount, the minimum amount in the range is recorded. Unless otherwise
required by GAAP, legal fees are expensed as incurred.
Environmental liabilities are recorded on an undiscounted basis when environmental remediation or other liabilities become probable and can be
reasonably estimated. Environmental expenditures related to past operations that do not generate current or future revenues are expensed.
Environmental expenditures related to operations that generate current or future revenues are expensed or capitalized, as appropriate. Certain
environmental expenditures receive regulatory accounting treatment and are recorded as regulatory assets.
See Notes 3 and 4 for further information.
Pension and Other Post-Retirement Benefit Plans
Duke Energy maintains qualified, non-qualified and other post-retirement benefit plans. Eligible employees of the Subsidiary Registrants participate in
the respective qualified, non-qualified and other post-retirement benefit plans and the Subsidiary Registrants are allocated their proportionate share
of benefit costs. See Note 22 for further information, including significant accounting policies associated with these plans.
Severance and Special Termination Benefits
Duke Energy has severance plans under which in general, the longer a terminated employee worked prior to termination the greater the amount of
severance benefits. A liability for involuntary severance is recorded once an involuntary severance plan is committed to by management if involuntary
severances are probable and can be reasonably estimated. For involuntary severance benefits incremental to its ongoing severance plan benefits,
the fair value of the obligation is expensed at the communication date if there are no future service requirements or over the required future service
period. Duke Energy also offers special termination benefits under voluntary severance programs. Special termination benefits are recorded
immediately upon employee acceptance absent a significant retention period. Otherwise, the cost is recorded over the remaining service period.
Employee acceptance of voluntary severance benefits is determined by management based on the facts and circumstances of the benefits being
offered. See Note 20 for further information.
Guarantees
If necessary, liabilities are recognized at the time of issuance or material modification of a guarantee for the estimated fair value of the obligation it
assumes. Fair value is estimated using a probability weighted approach. The obligation is reduced over the term of the guarantee or related contract
in a systematic and rational method as risk is reduced. Duke Energy recognizes a liability for the best estimate of its loss due to the nonperformance
of the guaranteed party. This liability is recognized at the inception of a guarantee and is updated periodically. See Note 7 for further information.
Stock-Based Compensation
Stock-based compensation represents costs related to stock-based awards granted to employees and Board of Directors members. Duke Energy
recognizes stock-based compensation based upon the estimated fair value of awards, net of estimated forfeitures at the date of issuance. The
recognition period for these costs begins at either the applicable service inception date or grant date and continues throughout the requisite service
period. Compensation cost is recognized as expense or capitalized as a component of property, plant and equipment. See Note 21 for further
information.
Income Taxes
Duke Energy and its subsidiaries file a consolidated federal income tax return and other state and foreign jurisdictional returns. The Subsidiary
Registrants are parties to a tax-sharing agreement with Duke Energy. Income taxes recorded represent amounts the Subsidiary Registrants would
incur as separate C-Corporations. Deferred income taxes have been provided for temporary differences between GAAP and tax bases of assets and
liabilities because the differences create taxable or tax-deductible amounts for future periods. ITCs associated with regulated operations are deferred
and amortized as a reduction of income tax expense over the estimated useful lives of the related properties. For ITCs associated with nonregulated
operations see “Accounting for Renewable Energy Tax Credits.”
129
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Accumulated deferred income taxes are valued using the enacted tax rate expected to apply to taxable income in the periods in which the deferred
tax asset or liability is expected to be settled or realized. In the event of a change in tax rates, deferred tax assets and liabilities are remeasured as of
the enactment date of the new rate. To the extent that the change in the value of the deferred tax represents an obligation to customers, the impact of
the remeasurement is deferred to a regulatory liability. Remaining impacts are recorded in income from continuing operations. Duke Energy's results
of operations could be impacted if the estimate of the tax effect of reversing temporary differences is not reflective of actual outcomes, is modified to
reflect new developments or interpretations of the tax law, revised to incorporate new accounting principles, or changes in the expected timing or
manner of a reversal.
Tax-related interest and penalties are recorded in Interest Expense and Other Income and Expenses, net in the Consolidated Statements of
Operations.
See Note 23 for further information.
Accounting for Renewable Energy Tax Credits
When Duke Energy receives ITCs on wind or solar facilities associated with its nonregulated operations, it reduces the basis of the property recorded
on the Consolidated Balance Sheets by the amount of the ITC and, therefore, the ITC benefit is ultimately recognized in the statement of operations
through reduced depreciation expense. Additionally, certain tax credits and government grants result in an initial tax depreciable base in excess of the
book carrying value by an amount equal to one half of the ITC. Deferred tax benefits are recorded as a reduction to income tax expense in the period
that the basis difference is created.
Duke Energy receives PTCs on wind facilities that are recognized as electricity is produced and records related amounts as a reduction of income tax
expense.
Excise Taxes
Certain excise taxes levied by state or local governments are required to be paid even if not collected from the customer. These taxes are recognized
on a gross basis. Taxes for which Duke Energy operates merely as a collection agent for the state and local government are accounted for on a net
basis. Excise taxes accounted for on a gross basis within both Operating Revenues and Property and other taxes in the Consolidated Statements of
Operations were as follows.
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 2019
Duke Energy $ 420 $ 415 $ 421 
Duke Energy Carolinas 44 43 39 
Progress Energy 250 249 256 
Duke Energy Progress 22 26 21 
Duke Energy Florida 228 223 235 
Duke Energy Ohio 102 96 101 
Duke Energy Indiana 23 25 23 
Piedmont 1 2 2 
Dividend Restrictions and Unappropriated Retained Earnings
Duke Energy does not have any current legal, regulatory or other restrictions on paying common stock dividends to shareholders. However, if Duke
Energy were to defer dividend payments on the preferred stock, the declaration of common stock dividends would be prohibited. See Note 19 for
more information. Additionally, as further described in Note 3, Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Ohio, Duke Energy
Indiana and Piedmont have restrictions on paying dividends or otherwise advancing funds to Duke Energy due to conditions established by
regulators in conjunction with merger transaction approvals. At December 31, 2021, and 2020, an insignificant amount of Duke Energy’s consolidated
Retained earnings balance represents undistributed earnings of equity method investments.
New Accounting Standards
The following new accounting standard was adopted by the Duke Energy Registrants in 2021.
Leases with Variable Lease Payments. In July 2021, the FASB issued new accounting guidance requiring lessors to classify a lease with variable
lease payments that do not depend on a reference index or rate as an operating lease if both of the following are met: (1) the lease would have to be
classified as a sales-type or direct financing lease under prior guidance, and (2) the lessor would have recognized a day-one loss. Duke Energy
elected to adopt the guidance immediately upon issuance of the new standard and will be applying the new standard prospectively to new lease
arrangements meeting the criteria. Duke Energy did not have any lease arrangements that this new accounting guidance materially impacted.
The following new accounting standard was adopted by Duke Energy Registrants in 2020.
Current Expected Credit Losses. In June 2016, the FASB issued new accounting guidance for credit losses. Duke Energy adopted the new
accounting guidance for credit losses effective January 1, 2020, using the modified retrospective method of adoption, which does not require
restatement of prior year results. Duke Energy did not adopt any practical expedients.
Duke Energy recognizes allowances for credit losses based on management's estimate of losses expected to be incurred over the lives of certain
assets or guarantees. Management monitors credit quality, changes in expected credit losses and the appropriateness of the allowance for credit
losses on a forward-looking basis. Management reviews the risk of loss periodically as part of the existing assessment of collectability of receivables.
130
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Duke Energy reviews the credit quality of its counterparties as part of its regular risk management process and requires credit enhancements, such
as deposits or letters of credit, as appropriate and as allowed by regulators.
Duke Energy recorded cumulative effects of changes in accounting principles related to the adoption of the new credit loss standard for allowances
and credit losses of trade and other receivables, insurance receivables and financial guarantees. These amounts are included in the Consolidated
Balance Sheets in Receivables, Receivables of VIEs, Other Noncurrent Assets and Other Noncurrent Liabilities. See Notes 7 and 18 for more
information.
Duke Energy recorded an adjustment for the cumulative effect of a change in accounting principle due to the adoption of this standard on January 1,
2020, as shown in the table below:
 January 1, 2020
Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Piedmont
Total pretax impact to Retained Earnings $ 120 $ 16 $ 2 $ 1 $ 1 $ 1 
The following new accounting standard has been issued but not yet adopted by the Duke Energy Registrants as of December 31, 2021.
Reference Rate Reform. In March 2020, the FASB issued new accounting guidance for reference rate reform. This guidance is elective and
provides expedients to facilitate financial reporting for the anticipated transition away from the London Inter-bank Offered Rate (LIBOR) and other
interbank reference rates starting in 2021 with all rates expected to be fully phased out in 2023. The optional expedients are effective for modification
of existing contracts or new arrangements executed between March 12, 2020, through December 31, 2022.
Duke Energy has variable-rate debt and manages interest rate risk by entering into financial contracts including interest rate swaps that are generally
indexed to LIBOR. Impacted financial arrangements extending beyond the phase out of the applicable LIBOR rate may require contractual
amendment or termination to fully adapt to a post-LIBOR environment. Duke Energy is assessing these financial arrangements and is evaluating the
use of optional expedients outlined in the new accounting guidance. Alternative index provisions are also being assessed and incorporated into new
financial arrangements that extend beyond the phase out of the applicable LIBOR rate. The full outcome of the transition away from LIBOR cannot be
determined at this time, but is not expected to have a material impact on the financial statements.
2. BUSINESS SEGMENTS
Reportable segments are determined based on information used by the chief operating decision-maker in deciding how to allocate resources and
evaluate the performance of the business. Duke Energy evaluates segment performance based on segment income. Segment income is defined as
income from continuing operations net of income attributable to noncontrolling interests and preferred stock dividends. Segment income, as
discussed below, includes intercompany revenues and expenses that are eliminated on the Consolidated Financial Statements. Certain governance
costs are allocated to each segment. In addition, direct interest expense and income taxes are included in segment income.
Products and services are sold between affiliate companies and reportable segments of Duke Energy at cost. Segment assets as presented in the
tables that follow exclude all intercompany assets.
Duke Energy
Duke Energy's segment structure includes the following segments: Electric Utilities and Infrastructure, Gas Utilities and Infrastructure and
Commercial Renewables.
The Electric Utilities and Infrastructure segment includes Duke Energy's regulated electric utilities in the Carolinas, Florida and the Midwest. The
regulated electric utilities conduct operations through the Subsidiary Registrants that are substantially all regulated and, accordingly, qualify for
regulatory accounting treatment. Electric Utilities and Infrastructure also includes Duke Energy's electric transmission infrastructure investments.
The Gas Utilities and Infrastructure segment includes Piedmont, Duke Energy's natural gas local distribution companies in Ohio and Kentucky, and
Duke Energy's natural gas storage and midstream pipeline investments. Gas Utilities and Infrastructure's operations are substantially all regulated
and, accordingly, qualify for regulatory accounting treatment.
The Commercial Renewables segment is primarily comprised of nonregulated utility-scale wind and solar generation assets located throughout the
U.S.
The remainder of Duke Energy’s operations is presented as Other, which is primarily comprised of interest expense on holding company debt,
unallocated corporate costs and Duke Energy’s wholly owned captive insurance company, Bison. Other also includes Duke Energy's interest in NMC.
See Note 12 for additional information on the investment in NMC.
131
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS BUSINESS SEGMENTS
Business segment information is presented in the following tables. Segment assets presented exclude intercompany assets.
Year Ended December 31, 2021
Electric Gas Total
Utilities and Utilities and CommercialReportable
(in millions) Infrastructure Infrastructure Renewables Segments Other Eliminations Total
Unaffiliated Revenues $ 22,570 $ 2,022 $ 476 $ 25,068 $ 29 $ — $ 25,097 
Intersegment Revenues 33 90 — 123 82 (205) — 
Total Revenues $ 22,603 $ 2,112 $ 476 $ 25,191 $ 111 $ (205)$ 25,097 
Interest Expense $ 1,432 $ 142 $ 72 $ 1,646 $ 643 $ (9)$ 2,280 
Depreciation and amortization 4,251 303 225 4,779 237 (26) 4,990 
Equity in earnings (losses) of
unconsolidated affiliates 7 8 (34) (19) 47 — 28 
Income tax expense (benefit) 494 55 (78) 471 (279) — 192 
Segment income (loss) 3,850 396 201 4,447 (652) — 3,795 
Less noncontrolling interest 329 
Add back preferred stock
dividend 106 
Income from discontinued
operations, net of tax 7 
Net income $ 3,579 
Capital investments expenditures
and acquisitions $ 7,653 $ 1,271 $ 543 $ 9,467 $ 285 $ — $ 9,752 
Segment assets 143,841 15,179 6,977 165,997 3,590 — 169,587 
(a)    Electric Utilities and Infrastructure includes $160 million of expense recorded within Impairment of assets and other charges, $77 million of
income within Other Income and expenses, $5 million of expense within Operations, maintenance and other, $13 million of income within
regulated operating revenues, $3 million of expense within interest expense and $6 million of expense within Depreciation and amortization
on the Duke Energy Carolinas' Consolidated Statement of Operations related to the South Carolina Supreme Court decision on coal ash
and insurance proceeds; it also includes $42 million of expense recorded within Impairment of assets and other charges, $34 million of
income within Other Income and expenses, $7 million of expense within Operations, maintenance, and other, $15 million of income within
Regulated electric operating revenues, $5 million of expense within interest expense and $1 million of expense within Depreciation and
amortization on the Duke Energy Progress' Consolidated Statement of Operations. See Notes 3 and 4 for more information.
(b)    Gas Utilities and Infrastructure includes $20 million, recorded within Equity in earnings (losses) of unconsolidated affiliates on the Consolidated
Statements of Operations, related to natural gas pipeline investments. See Note 3 for additional information.
(c)    Commercial Renewables includes a $35 million loss related to Texas Storm Uri of which ($8 million) is recorded within Nonregulated electric and
other revenues, $2 million within Operations, maintenance and other, $29 million within Equity in earnings (losses) of unconsolidated
affiliates and $12 million within Loss Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests on the Consolidated Statements of Operations. See Note 4 for
additional information.
(d)    Other includes $133 million recorded within Impairment of assets and other charges, $42 million within Operations, maintenance and other, and
$17 million within Depreciation and amortization on the Consolidated Statements of Operations, related to the workplace and workplace
realignment. See Note 10 for additional information.(a)(b)(c)(d)
132
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS BUSINESS SEGMENTS
Year Ended December 31, 2020
Electric Gas Total
Utilities and Utilities and CommercialReportable
(in millions) Infrastructure Infrastructure Renewables Segments Other Eliminations Total
Unaffiliated Revenues $ 21,687 $ 1,653 $ 502 $ 23,842 $ 26 $ — $ 23,868 
Intersegment Revenues 33 95 — 128 71 (199) — 
Total Revenues $ 21,720 $ 1,748 $ 502 $ 23,970 $ 97 $ (199)$ 23,868 
Interest Expense $ 1,320 $ 135 $ 66 $ 1,521 $ 657 $ (16)$ 2,162 
Depreciation and amortization 4,068 258 199 4,525 209 (29) 4,705 
Equity in earnings (losses) of
unconsolidated affiliates (1) (2,017) — (2,018) 13 — (2,005)
Income tax expense (benefit) 340 (349) (65) (74) (162) — (236)
Segment income (loss) 2,669 (1,266) 286 1,689 (426) — 1,263 
Less noncontrolling interest 295 
Add back preferred stock
dividend 107 
Income from discontinued
operations, net of tax 7 
Net income $ 1,082 
Capital investments expenditures
and acquisitions $ 7,629 $ 1,309 $ 1,219 $ 10,157 $ 264 $ — $ 10,421 
Segment assets 138,225 13,849 6,716 158,790 3,598 — 162,388 
(a)    Electric Utilities and Infrastructure includes $948 million of Impairment of assets and other charges and a reversal of $152 million included in
Regulated electric operating revenue related to the CCR Settlement Agreement filed with the NCUC. Additionally, Electric Utilities and
Infrastructure includes $19 million of Impairment of assets and other charges related to the Clemson University Combined Heat and Power
Plant, $5 million of Impairment charges related to the natural gas pipeline assets and $16 million of shareholder contributions within
Operations, maintenance and other related to Duke Energy Carolinas' and Duke Energy Progress' 2019 North Carolina rate cases. See
Note 3 for additional information.
(b)    Gas Utilities and Infrastructure includes $2.1 billion recorded within Equity in (losses) earnings of unconsolidated affiliates and $7 million of
Impairment of assets and other charges related to natural gas pipeline investments. See Notes 3 and 12 for additional information.
(c)    Other includes a $98 million reversal of 2018 severance costs due to a partial settlement in the Duke Energy Carolinas' 2019 North Carolina rate
case. See Note 20 for additional information.
Year Ended December 31, 2019
Electric Gas Total
Utilities and Utilities and CommercialReportable
(in millions) Infrastructure InfrastructureRenewables Segments OtherEliminations Total
Unaffiliated Revenues $ 22,798 $ 1,770 $ 487 $ 25,055 $ 24 $ — $25,079 
Intersegment Revenues 33 96 — 129 71 (200) — 
Total Revenues $ 22,831 $ 1,866 $ 487 $ 25,184 $ 95 $ (200)$25,079 
Interest Expense $ 1,345 $ 117 $ 95 $ 1,557 $705 $ (58)$ 2,204 
Depreciation and amortization 3,951 256 168 4,375 178 (5) 4,548 
Equity in earnings (losses) of
unconsolidated affiliates 9 114 (4) 119 43 — 162 
Income tax expense (benefit) 785 22 (115) 692 (173) — 519 
Segment income (loss) 3,536 432 198 4,166 (452) — 3,714 
Less noncontrolling interest 177 
Add back preferred stock
dividend 41 
Loss from discontinued
operations, net of tax (7)
Net income $ 3,571 
Capital investments
expenditures and acquisitions$ 8,263 $ 1,539 $ 1,423 $ 11,225 $221 $ — $11,446 
Segment assets 135,561 13,921 6,020 155,502 3,148 188 158,838 
(a)    Electric Utilities and Infrastructure includes a $27 million reduction of a prior year impairment at Citrus County CC related to the plant's cost cap.
(b)    Gas Utilities and Infrastructure includes an after-tax impairment charge of $19 million for the remaining investment in Constitution. See Note 12
for additional information.
Geographical Information
Substantially all assets and revenues from continuing operations are within the U.S.(a)(b)(c)
(a)(b)
133
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS BUSINESS SEGMENTS
Major Customers
For the year ended December 31, 2021, revenues from one customer of Duke Energy Progress are $586 million. Duke Energy Progress has one
reportable segment, Electric Utilities and Infrastructure. No other Subsidiary Registrant has an individual customer representing more than 10% of its
revenues.
Products and Services
The following table summarizes revenues of the reportable segments by type.
Retail Wholesale Retail Total
(in millions) Electric Electric Natural Gas Other Revenues
2021
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure $ 19,410 $ 2,216 $ — $ 977 $ 22,603 
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure — — 2,025 87 2,112 
Commercial Renewables — 411 — 65 476 
Total Reportable Segments $ 19,410 $ 2,627 $ 2,025 $ 1,129 $ 25,191 
2020
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure $ 18,898 $ 1,878 $ — $ 944 $ 21,720 
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure — — 1,691 57 1,748 
Commercial Renewables — 434 — 68 502 
Total Reportable Segments $ 18,898 $ 2,312 $ 1,691 $ 1,069 $ 23,970 
2019
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure $ 19,745 $ 2,231 $ — $ 855 $ 22,831 
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure — — 1,782 84 1,866 
Commercial Renewables — 389 — 98 487 
Total Reportable Segments $ 19,745 $ 2,620 $ 1,782 $ 1,037 $ 25,184 
Duke Energy Ohio
Duke Energy Ohio has two reportable segments, Electric Utilities and Infrastructure and Gas Utilities and Infrastructure.
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure transmits and distributes electricity in portions of Ohio and generates, distributes and sells electricity in portions of
Northern Kentucky. Gas Utilities and Infrastructure transports and sells natural gas in portions of Ohio and Northern Kentucky. Both reportable
segments conduct operations primarily through Duke Energy Ohio and its wholly owned subsidiary, Duke Energy Kentucky. The remainder of Duke
Energy Ohio's operations is presented as Other.
All Duke Energy Ohio assets and revenues from continuing operations are within the U.S.
Year Ended December 31, 2021
Electric Gas Total
Utilities and Utilities and Reportable
(in millions) Infrastructure Infrastructure Segments Other Eliminations Total
Total revenues $ 1,493 $ 544 $ 2,037 $ — $ — $ 2,037 
Interest expense $ 87 $ 24 $ 111 $ — $ — $ 111 
Depreciation and amortization 217 90 307 — — 307 
Income tax expense (benefit) 15 19 34 (4) — 30 
Segment income (loss)/Net income 141 78 219 (15) — 204 
Capital expenditures $ 486 $ 362 $ 848 $ — $ — $ 848 
Segment assets 6,882 3,892 10,774 29 (29) 10,774 
Year Ended December 31, 2020
Electric Gas Total
Utilities and Utilities and Reportable
(in millions) Infrastructure Infrastructure Segments Other Eliminations Total
Total revenues $ 1,405 $ 453 $ 1,858 $ — $ — $ 1,858 
Interest expense $ 85 $ 17 $ 102 $ — $ — $ 102 
Depreciation and amortization 200 78 278 — — 278 
Income tax expense (benefit) 19 26 45 (2) — 43 
Segment income (loss)/Net Income 162 96 258 (6) — 252 
Capital expenditures $ 548 $ 286 $ 834 $ — $ — $ 834 
Segment assets 6,615 3,380 9,995 32 (2) 10,025 
134
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS BUSINESS SEGMENTS
Year Ended December 31, 2019
Electric Gas Total
Utilities and Utilities and Reportable
(in millions) Infrastructure Infrastructure Segments Other Eliminations Total
Total revenues $ 1,456 $ 484 $ 1,940 $ — $ — $ 1,940 
Interest expense $ 80 $ 29 $ 109 $ — $ — $ 109 
Depreciation and amortization 182 83 265 — — 265 
Income tax expense (benefit) 20 21 41 (1) — 40 
Segment income (loss) 159 85 244 (5) — 239 
Loss from discontinued operations,
net of tax (1)
Net income $ 238 
Capital expenditures $ 680 $ 272 $ 952 $ — $ — $ 952 
Segment assets 6,188 3,116 9,304 34 — 9,338 
3. REGULATORY MATTERS
REGULATORY ASSETS AND LIABILITIES
The Duke Energy Registrants record regulatory assets and liabilities that result from the ratemaking process. See Note 1 for further information.
135
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
The following tables present the regulatory assets and liabilities recorded on the Consolidated Balance Sheets of Duke Energy and Progress Energy.
See separate tables below for balances by individual registrant.
Duke Energy Progress Energy
December 31, December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 2021 2020
Regulatory Assets
AROs – coal ash $ 3,408 $ 3,408 $ 1,399 $ 1,357 
AROs – nuclear and other 684 754 620 685 
Accrued pension and OPEB 2,017 2,317 725 875 
Deferred fuel and purchased power 1,253 213 718 162 
Storm cost securitized balance, net 991 — 759 — 
Nuclear asset securitized balance, net 937 991 937 991 
Debt fair value adjustment 884 950 — — 
Retired generation facilities 357 417 265 363 
Post-in-service carrying costs (PISCC) and deferred operating expenses 356 397 47 51 
Hedge costs deferrals 348 351 137 148 
Deferred asset – Lee and Harris COLA 317 356 21 32 
Advanced metering infrastructure (AMI) 311 311 130 102 
Customer connect project 242 136 124 55 
Demand side management (DSM)/Energy efficiency (EE) 235 242 230 241 
Vacation accrual 221 221 42 42 
Storm cost deferrals 213 1,102 189 893 
NCEMPA deferrals 165 124 165 124 
CEP deferral 161 117 — — 
Derivatives – natural gas supply contracts 139 122 — — 
COR settlement 123 128 32 33 
Nuclear deferral 120 123 42 35 
Deferred pipeline integrity costs 108 92 — — 
Costs of removal regulatory asset 107 — 107 — 
Manufactured gas plant (MGP) 104 104 — — 
Qualifying facility contract buyouts 94 107 94 107 
ABSAT, coal ash basin closure 90 98 23 27 
Incremental COVID-19 expenses 87 76 28 23 
Amounts due from customers 85 110 — — 
Deferred severance charges 54 86 18 29 
Other 426 609 87 158 
Total regulatory assets 14,637 14,062 6,939 6,533 
Less: current portion 2,150 1,641 1,030 758 
Total noncurrent regulatory assets $12,487 $12,421 $ 5,909 $ 5,775 
Regulatory Liabilities
Net regulatory liability related to income taxes $ 7,199 $ 7,368 $ 2,394 $ 2,411 
Costs of removal 6,150 5,883 2,955 2,666 
AROs – nuclear and other 2,053 1,512 — — 
Provision for rate refunds 274 344 87 123 
Hedge cost deferrals 271 24 117 8 
Accrued pension and OPEB 213 177 — — 
Other 1,203 1,098 491 483 
Total regulatory liabilities 17,363 16,406 6,044 5,691 
Less: current portion 1,211 1,377 478 640 
Total noncurrent regulatory liabilities $16,152 $15,029 $ 5,566 $ 5,051 
Descriptions of regulatory assets and liabilities summarized in the tables above and below follow. See tables below for recovery and amortization
periods at the separate registrants.
AROs – coal ash. Represents deferred depreciation and accretion related to the legal obligation to close ash basins. The costs are deferred until
recovery treatment has been determined. See Notes 1 and 9 for additional information.
136
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
AROs – nuclear and other. Represents regulatory assets or liabilities, including deferred depreciation and accretion, related to legal obligations
associated with the future retirement of property, plant and equipment, excluding amounts related to coal ash. The AROs relate primarily to
decommissioning nuclear power facilities. The amounts also include certain deferred gains and losses on NDTF investments. See Notes 1 and 9 for
additional information.
Accrued pension and OPEB. Accrued pension and OPEB represent regulatory assets and liabilities related to each of the Duke Energy Registrants’
respective shares of unrecognized actuarial gains and losses and unrecognized prior service cost and credit attributable to Duke Energy’s pension
plans and OPEB plans. The regulatory asset or liability is amortized with the recognition of actuarial gains and losses and prior service cost and
credit to net periodic benefit costs for pension and OPEB plans. The accrued pension and OPEB regulatory assets are expected to be recovered
primarily over the average remaining service periods or life expectancies of employees covered by the benefit plans. See Note 22 for additional
detail.
Deferred fuel and purchased power. Represents certain energy-related costs that are recoverable or refundable as approved by the applicable
regulatory body.
Storm cost securitized balance, net. Represents the North Carolina portion of storm restoration expenditures related to Hurricane Florence,
Hurricane Michael, Hurricane Dorian and Winter Storm Diego (2018 and 2019 events).
Nuclear asset securitized balance, net. Represents the balance associated with Crystal River Unit 3 retirement approved for recovery by the FPSC
on September 15, 2015, and the upfront financing costs securitized in 2016 with issuance of the associated bonds. The regulatory asset balance is
net of the AFUDC equity portion.
Debt fair value adjustment. Purchase accounting adjustments recorded to state the carrying value of Progress Energy and Piedmont at fair value in
connection with the 2012 and 2016 mergers, respectively. Amount is amortized over the life of the related debt.
Retired generation facilities. Represents amounts to be recovered for facilities that have been retired and are probable of recovery.
Post-in-service carrying costs (PISCC) and deferred operating expenses. Represents deferred depreciation and operating expenses as well as
carrying costs on the portion of capital expenditures placed in service but not yet reflected in retail rates as plant in service.
Hedge costs deferrals. Amounts relate to unrealized gains and losses on derivatives recorded as a regulatory asset or liability, respectively, until the
contracts are settled.
Deferred asset – Lee and Harris COLA. Represents deferred costs incurred for the canceled Lee and Harris nuclear projects.
AMI. Represents deferred costs related to the installation of AMI meters and remaining net book value of non-AMI meters to be replaced at Duke
Energy Carolinas, net book value of existing meters at Duke Energy Florida, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Ohio and future recovery of net
book value of electromechanical meters that have been replaced with AMI meters at Duke Energy Indiana.
Customer connect project. Represents incremental operating expenses and carrying costs on deferred amounts related to the deployment of the
new customer information system.
DSM/EE. Deferred costs related to various DSM and EE programs recoverable through various mechanisms.
Vacation accrual. Represents vacation entitlement, which is generally recovered in the following year.
Storm cost deferrals. Represents deferred incremental costs incurred related to major weather-related events.
NCEMPA deferrals. Represents retail allocated cost deferrals and returns associated with the additional ownership interest in assets acquired from
NCEMPA in 2015.
CEP deferral. Represents deferred depreciation, PISCC and deferred property tax for Duke Energy Ohio Gas capital assets for the Capital
Expenditure Program (CEP).
Derivatives – natural gas supply contracts. Represents costs for certain long-dated, fixed quantity forward natural gas supply contracts, which are
recoverable through PGA clauses.
COR settlement. Represents approved COR settlements that are being amortized over the average remaining lives, at the time of approval, of the
associated assets.
Nuclear deferral. Includes amounts related to levelizing nuclear plant outage costs, which allows for the recognition of nuclear outage expenses over
the refueling cycle rather than when the outage occurs, resulting in the deferral of operations and maintenance costs associated with refueling.
Deferred pipeline integrity costs. Represents pipeline integrity management costs in compliance with federal regulations.
Costs of removal regulatory asset. Represents the excess of spend over funds received from customers to cover the future removal of property,
plant and equipment from retired or abandoned sites as property is retired, net of certain deferred gains on NDTF investments.
MGP. Represents remediation costs incurred at former MGP sites and the deferral of costs to be incurred at Duke Energy Ohio's East End and West
End sites.
Qualifying facility contract buyouts. Represents termination payments for regulatory recovery through the capacity clause.
ABSAT, coal ash basin closure. Represents deferred depreciation and returns associated with Ash Basin Strategic Action Team (ABSAT) capital
assets related to converting the ash handling system from wet to dry.
137
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
Incremental COVID-19 expenses. Represents incremental costs related to ensuring continuity and quality of service in a safe manner during the
COVID-19 pandemic.
Amounts due from customers. Relates primarily to margin decoupling and IMR recovery mechanisms.
Deferred severance charges. Represents costs incurred for employees separation from Duke Energy.
Net regulatory liability related to income taxes. Amounts for all registrants include regulatory liabilities related primarily to impacts from the Tax
Act. See Note 23 for additional information. Amounts have no immediate impact on rate base as regulatory assets are offset by deferred tax liabilities.
Costs of removal. Represents funds received from customers to cover the future removal of property, plant and equipment from retired or
abandoned sites as property is retired. Also includes certain deferred gains on NDTF investments.
Provision for rate refunds. Represents estimated amounts due to customers based on recording interim rates subject to refund.
Amounts to be refunded to customers. Represents required rate reductions to retail customers by the applicable regulatory body.
RESTRICTIONS ON THE ABILITY OF CERTAIN SUBSIDIARIES TO MAKE DIVIDENDS, ADVANCES AND LOANS TO DUKE ENERGY
As a condition to the approval of merger transactions, the NCUC, PSCSC, PUCO, KPSC and IURC imposed conditions on the ability of Duke Energy
Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Ohio, Duke Energy Kentucky, Duke Energy Indiana and Piedmont to transfer funds to Duke Energy
through loans or advances, as well as restricted amounts available to pay dividends to Duke Energy. Certain subsidiaries may transfer funds to the
Parent by obtaining approval of the respective state regulatory commissions. These conditions imposed restrictions on the ability of the public utility
subsidiaries to pay cash dividends as discussed below.
Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida also have restrictions imposed by their first mortgage bond indentures, which in certain
circumstances, limit their ability to make cash dividends or distributions on common stock. Amounts restricted as a result of these provisions were not
material at December 31, 2021.
Duke Energy Indiana has certain dividend restrictions as a result of the minority interest investment agreement entered in January 2021 with GIC.
Duke Energy Indiana will declare dividends before the second closing, which is required to be completed no later than January 2023, in accordance
with the agreement. See additional information in Note 1.
Additionally, certain other subsidiaries of Duke Energy have restrictions on their ability to dividend, loan or advance funds to Duke Energy due to
specific legal or regulatory restrictions, including, but not limited to, minimum working capital and tangible net worth requirements.
The restrictions discussed below were not a material amount of Duke Energy's and Progress Energy's net assets at December 31, 2021.
Duke Energy Carolinas
Duke Energy Carolinas must limit cumulative distributions subsequent to mergers to (i) the amount of retained earnings on the day prior to the closing
of the mergers, plus (ii) any future earnings recorded.
Duke Energy Progress
Duke Energy Progress must limit cumulative distributions subsequent to the mergers between Duke Energy and Progress Energy and Duke Energy
and Piedmont to (i) the amount of retained earnings on the day prior to the closing of the respective mergers, plus (ii) any future earnings recorded.
Duke Energy Ohio
Duke Energy Ohio will not declare and pay dividends out of capital or unearned surplus without the prior authorization of the PUCO. Duke Energy
Ohio received FERC and PUCO approval to pay dividends from its equity accounts that are reflective of the amount that it would have in its retained
earnings account had push-down accounting for the Cinergy merger not been applied to Duke Energy Ohio’s balance sheet. The conditions include a
commitment from Duke Energy Ohio that equity, adjusted to remove the impacts of push-down accounting, will not fall below 30% of total capital.
Duke Energy Kentucky is required to pay dividends solely out of retained earnings and to maintain a minimum of 35% equity in its capital structure.
Duke Energy Indiana
Duke Energy Indiana must limit cumulative distributions subsequent to the merger between Duke Energy and Cinergy to (i) the amount of retained
earnings on the day prior to the closing of the merger, plus (ii) any future earnings recorded. In addition, Duke Energy Indiana will not declare and pay
dividends out of capital or unearned surplus without prior authorization of the IURC.
Piedmont
Piedmont must limit cumulative distributions subsequent to the acquisition of Piedmont by Duke Energy to (i) the amount of retained earnings on the
day prior to the closing of the merger, plus (ii) any future earnings recorded.
RATE-RELATED INFORMATION
The NCUC, PSCSC, FPSC, IURC, PUCO, TPUC and KPSC approve rates for retail electric and natural gas services within their states. The FERC
approves rates for electric sales to wholesale customers served under cost-based rates (excluding Ohio and Indiana), as well as sales of
transmission service. The FERC also regulates certification and siting of new interstate natural gas pipeline projects.
138
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress
2021 Coal Ash Settlement
On January 22, 2021, Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress entered into the Coal Combustion Residuals Settlement Agreement (the
“CCR Settlement Agreement”) with the North Carolina Public Staff (Public Staff), the North Carolina Attorney General’s Office and the Sierra Club
(collectively, the "Settling Parties"), which was filed with the NCUC on January 25, 2021. The CCR Settlement Agreement resolves all coal ash
prudence and cost recovery issues in connection with 2019 rate cases filed by Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress with the NCUC, as
well as the equitable sharing issue on remand from the 2017 Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress North Carolina rate cases as a
result of the December 11, 2020 North Carolina Supreme Court opinion. The settlement also provides clarity on coal ash cost recovery in North
Carolina for Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress through January 2030 and February 2030 (the "Term"), respectively.
Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress agreed not to seek recovery of approximately $1 billion of systemwide deferred coal ash
expenditures, but will retain the ability to earn a debt and equity return during the amortization period, which shall be five years under the 2019 North
Carolina rate cases and will be set by the NCUC in future rate case proceedings. The equity return and the amortization period on deferred coal ash
costs under the 2017 Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress North Carolina rate cases will remain unaffected. The equity return on
deferred coal ash costs under the 2019 North Carolina rate cases and future rate cases in North Carolina will be set at 150 basis points lower than
the authorized return on equity (ROE) then in effect, with a capital structure composed of 48% debt and 52% equity. Duke Energy Carolinas and
Duke Energy Progress retain the ability to earn a full WACC return during the deferral period, which is the period from when costs are incurred until
they are recovered in rates.
The Settling Parties agreed that execution by Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress of a settlement agreement between themselves and
the NCDEQ dated December 31, 2019, (the “DEQ Settlement”) and the coal ash management plans included therein or subsequently approved by
DEQ are reasonable and prudent. The Settling Parties retain the right to challenge the reasonableness and prudence of actions taken by Duke
Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress and costs incurred to implement the scope of work agreed upon in the DEQ Settlement, after February
1, 2020, and March 1, 2020, for Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress, respectively. The Settling Parties further agreed to waive rights
through the Term to challenge the reasonableness or prudence of Duke Energy Carolinas’ and Duke Energy Progress’ historical coal ash
management practices, and to waive the right to assert any arguments that future coal ash costs, including financing costs, shall be shared between
either company and customers through equitable sharing or any other rate base or return adjustment that shares the revenue requirement burden of
coal ash costs not otherwise disallowed due to imprudence.
The Settling Parties agreed to a sharing arrangement for future coal ash insurance litigation proceeds between Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke
Energy Progress and North Carolina customers. For more information, see Note 4 "Commitments and Contingencies."
As a result of the CCR Settlement Agreement, Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress recorded a pretax charge of approximately
$454 million and $494 million, respectively, in the fourth quarter of 2020 to Impairment of assets and other charges and a reversal of approximately
$50 million and $102 million, respectively, to Regulated electric operating revenues on the respective Consolidated Statements of Operations.
The Coal Ash Settlement was approved without modification in the NCUC Orders in the 2019 rate cases on March 31, 2021, and April 16, 2021, for
Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress, respectively. The NCUC issued an Order on Remand Accepting CCR Settlement and Affirming
Previous Orders Settling Rates and Imposing Penalties in the 2017 rate cases on June 25, 2021.
Carbon Plan
The NCUC is required by North Carolina House Bill 951 (HB 951) to adopt an initial Carbon Plan on or before December 31, 2022. The NCUC has
directed Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress to file a proposed Carbon Plan on or before May 16, 2022. Duke Energy Carolinas and
Duke Energy Progress cannot predict the outcome of this matter.
Performance-Based Regulation Rules
On February 10, 2022, the NCUC adopted rules to govern the application and review process for the Performance-Based Regulation (PBR)
authorized under HB 951. The PBR rules are constructive and consistent with the policy objectives of HB 951.
2020 North Carolina Storm Securitization Filings
On October 26, 2020, Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress filed a joint petition with the NCUC, as agreed to in partial settlements
reached in the 2019 North Carolina Rate Cases for Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress, seeking authorization for the financing of the
costs of each utility's storm recovery activities required as a result of Hurricane Florence, Hurricane Michael, Hurricane Dorian and Winter Storm
Diego. Specifically, Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress requested that the NCUC find that their storm recovery costs and related
financing costs are appropriately financed by debt secured by storm recovery property, and that the commission issue financing orders by which each
utility may accomplish such financing using a securitization structure. On January 27, 2021, Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress and the
Public Staff filed an Agreement and Stipulation of Partial Settlement, subject to review and approval of the NCUC, resolving certain accounting
issues, including agreement to support an 18- to 20-year bond period. In the NCUC Orders in the 2019 rate cases issued on March 31, 2021, and
April 16, 2021, for Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress, respectively, the reasonableness and prudence of the deferred storm costs
was approved. On May 20, 2021, the NCUC issued financing orders authorizing the companies to issue storm recovery bonds, subject to the terms
of the financing orders, and approving the Agreement and Stipulation of Partial Settlement in its entirety. The storm recovery bonds were issued by
Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress on November 24, 2021.
139
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
COVID-19 Filings
North Carolina
Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress filed a joint petition on August 7, 2020, with the NCUC for deferral treatment of incremental costs
and the cost of waived customer fees due to the COVID-19 pandemic. On December 29, 2021, the NCUC approved Duke Energy Carolinas' and
Duke Energy Progress' joint petition to defer estimated incremental pandemic-related costs, without prejudice, to the NCUC's future determination of
the appropriate ratemaking treatment ultimately to be accorded such costs in future rate case proceedings.
Duke Energy Carolinas
Regulatory Assets and Liabilities
The following tables present the regulatory assets and liabilities recorded on Duke Energy Carolinas' Consolidated Balance Sheets.
December 31, Earns/PaysRecovery/Refund
(in millions) 2021 2020 a Return Period Ends
Regulatory Assets
AROs – coal ash $ 1,227 $ 1,414 (h) (b)
Accrued pension and OPEB 365 427 Yes (i)
Deferred fuel and purchased power 339 42 (e) 2023
Storm cost securitized balance, net 232 — 2041
Retired generation facilities 54 11 Yes 2023
PISCC 31 32 Yes (b)
Hedge costs deferrals 171 174 Yes (b)
Deferred asset – Lee COLA 296 324 (b)
AMI 140 154 Yes (b)
Customer connect project 66 50 Yes (b)
Vacation accrual 83 84 2022
Storm cost deferrals 22 205 Yes (b)
COR settlement 91 95 Yes (b)
Nuclear deferral 78 88 2023
ABSAT, coal ash basin closure 67 71 Yes (b)
Incremental COVID-19 expenses 51 31 Yes (b)
Deferred severance charges 36 57 2023
Other 130 210 (b)
Total regulatory assets 3,479 3,469 
Less: current portion 544 473 
Total noncurrent regulatory assets $ 2,935 $ 2,996 
Regulatory Liabilities
Net regulatory liability related to income taxes $ 2,785 $ 2,874 (b)
Costs of removal 2,009 1,975 Yes (f)
AROs – nuclear and other 2,053 1,512 (b)
Provision for rate refunds 124 170 Yes
Hedge cost deferrals 154 16 (b)
Accrued pension and OPEB 44 32 Yes (i)
Other 516 429 (b)
Total regulatory liabilities 7,685 7,008 
Less: current portion 487 473 
Total noncurrent regulatory liabilities $ 7,198 $ 6,535 
(a)    Regulatory assets and liabilities are excluded from rate base unless otherwise noted.
(b)    The expected recovery or refund period varies or has not been determined.
(c)     Included in rate base.
(d)    Includes regulatory liabilities related to the change in the federal tax rate as a result of the Tax Act and the change in the North Carolina tax rate,
both discussed in Note 23. Portions are included in rate base.
(e)    Pays interest on over-recovered costs in North Carolina. Includes certain purchased power costs in North Carolina and South Carolina and
costs of distributed energy in South Carolina.
(f)    Recovered over the life of the associated assets.
(g)    Includes incentives on DSM/EE investments and is recovered through an annual rider mechanism.
(h)    Earns a debt and equity return on coal ash expenditures for North Carolina and South Carolina retail customers as permitted by various
regulatory orders.
(i)    Recovered primarily over the average remaining service periods or life expectancies of employees covered by the benefit plans. See Note 22 for
additional detail.(a)
(c)
(c)
(c)
(c)
(a)
(d)
(c)
(c)
(c)
140
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
2017 North Carolina Rate Case
On August 25, 2017, Duke Energy Carolinas filed an application with the NCUC for a rate increase for retail customers of approximately $647 million.
On February 28, 2018, Duke Energy Carolinas and the Public Staff filed an Agreement and Stipulation of Partial Settlement resolving certain portions
of the proceeding. Terms of the settlement included an ROE of 9.9% and a capital structure of 52% equity and 48% debt. On June 22, 2018, the
NCUC issued an order approving the Stipulation of Partial Settlement and requiring a revenue reduction.
The North Carolina Attorney General and other parties separately filed Notices of Appeal to the North Carolina Supreme Court. The North Carolina
Supreme Court consolidated the Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress appeals. On December 11, 2020, the North Carolina Supreme
Court issued an opinion, which affirmed, in part, and reversed and remanded, in part, the NCUC’s decisions. In the Opinion, the court upheld the
NCUC's decision to include coal ash costs in the cost of service, as well as the NCUC’s discretion to allow a return on the unamortized balance of
coal ash costs. The court also remanded to the NCUC a single issue to consider the assessment of support for the Public Staff’s equitable sharing
argument. On January 22, 2021, Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress entered into the CCR Settlement Agreement with the Settling
Parties, which was filed with the NCUC on January 25, 2021, and approved by the NCUC on March 31, 2021. The NCUC issued an Order on
Remand Accepting CCR Settlement and Affirming Previous Orders Setting Rates and Imposing Penalties on June 25, 2021.
2019 North Carolina Rate Case
On September 30, 2019, Duke Energy Carolinas filed an application with the NCUC for a net rate increase for retail customers of approximately $291
million, which represented an approximate 6% increase in annual base revenues. The gross rate case revenue increase request was $445 million,
which was offset by an EDIT rider of $154 million to return to customers North Carolina and federal EDIT resulting from recent reductions in corporate
tax rates. The request for a rate increase was driven by major capital investments subsequent to the previous base rate case, coal ash pond closure
costs, accelerated coal plant depreciation and deferred 2018 storm costs. Duke Energy Carolinas requested rates be effective no later than August 1,
2020.
On March 25, 2020, Duke Energy Carolinas and the Public Staff filed an Agreement and Stipulation of Partial Settlement, subject to review and
approval of the NCUC, resolving certain issues in the base rate proceeding. On July 24, 2020, Duke Energy Carolinas filed its request for approval of
its notice to customers required to implement temporary rates. On July 27, 2020, Duke Energy Carolinas filed a joint motion with Duke Energy
Progress and the Public Staff notifying the commission that the parties reached a joint partial settlement with the Public Staff. Also, on July 27, 2020,
Duke Energy Carolinas filed a letter stating that it intended to update its temporary rates calculation to reflect the terms of the partial settlement. On
July 31, 2020, Duke Energy Carolinas and the Public Staff filed a Second Agreement and Stipulation of Partial Settlement (Second Partial
Settlement), subject to review and approval of the NCUC, resolving certain remaining issues in the base rate proceeding. The remaining items
litigated at hearing included recovery of deferred coal ash compliance costs that are subject to asset retirement obligation accounting, implementation
of new depreciation rates and the amortization period of the loss on the hydro station sale.
On August 4, 2020, Duke Energy Carolinas filed an amended motion for approval of its amended notice to customers, seeking to exercise its
statutory right to implement temporary rates subject to refund on or after August 24, 2020. The revenue requirement to be recovered, subject to
refund, through the temporary rates was based on and consistent with the base rate component of the Second Partial Settlement and excluded the
items to be litigated noted above. The NCUC approved the August 4, 2020 amended temporary rates motion on August 6, 2020, and temporary rates
went into effect on August 24, 2020.
The Duke Energy Carolinas evidentiary hearing concluded on September 18, 2020, and post-hearing filings were made with the NCUC from all
parties by November 4, 2020. On January 22, 2021, Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress entered into the CCR Settlement Agreement
with the Settling Parties, which was filed with the NCUC on January 25, 2021.
On March 31, 2021, the NCUC issued an order approving the March 25, 2020, and July 31, 2020, partial settlements. The order includes approval of
1) an ROE of 9.6% based upon a capital structure of 52% equity and 48% debt; 2) deferral treatment of approximately $800 million of grid
improvement projects with a return; 3) a flow back period of five years for unprotected federal EDIT; and 4) the reasonableness and prudence of
$213 million of deferred storm costs, which were removed from the rate case and for which Duke Energy Carolinas filed a petition seeking
securitization in October 2020. Additionally, the order approved without modification the CCR Settlement Agreement.
The order denied Duke Energy Carolinas' proposal to shorten the remaining depreciable lives of certain Duke Energy Carolinas coal-fired generating
units, indicating the NCUC has not had the chance to fully examine the issue within the context of an integrated resource planning (IRP) proceeding,
and upon retirement the remaining net book value of these units should be placed in a regulatory asset account to be amortized over an appropriate
period to be determined in a future rate case.
On May 21, 2021, the NCUC issued an Order Approving Rate Schedules, which resulted in a net increase of approximately $33 million. Revised
customer rates became effective on June 1, 2021.
2018 South Carolina Rate Case
On November 8, 2018, Duke Energy Carolinas filed an application with the PSCSC for a rate increase for retail customers of approximately $168
million.
After hearings in March 2019, the PSCSC issued an order on May 21, 2019, which included an ROE of 9.5% and a capital structure of 53% equity
and 47% debt. The order also included the following material components:
• Approval of cancellation of the Lee Nuclear Project, with Duke Energy Carolinas maintaining the combined operating license;
• Approval of recovery of $125 million (South Carolina retail portion) of Lee Nuclear Project development costs (including AFUDC through
December 2017) over a 12-year period, but denial of a return on the deferred balance of costs;
• Approval of recovery of $96 million of coal ash costs over a five-year period with a return at Duke Energy Carolinas' WACC;
141
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
• Denial of recovery of $115 million of certain coal ash costs deemed to be related to the Coal Ash Act and incremental to the federal CCR
rule;
• Approval of a $66 million decrease to base rates to reflect the change in ongoing tax expense, primarily the reduction in the federal income
tax rate from 35% to 21%;
• Approval of a $45 million decrease through the EDIT Rider to return EDIT resulting from the federal tax rate change and deferred revenues
since January 2018 related to the change, to be returned in accordance with the Average Rate Assumption Method (ARAM) for protected
EDIT, over a 20-year period for unprotected EDIT associated with Property, Plant and Equipment, over a five-year period for unprotected
EDIT not associated with Property, Plant and Equipment and over a five-year period for the deferred revenues; and
• Approval of a $17 million decrease through the EDIT Rider related to reductions in the North Carolina state income tax rate from 6.9% to
2.5% to be returned over a five-year period.
As a result of the order, revised customer rates were effective June 1, 2019. On May 31, 2019, Duke Energy Carolinas filed a Petition for Rehearing
or Reconsideration of that order contending substantial rights of Duke Energy Carolinas were prejudiced by unlawful, arbitrary and capricious rulings
by the PSCSC on certain issues presented in the proceeding. On June 19, 2019, the PSCSC issued a directive denying Duke Energy Carolinas'
request to rehear or reconsider the commission's rulings on certain issues presented in the proceeding including coal ash remediation and disposal
costs, ROE and the recovery of a return on deferred operation and maintenance expenses. An order detailing the commission's decision in the
directive was issued on October 18, 2019. Duke Energy Carolinas filed a notice of appeal on November 15, 2019, with the Supreme Court of South
Carolina. On November 20, 2019, the South Carolina Energy Users Committee filed a Notice of Appeal with the Supreme Court of South Carolina.
Initial briefs were filed on April 21, 2020, which included the South Carolina Energy User's Committee brief arguing that the PSCSC erred in allowing
Duke Energy Carolinas' recovery of costs related to the Lee Nuclear Station. Response briefs were filed on July 6, 2020, and reply briefs were filed
on August 11, 2020. Oral arguments were heard before the Supreme Court of South Carolina on May 26, 2021.
On October 27, 2021, the Supreme Court of South Carolina affirmed the PSCSC's May 2019 order to:
• Disallow cost recovery on certain CCR compliance costs the PSCSC deemed to be incremental to the federal CCR rules;
• Disallow recovery of certain coal ash insurance litigation expenses;
• Disallow a return on certain deferred expenses; and
• Allow recovery of Lee Nuclear Project preconstruction costs.
The Supreme Court of South Carolinas' decision notes the prior determination made by the PSCSC that Duke Energy could submit coal ash costs for
recovery that were not initially approved in the rate case order if such costs can be attributed to the CCR rules. As a result of the court's opinion,
Duke Energy Carolinas recognized a pretax charge of approximately $160 million to Impairment of assets and other charges, and a $31 million
increase in Other income and expenses, net in the Consolidated Statements of Operations for the year ended December 31, 2021, principally related
to coal ash remediation at retired coal ash basin sites. On November 29, 2021, Duke Energy Carolinas filed a petition for rehearing on several
grounds, including the Supreme Court of South Carolinas’ decision on coal ash cost recovery and certain deferred expenses. On February 1, 2022,
the Supreme Court of South Carolina denied the petition for rehearing.
Oconee Nuclear Station Subsequent License Renewal
On June 7, 2021, Duke Energy Carolinas filed a subsequent license renewal application for the Oconee Nuclear Station (ONS) with the U.S. Nuclear
Regulatory Commission (NRC) to renew ONS’s operating license for an additional 20 years. The subsequent license renewal would extend
operations of the facility from 60 to 80 years. The current license for units 1 and 2 expire in 2033 and the license for unit 3 expires in 2034. By a
Federal Register Notice dated July 28, 2021, the NRC provided a 60-day comment period for persons whose interest may be affected by the
issuance of a subsequent renewed license for ONS to file a request for a hearing and a petition for leave to intervene. On September 27, 2021,
Beyond Nuclear and Sierra Club (Petitioners) filed a Hearing Request and Petition to Intervene (Hearing Request) and a Petition for Waiver. The
Hearing Request proposed three contentions purporting to challenge Duke Energy Carolinas’ environmental report (ER). In general, the proposed
contentions claimed that the ER did not consider certain information regarding the environmental aspects of severe accidents caused by a
hypothetical failure of the Jocassee Dam, and therefore did not satisfy the National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA) of 1969, as amended, or the
NRC’s NEPA-implementing regulations. Duke Energy Carolinas filed its answer to the proposed contentions on October 22, 2021, and the Petitioners
filed their reply to Duke Energy Carolinas’ answer on November 5, 2021. On February 11, 2022, the Atomic Safety and Licensing Board (ASLB)
issued its decision on the Hearing Request and found that the Petitioners failed to establish that the proposed contentions are litigable. The ASLB
also denied the Petitioners' Petition for Waiver and terminated the proceeding.
Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress intend to seek renewal of operating licenses and 20-year license extensions for all of their nuclear
stations. New depreciation rates were implemented for all of the nuclear facilities during the second quarter of 2021. Duke Energy Carolinas and
Duke Energy Progress cannot predict the outcome of this matter.
142
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
Duke Energy Progress
Regulatory Assets and Liabilities
The following tables present the regulatory assets and liabilities recorded on Duke Energy Progress' Consolidated Balance Sheets.
December 31, Earns/PaysRecovery/Refund
(in millions) 2021 2020 a Return Period Ends
Regulatory Assets
AROs – coal ash $ 1,389 $ 1,347 (h) (b)
AROs – nuclear and other 613 683 (c)
Accrued pension and OPEB 351 393 (k)
Deferred fuel and purchased power 303 158 (f) 2023
Storm cost securitized balance, net 759 — 2041
Retired generation facilities 171 189 Yes (b)
PISCC and deferred operating expenses 47 51 Yes 2054
Hedge costs deferrals 60 89 (b)
Deferred asset – Harris COLA 21 32 (b)
AMI 92 57 Yes (b)
Customer connect project 57 25 Yes (b)
DSM/EE 218 224 (i) (i)
Vacation accrual 42 42 2022
Storm cost deferrals 170 785 Yes (b)
NCEMPA deferrals 165 124 (g) 2042
COR settlement 32 33 Yes (b)
Nuclear deferral 42 35 2023
ABSAT, coal ash basin closure 23 27 Yes (b)
Incremental COVID-19 expenses 28 23 Yes (b)
Deferred severance charges 18 29 2023
Other 50 122 (b)
Total regulatory assets 4,651 4,468 
Less: current portion 533 492 
Total noncurrent regulatory assets $ 4,118 $ 3,976 
Regulatory Liabilities
Net regulatory liability related to income taxes $ 1,695 $ 1,662 (b)
Costs of removal 2,955 2,666 Yes (j)
Provision for rate refunds 87 123 Yes
Hedge cost deferrals 117 8 (b)
Other 395 465 (b)
Total regulatory liabilities 5,249 4,924 
Less: current portion 381 530 
Total noncurrent regulatory liabilities $ 4,868 $ 4,394 
(a)    Regulatory assets and liabilities are excluded from rate base unless otherwise noted.
(b)    The expected recovery or refund period varies or has not been determined.
(c)    Recovery period for costs related to nuclear facilities runs through the decommissioning period of each unit.
(d)    South Carolina storm costs are included in rate base.
(e)    Included in rate base.
(f)    Pays interest on over-recovered costs in North Carolina. Includes certain purchased power costs in North Carolina and South Carolina and costs
of distributed energy in South Carolina.
(g)    South Carolina retail allocated costs are earning a return.
(h)    Earns a debt and equity return on coal ash expenditures for North Carolina and South Carolina retail customers as permitted by various
regulatory orders.
(i)    Includes incentives on DSM/EE investments and is recovered through an annual rider mechanism.
(j)    Recovered over the life of the associated assets.
(k)    Recovered primarily over the average remaining service periods or life expectancies of employees covered by the benefit plans. See Note 22 for
additional detail.
(l)    Includes regulatory liabilities related to the change in the federal tax rate as a result of the Tax Act and the change in the North Carolina tax rate,
both discussed in Note 23. Portions are included in rate base.(a)
(e)
(d)
(a)
(l)
143
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
2017 North Carolina Rate Case
On June 1, 2017, Duke Energy Progress filed an application with the NCUC for a rate increase for retail customers of approximately $477 million,
which was subsequently adjusted to $420 million. On November 22, 2017, Duke Energy Progress and the Public Staff filed an Agreement and
Stipulation of Partial Settlement resolving certain portions of the proceeding. Terms of the settlement included an ROE of 9.9% and a capital structure
of 52% equity and 48% debt. On February 23, 2018, the NCUC issued an order approving the stipulation. The Public Staff, the North Carolina
Attorney General and the Sierra Club filed notices of appeal to the North Carolina Supreme Court.
The North Carolina Supreme Court consolidated the Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress appeals. On December 11, 2020, the North
Carolina Supreme Court issued an opinion, which affirmed, in part, and reversed and remanded, in part, the NCUC’s decisions. In the Opinion, the
court upheld the NCUC's decision to include coal ash costs in the cost of service, as well as the NCUC’s discretion to allow a return on the
unamortized balance of coal ash costs. The court also remanded to the NCUC a single issue to consider the assessment of support for the Public
Staff’s equitable sharing argument. On January 22, 2021, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Carolinas entered into the CCR Settlement
Agreement with the Settling Parties, which was filed with the NCUC on January 25, 2021, and approved by the NCUC on April 16, 2021. The NCUC
issued an Order on Remand Accepting CCR Settlement and Affirming Previous Orders Setting Rates and Imposing Penalties on June 25, 2021.
2019 North Carolina Rate Case
On October 30, 2019, Duke Energy Progress filed an application with the NCUC for a net rate increase for retail customers of approximately $464
million, which represented an approximate 12.3% increase in annual base revenues. The gross rate case revenue increase request was $586 million,
which was offset by riders of $122 million, primarily an EDIT rider of $120 million to return to customers North Carolina and federal EDIT resulting
from recent reductions in corporate tax rates. The request for a rate increase was driven by major capital investments subsequent to the previous
base rate case, coal ash pond closure costs, accelerated coal plant depreciation and deferred 2018 storm costs. Duke Energy Progress sought to
defer and recover incremental Hurricane Dorian storm costs in this proceeding and requested rates be effective no later than September 1, 2020. As
a result of the COVID-19 pandemic, on March 24, 2020, the NCUC suspended the procedural schedule and postponed the previously scheduled
evidentiary hearing on this matter indefinitely.
On June 2, 2020, Duke Energy Progress and the Public Staff filed an Agreement and Stipulation of Partial Settlement, subject to review and approval
of the NCUC, resolving certain issues in the base rate proceeding. On July 27, 2020, Duke Energy Progress filed a joint motion with Duke Energy
Carolinas and the Public Staff notifying the commission that the parties reached a joint partial settlement with the Public Staff. On July 31, 2020, Duke
Energy Progress and the Public Staff filed a Second Agreement and Stipulation of Partial Settlement, subject to review and approval of the NCUC,
resolving certain remaining issues in the base rate proceeding. The remaining items litigated at hearing included recovery of deferred coal ash
compliance costs that are subject to asset retirement obligation accounting and implementation of new depreciation rates.
On August 7, 2020, Duke Energy Progress filed a motion for approval of notice required to implement temporary rates, seeking to exercise its
statutory right to implement temporary rates subject to refund on or after September 1, 2020. The revenue requirement to be recovered subject to
refund through the temporary rates was based on and consistent with the terms of the base rate component of the settlement agreements with the
Public Staff and excluded items to be litigated noted above. In addition, Duke Energy Progress also sought authorization to place a temporary
decrement EDIT Rider into effect, concurrent with the temporary base rate change. The NCUC approved the August 7, 2020 temporary rates motion
on August 11, 2020, and temporary rates went into effect on September 1, 2020.
On January 22, 2021, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Carolinas entered into the CCR Settlement Agreement with the Settling Parties,
which was filed with the NCUC on January 25, 2021.
On April 16, 2021, the NCUC issued an order approving the June 2, 2020, and July 31, 2020, partial settlements. The order includes approval of 1)
an ROE of 9.6% based upon a capital structure of 52% equity and 48% debt; 2) deferral treatment of approximately $400 million of grid improvement
projects with a return; 3) a flow back period of five years for unprotected federal EDIT; and 4) the reasonableness and prudence of approximately
$714 million of deferred storm costs, which were removed from the rate case and for which Duke Energy Progress filed a petition seeking
securitization in October 2020. Additionally, the order approved without modification the CCR Settlement Agreement.
The order denied Duke Energy Progress' proposal to shorten the remaining depreciable lives of certain Duke Energy Progress coal-fired generating
units, indicating the NCUC has not had the chance to fully examine the issue within the context of an IRP proceeding, and upon retirement the
remaining net book value of these units should be placed in a regulatory asset account to be amortized over an appropriate period to be determined
in a future rate case.
On May 21, 2021, the NCUC issued an Order Approving Rate Schedules, which resulted in a net increase of approximately $178 million. Revised
customer rates became effective on June 1, 2021.
2018 South Carolina Rate Case
On November 8, 2018, Duke Energy Progress filed an application with the PSCSC for a rate increase for retail customers of approximately $59
million.
After hearings in April 2019, the PSCSC issued an order on May 21, 2019, which included an ROE of 9.5% and a capital structure of 53% equity and
47% debt. The order also included the following material components:
• Approval of recovery of $4 million of coal ash costs over a five-year period with a return at Duke Energy Progress' WACC;
• Denial of recovery of $65 million of certain coal ash costs deemed to be related to the Coal Ash Act and incremental to the federal CCR
rule;
• Approval of a $17 million decrease to base rates to reflect the change in ongoing tax expense, primarily the reduction in the federal income
tax rate from 35% to 21%;
144
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
• Approval of a $12 million decrease through the EDIT Tax Savings Rider resulting from the federal tax rate change and deferred revenues
since January 2018 related to the change, to be returned in accordance with ARAM for protected EDIT, over a 20-year period for
unprotected EDIT associated with Property, Plant and Equipment, over a five-year period for unprotected EDIT not associated with
Property, Plant and Equipment and over a three-year period for the deferred revenues; and
• Approval of a $12 million increase due to the expiration of EDIT related to reductions in the North Carolina state income tax rate from 6.9%
to 2.5%.
As a result of the order, revised customer rates were effective June 1, 2019. On May 31, 2019, Duke Energy Progress filed a Petition for Rehearing
or Reconsideration of that order contending substantial rights of Duke Energy Progress were prejudiced by unlawful, arbitrary and capricious rulings
by the PSCSC on certain issues presented in the proceeding. On June 19, 2019, the PSCSC issued a directive denying Duke Energy Progress'
request to rehear or reconsider the commission's rulings on certain issues presented in the proceeding including coal ash remediation and disposal
costs, ROE and the recovery of a return on deferred operation and maintenance expenses, but allowing additional litigation-related costs. As a result
of the directive allowing litigation-related costs, customer rates were revised effective July 1, 2019. An order detailing the commission's decision in the
directive was issued on October 18, 2019. In November 2019, Duke Energy Progress appealed the decision to the Supreme Court of South Carolina.
On October 27, 2021, the Supreme Court of South Carolina affirmed the PSCSC's May 2019 order to:
• Disallow cost recovery on certain CCR compliance costs the PSCSC deemed to be incremental to the federal CCR rules;
• Disallow recovery of certain coal ash insurance litigation expenses; and
• Disallow a return on certain deferred expenses.
The Supreme Court of South Carolinas' decision notes the prior determination made by the PSCSC that Duke Energy could submit coal ash costs for
recovery that were not initially approved in the rate case order if such costs can be attributed to the CCR rules. As a result of the court's opinion,
Duke Energy Progress recognized a pretax charge of approximately $42 million to Impairment of assets and other charges, and a $6 million increase
in Other income and expenses, net, in the Consolidated Statements of Operations for the year ended December 31, 2021, principally related to coal
ash remediation at retired coal ash basin sites. On November 29, 2021, Duke Energy Progress filed a petition for rehearing on several grounds,
including the Supreme Court of South Carolinas’ decision on coal ash cost recovery and certain deferred expenses. On February 1, 2022, the
Supreme Court of South Carolina denied the petition for rehearing.
FERC Return on Equity Complaints
On October 11, 2019, North Carolina Eastern Municipal Power Agency (NCEMPA) filed a complaint at the FERC against Duke Energy Progress
pursuant to Section 206 of the Federal Power Act (FPA), alleging that the 11% stated ROE component contained in the demand formula rate in the
Full Requirements Power Purchase Agreement (FRPPA) between NCEMPA and Duke Energy Progress is unjust and unreasonable. On July 16,
2020, the FERC set this matter for hearing and settlement judge procedures and established a refund effective date of October 11, 2019. In its order
setting the matter for settlement, the FERC allowed for the consideration of variations to the base transmission-related ROE methodology developed
in its Order No. 569-A, through the introduction of “specific facts and circumstances” involving issues specific to the case. The parties reached a
settlement in principle at a settlement conference on January 7, 2021, and filed a settlement package on March 10, 2021. The FERC Trial Staff filed
comments in support of the settlement. On April 19, 2021, the Settlement Judge certified the settlement to the FERC as an uncontested settlement.
The FERC approved the settlement on May 25, 2021, and Duke Energy Progress filed compliance documents on June 10, 2021. The FERC
accepted the compliance filing on October 8, 2021.
On October 16, 2020, North Carolina Electric Membership Corporation (NCEMC) filed a complaint at the FERC against Duke Energy Progress
pursuant to Section 206 of the FPA, alleging that the 11% stated ROE component in the demand formula rate in the Power Supply and Coordination
Agreement between NCEMC and Duke Energy Progress is unjust and unreasonable. Under FPA Section 206, the earliest refund effective date that
the FERC can establish is the date of the filing of the complaint. Duke Energy Progress responded to the complaint on November 20, 2020, seeking
dismissal, demonstrating that the 11% ROE is just and reasonable for the service provided. The parties filed responsive pleadings and are awaiting
an order from the FERC. Duke Energy Progress cannot predict the outcome of this matter.
145
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
Duke Energy Florida
Regulatory Assets and Liabilities
The following tables present the regulatory assets and liabilities recorded on Duke Energy Florida's Consolidated Balance Sheets.
December 31, Earns/PaysRecovery/Refund
(in millions) 2021 2020 a Return Period Ends
Regulatory Assets
AROs – coal ash $ 10 $ 10 (b)
AROs – nuclear and other 7 2 (b)
Accrued pension and OPEB 374 482 Yes (g)
Deferred fuel and purchased power 415 4 (f) 2022
Nuclear asset securitized balance, net 937 991 2036
Retired generation facilities 94 174 Yes 2044
Hedge costs deferrals 77 59 Yes 2038
AMI 38 45 Yes 2032
Customer connect project 67 30 2037
DSM/EE 12 17 Yes 2025
Storm cost deferrals 19 108 (e) (b)
Costs of removal regulatory asset 107 — (d) (b)
Qualifying facility contract buyouts 94 107 Yes 2034
Other 37 35 (d) (b)
Total regulatory assets 2,288 2,064 
Less: current portion 497 265 
Total noncurrent regulatory assets $ 1,791 $ 1,799 
Regulatory Liabilities
Net regulatory liability related to income taxes $ 699 $ 749 (b)
Other 97 19 (d) (b)
Total regulatory liabilities 796 768 
Less: current portion 98 110 
Total noncurrent regulatory liabilities $ 698 $ 658 
(a)    Regulatory assets and liabilities are excluded from rate base unless otherwise noted.
(b)    The expected recovery or refund period varies or has not been determined.
(c)    Included in rate base.
(d)    Certain costs earn/pay a return.
(e)    Earns a debt return/interest once collections begin.
(f)    Earns commercial paper rate.
(g)    Recovered primarily over the average remaining service periods or life expectancies of employees covered by the benefit plans. See Note 22
for additional detail.
2021 Settlement Agreement
On January 14, 2021, Duke Energy Florida filed a Settlement Agreement (the “2021 Settlement”) with the FPSC. The parties to the 2021 Settlement
include Duke Energy Florida, the Office of Public Counsel (OPC), the Florida Industrial Power Users Group, White Springs Agricultural Chemicals,
Inc. d/b/a PCS Phosphate and NUCOR Steel Florida, Inc. (collectively, the “Parties”).
Pursuant to the 2021 Settlement, the Parties agreed to a base rate stay-out provision that expires year-end 2024; however, Duke Energy Florida is
allowed an increase to its base rates of an incremental $67 million in 2022, $49 million in 2023 and $79 million in 2024, subject to adjustment in the
event of tax reform during the years 2021, 2022 and 2023. The Parties also agreed to an ROE band of 8.85% to 10.85% with a midpoint of 9.85%
based on a capital structure of 53% equity and 47% debt. The ROE band can be increased by 25 basis points if the average 30-year U.S. Treasury
rate increases 50 basis points or more over a six-month period in which case the midpoint ROE would rise from 9.85% to 10.10%. Duke Energy
Florida will also be able to retain the retail portion of the DOE award of approximately $173 million for spent nuclear fuel, which is expected to be
received in 2022, in order to mitigate customer rates over the term of the 2021 Settlement. In return, Duke Energy Florida will be able to recognize
the $173 million into earnings from 2022 through 2024.
In addition to these terms, the 2021 Settlement contained provisions related to the accelerated depreciation of Crystal River Units 4-5, the approval of
approximately $1 billion in future investments in new cost-effective solar power, the implementation of a new Electric Vehicle Charging Station
Program and the deferral and recovery of costs in connection with the implementation of Duke Energy Florida’s Vision Florida program, which
explores various emerging non-carbon emitting generation technology, distributed technologies and resiliency projects, among other things. The 2021
Settlement also resolved remaining unrecovered storm costs for Hurricane Michael and Hurricane Dorian.
The FPSC approved the 2021 Settlement on May 4, 2021, issuing an order on June 4, 2021. Revised customer rates became effective January 1,
2022, with subsequent base rate increases effective January 1, 2023, and January 1, 2024.(a)
(c)
(c)
(c)
(c)
(c)
(c)
(c)
(c)
(a)
(c)
146
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
Storm Restoration Cost Recovery
Duke Energy Florida filed a petition with the FPSC on April 30, 2019, to recover $223 million of estimated retail incremental storm restoration costs
for Hurricane Michael, consistent with the provisions in the 2017 Settlement, and the FPSC approved the petition on June 11, 2019. The FPSC also
approved allowing Duke Energy Florida to use the tax savings resulting from the Tax Act to recover these storm costs in lieu of implementing a storm
surcharge. Approved storm costs were fully recovered by year-end 2021. On November 22, 2019, Duke Energy Florida filed a petition for approval of
actual retail recoverable storm restoration costs related to Hurricane Michael in the amount of $191 million plus interest. On May 19, 2020, Duke
Energy Florida filed a supplemental true up reducing the actual retail recoverable storm restoration costs related to Hurricane Michael by
approximately $3 million, resulting in a total request to recover $188 million actual retail recoverable storm restoration costs, plus interest.
Approximately $80 million of these costs are included in Regulatory assets within Current Assets and Other Noncurrent Assets on the Consolidated
Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2020.
Duke Energy Florida filed a petition with the FPSC on December 19, 2019, to recover $169 million of estimated retail incremental storm restoration
costs for Hurricane Dorian, consistent with the provisions in the 2017 Settlement and the FPSC approved the petition on February 24, 2020. The final
actual amount of $145 million was filed on September 30, 2020. The 2021 Settlement resolved all matters regarding storm cost recovery relating to
Hurricane Michael and Hurricane Dorian.
Clean Energy Connection
On July 1, 2020, Duke Energy Florida petitioned the FPSC for approval of a voluntary solar program. The program consists of 10 new solar
generating facilities with combined capacity of approximately 750 MW. The program allows participants to support cost-effective solar development in
Florida by paying a subscription fee based on per kilowatt-subscriptions and receiving a credit on their bill based on the actual generation associated
with their portion of the solar portfolio. The estimated cost of the 10 new solar generation facilities is approximately $1 billion over the next three
years, and this investment will be included in base rates offset by the revenue from the subscription fees. The credits will be included for recovery in
the fuel cost recovery clause. The FPSC approved the program in January 2021.
On February 24, 2021, the League of United Latin American Citizens (LULAC) filed a notice of appeal of the FPSC’s order approving the Clean
Energy Connection to the Supreme Court of Florida. LULAC's initial brief was filed on May 26, 2021, and Appellees' response briefs were filed on
July 26, 2021. LULAC's reply brief was filed on September 24, 2021, and its request for oral argument was filed on September 28, 2021. The
Supreme Court of Florida heard the oral argument on February 9, 2022. The FPSC approval order remains in effect pending the outcome of the
appeal. Duke Energy Florida cannot predict the outcome of this matter.
147
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
Duke Energy Ohio
Regulatory Assets and Liabilities
The following tables present the regulatory assets and liabilities recorded on Duke Energy Ohio's Consolidated Balance Sheets.
December 31, Earns/PaysRecovery/Refund
(in millions) 2021 2020 a Return Period Ends
Regulatory Assets
AROs – coal ash $ 33 $ 22 Yes (b)
Accrued pension and OPEB 133 149 (g)
Deferred fuel and purchased power 38 — 2022
PISCC and deferred operating expenses 16 16 Yes 2083
Hedge costs deferrals 5 7 (b)
AMI 24 36 (b)
Customer connect project 41 26 (b)
DSM/EE 5 1 (f) (e)
Vacation accrual 6 6 2022
Storm cost deferrals 2 4 2023
CEP deferral 161 117 Yes (b)
Deferred pipeline integrity costs 24 21 Yes (b)
MGP 104 104 (b)
Other 115 140 (b)
Total regulatory assets 707 649 
Less: current portion 72 39 
Total noncurrent regulatory assets $ 635 $ 610 
Regulatory Liabilities
Net regulatory liability related to income taxes $ 602 $ 628 (b)
Costs of removal 39 68 (d)
Provision for rate refunds 61 45 (b)
Accrued pension and OPEB 21 17 (g)
Other 78 55 (b)
Total regulatory liabilities 801 813 
Less: current portion 62 65 
Total noncurrent regulatory liabilities $ 739 $ 748 
(a)    Regulatory assets and liabilities are excluded from rate base unless otherwise noted.
(b)    The expected recovery or refund period varies or has not been determined.
(c)    Included in rate base.
(d)    Recovery over the life of the associated assets.
(e)    Recovered via a rider mechanism.
(f)    Includes incentives on DSM/EE investments.
(g)    Recovered primarily over the average remaining service periods or life expectancies of employees covered by the benefit plans. See Note 22
for additional detail.
Duke Energy Ohio Electric Base Rate Case
Duke Energy Ohio filed with the PUCO an electric distribution base rate case application on October 1, 2021, with supporting testimony filed on
October 15, 2021, requesting an increase in electric distribution base rates of approximately $55 million and an ROE of 10.3%. This is an
approximate 3.3% average increase in the customer's total bill across all customer classes. The drivers for this case are capital invested since Duke
Energy Ohio's last electric distribution base rate case in 2017. Duke Energy Ohio is also seeking to adjust the caps on its Distribution Capital
Investment (DCI) Rider. Duke Energy Ohio anticipates the PUCO will rule on the request by the summer of 2022. Duke Energy Ohio cannot predict
the outcome of this matter.(a)
(c)
(a)
148
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
Ohio House Bill 6 and House Bill 128
On July 23, 2019, House Bill 6 was signed into law and became effective January 1, 2020. Among other things, the bill allowed for funding through a
rider mechanism referred to as the Clean Air Fund (CAF) Rider, of two nuclear generating facilities located in Northern Ohio owned by Energy Harbor
(f/k/a FirstEnergy Solutions) and certain renewable resources, repeal of energy efficiency mandates and recovery of prudently incurred costs, net of
any revenues, for Ohio investor-owned utilities that are participants under the OVEC power agreement. The OVEC recovery is through a non-
bypassable rider that replaced any existing recovery mechanism approved by the PUCO and will remain in place through 2030. As such, Duke
Energy Ohio created the Legacy Generation Rider that replaced the Price Stabilization Rider effective January 1, 2020. The amounts recoverable
from customers are subject to an annual cap, with incremental costs that exceed such cap eligible for deferral and recovery, subject to review. See
Note 17 for additional discussion of Duke Energy Ohio's ownership interest in OVEC. House Bill 128 (HB 128) was signed into law on March 31,
2021, and became effective June 30, 2021. The bill removes nuclear plant funding included in HB 6, eliminates the CAF Rider and establishes the
Solar Generation Fund Rider to recover the renewable investments originally included in HB 6. HB 128 does not impact OVEC cost recovery or any
transmission or distribution rider.
Energy Efficiency Cost Recovery
In response to changes in Ohio law that eliminated Ohio's energy efficiency mandates, the PUCO issued an order on February 26, 2020, directing
utilities to wind down their demand-side management programs by September 30, 2020, and to terminate the programs by December 31, 2020. Duke
Energy Ohio took the following actions:
• On March 27, 2020, Duke Energy Ohio filed an application for rehearing seeking clarification on the final true up and reconciliation process
after 2020. On November 18, 2020, the PUCO issued an order replacing the cost cap previously imposed upon Duke Energy Ohio with a
cap on shared savings recovery. On December 18, 2020, Duke Energy Ohio filed an additional application for rehearing challenging,
among other things, the imposition of the cap on shared savings. On January 13, 2021, the application for rehearing was granted for further
consideration.
• On October 9, 2020, Duke Energy Ohio filed an application to implement a voluntary energy efficiency program portfolio to commence on
January 1, 2021. The application proposed a mechanism for recovery of program costs and a benefit associated with avoided transmission
and distribution costs. The application remains under review.
• On November 18, 2020, the PUCO issued an order directing all utilities to set their energy efficiency riders to zero effective January 1,
2021, and to file a separate application for final reconciliation of all energy efficiency costs prior to December 31, 2020.
• Effective January 1, 2021, Duke Energy Ohio suspended its energy efficiency programs.
• On June 14, 2021, the PUCO issued an entry for each utility to file by July 15, 2021, a proposal to reestablish low-income programs
through December 31, 2021. Duke Energy Oho filed its application on July 14, 2021.
Duke Energy Ohio cannot predict the outcome of this matter.
Natural Gas Pipeline Extension
Duke Energy Ohio is installing a new natural gas pipeline (the Central Corridor Project) in its Ohio service territory to increase system reliability and
enable the retirement of older infrastructure. Duke Energy Ohio currently estimates the pipeline development costs and construction activities will
range from $185 million to $195 million in direct costs (excluding overheads and AFUDC) and that construction of the pipeline extension will be
completed in February 2022. An evidentiary hearing on Duke Energy Ohio's application for a Certificate of Environmental Compatibility and Public
Need concluded on April 11, 2019. On November 21, 2019, the Ohio Power Siting Board (OPSB) approved Duke Energy Ohio's application subject to
41 conditions on construction. Applications for rehearing were filed by several stakeholders on December 23, 2019, arguing that the OPSB approval
was incorrect. On February 20, 2020, the OPSB denied the rehearing requests. On April 15, 2020, those stakeholders filed a notice of appeal at the
Supreme Court of Ohio of the OPSB’s decision approving Duke Energy Ohio’s Central Corridor Project application. The Supreme Court of Ohio
affirmed the OPSB order on September 22, 2021.
On September 22, 2020, Duke Energy Ohio filed an application with the OPSB for approval to amend the certificated pipeline route due to changes in
the route negotiated with property owners and municipalities. On January 21, 2021, the OPSB approved the amended filing with recommended
conditions that reaffirm previous conditions and provide guidance regarding local permitting and construction supervision.
MGP Cost Recovery
In an order issued in 2013, the PUCO approved Duke Energy Ohio's deferral and recovery of costs related to environmental remediation at two sites
(East End and West End) that housed former MGP operations. Duke Energy Ohio has collected approximately $55 million in environmental
remediation costs incurred between 2008 through 2012 through Rider MGP, which is currently suspended. Duke Energy Ohio has made annual
applications with the PUCO to recover its incremental remediation costs consistent with the PUCO’s directive in Duke Energy Ohio’s 2012 natural gas
base rate case. To date, the PUCO has not ruled on Duke Energy Ohio’s annual applications for the calendar years 2013 through 2019. On
September 28, 2018, the Staff of the PUCO (Staff) issued a report recommending a disallowance of approximately $12 million of the $26 million in
MGP remediation costs incurred between 2013 through 2017 that the Staff believes are not eligible for recovery. The Staff interprets the PUCO’s
2013 order granting Duke Energy Ohio recovery of MGP remediation as limiting the recovery to work directly on the East End and West End sites. On
October 30, 2018, Duke Energy Ohio filed reply comments objecting to the Staff’s recommendations and explaining, among other things, the
obligation Duke Energy Ohio has under Ohio law to remediate all areas impacted by the former MGPs and not just physical property that housed the
former plants and equipment. On March 29, 2019, Duke Energy Ohio filed its annual application to recover incremental remediation expense for the
calendar year 2018 seeking recovery of approximately $20 million in remediation costs. On July 12, 2019, the Staff recommended a disallowance of
approximately $11 million for work that the Staff believes occurred in areas not authorized for recovery. Additionally, the Staff recommended that any
discussion pertaining to Duke Energy Ohio's recovery of ongoing MGP costs should be directly tied to or netted against insurance proceeds collected
by Duke Energy Ohio. An evidentiary hearing concluded on November 21, 2019. Initial briefs were filed on January 17, 2020, and reply briefs were
filed on February 14, 2020.
149
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
On March 31, 2020, Duke Energy Ohio filed its annual application to recover incremental MGP remediation expense seeking recovery of
approximately $39 million in remediation costs incurred during 2019. On July 23, 2020, the Staff recommended a disallowance of approximately $4
million for work the Staff believes occurred in areas not authorized for recovery. Additionally, the Staff recommended insurance proceeds, net of
litigation costs and attorney fees, should be paid to customers and not be held by Duke Energy Ohio until all investigation and remediation is
complete. Duke Energy Ohio filed comments in response to the Staff's report on August 21, 2020, and intervenor comments were filed on November
9, 2020.
The 2013 PUCO order also contained conditional deadlines for completing the MGP environmental remediation and the deferral of related
remediation costs. Subsequent to the order, the deadline was extended to December 31, 2019. On May 10, 2019, Duke Energy Ohio filed an
application requesting a continuation of its existing deferral authority for MGP remediation that must occur after December 31, 2019. On July 12,
2019, the Staff recommended the commission deny the deferral authority request. On September 13, 2019, intervenor comments were filed opposing
Duke Energy Ohio's request for continuation of existing deferral authority and on October 2, 2019, Duke Energy Ohio filed reply comments.
A Stipulation and Recommendation was filed jointly by Duke Energy Ohio, the Staff, the Office of the Ohio Consumers' Counsel and the Ohio Energy
Group on August 31, 2021, which is subject to review and approval by the PUCO. If approved, the Stipulation and Recommendation would, among
other things, resolve all open issues regarding MGP remediation costs incurred between 2013 and 2019, Duke Energy Ohio’s request for additional
deferral authority beyond 2019 and the pending issues related to the Tax Act as it relates to Duke Energy Ohio’s natural gas operations. These
impacts are not expected to have a material impact on Duke Energy Ohio's financial statements. The Stipulation and Recommendation further
acknowledges Duke Energy Ohio’s ability to file a request for additional deferral authority in the future related to environmental remediation of any
MGP impacts in the Ohio River if necessary, subject to specific conditions. On October 15, 2021, the PUCO granted motions to intervene filed in
September 2021 by Interstate Gas Supply, Inc. and Retail Energy Supply Association on a limited basis. An evidentiary hearing was held on
November 18, 2021, and briefing was concluded on December 23, 2021. Duke Energy Ohio cannot predict the outcome of this matter.
Tax Act – Ohio
On December 21, 2018, Duke Energy Ohio filed an application to change its base rate tariffs and establish a new rider to implement the benefits of
the Tax Act for natural gas customers. Duke Energy Ohio requested commission approval to implement the tariff changes and rider effective April 1,
2019. The new rider will flow through to customers the benefit of the reduction in the statutory federal tax rate from 35% to 21% since January 1,
2018, all future benefits of the lower tax rates and a full refund of deferred income taxes collected at the higher tax rates in prior years. Deferred
income taxes subject to normalization rules will be refunded consistent with federal law and deferred income taxes not subject to normalization rules
will be refunded over a 10-year period. The PUCO established a procedural schedule and testimony was filed on July 31, 2019. An evidentiary
hearing occurred on August 7, 2019. Initial briefs were filed on September 11, 2019. Reply briefs were filed on September 25, 2019. The Stipulation
and Recommendation filed on August 31, 2021, disclosed in the MGP Cost Recovery matter above, also resolves the outstanding issues in this
proceeding. On October 15, 2021, the PUCO granted motions to intervene filed in September 2021 by Interstate Gas Supply, Inc. and Retail Energy
Supply Association on a limited basis. An evidentiary hearing was held on November 18, 2021, and briefing was concluded on December 23, 2021.
Duke Energy Ohio cannot predict the outcome of this matter.
Duke Energy Kentucky Natural Gas Base Rate Case
On June 1, 2021, Duke Energy Kentucky filed an application with the KPSC requesting an increase in natural gas base rates of approximately
$15 million, an approximate 13% average increase across all customer classes. The drivers for this case are capital invested since Duke Energy
Kentucky's last natural gas base rate case in 2018. Duke Energy Kentucky also sought implementation of a rider in order to recover from or pay to
customers the financial impact of governmental directives and mandates, including changes in federal or state tax rates and regulations issued by the
Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety Administration (PHMSA). On October 8, 2021, Duke Energy Kentucky filed a Stipulation and
Recommendation jointly with the Kentucky Attorney General, subject to review and approval by the KPSC, which if approved, would resolve the case.
The Stipulation and Recommendation included a $9 million increase in base revenues, an ROE of 9.375% for natural gas base rates and 9.3% for
natural gas riders, a rider for PHMSA-required capital investments with an annual 5% rate increase cap and a four-year natural gas base rate case
stay out. The evidentiary hearing was held on October 18, 2021. On December 28, 2021, the KPSC approved the Stipulation and Recommendation
with minor modifications, authorizing a $9 million increase. Rates were effective January 4, 2022.
Midwest Propane Caverns
Duke Energy Ohio uses propane stored in caverns to meet peak demand during winter. Once the Central Corridor Project is complete, the propane
peaking facilities will no longer be necessary and will be retired. On October 7, 2021, Duke Energy Ohio requested deferral treatment of the property,
plant and equipment as well as costs related to propane inventory and decommissioning costs. On January 6, 2022, the Staff issued a report
recommending deferral authority for costs related to propane inventory and decommissioning but not for the net book value of the remaining assets.
As a result of the Staff's report, Duke Energy Ohio recorded a $19 million charge to Impairment of assets and other charges on the Consolidated
Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income in the fourth quarter of 2021. There is approximately $6 million and $27 million in Net,
property, plant and equipment on the Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2021, and December 31, 2020, respectively, related to the
propane caverns. The PUCO established a procedural schedule for the submission of comments by March 7, 2022. Duke Energy Ohio cannot predict
the outcome of this matter.
Regional Transmission Organization Realignment
Duke Energy Ohio, including Duke Energy Kentucky, transferred control of its transmission assets from MISO to PJM, effective December 31, 2011.
The PUCO approved a settlement related to Duke Energy Ohio’s recovery of certain costs of the RTO realignment via a non-bypassable rider. Duke
Energy Ohio is allowed to recover all MISO Transmission Expansion Planning (MTEP) costs directly or indirectly charged to Ohio customers. The
KPSC also approved a request to effect the RTO realignment, subject to a commitment not to seek double recovery in a future rate case of the
transmission expansion fees that may be charged by MISO and PJM in the same period or overlapping periods.
150
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
The following table provides a reconciliation of the beginning and ending balance of Duke Energy Ohio’s recorded liability for its exit obligation and
share of MTEP costs recorded in Other within Current Liabilities and Other Noncurrent Liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. The retail
portions of MTEP costs billed by MISO are recovered by Duke Energy Ohio through a non-bypassable rider. As of December 31, 2021, and 2020,
$33 million and $37 million, respectively, are recorded in Regulatory assets on Duke Energy Ohio's Consolidated Balance Sheets.
Provisions/ Cash
(in millions)
December 31, 2020Adjustments Reductions
December 31, 2021
Duke Energy Ohio
$ 50 $ — $ (4)$ 46 
Duke Energy Indiana
Regulatory Assets and Liabilities
The following tables present the regulatory assets and liabilities recorded on Duke Energy Indiana's Consolidated Balance Sheets.
December 31, Earns/PaysRecovery/Refund
(in millions) 2021 2020 a Return Period Ends
Regulatory Assets
AROs – coal ash $ 749 $ 615 Yes (b)
Accrued pension and OPEB 222 245 (e)
Deferred fuel and purchased power 158 9 2022
Retired generation facilities 38 43 Yes 2030
PISCC and deferred operating expenses 262 298 Yes (b)
Hedge costs deferrals 35 22 (b)
AMI 17 19 2031
Customer connect project 11 5 (b)
Vacation accrual 13 12 2022
Other 50 60 (b)
Total regulatory assets 1,555 1,328 
Less: current portion 277 125 
Total noncurrent regulatory assets $ 1,278 $ 1,203 
Regulatory Liabilities
Net regulatory liability related to income taxes $ 908 $ 956 (b)
Costs of removal 575 599 (d)
Accrued pension and OPEB 113 100 (e)
Other 96 83 (b)
Total regulatory liabilities 1,692 1,738 
Less: current portion 127 111 
Total noncurrent regulatory liabilities $ 1,565 $ 1,627 
(a)    Regulatory assets and liabilities are excluded from rate base unless otherwise noted.
(b)    The expected recovery or refund period varies or has not been determined.
(c)    Included in rate base.
(d)    Refunded over the life of the associated assets.
(e)    Recovered primarily over the average remaining service periods or life expectancies of employees covered by the benefit plans. See Note 22
for additional detail.(a)
(c)
(c)
(a)
151
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
2019 Indiana Rate Case
On July 2, 2019, Duke Energy Indiana filed a general rate case with the IURC for a rate increase for retail customers of approximately $395 million.
The rebuttal case, filed on December 4, 2019, updated the requested revenue requirement to result in a 15.6% or $396 million average retail rate
increase, including the impacts of the Utility Receipts Tax. Hearings concluded on February 7, 2020. On June 29, 2020, the IURC issued an order in
the rate case approving a revenue increase of $146 million before certain adjustments and ratemaking refinements. The order approved Duke
Energy Indiana's requested forecasted rate base of $10.2 billion as of December 31, 2020, including the Edwardsport Integrated Gasification
Combined Cycle (IGCC) Plant. The IURC reduced Duke Energy Indiana's request by slightly more than $200 million, when accounting for the utility
receipts tax and other adjustments. Approximately 50% of the reduction was due to a prospective change in depreciation and use of regulatory asset
for the end-of-life inventory at retired generating plants, approximately 20% is due to the approved ROE of 9.7% versus the requested ROE of 10.4%
and approximately 20% was related to miscellaneous earnings neutral adjustments. Step one rates were estimated to be approximately 75% of the
total and became effective on July 30, 2020. Step two rates are estimated to be the remaining 25% of the total rate increase. Step two rates were
approved on July 28, 2021, and implemented in August 2021. Step two rates are based on a return on equity of 9.7% and actual December 31, 2020
capital structure with a 54% equity component. Step two rates will be reconciled to January 1, 2021. Several groups appealed the IURC order to the
Indiana Court of Appeals. Appellate briefs were filed on October 14, 2020, focusing on three issues: wholesale sales allocations, coal ash basin cost
recovery and the Edwardsport IGCC operating and maintenance expense level approved. The appeal was fully briefed in January 2021, and an oral
argument was held on April 8, 2021. The Indiana Court of Appeals affirmed the IURC decision on May 13, 2021. The Indiana Office of Utility
Consumer Counselor (OUCC) and the Duke Industrial Group filed a joint petition to transfer the rate case appeal to the Indiana Supreme Court on
June 28, 2021. Response briefs were filed July 19, 2021. The Indiana Supreme Court granted the petition to transfer on September 16, 2021, and
oral arguments were heard on November 16, 2021. Duke Energy Indiana cannot predict the outcome of this matter.
2020 Indiana Coal Ash Recovery Case
In Duke Energy Indiana’s 2019 rate case, the IURC approved coal ash basin closure costs expended through 2018 including financing costs as a
regulatory asset and included in rate base. The IURC also opened a subdocket for post-2018 coal ash related expenditures. Duke Energy Indiana
filed testimony on April 15, 2020, in the coal ash subdocket requesting recovery for the post-2018 coal ash basin closure costs for plans that have
been approved by the Indiana Department of Environmental Management (IDEM) as well as continuing deferral, with carrying costs, on the balance.
An evidentiary hearing was held on September 14, 2020. Briefing was completed by mid-September 2021. On November 3, 2021, the IURC issued
an order allowing recovery for post-2018 coal ash basin closure costs for the plans that have been approved by IDEM, as well as continuing deferral,
with carrying costs, on the balance. The OUCC filed a notice of appeal to the Indiana Court of Appeals on December 3, 2021. Duke Energy Indiana
cannot predict the outcome of this matter.
Piedmont
Regulatory Assets and Liabilities
The following tables present the regulatory assets and liabilities recorded on Piedmont's Consolidated Balance Sheets.
December 31, Earns/PaysRecovery/Refund
(in millions) 2021 2020 a Return Period Ends
Regulatory Assets
AROs – nuclear and other $ 22 $ 20 (d)
Accrued pension and OPEB 82 88 (g)
Vacation accrual 12 12 2022
Derivatives – natural gas supply contracts 139 122 
Deferred pipeline integrity costs 84 71 2025
Amounts due from customers 85 110 (e) (b)
Other 33 32 (b)
Total regulatory assets 457 455 
Less: current portion 141 153 
Total noncurrent regulatory assets $ 316 $ 302 
Regulatory Liabilities
Net regulatory liability related to income taxes $ 510 $ 499 (b)
Costs of removal 572 575 (d)
Provision for rate refunds 2 6 
Accrued pension and OPEB 5 3 (g)
Other 25 49 (e) (b)
Total regulatory liabilities 1,114 1,132 
Less: current portion 56 88 
Total noncurrent regulatory liabilities $ 1,058 $ 1,044 (a)
(c)
(f)
(c)
(a)
(c)
(c)
152
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
(a)    Regulatory assets and liabilities are excluded from rate base unless otherwise noted.
(b)    The expected recovery or refund period varies or has not been determined.
(c)    Included in rate base.
(d)    Recovery over the life of the associated assets.
(e)    Certain costs earn/pay a return.
(f)    Balance will fluctuate with changes in the market. Current contracts extend into 2031.
(g)    Recovered primarily over the average remaining service periods or life expectancies of employees covered by the benefit plans. See Note 22
for additional detail.
2020 Tennessee Rate Case
On July 2, 2020, Piedmont filed an application with the TPUC, its first general rate case in Tennessee in nine years, for a rate increase for retail
customers of approximately $30 million, which represents an approximate 15% increase in annual revenues. The rate increase is driven by significant
infrastructure upgrade investments since Piedmont's previous rate case. Approximately half of the plant additions being added to rate base are
categories of capital investment not covered under the IMR mechanism, which was approved in 2013. Piedmont amended its requested increase to
approximately $26 million in December 2020. As authorized under Tennessee law, Piedmont implemented interim rates on January 2, 2021, at the
level requested in its adjusted request. A settlement reached with the Tennessee Consumer Advocate in mid-January was approved by the TPUC on
February 16, 2021. The settlement results in an increase of revenues of approximately $16 million and an ROE of 9.8%. Revised customer rates
became effective on January 2, 2021. Piedmont refunded customers the difference between bills previously rendered under interim rates and such
bills if rendered under approved rates, plus interest in April 2021.
2021 North Carolina Rate Case
On March 22, 2021, Piedmont filed an application with the NCUC for a rate increase for retail customers of approximately $109 million, which
represents an approximate 10% increase in retail revenues. The rate increase is driven by customer growth and significant infrastructure upgrade
investments (plant additions) since the last general rate case. Approximately 70% of the plant additions being rolled into rate base are categories of
plant investment not covered under the IMR mechanism, which was originally approved as part of the 2013 North Carolina Rate Case. On July 28,
2021, Piedmont amended its requested increase to approximately $97 million.
On September 7, 2021, Piedmont and the Public Staff, the Carolina Utility Customers Association, Inc. and the Carolina Industrial Group for Fair
Utility Rates IV filed a Stipulation of Partial Settlement (Stipulation), which is subject to review and approval by the NCUC, resolving most issues
between these parties. Major components of the Stipulation include:
• A return on equity of 9.6% and a capital structure of 51.6% equity and 48.4% debt;
• Continuation of the IMR mechanism and margin decoupling; and
• A base rate increase of approximately $67 million, subject to completion of the Robeson County LNG facility and the Pender Onslow
County expansion project.
An evidentiary hearing to review the Stipulation and other issues concluded on September 9, 2021. On October 12, 2021, Piedmont notified the
NCUC of its intent to implement the stipulated rates effective November 1, 2021, on a temporary basis and subject to refund. On October 18, 2021,
Piedmont and the Public Staff filed supplemental testimony attesting to the completion of the Robeson County LNG facility and the Pender Onslow
County expansion project and to the propriety of including the capital investment for these two projects in this proceeding. On January 6, 2022, the
NCUC issued an order approving the Stipulation. No refunds need to be rendered to customers arising from Piedmont's implementation of interim
rates.
OTHER REGULATORY MATTERS
Atlantic Coast Pipeline, LLC
Atlantic Coast Pipeline (ACP pipeline) was planned to be an approximately 600-mile interstate natural gas pipeline running from West Virginia to
North Carolina. Duke Energy indirectly owns a 47% interest, which is accounted for as an equity method investment through its Gas Utilities and
Infrastructure segment.
As a result of the uncertainty created by various legal rulings, the potential impact on the cost and schedule for the project, the ongoing legal
challenges and the risk of additional legal challenges and delays through the construction period and Dominion’s decision to sell substantially all of its
gas transmission and storage segment assets, Duke Energy's Board of Directors and management decided that it was not prudent to continue to
invest in the project. On July 5, 2020, Duke Energy and Dominion announced the cancellation of the ACP pipeline project.
As part of the pretax charges to earnings of approximately $2.1 billion recorded in June 2020, within Equity in earnings (losses) of unconsolidated
affiliates on the Duke Energy Consolidated Statements of Operations, Duke Energy established liabilities related to the cancellation of the ACP
pipeline project. In February 2021, Duke Energy paid approximately $855 million to fund ACP's outstanding debt, relieving Duke Energy of its
guarantee. At December 31, 2021, there is $47 million and $53 million within Other Current Liabilities and Other Noncurrent Liabilities, respectively, in
the Gas Utilities and Infrastructure segment. The liabilities represent Duke Energy's obligation of approximately $100 million to satisfy remaining ARO
requirements to restore construction sites.
See Notes 7 and 12 for additional information regarding this transaction.
153
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
Potential Coal Plant Retirements
The Subsidiary Registrants periodically file integrated resource plans (IRPs) with their state regulatory commissions. The IRPs provide a view of
forecasted energy needs over a long term (10 to 20 years) and options being considered to meet those needs. IRPs filed by the Subsidiary
Registrants included planning assumptions to potentially retire certain coal-fired generating facilities in North Carolina and Indiana earlier than their
current estimated useful lives. Duke Energy continues to evaluate the potential need to retire these coal-fired generating facilities earlier than the
current estimated useful lives and plans to seek regulatory recovery for amounts that would not be otherwise recovered when any of these assets are
retired.
The table below contains the net carrying value of generating facilities planned for retirement or included in recent IRPs as evaluated for potential
retirement. Dollar amounts in the table below are included in Net property, plant and equipment on the Consolidated Balance Sheets as of
December 31, 2021, and exclude capitalized asset retirement costs.
Remaining Net
Capacity Book Value
(in MW) (in millions)
Duke Energy Carolinas
Allen Steam Station Unit 1 167 $ 12 
Allen Steam Station Unit 5 259 277 
Cliffside Unit 5 546 365 
Duke Energy Progress
Mayo Unit 1 713 631 
Roxboro Units 3-4 1,409 457 
Duke Energy Florida
Crystal River Units 4-5 1,442 1,650 
Duke Energy Indiana
Gibson Units 1-5 2,845 1,829 
Cayuga Units 1-2 1,005 696 
Total Duke Energy 8,386 $ 5,917 
(a)    As part of the 2015 resolution of a lawsuit involving alleged New Source Review violations, Duke Energy Carolinas must retire Allen Steam
Station Units 1 through 3 by December 31, 2024. The long-term energy options considered in the IRP could result in retirement of these
units earlier than their current estimated useful lives. Unit 3 with a capacity of 270 MW and a net book value of $26 million at December 31,
2020, was retired in March 2021, and unit 2 with a capacity of 167 MW and a net book value of $44 million at December 31, 2020, was
retired in December 2021.
(b)    These units were included in the IRP filed by Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress in North Carolina and South Carolina on
September 1, 2020. The long-term energy options considered in the IRP could result in retirement of these units earlier than their current
estimated useful lives. In 2019, Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress filed North Carolina rate cases that included
depreciation studies that accelerate end-of-life dates for these plants. The NCUC issued orders in the 2019 rate cases of Duke Energy
Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress on March 31, 2021, and April 16, 2021, respectively, in which the proposals to shorten the remaining
depreciable lives of these units were denied, while indicating the IRP proceeding was the appropriate proceeding for the review of
generating plant retirements. Allen Unit 4 with a capacity of 267 MW and a net book value of $170 million at December 31, 2020, was
retired in December 2021.
(c)    On January 14, 2021, Duke Energy Florida filed the 2021 Settlement with the FPSC, which proposed depreciation rates reflecting retirement
dates for Duke Energy Florida's last two coal-fired generating facilities, Crystal River Units 4-5, eight years ahead of schedule in 2034
rather than in 2042. The FPSC approved the 2021 Settlement on May 4, 2021.
(d)    Gallagher Units 2 and 4 with a total capacity of 280 MW and a total net book value of $102 million at December 31, 2020, were retired on June
1, 2021.
(e)    The rate case filed July 2, 2019, included proposed depreciation rates reflecting retirement dates from 2026 to 2038. The depreciation rates
reflecting these updated retirement dates were approved by the IURC as part of the rate case order issued on June 29, 2020.
4. COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
INSURANCE
General Insurance
The Duke Energy Registrants have insurance and reinsurance coverage either directly or through indemnification from Duke Energy’s captive
insurance company, Bison, and its affiliates, consistent with companies engaged in similar commercial operations with similar type properties. The
Duke Energy Registrants’ coverage includes (i) commercial general liability coverage for liabilities arising to third parties for bodily injury and property
damage; (ii) workers’ compensation; (iii) automobile liability coverage; and (iv) property coverage for all real and personal property damage. Real and
personal property damage coverage excludes electric transmission and distribution lines, but includes damages arising from boiler and machinery
breakdowns, earthquakes, flood damage and extra expense, but not outage or replacement power coverage. All coverage is subject to certain
deductibles or retentions, sublimits, exclusions, terms and conditions common for companies with similar types of operations. The Duke Energy
Registrants self-insure their electric transmission and distribution lines against loss due to storm damage and other natural disasters. As discussed
further in Note 3, Duke Energy Florida maintains a storm damage reserve and has a regulatory mechanism to recover the cost of named storms on
an expedited basis.
The cost of the Duke Energy Registrants’ coverage can fluctuate from year to year reflecting claims history and conditions of the insurance and
reinsurance markets.(a)
(b)
(b)
(b)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
(e)
154
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
In the event of a loss, terms and amounts of insurance and reinsurance available might not be adequate to cover claims and other expenses
incurred. Uninsured losses and other expenses, to the extent not recovered by other sources, could have a material effect on the Duke Energy
Registrants’ results of operations, cash flows or financial position. Each company is responsible to the extent losses may be excluded or exceed
limits of the coverage available.
Nuclear Insurance
Duke Energy Carolinas owns and operates McGuire and Oconee and operates and has a partial ownership interest in Catawba. McGuire and
Catawba each have two reactors. Oconee has three reactors. The other joint owners of Catawba reimburse Duke Energy Carolinas for certain
expenses associated with nuclear insurance per the Catawba joint owner agreements.
Duke Energy Progress owns and operates Robinson, Brunswick and Harris. Robinson and Harris each have one reactor. Brunswick has two
reactors.
Duke Energy Florida owns Crystal River Unit 3, which permanently ceased operation in 2013 and achieved a SAFSTOR condition in July 2019. On
October 1, 2020, Crystal River Unit 3 changed decommissioning strategies from SAFSTOR to DECON.
In the event of a loss, terms and amounts of insurance available might not be adequate to cover property damage and other expenses incurred.
Uninsured losses and other expenses, to the extent not recovered by other sources, could have a material effect on Duke Energy Carolinas’, Duke
Energy Progress’ and Duke Energy Florida’s results of operations, cash flows or financial position. Each company is responsible to the extent losses
may be excluded or exceed limits of the coverage available.
Nuclear Liability Coverage
The Price-Anderson Act requires owners of nuclear reactors to provide for public nuclear liability protection per nuclear incident up to a maximum
total financial protection liability. The maximum total financial protection liability, which is approximately $13.5 billion, is subject to change every five
years for inflation and for the number of licensed reactors. Total nuclear liability coverage consists of a combination of private primary nuclear liability
insurance coverage and a mandatory industry risk-sharing program to provide for excess nuclear liability coverage above the maximum reasonably
available private primary coverage. The U.S. Congress could impose revenue-raising measures on the nuclear industry to pay claims.
Primary Liability Insurance
Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress have purchased the maximum reasonably available private primary nuclear liability insurance as
required by law, which is $450 million per station. Duke Energy Florida has purchased $100 million primary nuclear liability insurance in compliance
with the law.
Excess Liability Program
This program provides $13.1 billion of coverage per incident through the Price-Anderson Act’s mandatory industrywide excess secondary financial
protection program of risk pooling. This amount is the product of potential cumulative retrospective premium assessments of $138 million times the
current 95 licensed commercial nuclear reactors in the U.S. Under this program, operating unit licensees could be assessed retrospective premiums
to compensate for public nuclear liability damages in the event of a nuclear incident at any licensed facility in the U.S. Retrospective premiums may
be assessed at a rate not to exceed $20.5 million per year per licensed reactor for each incident. The assessment may be subject to state premium
taxes.
Nuclear Property and Accidental Outage Coverage
Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida are members of Nuclear Electric Insurance Limited (NEIL), an industry
mutual insurance company, which provides property damage, nuclear accident decontamination and premature decommissioning insurance for each
station for losses resulting from damage to its nuclear plants, either due to accidents or acts of terrorism. Additionally, NEIL provides accidental
outage coverage for losses in the event of a major accidental outage at an insured nuclear station.
Pursuant to regulations of the NRC, each company’s property damage insurance policies provide that all proceeds from such insurance be applied,
first, to place the plant in a safe and stable condition after a qualifying accident and second, to decontaminate the plant before any proceeds can be
used for decommissioning, plant repair or restoration.
Losses resulting from acts of terrorism are covered as common occurrences, such that if terrorist acts occur against one or more commercial nuclear
power plants insured by NEIL within a 12-month period, they would be treated as one event and the owners of the plants where the act occurred
would share one full limit of liability. The full limit of liability is currently $3.2 billion. NEIL sublimits the total aggregate for all of their policies for non-
nuclear terrorist events to approximately $1.8 billion.
Each nuclear facility has accident property damage, nuclear accident decontamination and premature decommissioning liability insurance from NEIL
with limits of $1.5 billion, except for Crystal River Unit 3. Crystal River Unit 3’s limit is $50 million and is on an actual cash value basis. All nuclear
facilities except for Catawba and Crystal River Unit 3 also share an additional $1.25 billion nuclear accident insurance limit above their dedicated
underlying limit. This shared additional excess limit is not subject to reinstatement in the event of a loss. Catawba has a dedicated $1.25 billion of
additional nuclear accident insurance limit above its dedicated underlying limit. Catawba and Oconee also have an additional $750 million of non-
nuclear accident property damage limit. All coverages are subject to sublimits and significant deductibles.
155
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
NEIL’s Accidental Outage policy provides some coverage, similar to business interruption, for losses in the event of a major accident property
damage outage of a nuclear unit. Coverage is provided on a weekly limit basis after a significant waiting period deductible and at 100% of the
applicable weekly limits for 52 weeks and 80% of the applicable weekly limits for up to the next 110 weeks. Coverage is provided until these
applicable weekly periods are met, where the accidental outage policy limit will not exceed $490 million for Catawba, $434 million for McGuire, $364
million for Harris, $336 million for Brunswick, $322 million for Oconee and $280 million for Robinson. NEIL sublimits the accidental outage recovery
up to the first 104 weeks of coverage not to exceed $328 million from non-nuclear accidental property damage. Coverage amounts decrease in the
event more than one unit at a station is out of service due to a common accident. All coverages are subject to sublimits and significant deductibles.
Potential Retroactive Premium Assessments
In the event of NEIL losses, NEIL’s board of directors may assess member companies' retroactive premiums of amounts up to 10 times their annual
premiums for up to six years after a loss. NEIL has never exercised this assessment. The maximum aggregate annual retrospective premium
obligations for Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida are $140 million, $88 million and $1 million, respectively.
Duke Energy Carolinas' maximum assessment amount includes 100% of potential obligations to NEIL for jointly owned reactors. Duke Energy
Carolinas would seek reimbursement from the joint owners for their portion of these assessment amounts.
ENVIRONMENTAL
The Duke Energy Registrants are subject to federal, state and local laws regarding air and water quality, hazardous and solid waste disposal, coal
ash and other environmental matters. These laws can be changed from time to time, imposing new obligations on the Duke Energy Registrants. The
following environmental matters impact all of the Duke Energy Registrants.
Remediation Activities
In addition to the ARO recorded as a result of various environmental regulations, discussed in Note 9, the Duke Energy Registrants are responsible
for environmental remediation at various sites. These include certain properties that are part of ongoing operations and sites formerly owned or used
by Duke Energy entities. These sites are in various stages of investigation, remediation and monitoring. Managed in conjunction with relevant federal,
state and local agencies, remediation activities vary based upon site conditions and location, remediation requirements, complexity and sharing of
responsibility. If remediation activities involve joint and several liability provisions, strict liability, or cost recovery or contribution actions, the Duke
Energy Registrants could potentially be held responsible for environmental impacts caused by other potentially responsible parties and may also
benefit from insurance policies or contractual indemnities that cover some or all cleanup costs. Liabilities are recorded when losses become probable
and are reasonably estimable. The total costs that may be incurred cannot be estimated because the extent of environmental impact, allocation
among potentially responsible parties, remediation alternatives and/or regulatory decisions have not yet been determined at all sites. Additional costs
associated with remediation activities are likely to be incurred in the future and could be significant. Costs are typically expensed as Operation,
maintenance and other in the Consolidated Statements of Operations unless regulatory recovery of the costs is deemed probable.
The following tables contain information regarding reserves for probable and estimable costs related to the various environmental sites. These
reserves are recorded in Other within Other Noncurrent Liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
(in millions) December 31, 2021 December 31, 2020
Reserves for Environmental Remediation
Duke Energy $ 88 $ 75 
Duke Energy Carolinas 19 19 
Progress Energy 23 19 
Duke Energy Progress 11 6 
Duke Energy Florida 11 12 
Duke Energy Ohio 34 22 
Duke Energy Indiana 4 6 
Piedmont 9 10 
Additional losses in excess of recorded reserves that could be incurred for the stages of investigation, remediation and monitoring for environmental
sites that have been evaluated at this time are not material.
156
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
LITIGATION
Duke Energy
Michael Johnson et al. v. Duke Energy Corporation et al.
On September 23, 2020, plaintiff Michael Johnson, a former Duke Energy employee and participant in the Duke Energy Retirement Savings Plan
(Plan) brought suit on his own behalf and on behalf of other participants and beneficiaries similarly situated against Duke Energy Corporation, the
Duke Energy Benefits Committee, and other unnamed individual defendants. The complaint, which was subsequently amended to add a current
participant as a plaintiff on November 23, 2020, alleges that the defendants breached their fiduciary duties with respect to certain fees associated
with the Plan in violation of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 and seeks certification of a class of all individuals who were
participants or beneficiaries of the Plan at any time on or after September 23, 2014. The defendants filed a motion to dismiss the plaintiffs’ amended
complaint on December 18, 2020. On January 31, 2022, the court denied the defendants' motion to dismiss. Duke Energy will be filing its answer to
the amended complaint, following which discovery will commence. Duke Energy cannot predict the outcome of this matter.
Texas Storm Uri Tort Litigation
Several Duke Energy renewables project companies, located in the Electric Reliability Council of Texas (ERCOT) market, were named in lawsuits
arising out of Texas Storm Uri in mid-February 2021. Several additional suits, where Duke Energy Corporation had been named, were dismissed The
current lawsuits seek recovery for property damages, personal injury and for wrongful death allegedly caused by the power outages, which the
plaintiffs claim was the result of collective failures of generators, transmission and distribution operators, retail energy providers and others including
ERCOT. The cases have been consolidated into a Texas state court multidistrict litigation (MDL) proceeding for discovery purposes. With the
exception of a few bellwether cases which are still being decided, all the lawsuits in the MDL will be stayed until motions to dismiss are filed and
considered by the court in mid-2022. The bellwether cases will include those in which the Duke Energy entities are named. Duke Energy cannot
predict the outcomes of these matters.
Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress
Coal Ash Insurance Coverage Litigation
In March 2017, Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress filed a civil action in the North Carolina Business Court against various insurance
providers. The lawsuit sought payment for coal ash related liabilities covered by third-party liability insurance policies. The insurance policies were
issued between 1971 and 1986 and provide third-party liability insurance for property damage. The civil action sought damages for breach of contract
and indemnification for costs arising from the Coal Ash Act and the EPA CCR rule at 15 coal-fired plants in North Carolina and South Carolina.
Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress have now resolved claims against all of the insurers sued in this litigation and have dismissed
their claims against all of the insurers. Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress have received approximately $418 million of coal ash
insurance litigation proceeds from settlements with insurer-defendants and the proceeds will be distributed in accordance with the terms of the CCR
settlement agreement.
Duke Energy Carolinas
Ruben Villano, et al. v. Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC
On June 16, 2021, a group of nine individuals went over a low head dam adjacent to the Dan River Steam Station in Eden, North Carolina, while
water tubing. Emergency personnel rescued four people and five others were confirmed deceased. On August 11, 2021, Duke Energy Carolinas was
served with the complaint filed in Durham County Superior Court on behalf of four survivors, which was later amended to include all the decedents
along with the survivors, except for one minor. The lawsuit alleges that Duke Energy Carolinas knew that the river was used for recreational purposes
and that Duke Energy did not adequately warn about the dam. On September 30, 2021, Duke Energy Carolinas filed its motion to dismiss and motion
for transfer of venue from Durham County to Rockingham County, both of which were denied on November 15, 2021. On November 15, 2021, Duke
Energy Carolinas was also served with Plaintiffs Second Amended Complaint, which added the final minor plaintiff and consolidated all the actions
into one lawsuit. Duke Energy Carolinas has filed its Answer and Affirmative Defenses to the Second Amended Complaint. Discovery has now
commenced. Duke Energy Carolinas cannot predict the outcome of this matter.
NTE Carolinas II, LLC Litigation
In November 2017, Duke Energy Carolinas entered into a standard FERC large generator interconnection agreement (LGIA) with NTE Carolinas II,
LLC (NTE), a company that proposed to build a combined-cycle natural gas plant in Rockingham County, North Carolina. On September 6, 2019,
Duke Energy Carolinas filed a lawsuit in Mecklenburg County Superior Court against NTE for breach of contract, alleging that NTE's failure to pay
benchmark payments for Duke Energy Carolinas' transmission system upgrades required under the interconnection agreement constituted a
termination of the interconnection agreement. Duke Energy Carolinas is seeking a monetary judgment against NTE because NTE failed to make
multiple milestone payments. The lawsuit was moved to federal court in North Carolina. NTE filed a motion to dismiss Duke Energy Carolinas’
complaint and brought counterclaims alleging anti-competitive conduct and violations of state and federal statutes. Duke Energy Carolinas filed a
motion to dismiss NTE's counterclaims.
On May 21, 2020, in response to a NTE petition challenging Duke Energy Carolinas' termination of the LGIA, FERC issued a ruling that 1) FERC has
exclusive jurisdiction to determine whether a transmission provider may terminate a LGIA; 2) FERC approval is required to terminate a conforming
LGIA if objected to by the interconnection customer; and 3) Duke Energy may not announce the termination of a conforming LGIA unless FERC has
approved the termination. FERC's Office of Enforcement also initiated an investigation of Duke Energy Carolinas into matters pertaining to the LGIA.
Duke Energy Carolinas is cooperating with the Office of Enforcement and cannot predict the outcome of this investigation.
157
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
On August 17, 2020, the court denied both NTE’s and Duke Energy Carolinas’ motions to dismiss. In October 2021, NTE filed a Second Amended
Counterclaim and Complaint, and in January 2022, NTE filed a Third Amended Counterclaim and Complaint. Duke Energy Carolinas has responded
to these pleadings. On December 6, 2021, Duke Energy Carolinas filed an Amended Complaint. Discovery is scheduled to end by April 2022, after
which the parties will file dispositive motions for the court's consideration. The case is scheduled to be trial ready by August 1, 2022. Duke Energy
Carolinas cannot predict the outcome of this matter.
Asbestos-related Injuries and Damages Claims
Duke Energy Carolinas has experienced numerous claims for indemnification and medical cost reimbursement related to asbestos exposure. These
claims relate to damages for bodily injuries alleged to have arisen from exposure to or use of asbestos in connection with construction and
maintenance activities conducted on its electric generation plants prior to 1985.
Duke Energy Carolinas has recognized asbestos-related reserves of $501 million and $572 million at December 31, 2021, and 2020, respectively.
These reserves are classified in Other within Other Noncurrent Liabilities and Other within Current Liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
The change in the reserves is a result of a third-party study completed in 2021 as well as settlements made throughout the year. These reserves are
based upon Duke Energy Carolinas' best estimate for current and future asbestos claims through 2041 and are recorded on an undiscounted basis.
In light of the uncertainties inherent in a longer-term forecast, management does not believe they can reasonably estimate the indemnity and medical
costs that might be incurred after 2041 related to such potential claims. It is possible Duke Energy Carolinas may incur asbestos liabilities in excess
of the recorded reserves.
Duke Energy Carolinas has third-party insurance to cover certain losses related to asbestos-related injuries and damages above an aggregate self-
insured retention. Receivables for insurance recoveries were $644 million and $704 million at December 31, 2021, and 2020, respectively. These
amounts are classified in Other within Other Noncurrent Assets and Receivables within Current Assets on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. Any
future payments up to the policy limit will be reimbursed by the third-party insurance carrier. Duke Energy Carolinas is not aware of any uncertainties
regarding the legal sufficiency of insurance claims. Duke Energy Carolinas believes the insurance recovery asset is probable of recovery as the
insurance carrier continues to have a strong financial strength rating.
As described in Note 1, Duke Energy adopted the new guidance for credit losses effective January 1, 2020, using the modified retrospective method
of adoption, which does not require restatement of prior year reported results. The reserve for credit losses for insurance receivables for the
asbestos-related injuries and damages based on adoption of the new standard is $12 million and $15 million for Duke Energy and Duke Energy
Carolinas as of December 31, 2021, and December 31, 2020, respectively. The insurance receivable is evaluated based on the risk of default and the
historical losses, current conditions and expected conditions around collectability. Management evaluates the risk of default annually based on
payment history, credit rating and changes in the risk of default from credit agencies.
Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida
Spent Nuclear Fuel Matters
On June 18, 2018, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida sued the U.S. in the U.S. Court of Federal Claims for damages incurred for the
period 2014 through 2018. The lawsuit claimed the Department of Energy breached a contract in failing to accept spent nuclear fuel under the
Nuclear Waste Policy Act of 1982 and asserted damages for the cost of on-site storage in the amount of $100 million and $200 million for Duke
Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida, respectively. The Department of Energy filed a motion for partial summary judgment relating to
approximately $60 million of Duke Energy Florida’s claimed damages. A hearing on the motion was held on February 9, 2022. Trial is scheduled for
April 2022. Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida cannot predict the outcome of this matter.
Duke Energy Florida
Power Purchase Dispute Arbitration
Duke Energy Florida, on behalf of its customers, entered into a PPA for the purchase of firm capacity and energy from a qualifying facility under the
Public Utilities Regulatory Policies Act of 1978. Duke Energy Florida determined the qualifying facility did not perform in accordance with the PPA,
and Duke Energy Florida terminated the PPA. The qualifying facility counterparty filed a confidential American Arbitration Association (AAA)
arbitration demand, challenging the termination of the PPA and seeking damages.
The final arbitration hearing occurred during the week of December 7, 2020. An interim arbitral award was issued in March 2021, upholding Duke
Energy Florida's positions on all issues and awarding the company termination costs. In May 2021, the final arbitral award was issued awarding Duke
Energy Florida its claimed fees and costs. On August 18, 2021, Duke Energy Florida filed a motion in Florida state court to confirm the arbitral award.
On December 13, 2021, the court entered a final judgment confirming the arbitration award.
Duke Energy Indiana
Coal Ash Basin Closure Plan Appeal
On January 27, 2020, Hoosier Environmental Council (HEC) filed a Petition for Administrative Review with the Indiana Office of Environmental
Adjudication challenging the Indiana Department of Environmental Management’s (IDEM's) December 10, 2019 partial approval of Duke Energy
Indiana’s ash pond closure plan at Gallagher. After hearing oral arguments in early April 2021 on Duke Energy Indiana's and HEC's competing
Motions for Summary Judgment, on May 4, 2021, the administrative court rejected all of HEC’s claims and issued a ruling in favor of Duke Energy
Indiana. On June 3, 2021, HEC filed an appeal in Superior Court to seek judicial review of the order. On June 25, 2021, Duke Energy Indiana filed its
response to the Petition to Review. On August 30, 2021, HEC served Duke Energy Indiana with its Brief in Support of Petition for Judicial Review. On
October 29, 2021, Duke Energy Indiana and IDEM filed their response briefs. On December 13, 2021, HEC filed and served its Reply Brief.
On January 11, 2022, Duke Energy Indiana received a compliance obligation letter from the EPA notifying the company that the two basins at issue in
the litigation are subject to requirements of the CCR Rule. The letter does not provide a deadline for compliance. Duke Energy Indiana is evaluating
the EPA letter, its potential impacts on the litigation and the extent to which this letter could apply to CCR surface impoundments at its other Indiana
sites.
158
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
Following the January 11, 2022 EPA notice of compliance letter, the parties filed a joint motion to stay the litigation for 45 days, which was approved
by the court. As a result, the oral argument scheduled for February 1, 2022, was postponed until the end of the 45-day stay. Duke Energy Indiana
cannot predict the outcome of this matter.
Other Litigation and Legal Proceedings
The Duke Energy Registrants are involved in other legal, tax and regulatory proceedings arising in the ordinary course of business, some of which
involve significant amounts. The Duke Energy Registrants believe the final disposition of these proceedings will not have a material effect on their
results of operations, cash flows or financial position for the years presented. Reserves are classified on the Consolidated Balance Sheets in Other
within Other Noncurrent Liabilities and Other within Current Liabilities.
OTHER COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
General
As part of their normal business, the Duke Energy Registrants are party to various financial guarantees, performance guarantees and other
contractual commitments to extend guarantees of credit and other assistance to various subsidiaries, investees and other third parties. These
guarantees involve elements of performance and credit risk, which are not fully recognized on the Consolidated Balance Sheets and have uncapped
maximum potential payments. See Note 7 for more information.
Purchase Obligations
Purchased Power
Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Florida and Duke Energy Ohio have ongoing purchased power contracts, including renewable energy contracts,
with other utilities, wholesale marketers, co-generators and qualified facilities. These purchased power contracts generally provide for capacity and
energy payments. In addition, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida have various contracts to secure transmission rights.
The following table presents executory purchased power contracts with terms exceeding one year, excluding contracts classified as leases.
  Minimum Purchase Amount at December 31, 2021
Contract
(in millions) Expiration 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 Thereafter Total
Duke Energy Progress 2028-2032$ 22 $ 22 $ 21 $ 22 $ 18 $ 45 $ 150 
Duke Energy Florida 2023-2025 354 374 262 91 — — 1,081 
Duke Energy Ohio 2023 53 34 — — — — 87 
(a)    Contracts represent between 18% and 100% of net plant output.
(b)    Contracts represent 100% of net plant output.
(c)    Contracts represent 15% of net plant output.
(d)    Excludes PPA with OVEC. See Note 17 for additional information.
Gas Supply and Capacity Contracts
Duke Energy Ohio and Piedmont routinely enter into long-term natural gas supply commodity and capacity commitments and other agreements that
commit future cash flows to acquire services needed in their businesses. These commitments include pipeline and storage capacity contracts and
natural gas supply contracts to provide service to customers. Costs arising from the natural gas supply commodity and capacity commitments, while
significant, are pass-through costs to customers and are generally fully recoverable through the fuel adjustment or PGA procedures and prudence
reviews in North Carolina and South Carolina and under the Tennessee Incentive Plan in Tennessee. In the Midwest, these costs are recovered via
the Gas Cost Recovery Rate in Ohio or the Gas Cost Adjustment Clause in Kentucky. The time periods for fixed payments under pipeline and storage
capacity contracts are up to 14 years. The time periods for fixed payments under natural gas supply contracts are up to five years. The time period for
the natural gas supply purchase commitments is up to 10 years.
Certain storage and pipeline capacity contracts require the payment of demand charges that are based on rates approved by the FERC in order to
maintain rights to access the natural gas storage or pipeline capacity on a firm basis during the contract term. The demand charges that are incurred
in each period are recognized in the Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income as part of natural gas purchases and are
included in Cost of natural gas.
The following table presents future unconditional purchase obligations under natural gas supply and capacity contracts as of December 31, 2021.
(in millions) 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 Thereafter Total
Duke Energy Ohio $ 62 $ 37 $ 25 $ 16 $ 13 $ 47 $ 200 
Piedmont 324 272 225 134 122 503 1,580 
5. LEASES
As part of its operations, Duke Energy leases certain aircraft, space on communication towers, industrial equipment, fleet vehicles, fuel transportation
(barges and railcars), land and office space under various terms and expiration dates. Additionally, Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress
and Duke Energy Indiana have finance leases related to firm natural gas pipeline transportation capacity. Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy
Florida have entered into certain PPAs, which are classified as finance and operating leases.(a)
(b)
(c)(d)
159
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS LEASES
Duke Energy has certain lease agreements, which include variable lease payments that are based on the usage of an asset. These variable lease
payments are not included in the measurement of the ROU assets or operating lease liabilities on the Consolidated Financial Statements.
Certain Duke Energy lease agreements include options for renewal and early termination. The intent to renew a lease varies depending on the lease
type and asset. Renewal options that are reasonably certain to be exercised are included in the lease measurements. The decision to terminate a
lease early is dependent on various economic factors. No termination options have been included in any of the lease measurements.
Duke Energy Carolinas entered into a sale-leaseback arrangement in December 2019, to construct and occupy an office tower. The lease agreement
was evaluated as a sale-leaseback of real estate and it was determined that the transaction did not qualify for sale-leaseback accounting. As a result,
the transaction is being accounted for as a financing. For this transaction, Duke Energy Carolinas will continue to record the real estate on the
Consolidated Balance Sheets within Property, Plant and Equipment as if it were the legal owner and will continue to recognize depreciation expense
over the estimated useful life. In addition, the failed sale-leaseback obligation is reported within Long-Term Debt on the Consolidated Balance Sheets,
with the monthly lease payments commencing after the construction phase being split between interest expense and principal pay down of the debt.
Duke Energy operates various renewable energy projects and sells the generated output to utilities, electric cooperatives, municipalities and
commercial and industrial customers through long-term PPAs. In certain situations, these PPAs and the associated renewable energy projects qualify
as operating leases. Rental income from these leases is accounted for as Nonregulated electric and other revenues in the Consolidated Statements
of Operations. There are no minimum lease payments as all payments are contingent based on actual electricity generated by the renewable energy
projects. Contingent lease payments were $259 million, $275 million and $264 million for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020, and 2019,
respectively. Renewable energy projects owned by Duke Energy and accounted for as operating leases had a cost basis of $3,339 million and
$3,335 million and accumulated depreciation of $966 million and $848 million at December 31, 2021, and 2020, respectively. These assets are
principally classified as nonregulated electric generation and transmission assets.
Piedmont has certain agreements with Duke Energy Carolinas for the construction and transportation of natural gas pipelines to supply its natural gas
plant needs. Piedmont accounts for these pipeline lateral contracts as sales-type leases since the present value of the sum of the lease payments
equals the fair value of the assets. These pipeline lateral assets owned by Piedmont had a current net investment basis of $2 million as of
December 31, 2021, and 2020, and a long-term net investment basis of $203 million and $205 million as of December 31, 2021, and 2020,
respectively. These assets are classified in Other, within Current Assets and Other Noncurrent Assets, respectively, on Piedmont's Consolidated
Balance Sheets. Duke Energy Carolinas accounts for the contracts as finance leases. The activity for these contracts is eliminated in consolidation at
Duke Energy.
The following tables present the components of lease expense.
Year Ended December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Operating lease expense $ 250 $ 43 $ 155 $ 83 $ 72 $ 11 $ 18 $ 7 
Short-term lease expense 5 — 2 1 1 — 2 — 
Variable lease expense 41 17 22 10 12 — — 1 
Finance lease expense
Amortization of leased assets 219 5 37 18 19 — 1 — 
Interest on lease liabilities 55 33 48 42 6 — — — 
Total finance lease expense 274 38 85 60 25 — 1 — 
Total lease expense $ 570 $ 98 $ 264 $ 154 $ 110 $ 11 $ 21 $ 8 
(a)    Included in Operations, maintenance and other or, for barges and railcars, Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power on the
Consolidated Statements of Operations.
(b)    Included in Depreciation and amortization on the Consolidated Statements of Operations.
(c)    Included in Interest Expense on the Consolidated Statements of Operations.(a)
(a)
(a)
(b)
(c)
160
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS LEASES
Year Ended December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Operating lease expense $ 283 $ 53 $ 162 $ 72 $ 90 $ 11 $ 19 $ 7 
Short-term lease expense 4 — 2 1 1 — 1 — 
Variable lease expense 30 13 13 5 8 — 1 1 
Finance lease expense
Amortization of leased assets 119 8 24 6 18 — 1 — 
Interest on lease liabilities 61 30 44 37 7 — — — 
Total finance lease expense 180 38 68 43 25 — 1 — 
Total lease expense $ 497 $ 104 $ 245 $ 121 $ 124 $ 11 $ 22 $ 8 
(a)    Included in Operations, maintenance and other or, for barges and railcars, Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power on the
Consolidated Statements of Operations.
(b)    Included in Depreciation and amortization on the Consolidated Statements of Operations.
(c)    Included in Interest Expense on the Consolidated Statements of Operations.
The following table presents operating lease maturities and a reconciliation of the undiscounted cash flows to operating lease liabilities.
December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
2022 $ 225 $ 24 $ 118 $ 63 $ 55 $ 2 $ 6 $ 5 
2023 212 21 118 64 54 2 6 5 
2024 185 14 110 56 54 2 4 5 
2025 156 10 96 42 54 2 4 5 
2026 136 10 92 38 54 2 4 — 
Thereafter 594 42 290 220 70 16 50 — 
Total operating lease payments 1,508 121 824 483 341 26 74 20 
Less: present value discount (247) (21) (124) (83) (41) (7) (20) (1)
Total operating lease liabilities $1,261 $ 100 $ 700 $ 400 $ 300 $ 19 $ 54 $ 19 
(a)    Certain operating lease payments include renewal options that are reasonably certain to be exercised.
The following table presents finance lease maturities and a reconciliation of the undiscounted cash flows to finance lease liabilities.
December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Indiana
2022 $ 201 $ 38 $ 111 $ 86 $ 25 $ 1 
2023 198 38 103 78 25 1 
2024 143 38 88 79 9 1 
2025 76 38 85 80 5 1 
2026 77 38 86 81 5 1 
Thereafter 658 464 637 636 1 24 
Total finance lease payments 1,353 654 1,110 1,040 70 29 
Less: amounts representing interest (438) (365) (420) (411) (9) (19)
Total finance lease liabilities $ 915 $ 289 $ 690 $ 629 $ 61 $ 10 (a)
(a)
(a)
(b)
(c)
(a)
161
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS LEASES
The following tables contain additional information related to leases.
December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Classification Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Assets
OperatingOperating lease ROU
assets, net $1,266 $ 92 $ 691 $ 389 $ 302 $ 19 $ 53 $ 16 
FinanceNet property, plant and
equipment 950 302 729 627 102 — 7 — 
Total lease assets $2,216 $ 394 $ 1,420 $ 1,016 $ 404 $ 19 $ 60 $ 16 
Liabilities
Current
Operating Other current liabilities $187 $ 22 $ 94 $ 50 $ 44 $ 1 $ 4 $ 5 
FinanceCurrent maturities of
long-term debt 151 6 61 41 20 — — — 
Noncurrent
Operating Operating lease liabilities 1,074 78 606 350 256 18 50 14 
Finance Long-Term Debt 764 283 629 588 41 — 10 — 
Total lease liabilities $2,176 $ 389 $ 1,390 $ 1,029 $ 361 $ 19 $ 64 $ 19 
December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Classification Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Assets
OperatingOperating lease ROU
assets, net $1,524 $ 110 $ 690 $ 346 $ 344 $ 20 $ 55 $ 20 
FinanceNet property, plant and
equipment 797 312 416 297 119 — 7 — 
Total lease assets $2,321 $ 422 $ 1,106 $ 643 $ 463 $ 20 $ 62 $ 20 
Liabilities
Current
Operating Other current liabilities $177 $ 20 $ 73 $ 31 $ 42 $ 1 $ 3 $ 4 
FinanceCurrent maturities of
long-term debt 129 5 26 7 19 — — — 
Noncurrent
Operating Operating lease liabilities 1,340 97 623 323 300 20 53 19 
Finance Long-Term Debt 716 289 351 289 62 — 10 — 
Total lease
liabilities $2,362 $ 411 $ 1,073 $ 650 $ 423 $ 21 $ 66 $ 23 
Year Ended December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Cash paid for amounts included in the
measurement of lease liabilities
Operating cash flows from operating
leases $ 245 $ 25 $ 117 $ 62 $ 55 $ 2 $ 6 $ 5 
Operating cash flows from finance leases 55 33 48 42 6 — — — 
Financing cash flows from finance leases 219 5 37 18 19 — 1 — 
Lease assets obtained in exchange for
new lease liabilities (non-cash)
Operating $ 182 $ 4 $ 99 $ 99 $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Finance 322 — 322 322 — — — — 
(a)    No amounts were classified as investing cash flows from operating leases for the year ended December 31, 2021.
(b)    Does not include ROU assets recorded as a result of the adoption of the new lease standard.(a)
(b)
162
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS LEASES
Year Ended December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke EnergyProgress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Cash paid for amounts included in
the measurement of lease
liabilities
Operating cash flows from operating
leases $271 $ 31 $ 124 $ 52 $ 72 $ 2 $ 6 $ 5 
Operating cash flows from finance
leases 61 30 44 37 7 — — — 
Financing cash flows from finance
leases 119 8 24 6 18 — 1 — 
Lease assets obtained in exchange
for new lease liabilities (non-cash)
Operating $116 $ 17 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 1 $ — 
Finance 125 125 — — — — — — 
(a)    No amounts were classified as investing cash flows from operating leases for the year ended December 31, 2020.
(b)    Does not include ROU assets recorded as a result of the adoption of the new lease standard.
December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Weighted average remaining lease
term (years)
Operating leases 9 9 8 10 7 16 16 4
Finance leases 10 18 13 13 11 — 24 — 
Weighted average discount rate
Operating leases 3.6 % 3.5 % 3.6 % 3.4 % 3.8 % 4.2 % 4.1 % 3.6 %
Finance leases 7.3 % 11.6 % 9.0 % 9.0 % 8.2 % — % 11.9 % — %
(a)    The discount rate is calculated using the rate implicit in a lease if it is readily determinable. Generally, the rate used by the lessor is not provided
to Duke Energy and in these cases the incremental borrowing rate is used. Duke Energy will typically use its fully collateralized incremental
borrowing rate as of the commencement date to calculate and record the lease. The incremental borrowing rate is influenced by the
lessee’s credit rating and lease term and as such may differ for individual leases, embedded leases or portfolios of leased assets.
December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Weighted average remaining
lease term (years)
Operating leases 10 9 10 12 8 17 18 5
Finance leases 13 19 15 17 11 — 25 — 
Weighted average discount
rate
Operating leases 3.8 % 3.4 % 3.8 % 3.9 % 3.8 % 4.2 % 4.2 % 3.6 %
Finance leases 8.4 % 11.6 % 11.9 % 12.4 % 8.2 % — % 11.9 % — %
(a)    The discount rate is calculated using the rate implicit in a lease if it is readily determinable. Generally, the rate used by the lessor is not provided
to Duke Energy and in these cases the incremental borrowing rate is used. Duke Energy will typically use its fully collateralized incremental
borrowing rate as of the commencement date to calculate and record the lease. The incremental borrowing rate is influenced by the
lessee’s credit rating and lease term and as such may differ for individual leases, embedded leases or portfolios of leased assets.(a)
(b)
(a)
(a)
163
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS DEBT AND CREDIT FACILITIES
6. DEBT AND CREDIT FACILITIES
Summary of Debt and Related Terms
The following tables summarize outstanding debt.
 December 31, 2021
Weighted
Average Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Interest Duke EnergyProgress Energy EnergyEnergy Energy
(in millions) Rate EnergyCarolinas EnergyProgress Florida Ohio IndianaPiedmont
Unsecured debt, maturing 2022-2082 3.71 %$24,564 $ 1,150 $ 2,250 $ — $ 150 $1,330 $ 700 $ 2,990 
Secured debt, maturing 2022-2052 2.50 % 5,584 1,094 2,397 1,120 1,278 — — — 
First mortgage bonds, maturing 2022-
2051 3.87 % 31,026 10,507 15,450 8,375 7,075 1,850 3,219 — 
Finance leases, maturing 2022-2051 5.81 % 915 289 690 629 61 — 10 — 
Tax-exempt bonds, maturing 2027-
2041 0.65 % 360 — 48 48 — 27 285 — 
Notes payable and commercial
paper 0.35 % 3,929 — — — — — — — 
Money pool/intercompany borrowings — 526 2,959 322 199 128 150 518 
Fair value hedge carrying value
adjustment  4 4 — — — — — — 
Unamortized debt discount and
premium, net  1,119 (21) (34) (19) (14) (27) (18) (6)
Unamortized debt issuance costs (362) (67) (128) (54) (68) (13) (23) (16)
Total debt 3.50 %$67,139 $ 13,482 $23,632 $10,421 $8,681 $3,295 $4,323 $ 3,486 
Short-term notes payable and
commercial paper  (3,304) — — — — — — — 
Short-term money pool/intercompany
borrowings — (226) (2,809) (172) (199) (103) — (518)
Current maturities of long-term debt (3,387) (362) (1,082) (556) (76) — (84) — 
Total long-term debt $60,448 $ 12,894 $19,741 $ 9,693 $8,406 $3,192 $4,239 $ 2,968 
(a) Substantially all electric utility property is mortgaged under mortgage bond indentures.
(b) Duke Energy includes $256 million of finance lease purchase accounting adjustments related to Duke Energy Florida related to PPAs that
are not accounted for as finance leases in their respective financial statements because of grandfathering provisions in GAAP.
(c) Substantially all tax-exempt bonds are secured by first mortgage bonds, letters of credit or the Master Credit Facility.
(d) Includes $625 million classified as Long-Term Debt on the Consolidated Balance Sheets due to the existence of long-term credit facilities
that backstop these commercial paper balances, along with Duke Energy’s ability and intent to refinance these balances on a long-term
basis. The weighted average days to maturity for Duke Energy's commercial paper program was 15 days.
(e) Duke Energy includes $1,121 million and $100 million in purchase accounting adjustments related to Progress Energy and Piedmont,
respectively.
(f) Duke Energy includes $29 million in purchase accounting adjustments primarily related to the merger with Progress Energy.
(g) Refer to Note 17 for additional information on amounts from consolidated VIEs.(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
(f)
(g)
(g)
164
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS DEBT AND CREDIT FACILITIES
 December 31, 2020
Weighted
Average Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Interest Duke EnergyProgress Energy EnergyEnergy Energy
(in millions) Rate EnergyCarolinas EnergyProgress Florida Ohio IndianaPiedmont
Unsecured debt, maturing 2021-2078 3.71 %$23,669 $ 1,150 $ 3,150 $ 700 $ 350 $1,180 $ 403 $ 2,800 
Secured debt, maturing 2021-2052 2.67 % 4,270 543 1,584 252 1,332 — — — 
First mortgage bonds, maturing 2021-
2050 4.00 % 29,177 10,008 14,100 7,875 6,225 1,850 3,219 — 
Finance leases, maturing 2022-2051 6.96 % 845 294 377 296 81 — 10 — 
Tax-exempt bonds, maturing 2027-
2041 0.75 % 477 — 48 48 — 77 352 — 
Notes payable and commercial
paper 0.51 % 3,407 — — — — — — — 
Money pool/intercompany borrowings — 806 3,119 445 196 194 281 530 
Fair value hedge carrying value
adjustment  4 4 — — — — — — 
Unamortized debt discount and
premium, net  1,217 (20) (31) (19) (11) (29) (18) (5)
Unamortized debt issuance costs (330) (62) (113) (44) (62) (14) (25) (15)
Total debt 3.62 %$62,736 $ 12,723 $22,234 $ 9,553 $8,111 $3,258 $4,222 $ 3,310 
Short-term notes payable and
commercial paper  (2,873) — — — — — — — 
Short-term money pool/intercompany
borrowings — (506) (2,969) (295) (196) (169) (131) (530)
Current maturities of long-term debt (4,238) (506) (1,426) (603) (823) (50) (70) (160)
Total long-term debt $55,625 $ 11,711 $17,839 $ 8,655 $7,092 $3,039 $4,021 $ 2,620 
(a)    Substantially all electric utility property is mortgaged under mortgage bond indentures.
(b)    Duke Energy includes $24 million and $341 million of finance lease purchase accounting adjustments related to Duke Energy Progress and
Duke Energy Florida, respectively, related to PPAs that are not accounted for as finance leases in their respective financial statements
because of grandfathering provisions in GAAP.
(c)    Substantially all tax-exempt bonds are secured by first mortgage bonds, letters of credit or the Master Credit Facility.
(d)    Includes $625 million that was classified as Long-Term Debt on the Consolidated Balance Sheets due to the existence of long-term credit
facilities that backstop these commercial paper balances, along with Duke Energy’s ability and intent to refinance these balances on a
long-term basis. The weighted average days to maturity for Duke Energy's commercial paper programs was 23 days.
(e)    Duke Energy includes $1,196 million and $117 million in purchase accounting adjustments related to Progress Energy and Piedmont,
respectively.
(f)    Duke Energy includes $33 million in purchase accounting adjustments primarily related to the merger with Progress Energy.
(g)     Refer to Note 17 for additional information on amounts from consolidated VIEs.
Current Maturities of Long-Term Debt
The following table shows the significant components of Current maturities of Long-Term Debt on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. The Duke
Energy Registrants currently anticipate satisfying these obligations with cash on hand and proceeds from additional borrowings.
(in millions) Maturity Date Interest Rate December 31, 2021
Unsecured Debt
Duke Energy (Parent) March 2022 3.227 % 300 
Duke Energy (Parent) March 2022 0.851 % 300 
Progress Energy April 2022 3.150 % 450 
Duke Energy (Parent) August 2022 3.050 % 500 
Duke Energy (Parent) August 2022 2.400 % 500 
First Mortgage Bonds
Duke Energy Indiana January 2022 8.850 % 53 
Duke Energy Carolinas May 2022 3.350 % 350 
Duke Energy Progress May 2022 2.800 % 500 
Other 434 
Current maturities of long-term debt $ 3,387 
(a)    In December 2021, Duke Energy Progress early retired $700 million of unsecured debt with an original maturity date of February 2022.
(b)    Debt has a floating interest rate.
(c)    Includes finance lease obligations, amortizing debt and small bullet maturities.(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
(f)
(g)
(g)
(a)
(b)
(c)
165
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS DEBT AND CREDIT FACILITIES
Maturities and Call Options
The following table shows the annual maturities of long-term debt for the next five years and thereafter. Amounts presented exclude short-term notes
payable, commercial paper and money pool borrowings and debt issuance costs for the Subsidiary Registrants.
 December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
2022 $ 3,387 $ 362 $ 1,082 $ 556 $ 76 $ — $ 84 $ — 
2023 4,725 1,018 1,046 719 327 475 303 45 
2024 1,917 19 138 72 66 — 4 40 
2025 3,078 496 639 575 64 245 4 205 
2026 3,125 921 310 229 81 70 154 40 
Thereafter 46,844 10,528 17,766 8,168 7,949 2,442 3,814 2,660 
Total long-term debt, including current
maturities $63,076 $ 13,344 $20,981 $10,319 $8,563 $3,232 $4,363 $ 2,990 
(a)    Excludes $1,250 million in purchase accounting adjustments related to the Progress Energy merger and the Piedmont acquisition.
The Duke Energy Registrants have the ability under certain debt facilities to call and repay the obligation prior to its scheduled maturity. Therefore,
the actual timing of future cash repayments could be materially different than as presented above.
Short-Term Obligations Classified as Long-Term Debt
Tax-exempt bonds that may be put to the Duke Energy Registrants at the option of the holder and certain commercial paper issuances and money
pool borrowings are classified as Long-Term Debt on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. These tax-exempt bonds, commercial paper issuances and
money pool borrowings, which are short-term obligations by nature, are classified as long-term due to Duke Energy’s intent and ability to utilize such
borrowings as long-term financing. As Duke Energy’s Master Credit Facility and other bilateral letter of credit agreements have non-cancelable terms
in excess of one year as of the balance sheet date, Duke Energy has the ability to refinance these short-term obligations on a long-term basis. The
following tables show short-term obligations classified as long-term debt.
 December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Progress Ohio Indiana
Tax-exempt bonds $ 312 $ — $ — $ 27 $ 285 
Commercial paper 625 300 150 25 150 
Total $ 937 $ 300 $ 150 $ 52 $ 435 
 December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Progress Ohio Indiana
Tax-exempt bonds $ 312 $ — $ — $ 27 $ 285 
Commercial paper 625 300 150 25 150 
Total $ 937 $ 300 $ 150 $ 52 $ 435 
(a)    Progress Energy amounts are equal to Duke Energy Progress amounts.(a)
(a)
(a)
166
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS DEBT AND CREDIT FACILITIES
Summary of Significant Debt Issuances
The following tables summarize significant debt issuances (in millions).
Year Ended December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke
Maturity Interest Duke Energy Energy Energy Energy
Issuance Date Date Rate Energy (Parent) Carolinas Progress Florida Piedmont
Unsecured Debt
March 2021 March 2031 2.500 %$ 350 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 350 
June 2021 June 2023 0.299 % 500 500 — — — — 
June 2021 June 2031 2.550 % 1,000 1,000 — — — — 
June 2021 June 2041 3.300 % 750 750 — — — — 
June 2021 June 2051 3.500 % 750 750 — — — — 
September 2021 January 2082 3.250 % 500 500 
Secured Debt
November 2021 July 2031 1.679 % 100 — 100 — — — 
November 2021 July 2041 2.617 % 137 — 137 — — — 
November 2021 July 2028 1.295 % 221 — — 221 — — 
November 2021 July 2037 2.387 % 352 — — 352 — — 
November 2021 July 2041 2.799 % 197 — — 197 — — 
First Mortgage Bonds
April 2021 April 2031 2.550 % 550 — 550 — — — 
April 2021 April 2051 3.450 % 450 — 450 — — — 
August 2021 August 2031 2.000 % 650 — — 650 — — 
August 2021 August 2051 2.900 % 450 — — 450 — — 
December 2021 December 2031 2.400 % 650 — — — 650 — 
December 2021 December 2051 3.000 % 500 — — — 500 — 
Total issuances $ 8,107 $3,500 $ 1,237 $ 1,870 $1,150 $ 350 
(a) Debt issued to repay at maturity $160 million senior unsecured notes due June 2021, pay down short-term debt and for general corporate
purposes.
(b) Debt has a floating interest rate.
(c) Debt issued to repay $1.75 billion of Duke Energy (Parent) debt maturities, to repay a portion of short-term debt and for general corporate
purposes.
(d) Debt issued to repay in October 2021 $500 million of Duke Energy (Parent) unsecured notes. The interest rate resets every five years.
(e) Debt issued to finance the North Carolina portion of storm restoration expenditures related to Hurricane Florence, Hurricane Michael,
Hurricane Dorian and Winter Storm Diego.
(f) Debt issued to repay at maturity $500 million first mortgage bonds due June 2021, pay down short-term debt and for general company
purposes.
(g) Debt issued to repay at maturity a total of $600 million first mortgage bonds due September 2021, pay down short-term debt and for
general company purposes.
(h) Proceeds will be used to finance or refinance, in whole or in part, existing or new eligible projects under the sustainable financing
framework.a)
(b)(c)
(c)
(c)
(c)
(d)
(e)
(e)
(e)
(e)
(e)
(f)
(f)
(g)
(g)
(h)
(h)
167
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS DEBT AND CREDIT FACILITIES
Year Ended December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Maturity Interest Duke Energy Energy Energy Energy Energy Energy
Issuance Date Date RateEnergy (Parent)Carolinas Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Unsecured Debt
May 2020 June 2030 2.450 %$500 $ 500 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
May 2020 June 2050 3.350 % 400 — — — — — — 400 
August 2020 February 2022 0.400 % 700 — — 700 — — — — 
September
2020 September 2025 0.900 % 650 650 — — — — — — 
September
2020 June 2030 2.450 % 350 350 — — — — — — 
First Mortgage Bonds
January 2020 February 2030 2.450 % 500 — 500 — — — — — 
January 2020 August 2049 3.200 % 400 — 400 — — — — — 
March 2020 April 2050 2.750 % 550 — — — — — 550 — 
May 2020 June 2030 2.125 % 400 — — — — 400 — — 
June 2020 June 2030 1.750 % 500 — — — 500 — — — 
August 2020 August 2050 2.500 % 600 — — 600 — — — — 
Total issuances $5,550 $1,500 $ 900 $ 1,300 $500 $ 400 $ 550 $ 400 
(a) Debt issued to repay $500 million borrowing made under Duke Energy (Parent) revolving credit facility in March 2020, and for general
corporate purposes.
(b) Debt issued to repay short-term debt and for general corporate purposes.
(c) Debt issued to repay $700 million term loan due December 2020.
(d) Debt issuance has a floating interest rate.
(e) Debt issued to repay a portion of outstanding commercial paper, to repay a portion of Duke Energy (Parent)'s outstanding $1.7 billion term
loan due March 2021 and for general corporate purposes.
(f) Debt issued to repay at maturity $450 million first mortgage bonds due June 2020 and for general corporate purposes.
(g) Debt issued to repay at maturity $500 million first mortgage bonds due July 2020 and to pay down short-term debt.
(h) Debt issued to repay at maturity $300 million first mortgage bonds due September 2020 and for general corporate purposes.
AVAILABLE CREDIT FACILITIES
Master Credit Facility
In March 2021, Duke Energy amended its existing $8 billion Master Credit Facility to extend the termination date to March 2026. The Duke Energy
Registrants, excluding Progress Energy, have borrowing capacity under the Master Credit Facility up to a specified sublimit for each borrower. Duke
Energy has the unilateral ability at any time to increase or decrease the borrowing sublimits of each borrower, subject to a maximum sublimit for each
borrower. The amount available under the Master Credit Facility has been reduced to backstop issuances of commercial paper, certain letters of
credit and variable-rate demand tax-exempt bonds that may be put to the Duke Energy Registrants at the option of the holder.
The table below includes the current borrowing sublimits and available capacity under these credit facilities.
 December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Energy Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy (Parent) Carolinas Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Facility size $8,000 $2,650 $ 1,225 $ 1,150 $ 900 $ 775 $ 600 $ 700 
Reduction to backstop issuances
Commercial paper (2,863) (1,128) (506) (307) (181) (119) (150) (472)
Outstanding letters of credit (38) (25) (4) (2) (7) — — — 
Tax-exempt bonds (81) — — — — — (81) — 
Available capacity $5,018 $1,497 $ 715 $ 841 $ 712 $ 656 $ 369 $ 228 
(a)    Represents the sublimit of each borrower.
(b)    Duke Energy issued $625 million of commercial paper and loaned the proceeds through the money pool to Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke
Energy Progress, Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana. The balances are classified as Long-Term Debt Payable to Affiliated
Companies in the Consolidated Balance Sheets.(a)
(b)
(c)(d)
(e)
(e)
(f)
(f)
(g)
(b)
(b)
(h)
(a)
(b)
168
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS DEBT AND CREDIT FACILITIES
Three-Year Revolving Credit Facility
Duke Energy (Parent) has a $1 billion revolving credit facility. In March 2021, Duke Energy extended the termination date of the facility from May
2022 to May 2024. Borrowings under this facility will be used for general corporate purposes. As of December 31, 2021, $500 million has been drawn
under this facility. This balance is classified as Long-term debt on Duke Energy's Consolidated Balance Sheets. Any undrawn commitments can be
drawn, and borrowings can be prepaid, at any time throughout the term of the facility. During the first quarter of 2020, an additional $500 million was
drawn under this facility to manage liquidity impacts from COVID-19. The additional $500 million was paid down during the second quarter of 2020.
The terms and conditions of the facility are generally consistent with those governing Duke Energy's Master Credit Facility.
Duke Energy Ohio Term Loan Facility
In October 2021, Duke Energy Ohio entered into a two-year term loan facility with commitments totaling $100 million. Borrowings under the facility
will be used to pay down short-term debt and for general corporate purposes. The term loan was fully drawn at the time of closing in October. The
balance is classified as Long-Term Debt on Duke Energy Ohio’s Consolidated Balance Sheets.
Duke Energy Indiana Term Loan Facility
In October 2021, Duke Energy Indiana entered into a two-year term loan facility with commitments totaling $300 million. Borrowings under the facility
will be used to pay down short-term debt and for general corporate purposes. The term loan was fully drawn at the time of closing in October. The
balance is classified as Long-Term Debt on Duke Energy Indiana’s Consolidated Balance Sheets.
Duke Energy Kentucky Term Loan Facility
In October 2021, Duke Energy Kentucky entered into a two-year term loan facility with commitments totaling $50 million. Borrowings under the facility
will be used to pay down short-term debt and for general corporate purposes. The term loan was fully drawn at the time of closing in October. The
balance is classified as Long-Term Debt on Duke Energy Ohio’s Consolidated Balance Sheets.
Other Debt Matters
In September 2019, Duke Energy filed a Form S-3 with the SEC. Under this Form S-3, which is uncapped, the Duke Energy Registrants, excluding
Progress Energy, may issue debt and other securities, including preferred stock, in the future at amounts, prices and with terms to be determined at
the time of future offerings. The registration statement was filed to replace a similar prior filing upon expiration of its three-year term and also allows
for the issuance of common and preferred stock by Duke Energy.
Duke Energy has an effective Form S-3 with the SEC to sell up to $3 billion of variable denomination floating-rate demand notes, called
PremierNotes. The Form S-3 states that no more than $1.5 billion of the notes will be outstanding at any particular time. The notes are offered on a
continuous basis and bear interest at a floating rate per annum determined by the Duke Energy PremierNotes Committee, or its designee, on a
weekly basis. The interest rate payable on notes held by an investor may vary based on the principal amount of the investment. The notes have no
stated maturity date, are non-transferable and may be redeemed in whole or in part by Duke Energy or at the investor’s option at any time. The
balance as of December 31, 2021, and 2020, was $1,066 million and $1,168 million, respectively. The notes are short-term debt obligations of Duke
Energy and are reflected as Notes payable and commercial paper on Duke Energy’s Consolidated Balance Sheets.
Money Pool and Intercompany Credit Agreements
The Subsidiary Registrants, excluding Progress Energy, are eligible to receive support for their short-term borrowing needs through participation with
Duke Energy and certain of its subsidiaries in a money pool arrangement. Under this arrangement, those companies with short-term funds may
provide short-term loans to affiliates participating in this arrangement. The money pool is structured such that the Subsidiary Registrants, excluding
Progress Energy, separately manage their cash needs and working capital requirements. Accordingly, there is no net settlement of receivables and
payables between money pool participants. Duke Energy (Parent), may loan funds to its participating subsidiaries, but may not borrow funds through
the money pool. Accordingly, as the money pool activity is between Duke Energy and its wholly owned subsidiaries, all money pool balances are
eliminated within Duke Energy’s Consolidated Balance Sheets.
Money pool receivable balances are reflected within Notes receivable from affiliated companies on the Subsidiary Registrants’ Consolidated Balance
Sheets. Money pool payable balances are reflected within either Notes payable to affiliated companies or Long-Term Debt Payable to Affiliated
Companies on the Subsidiary Registrants’ Consolidated Balance Sheets.
Progress Energy has a revolving credit agreement with Duke Energy (Parent) which allows up to $2.5 billion in intercompany borrowings. The
balance is reflected within Notes payable to affiliated companies on the Progress Energy Consolidated Balance Sheets.
Restrictive Debt Covenants
The Duke Energy Registrants’ debt and credit agreements contain various financial and other covenants. Duke Energy's Master Credit Facility
contains a covenant requiring the debt-to-total capitalization ratio not to exceed 65% for each borrower, excluding Piedmont, and 70% for Piedmont.
Failure to meet those covenants beyond applicable grace periods could result in accelerated due dates and/or termination of the agreements. As of
December 31, 2021, each of the Duke Energy Registrants was in compliance with all covenants related to their debt agreements. In addition, some
credit agreements may allow for acceleration of payments or termination of the agreements due to nonpayment, or acceleration of other significant
indebtedness of the borrower or some of its subsidiaries. None of the debt or credit agreements contain material adverse change clauses.
Other Loans
As of December 31, 2021, and 2020, Duke Energy had loans outstanding of $819 million, including $34 million at Duke Energy Progress and $817
million, including $35 million at Duke Energy Progress, respectively, against the cash surrender value of life insurance policies it owns on the lives of
its executives. The amounts outstanding were carried as a reduction of the related cash surrender value that is included in Other within Other
Noncurrent Assets on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
169
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS GUARANTEES AND INDEMNIFICATIONS
7. GUARANTEES AND INDEMNIFICATIONS
Duke Energy has various financial and performance guarantees and indemnifications with non-consolidated entities, which are issued in the normal
course of business. As discussed below, these contracts include performance guarantees, standby letters of credit, debt guarantees and
indemnifications. Duke Energy enters into these arrangements to facilitate commercial transactions with third parties by enhancing the value of the
transaction to the third party. At December 31, 2021, Duke Energy does not believe conditions are likely for significant performance under these
guarantees. To the extent liabilities are incurred as a result of the activities covered by the guarantees, such liabilities are included on the
accompanying Consolidated Balance Sheets.
On January 2, 2007, Duke Energy completed the spin-off of its previously wholly owned natural gas businesses to shareholders. Guarantees issued
by Duke Energy or its affiliates, or assigned to Duke Energy prior to the spin-off, remained with Duke Energy subsequent to the spin-off. Guarantees
issued by Spectra Energy Capital, LLC (Spectra Capital) or its affiliates prior to the spin-off remained with Spectra Capital subsequent to the spin-off,
except for guarantees that were later assigned to Duke Energy. Duke Energy has indemnified Spectra Capital against any losses incurred under
certain of the guarantee obligations that remain with Spectra Capital. At December 31, 2021, the maximum potential amount of future payments
associated with these guarantees were $48 million, the majority of which expire by 2028.
In October 2017, ACP executed a $3.4 billion revolving credit facility with a stated maturity date of October 2021. Duke Energy entered into a
guarantee agreement to support its share of the ACP revolving credit facility. In July 2020, ACP reduced the size of the credit facility to $1.9 billion.
Duke Energy's maximum exposure to loss under the terms of the guarantee was $860 million as of December 31, 2020. This amount represented
47% of the outstanding borrowings under the credit facility and was recognized within Other Current Liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheets at
December 31, 2020, of which $95 million was previously recognized due the adoption of new guidance for credit losses effective January 1, 2020. In
February 2021, Duke Energy paid approximately $855 million to fund ACP's outstanding debt, relieving Duke Energy of its guarantee. See Notes 3
and 12 for more information.
In addition to the Spectra Capital and ACP revolving credit facility guarantees above, Duke Energy has issued performance guarantees to customers
and other third parties that guarantee the payment and performance of other parties, including certain non-wholly owned entities, as well as
guarantees of debt of certain non-consolidated entities. If such entities were to default on payments or performance, Duke Energy would be required
under the guarantees to make payments on the obligations of these entities. The maximum potential amount of future payments required under these
guarantees as of December 31, 2021, was $53 million of which all expire between 2022 and 2030, with the remaining performance guarantees
having no contractual expiration. Additionally, certain guarantees have uncapped maximum potential payments; however, Duke Energy does not
believe these guarantees will have a material effect on its results of operations, cash flows or financial position.
Duke Energy uses bank-issued standby letters of credit to secure the performance of wholly owned and non-wholly owned entities to a third party or
customer. Under these arrangements, Duke Energy has payment obligations to the issuing bank that are triggered by a draw by the third party or
customer due to the failure of the wholly owned or non-wholly owned entity to perform according to the terms of its underlying contract. At
December 31, 2021, Duke Energy had issued a total of $586 million in letters of credit, which expire between 2022 and 2023. The unused amount
under these letters of credit was $54 million.
Duke Energy recognized $3 million and $11 million as of December 31, 2021, and 2020, respectively, primarily in Other within Other Noncurrent
Liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheets, for the guarantees discussed above. As current estimates change, additional losses related to
guarantees and indemnifications to third parties, which could be material, may be recorded by the Duke Energy Registrants in the future.
8. JOINT OWNERSHIP OF GENERATING AND TRANSMISSION FACILITIES
The Duke Energy Registrants maintain ownership interests in certain jointly owned generating and transmission facilities. The Duke Energy
Registrants are entitled to a share of the generating capacity and output of each unit equal to their respective ownership interests. The Duke Energy
Registrants pay their ownership share of additional construction costs, fuel inventory purchases and operating expenses. The Duke Energy
Registrants share of revenues and operating costs of the jointly owned facilities is included within the corresponding line in the Consolidated
Statements of Operations. Each participant in the jointly owned facilities must provide its own financing.
The following table presents the Duke Energy Registrants' interest of jointly owned plant or facilities and amounts included on the Consolidated
Balance Sheets. All facilities are operated by the Duke Energy Registrants and are included in the Electric Utilities and Infrastructure segment.
 December 31, 2021
Construction
Ownership Property, Plant Accumulated Work in
(in millions except for ownership interest) Interestand Equipment Depreciation Progress
Duke Energy Carolinas     
Catawba (units 1 and 2) 19.25 %$ 1,044 $ 525 $ 20 
W.S. Lee CC 87.27 % 632 67 3 
Duke Energy Indiana     
Gibson (unit 5) 50.05 % 440 221 3 
Vermillion 62.50 % 175 108 5 
Transmission and local facilities Various 6,164 1,477 190 
(a)    Jointly owned with North Carolina Municipal Power Agency Number 1, NCEMC and PMPA.
(b)    Jointly owned with NCEMC.
(c)    Jointly owned with WVPA and IMPA.
(d)    Jointly owned with WVPA.(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(c)
170
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS ASSET RETIREMENT OBLIGATIONS
9. ASSET RETIREMENT OBLIGATIONS
Duke Energy records an ARO when it has a legal obligation to incur retirement costs associated with the retirement of a long-lived asset and the
obligation can be reasonably estimated. Certain assets of the Duke Energy Registrants have an indeterminate life, such as transmission and
distribution facilities, and thus the fair value of the retirement obligation is not reasonably estimable. A liability for these AROs will be recorded when a
fair value is determinable.
The Duke Energy Registrants’ regulated operations accrue costs of removal for property that does not have an associated legal retirement obligation
based on regulatory orders from state commissions. These costs of removal are recorded as a regulatory liability in accordance with regulatory
accounting treatment. The Duke Energy Registrants do not accrue the estimated cost of removal for any nonregulated assets. See Note 3 for the
estimated cost of removal for assets without an associated legal retirement obligation, which are included in Regulatory liabilities on the Consolidated
Balance Sheets.
The following table presents the AROs recorded on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Decommissioning of nuclear power
facilities $7,046 $ 2,847 $ 4,156 $ 3,792 $ 364 $ — $ — $ — 
Closure of ash impoundments 5,293 2,390 1,872 1,839 33 82 949 — 
Other 437 64 84 44 40 54 38 22 
Total asset retirement obligation $12,776 $ 5,301 $ 6,112 $ 5,675 $ 437 $ 136 $ 987 $ 22 
Less: Current portion 647 249 275 274 1 13 110 — 
Total noncurrent asset retirement obligation$12,129 $ 5,052 $ 5,837 $ 5,401 $ 436 $ 123 $ 877 $ 22 
(a)    Duke Energy amount includes purchase accounting adjustments related to the merger with Progress Energy.
Nuclear Decommissioning Liability
AROs related to nuclear decommissioning are based on site-specific cost studies. The NCUC, PSCSC and FPSC require updated cost estimates for
decommissioning nuclear plants every five years.
The following table summarizes information about the most recent site-specific nuclear decommissioning cost studies. Decommissioning costs are
stated in 2018 or 2019 dollars, depending on the year of the cost study, and include costs to decommission plant components not subject to
radioactive contamination.
Annual Funding Decommissioning
(in millions) Requirement Costs Year of Cost Study
Duke Energy $ 15 $ 9,105 2018 or 2019
Duke Energy Carolinas — 4,365 2018
Duke Energy Progress 15 4,181 2019
Duke Energy Florida — 559 N/A
(a)    Amount represents annual funding requirement for the current fiscal year. Amounts for Progress Energy equal the sum of Duke Energy Progress
and Duke Energy Florida.
(b)    Decommissioning costs for Duke Energy Carolinas reflects its ownership interest in jointly owned reactors. Other joint owners are responsible
for decommissioning costs related to their interest in the reactors.
(c)    Duke Energy Carolinas' site-specific nuclear decommissioning cost study completed in 2018 was filed with the NCUC and PSCSC in 2019. A
new funding study was also completed and filed with the NCUC and PSCSC in 2019.
(d)    Duke Energy Progress' site-specific nuclear decommissioning cost study completed in 2019 was filed with the NCUC and PSCSC in March
2020. Duke Energy Progress also completed a funding study, which was filed with the NCUC and PSCSC in July 2020. In October 2021,
Duke Energy Progress filed the 2019 nuclear decommissioning cost study with the FERC, as well as a revised rate schedule for
decommissioning expense to be collected from wholesale customers. The FERC accepted the filing, as filed on December 9, 2021.
(e)    During 2019, Duke Energy Florida reached an agreement to transfer decommissioning work for Crystal River Unit 3 to a third party and
decommissioning costs are based on the agreement with this third party rather than a cost study. Regulatory approval was received from
the NRC and the FPSC in April 2020 and August 2020, respectively.
Nuclear Decommissioning Trust Funds
Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida each maintain NDTFs that are intended to pay for the decommissioning
costs of their respective nuclear power plants. The NDTF investments are managed and invested in accordance with applicable requirements of
various regulatory bodies including the NRC, FERC, NCUC, PSCSC, FPSC and the IRS.
Use of the NDTF investments is restricted to nuclear decommissioning activities including license termination, spent fuel and site restoration. The
license termination and spent fuel obligations relate to contaminated decommissioning and are recorded as AROs. The site restoration obligation
relates to non-contaminated decommissioning and is recorded to cost of removal within Regulatory liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.(a)
(a) (a)
(b)(c)
(d)
(e)
171
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS ASSET RETIREMENT OBLIGATIONS
The following table presents the fair value of NDTF assets legally restricted for purposes of settling AROs associated with nuclear decommissioning.
Duke Energy Florida entered into an agreement with a third party to decommission Crystal River Unit 3 and was granted an exemption from the NRC,
which allows for use of the NDTF for all aspects of nuclear decommissioning. The entire balance of Duke Energy Florida's NDTF may be applied
toward license termination, spent fuel and site restoration costs incurred to decommission Crystal River Unit 3 and is excluded from the table below.
See Note 16 for additional information related to the fair value of the Duke Energy Registrants' NDTFs.
December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020
Duke Energy $ 8,933 $ 7,726 
Duke Energy Carolinas 5,068 4,381 
Duke Energy Progress 3,865 3,345 
Nuclear Operating Licenses
As described in Note 3, Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress intend to seek renewal of operating licenses and 20-year license
extensions for all of their nuclear stations. The following table includes the current expiration of nuclear operating licenses.
Unit Year of Expiration
Duke Energy Carolinas
Catawba Units 1 and 2 2043
McGuire Unit 1 2041
McGuire Unit 2 2043
Oconee Units 1 and 2 2033
Oconee Unit 3 2034
Duke Energy Progress
Brunswick Unit 1 2036
Brunswick Unit 2 2034
Harris 2046
Robinson 2030
The NRC has acknowledged permanent cessation of operation and permanent removal of fuel from the reactor vessel at Crystal River Unit 3.
Therefore, the license no longer authorizes operation of the reactor. During 2019, Duke Energy Florida entered into an agreement for the accelerated
decommissioning of Crystal River Unit 3. Regulatory approval was received from the NRC and the FPSC in April 2020 and August 2020, respectively.
See Note 3 for more information.
Closure of Ash Impoundments
The Duke Energy Registrants are subject to state and federal regulations covering the closure of coal ash impoundments, including the EPA CCR
rule and the Coal Ash Act, and other agreements. AROs recorded on the Duke Energy Registrants' Consolidated Balance Sheets include the legal
obligation for closure of coal ash basins and the disposal of related ash as a result of these regulations and agreements.
The ARO amount recorded on the Consolidated Balance Sheets is based upon estimated closure costs for impacted ash impoundments. The amount
recorded represents the discounted cash flows for estimated closure costs based upon specific closure plans. Actual costs to be incurred will be
dependent upon factors that vary from site to site. The most significant factors are the method and time frame of closure at the individual sites.
Closure methods considered include removing the water from ash basins, consolidating material as necessary and capping the ash with a synthetic
barrier, excavating and relocating the ash to a lined structural fill or lined landfill or recycling the ash for concrete or some other beneficial use. The
ultimate method and timetable for closure will be in compliance with standards set by federal and state regulations and other agreements. The ARO
amount will be adjusted as additional information is gained through the closure and post-closure process, including acceptance and approval of
compliance approaches, which may change management assumptions, and may result in a material change to the balance. See ARO Liability
Rollforward section below for information on revisions made to the coal ash liability during 2021 and 2020.
Asset retirement costs associated with the AROs for operating plants and retired plants are included in Net property, plant and equipment and
Regulatory assets, respectively, on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. See Note 3 for additional information on Regulatory assets related to AROs
and Note 4 for additional information on commitments and contingencies.
Cost recovery for future expenditures will be pursued through the normal ratemaking process with federal and state utility commissions, which permit
recovery of necessary and prudently incurred costs associated with Duke Energy’s regulated operations. See Note 3 for additional information on
recovery of coal ash costs.
172
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS ASSET RETIREMENT OBLIGATIONS
ARO Liability Rollforward
The following tables present changes in the liability associated with AROs.
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Balance at December 31, 2019 $13,318 $ 5,734 $ 6,471 $ 5,893 $ 578 $ 80 $ 832 $ 17 
Accretion expense 542 258 246 225 21 4 33 1 
Liabilities settled (724) (198) (451) (358) (93) (2) (74) — 
Liabilities incurred in the current year 22 — 5 — 5 — — — 
Revisions in estimates of cash
flows (154) (444) (122) (125) 3 29 385 2 
Balance at December 31, 2020 13,004 5,350 6,149 5,635 514 111 1,176 20 
Accretion expense 512 242 229 212 17 4 35 1 
Liabilities settled (613) (210) (324) (214) (110) (3) (77) — 
Liabilities incurred in the current year 32 8 6 — 6 — — — 
Revisions in estimates of cash
flows (159) (89) 52 42 10 24 (147) 1 
Balance at December 31, 2021 $12,776 $ 5,301 $ 6,112 $ 5,675 $ 437 $ 136 $ 987 $ 22 
(a)    Substantially all accretion expense for the years ended December 31, 2021, and 2020, relates to Duke Energy’s regulated operations and has
been deferred in accordance with regulatory accounting treatment.
(b)    Amounts primarily relate to ash impoundment closures and nuclear decommissioning.
(c)    Primarily relates to decreases due to revised basin closure cost estimates, partially offset by increases related to new closure plan approvals,
post closure maintenance and beneficiation costs. Duke Energy Indiana estimates also include the impacts of closure estimates for certain
ash impoundments due to the impact of Hoosier Environmental Council’s petition filed with the court challenging the Indiana Department of
Environmental Management’s partial approval of Duke Energy Indiana’s ash pond closure plan. See Note 4 for more information on
Hoosier Environmental Council's petition. The amounts recorded represent the discounted cash flows for estimated closure costs based
upon the probability weightings of the potential closure methods as evaluated on a site-by-site basis.(a)
(b)
(c)
(a)
(b)
(c)
173
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS PROPERTY, PLANT AND EQUIPMENT
10. PROPERTY, PLANT AND EQUIPMENT
The following tables summarize the property, plant and equipment for Duke Energy and its subsidiary registrants.
December 31, 2021
Average
Remaining Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Useful Life Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) (Years) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio IndianaPiedmont
Land $2,162 $ 543 $ 957 $ 482 $ 475 $219 $ 122 $ 279 
Plant – Regulated
Electric generation,
distribution and
transmission 40 120,855 44,910 53,447 32,417 21,030 6,573 15,925 — 
Natural gas
transmission and
distribution 54 12,079 — — — — 3,347 — 8,732 
Other buildings and
improvements 37 1,921 550 514 228 286 381 321 155 
Plant – Nonregulated  
Electric generation,
distribution and
transmission 28 7,104 — — — — — — — 
Other buildings and
improvements 11 401 — — — — — — — 
Nuclear fuel 3,181 1,856 1,325 1,325 — — — — 
Equipment 13 2,659 614 791 497 294 403 262 122 
Construction in process 6,168 2,078 2,297 954 1,343 515 460 262 
Other 14 5,289 1,323 1,563 1,115 437 287 253 368 
Total property, plant and
equipment 161,819 51,874 60,894 37,018 23,865 11,725 17,343 9,918 
Total accumulated
depreciation – regulated (47,611) (17,854) (19,214) (13,387) (5,819) (3,106) (5,583) (1,899)
Total accumulated
depreciation – nonregulated(2,944) — — — — — — — 
Facilities to be retired, net 144 102 26 26 — 6 — 11 
Total net property, plant and
equipment $111,408 $34,122 $41,706 $23,657 $18,046 $8,625 $11,760 $ 8,030 
(a)    Includes finance leases of $958 million, $335 million, $729 million, $627 million, $102 million and $10 million at Duke Energy, Duke Energy
Carolinas, Progress Energy, Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Florida and Duke Energy Indiana, respectively, primarily within Plant –
Regulated. The Progress Energy, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida amounts are net of $178 million, $45 million and $133
million, respectively, of accumulated amortization of finance leases.
(b)    Includes $1,799 million, $1,064 million, $735 million and $735 million of accumulated amortization of nuclear fuel at Duke Energy, Duke Energy
Carolinas, Progress Energy and Duke Energy Progress, respectively.
(c)    Includes accumulated amortization of finance leases of $9 million, $33 million and $3 million at Duke Energy, Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke
Energy Indiana, respectively.
(d)    Includes accumulated amortization of finance leases of ($1 million) at Duke Energy.
(e)    Includes gross property, plant and equipment cost of consolidated VIEs of $7,339 million and accumulated depreciation of consolidated VIEs of
$1,474 million at Duke Energy.
Duke Energy continues to execute on its business transformation strategy, including the evaluation of in-office work policies considering the
experience with the COVID-19 pandemic and also workforce realignment of roles and responsibilities. In May 2021, Duke Energy management
approved the sale of certain properties and entered into an agreement to exit certain leased space on December 31, 2021. The sale of the properties
is subject to abandonment accounting and resulted in an impairment charge. Additionally, the exit of the leased space resulted in the impairment of
related furniture, fixtures and equipment. During the 12 months ended December 31, 2021, Duke Energy recorded a pretax charge to earnings of
$192 million on the Consolidated Statements of Operations, which includes $133 million within Impairment of assets and other charges, $42 million
within Operations, maintenance and other and $17 million within Depreciation and amortization.
In 2021, Duke Energy continued to monitor recoverability of its renewable merchant plants located in the Electric Reliability Council of Texas West
market and in the PJM West market due to fluctuating market pricing and long-term forecasted energy prices. The assets were not impaired as of
December 31, 2021, because the carrying value of approximately $200 million continues to approximate the aggregate estimated future
undiscounted cash flows. A continued decline in energy market pricing or other factors unfavorably impacting the economics would likely result in a
future impairment. Duke Energy retained 51% ownership interest in these facilities following the 2019 transaction to sell a minority interest in certain
renewable assets. See Note 1 for further information.(a)(e)
(b)(c)
(d)
(e)
174
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS PROPERTY, PLANT AND EQUIPMENT
December 31, 2020
Average
Remaining Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Useful Life Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) (Years) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio IndianaPiedmont
Land $2,046 $ 536 $ 908 $ 463 $ 445 $171 $ 118 $ 279 
Plant – Regulated
Electric generation,
distribution and
transmission 39 117,107 44,059 50,785 31,375 19,410 6,255 16,008 — 
Natural gas
transmission and
distribution 54 10,799 — — — — 3,136 — 7,663 
Other buildings and
improvements 36 2,038 740 459 197 262 374 300 165 
Plant – Nonregulated
Electric generation,
distribution and
transmission 27 5,444 — — — — — — — 
Other buildings and
improvements 10 519 — — — — — — — 
Nuclear fuel 3,284 1,837 1,447 1,447 — — — — 
Equipment 15 2,608 620 759 498 261 385 238 122 
Construction in process 6,645 1,645 2,013 709 1,304 407 409 581 
Other 14 5,090 1,203 1,521 1,070 441 294 309 324 
Total property, plant and
equipment 155,580 50,640 57,892 35,759 22,123 11,022 17,382 9,134 
Total accumulated
depreciation – regulated (46,216) (17,453) (18,368) (12,801) (5,560) (3,013) (5,661) (1,749)
Total accumulated
depreciation – nonregulated(2,611) — — — — — — — 
Facilities to be retired, net 29 — 29 29 — — — — 
Total net property, plant and
equipment $106,782 $33,187 $39,553 $22,987 $16,563 $8,009 $11,721 $ 7,385 
(a)    Includes finance leases of $832 million, $335 million, $416 million, $297 million, $119 million, and $10 million at Duke Energy, Duke Energy
Carolinas, Progress Energy, Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Florida and Duke Energy Indiana, respectively, primarily within Plant –
Regulated. The Progress Energy, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida amounts are net of $141 million, $24 million and $117
million, respectively, of accumulated amortization of finance leases.
(b)    Includes $1,832 million, $1,010 million, $822 million and $822 million of accumulated amortization of nuclear fuel at Duke Energy, Duke Energy
Carolinas, Progress Energy and Duke Energy Progress, respectively.
(c)    Includes accumulated amortization of finance leases of $12 million, $23 million, and $3 million at Duke Energy, Duke Energy Carolinas and
Duke Energy Indiana, respectively.
(d)    Includes accumulated amortization of finance leases of $23 million at Duke Energy.
(e)    Includes gross property, plant and equipment cost of consolidated VIEs of $6,394 million and accumulated depreciation of consolidated VIEs of
$1,242 million at Duke Energy.
The following table presents capitalized interest, which includes the debt component of AFUDC.
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 2019
Duke Energy $ 72 $ 112 $ 159 
Duke Energy Carolinas 29 28 30 
Progress Energy 20 17 31 
Duke Energy Progress 14 12 28 
Duke Energy Florida 6 5 3 
Duke Energy Ohio 20 26 22 
Duke Energy Indiana (17) 10 26 
Piedmont 9 8 26 
(a)    Duke Energy Indiana is primarily compromised of ($24 million) of PISCC amortization, which is partially offset by $7 million of the debt
component of AFUDC.(a)(e)
(b)(c)
(d)
(e)
(a)
175
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS GOODWILL AND INTANGIBLE ASSETS
11. GOODWILL AND INTANGIBLE ASSETS
GOODWILL
Duke Energy
The following table presents goodwill by reportable segment for Duke Energy included on Duke Energy's Consolidated Balance Sheets at
December 31, 2021, and 2020.
Electric Utilities Gas Utilities Commercial
(in millions) and Infrastructure and Infrastructure Renewables Total
Goodwill Balance at December 31, 2020 $ 17,379 $ 1,924 $ 122 $ 19,425 
Accumulated impairment charges — — (122) (122)
Goodwill balance at December 31, 2020, adjusted for
accumulated impairment charges $ 17,379 $ 1,924 $ — $ 19,303 
Goodwill Balance at December 31, 2021 $ 17,379 $ 1,924 $ 122 $ 19,425 
Accumulated impairment charges — — (122) (122)
Goodwill balance at December 31, 2021, adjusted for
accumulated impairment charges $ 17,379 $ 1,924 $ — $ 19,303 
Duke Energy Ohio
Duke Energy Ohio's Goodwill balance of $920 million, allocated $596 million to Electric Utilities and Infrastructure and $324 million to Gas Utilities
and Infrastructure, is presented net of accumulated impairment charges of $216 million on the Consolidated Balance Sheets at December 31, 2021,
and 2020.
Progress Energy
Progress Energy's Goodwill is included in the Electric Utilities and Infrastructure segment and there are no accumulated impairment charges.
Piedmont
Piedmont's Goodwill is included in the Gas Utilities and Infrastructure segment and there are no accumulated impairment charges.
Goodwill Impairment Testing
Duke Energy, Progress Energy, Duke Energy Ohio and Piedmont are required to perform an annual goodwill impairment test as of the same date
each year and, accordingly, perform their annual impairment testing of goodwill as of August 31. Duke Energy, Progress Energy, Duke Energy Ohio
and Piedmont update their test between annual tests if events or circumstances occur that would more likely than not reduce the fair value of a
reporting unit below its carrying value. As the fair value for Duke Energy, Progress Energy, Duke Energy Ohio and Piedmont exceeded their
respective carrying values at the date of the annual impairment analysis, no goodwill impairment charges were recorded in 2021.
INTANGIBLE ASSETS
The following tables show the carrying amount and accumulated amortization of intangible assets included in Other within Other Noncurrent Assets
on the Consolidated Balance Sheets of the Duke Energy Registrants at December 31, 2021, and 2020.
 December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Emission allowances $ 8 $ — $ 5 $ 2 $ 3 $ — $ 2 $ — 
Renewable energy certificates 204 73 131 131 — — — — 
Natural gas, coal and power
contracts 24 — — — — — 24 — 
Renewable operating and
development projects 106 — — — — — — — 
Other 28 — — — — — — — 
Total gross carrying amounts 370 73 136 133 3 — 26 — 
Accumulated amortization – natural
gas, coal and power contracts (24) — — — — — (24) — 
Accumulated amortization –
renewable operating and
development projects (38) — — — — — — — 
Accumulated amortization – other (4) — — — — — — — 
Total accumulated amortization (66) — — — — — (24) — 
Total intangible assets, net $ 304 $ 73 $ 136 $ 133 $ 3 $ — $ 2 $ — 
176
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS GOODWILL AND INTANGIBLE ASSETS
 December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Emission allowances $ 8 $ — $ 5 $ 2 $ 3 $ — $ 2 $ — 
Renewable energy certificates 196 65 130 130 — 1 — — 
Natural gas, coal and power
contracts 24 — — — — — 24 — 
Renewable operating and
development projects 107 — — — — — — — 
Other 20 — — — — — — — 
Total gross carrying amounts 355 65 135 132 3 1 26 — 
Accumulated amortization – natural
gas, coal and power contracts (23) — — — — — (23) — 
Accumulated amortization –
renewable operating and
development projects (34) — — — — — — — 
Accumulated amortization – other (3) — — — — — — — 
Total accumulated amortization (60) — — — — — (23) — 
Total intangible assets, net $ 295 $ 65 $ 135 $ 132 $ 3 $ 1 $ 3 $ — 
Amortization Expense
Amortization expense amounts for natural gas, coal and power contracts, renewable operating projects and other intangible assets are immaterial for
the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, and are expected to be immaterial for the next five years as of December 31, 2021.
12. INVESTMENTS IN UNCONSOLIDATED AFFILIATES
EQUITY METHOD INVESTMENTS
Investments in affiliates that are not controlled by Duke Energy, but over which it has significant influence, are accounted for using the equity method.
The following table presents Duke Energy’s investments in unconsolidated affiliates accounted for under the equity method, as well as the respective
equity in earnings, by segment, for periods presented in this filing.
 Years Ended December 31,
 2021 2020 2019
Equity in Equity in Equity in
earnings earnings earnings
(in millions) Investments (losses) Investments (losses) (losses)
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure $ 104 $ 7 $ 105 $ (1)$ 9 
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure 231 8 215 (2,017) 114 
Commercial Renewables 513 (34) 534 — (4)
Other 122 47 107 13 43 
Total $ 970 $ 28 $ 961 $ (2,005)$ 162 
During the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, Duke Energy received distributions from equity investments of $80 million, $37 million
and $55 million, respectively, which are included in Other assets within Cash Flows from Operating Activities on the Consolidated Statements of Cash
Flows. During the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, Duke Energy received distributions from equity investments of $44 million, $133
million and $11 million, respectively, which are included in Return of investment capital within Cash Flows from Investing Activities on the
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows.
During the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, Piedmont received distributions from equity investments of $8 million, $2 million and $1
million, respectively, which are included in Other assets within Cash Flows from Operating Activities and $2 million, $2 million and $4 million,
respectively, which are included within Cash Flows from Investing Activities on the Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows.
Significant investments in affiliates accounted for under the equity method are discussed below.
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure
Duke Energy owns 50% interests in both DATC and Pioneer, which build, own and operate electric transmission facilities in North America.
177
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS INVESTMENTS IN UNCONSOLIDATED AFFILIATES
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure
Pipeline Investments
Piedmont owns a 21.49% investment in Cardinal, an intrastate pipeline located in North Carolina.
Duke Energy owns a 7.5% interest in Sabal Trail, a 517-mile interstate natural gas pipeline, which provides natural gas to Duke Energy Florida and
Florida Power and Light.
Duke Energy recorded OTTIs of $25 million within Equity in earnings (losses) of unconsolidated affiliates on Duke Energy's Consolidated Statements
of Operations for the year ended December 31, 2019, to completely impair its 24% ownership interest in Constitution.
Duke Energy owns a 47% interest in the ACP pipeline. In 2020, Duke Energy determined it would no longer continue its investment in the
construction of the ACP pipeline. See Notes 3 and 7 for further information.
Storage Facilities
Piedmont owns a 45% interest in Pine Needle, an interstate LNG storage facility located in North Carolina, and a 50% interest in Hardy Storage, an
underground interstate natural gas storage facility located in West Virginia.
Renewable Natural Gas Investments
Duke Energy owns a 29.68% investment in SustainRNG, a developer of renewable natural gas projects, and a 70% interest in Sustain T&W,
SustainRNG's renewable natural gas project located in Georgia.
Commercial Renewables
DS Cornerstone, LLC, which owns wind farm projects in the U.S. was part of a sale of minority interest in a certain portion of renewable assets in
2019. See Note 1 for more information on the sale. Prior to the sale, Duke Energy had a 50% interest in DS Cornerstone, LLC. Subsequent to the
sale, Duke Energy has a 26% interest in the investment.
In 2020, Duke Energy completed its acquisition of 70 distributed fuel cell projects from Bloom Energy Corporation, which approximates 43 MW of
capacity serving commercial and industrial customers across the U.S. Duke Energy is not the primary beneficiary of the distributed fuel cell portfolio
and does not consolidate these assets.
Other
Duke Energy has a 17.5% indirect economic ownership interest and a 25% board representation and voting rights interest in NMC, which owns and
operates a methanol and MTBE business in Jubail, Saudi Arabia.
Significant Subsidiaries
For the year ended December 31, 2020, Duke Energy's investment in ACP met the requirements of S-X Rule 4-08(g) to provide summarized financial
information. The following table provides summary information for ACP as required under S-X Rule 1-02(bb) for the period of significance and
comparative prior year periods in Duke Energy's consolidated balance sheets and consolidated statements of operations. For the year ended
December 31, 2021, there were no investments that met the significance requirements.
(in millions) December 31, 2020
Current assets $ 43 
Noncurrent assets 93 
Current liabilities 1,965 
Noncurrent liabilities 167 
Membership interests (1,996)
Years Ended December 31,
2020 2019
Net revenues $ — $ — 
Operating loss (4,612) (5)
Net (loss) income (4,512) 246 
Net (loss) income attributable to Duke Energy $ (2,121)$ 116 
178
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS RELATED PARTY TRANSACTIONS
13. RELATED PARTY TRANSACTIONS
The Subsidiary Registrants engage in related party transactions in accordance with the applicable state and federal commission regulations. Refer to
the Consolidated Balance Sheets of the Subsidiary Registrants for balances due to or due from related parties. Material amounts related to
transactions with related parties included in the Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income are presented in the following
table.
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 2019
Duke Energy Carolinas    
Corporate governance and shared service expenses $ 894 $ 753 $ 841 
Indemnification coverages 24 20 20 
Joint Dispatch Agreement (JDA) revenue 41 25 60 
JDA expense 207 114 186 
Intercompany natural gas purchases 11 15 15 
Progress Energy  
Corporate governance and shared service expenses $ 856 $ 715 $ 778 
Indemnification coverages 41 36 37 
JDA revenue 207 114 186 
JDA expense 41 25 60 
Intercompany natural gas purchases 75 75 76 
Duke Energy Progress  
Corporate governance and shared service expenses $ 504 $ 420 $ 462 
Indemnification coverages 19 17 15 
JDA revenue 207 114 186 
JDA expense 41 25 60 
Intercompany natural gas purchases 75 75 76 
Duke Energy Florida  
Corporate governance and shared service expenses $ 352 $ 295 $ 316 
Indemnification coverages 22 19 22 
Duke Energy Ohio  
Corporate governance and shared service expenses $ 329 $ 326 $ 354 
Indemnification coverages 4 4 4 
Duke Energy Indiana  
Corporate governance and shared service expenses $ 409 $ 401 $ 412 
Indemnification coverages 8 8 7 
Piedmont
Corporate governance and shared service expenses $ 139 $ 140 $ 138 
Indemnification coverages 3 3 3 
Intercompany natural gas sales 86 90 91 
Natural gas storage and transportation costs 22 23 23 
(a) The Subsidiary Registrants are charged their proportionate share of corporate governance and other shared services costs, primarily
related to human resources, employee benefits, information technology, legal and accounting fees, as well as other third-party costs. These
amounts are primarily recorded in Operation, maintenance and other on the Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive
Income.
(b) The Subsidiary Registrants incur expenses related to certain indemnification coverages through Bison, Duke Energy’s wholly owned
captive insurance subsidiary. These expenses are recorded in Operation, maintenance and other on the Consolidated Statements of
Operations and Comprehensive Income.
(c) Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress participate in a JDA, which allows the collective dispatch of power plants between the
service territories to reduce customer rates. Revenues from the sale of power and expenses from the purchase of power pursuant to the
JDA are recorded in Operating Revenues and Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power, respectively, on the Consolidated
Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income.
(d) Piedmont provides long-term natural gas delivery service to certain Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress natural gas-fired
generation facilities. Piedmont records the sales in Operating Revenues, and Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress record
the related purchases as a component of Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power on their respective Consolidated
Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income. These intercompany revenues and expenses are eliminated in consolidation.
(e) Piedmont has related party transactions as a customer of its equity method investments in Pine Needle, Hardy Storage, and Cardinal
natural gas storage and transportation facilities. These expenses are included in Cost of natural gas on Piedmont's Consolidated
Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income.(a)
(b)
(c)
(c)
(d)
(a)
(b)
(c)
(c)
(d)
(a)
(b)
(c)
(c)
(d)
(a)
(b)
(a)
(b)
(a)
(b)
(a)
(b)
(d)
(e)
179
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS RELATED PARTY TRANSACTIONS
In addition to the amounts presented above, the Subsidiary Registrants have other affiliate transactions, including rental of office space, participation
in a money pool arrangement, other operational transactions and their proportionate share of certain charged expenses. See Note 6 for more
information regarding money pool. These transactions of the Subsidiary Registrants are incurred in the ordinary course of business and are
eliminated in consolidation.
As discussed in Note 17, certain trade receivables have been sold by Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana to CRC, an affiliate formed by a
subsidiary of Duke Energy. The proceeds obtained from the sales of receivables are largely cash but do include a subordinated note from CRC for a
portion of the purchase price.
Intercompany Income Taxes
Duke Energy and the Subsidiary Registrants file a consolidated federal income tax return and other state and jurisdictional returns. The Subsidiary
Registrants have a tax sharing agreement with Duke Energy for the allocation of consolidated tax liabilities and benefits. Income taxes recorded
represent amounts the Subsidiary Registrants would incur as separate C-Corporations. The following table includes the balance of intercompany
income tax receivables and payables for the Subsidiary Registrants.
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
December 31, 2021
Intercompany income tax receivable $ — $ — $ — $ 40 $ 19 $ — $ — 
Intercompany income tax payable 62 — 84 — — 10 27 
December 31, 2020
Intercompany income tax receivable $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 9 $ 10 
Intercompany income tax payable 31 33 46 35 2 — — 
14. DERIVATIVES AND HEDGING
The Duke Energy Registrants use commodity and interest rate contracts to manage commodity price risk and interest rate risk. The primary use of
commodity derivatives is to hedge the generation portfolio against changes in the prices of electricity and natural gas. Piedmont enters into natural
gas supply contracts to provide diversification, reliability and natural gas cost benefits to its customers. Interest rate derivatives are used to manage
interest rate risk associated with borrowings.
All derivative instruments not identified as NPNS are recorded at fair value as assets or liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. Cash
collateral related to derivative instruments executed under master netting arrangements is offset against the collateralized derivatives on the
Consolidated Balance Sheets. The cash impacts of settled derivatives are recorded as operating activities on the Consolidated Statements of Cash
Flows.
INTEREST RATE RISK
The Duke Energy Registrants are exposed to changes in interest rates as a result of their issuance or anticipated issuance of variable-rate and fixed-
rate debt and commercial paper. Interest rate risk is managed by limiting variable-rate exposures to a percentage of total debt and by monitoring
changes in interest rates. To manage risk associated with changes in interest rates, the Duke Energy Registrants may enter into interest rate swaps,
U.S. Treasury lock agreements and other financial contracts. In anticipation of certain fixed-rate debt issuances, a series of forward-starting interest
rate swaps or Treasury locks may be executed to lock in components of current market interest rates. These instruments are later terminated prior to
or upon the issuance of the corresponding debt.
Cash Flow Hedges
For a derivative designated as hedging the exposure to variable cash flows of a future transaction, referred to as a cash flow hedge, the effective
portion of the derivative's gain or loss is initially reported as a component of other comprehensive income and subsequently reclassified into earnings
once the future transaction impacts earnings. Amounts for interest rate contracts are reclassified to earnings as interest expense over the term of the
related debt. Gains and losses reclassified out of AOCI for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, were not material. Duke Energy's
interest rate derivatives designated as hedges include interest rate swaps used to hedge existing debt within the Commercial Renewables segment
and forward-starting interest rate swaps not accounted for under regulatory accounting.
Undesignated Contracts
Undesignated contracts primarily include contracts not designated as a hedge because they are accounted for under regulatory accounting or
contracts that do not qualify for hedge accounting.
Duke Energy’s interest rate swaps for its regulated operations employ regulatory accounting. With regulatory accounting, the mark-to-market gains or
losses on the swaps are deferred as regulatory liabilities or regulatory assets, respectively. Regulatory assets and liabilities are amortized consistent
with the treatment of the related costs in the ratemaking process. The accrual of interest on the swaps is recorded as Interest Expense on the Duke
Energy Registrant's Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income.
180
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS DERIVATIVES AND HEDGING
The following tables show notional amounts of outstanding derivatives related to interest rate risk.
December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Indiana Ohio
Cash flow hedges $ 2,415 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Undesignated contracts 1,177 350 500 500 300 27 
Total notional amount $ 3,592 $ 350 $ 500 $ 500 $ 300 $ 27 
December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Ohio
Cash flow hedges $ 632 $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Undesignated contracts 1,177 400 750 750 27 
Total notional amount $ 1,809 $ 400 $ 750 $ 750 $ 27 
(a)    Duke Energy includes amounts related to consolidated VIEs of $665 million in cash flow hedges as of December 31, 2021, and $632 million in
cash flow hedges as of December 31, 2020.
COMMODITY PRICE RISK
The Duke Energy Registrants are exposed to the impact of changes in the prices of electricity purchased and sold in bulk power markets and natural
gas purchases, including Piedmont's natural gas supply contracts. Exposure to commodity price risk is influenced by a number of factors including
the term of contracts, the liquidity of markets and delivery locations. To manage risk associated with commodity prices, the Duke Energy Registrants
may enter into long-term power purchase or sales contracts and long-term natural gas supply agreements.
Cash Flow Hedges
For derivatives designated as hedging the exposure to variable cash flows of a future transaction, referred to as a cash flow hedge, the derivative's
gain or loss is initially reported as a component of other comprehensive income and subsequently reclassified into earnings once the future
transaction impacts earnings. Gains and losses reclassified out of accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) for the year ended December 31,
2021, 2020 and 2019, were not material. Duke Energy’s commodity derivatives designated as hedges include long-term electricity sales in the
Commercial Renewables segment.
Undesignated Contracts
For the Subsidiary Registrants, bulk power electricity and natural gas purchases flow through fuel adjustment clauses, formula-based contracts or
other cost sharing mechanisms. Differences between the costs included in rates and the incurred costs, including undesignated derivative contracts,
are largely deferred as regulatory assets or regulatory liabilities. Piedmont policies allow for the use of financial instruments to hedge commodity price
risks. The strategy and objective of these hedging programs are to use the financial instruments to reduce natural gas cost volatility for customers.
Volumes
The tables below include volumes of outstanding commodity derivatives. Amounts disclosed represent the absolute value of notional volumes of
commodity contracts excluding NPNS. The Duke Energy Registrants have netted contractual amounts where offsetting purchase and sale contracts
exist with identical delivery locations and times of delivery. Where all commodity positions are perfectly offset, no quantities are shown.
December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy
Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Electricity (GWh) 22,344 — — — 1,681 10,688 — 
Natural gas (millions of Dth) 823 264 215 215 — 8 336 
December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy
Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Electricity (GWh) 35,409 — — — 2,559 10,802 — 
Natural gas (millions of Dth) 678 145 158 158 — 2 373 
(a)    Duke Energy includes 9,975 GWh and 22,048 GWh related to cash flow hedges as of December 31, 2021, and 2020, respectively.(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
181
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS DERIVATIVES AND HEDGING
LOCATION AND FAIR VALUE OF DERIVATIVE ASSETS AND LIABILITIES RECOGNIZED IN THE CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
The following tables show the fair value and balance sheet location of derivative instruments. Although derivatives subject to master netting
arrangements are netted on the Consolidated Balance Sheets, the fair values presented below are shown gross and cash collateral on the
derivatives has not been netted against the fair values shown.
Derivative Assets December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Commodity Contracts
Not Designated as Hedging
Instruments
Current $ 199 $ 99 $ 72 $ 72 $ — $ 2 $ 23 $ 3 
Noncurrent 113 63 50 50 — — — — 
Total Derivative Assets – Commodity
Contracts $ 312 $ 162 $ 122 $ 122 $ — $ 2 $ 23 $ 3 
Interest Rate Contracts
Designated as Hedging Instruments
Current $ 3 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Noncurrent 3 — — — — — — — 
Not Designated as Hedging
Instruments
Current $ 2 $ — $ 2 $ 2 $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Total Derivative Assets – Interest Rate
Contracts $ 8 $ — $ 2 $ 2 $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Total Derivative Assets $ 320 $ 162 $ 124 $ 124 $ — $ 2 $ 23 $ 3 
Derivative Liabilities December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Commodity Contracts
Designated as Hedging Instruments
Current $ 27 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Noncurrent 117 — — — — — — — 
Not Designated as Hedging
Instruments
Current $ 72 $ 18 $ 19 $ 5 $ 14 $ — $ 13 $ 21 
Noncurrent 132 9 5 5 — — — 118 
Total Derivative Liabilities –
Commodity Contracts $ 348 $ 27 $ 24 $ 10 $ 14 $ — $ 13 $ 139 
Interest Rate Contracts
Designated as Hedging Instruments
Current $ 75 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Noncurrent 21 — — — — — — — 
Not Designated as Hedging
Instruments
Current 10 8 — — — 1 — — 
Noncurrent 18 — — — — 4 14 — 
Total Derivative Liabilities – Interest
Rate Contracts $ 124 $ 8 $ — $ — $ — $ 5 $ 14 $ — 
Total Derivative Liabilities $ 472 $ 35 $ 24 $ 10 $ 14 $ 5 $ 27 $ 139 
182
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS DERIVATIVES AND HEDGING
Derivative Assets December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Commodity Contracts
Not Designated as Hedging
Instruments
Current $ 30 $ 14 $ 9 $ 9 $ — $ 1 $ 6 $ 1 
Noncurrent 13 6 6 6 — — — — 
Total Derivative Assets – Commodity
Contracts $ 43 $ 20 $ 15 $ 15 $ — $ 1 $ 6 $ 1 
Interest Rate Contracts
Not Designated as Hedging
Instruments
Current $ 18 $ — $ 18 $ 18 $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Total Derivative Assets – Interest Rate
Contracts $ 18 $ — $ 18 $ 18 $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Total Derivative Assets $ 61 $ 20 $ 33 $ 33 $ — $ 1 $ 6 $ 1 
Derivative Liabilities December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Commodity Contracts
Designated as Hedging Instruments
Current $ 14 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Noncurrent 70 — — — — — — — 
Not Designated as Hedging
Instruments
Current $ 30 $ 13 $ 2 $ 2 $ — $ — $ 1 $ 15 
Noncurrent 137 3 27 12 — — — 107 
Total Derivative Liabilities –
Commodity Contracts $ 251 $ 16 $ 29 $ 14 $ — $ — $ 1 $ 122 
Interest Rate Contracts
Designated as Hedging Instruments
Current $ 15 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Noncurrent 48 — — — — — — — 
Not Designated as Hedging
Instruments
Current 5 4 — — — 1 — — 
Noncurrent 5 — — — — 5 — — 
Total Derivative Liabilities – Interest
Rate Contracts $ 73 $ 4 $ — $ — $ — $ 6 $ — $ — 
Total Derivative Liabilities $ 324 $ 20 $ 29 $ 14 $ — $ 6 $ 1 $ 122 
183
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS DERIVATIVES AND HEDGING
OFFSETTING ASSETS AND LIABILITIES
The following tables present the line items on the Consolidated Balance Sheets where derivatives are reported. Substantially all of Duke Energy's
outstanding derivative contracts are subject to enforceable master netting arrangements. The gross amounts offset in the tables below show the
effect of these netting arrangements on financial position and include collateral posted to offset the net position. The amounts shown are calculated
by counterparty. Accounts receivable or accounts payable may also be available to offset exposures in the event of bankruptcy. These amounts are
not included in the tables below.
Derivative Assets December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Current
Gross amounts recognized $ 204 $ 99 $ 74 $ 74 $ — $ 2 $ 23 $ 3 
Gross amounts offset (25) (16) (9) (9) — — — — 
Net amounts presented in Current
Assets: Other $ 179 $ 83 $ 65 $ 65 $ — $ 2 $ 23 $ 3 
Noncurrent
Gross amounts recognized $ 116 $ 63 $ 50 $ 50 $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Gross amounts offset (23) (15) (8) (8) — — — — 
Net amounts presented in Other
Noncurrent Assets: Other $ 93 $ 48 $ 42 $ 42 $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Derivative Liabilities December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Current
Gross amounts recognized $ 184 $ 26 $ 19 $ 5 $ 14 $ 1 $ 13 $ 21 
Gross amounts offset (11) (6) (5) (5) — — — — 
Net amounts presented in Current
Liabilities: Other $ 173 $ 20 $ 14 $ — $ 14 $ 1 $ 13 $ 21 
Noncurrent
Gross amounts recognized $ 288 $ 9 $ 5 $ 5 $ — $ 4 $ 14 $ 118 
Gross amounts offset (12) (8) (5) (5) — — — — 
Net amounts presented in Other
Noncurrent Liabilities: Other $ 276 $ 1 $ — $ — $ — $ 4 $ 14 $ 118 
Derivative Assets December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Current
Gross amounts recognized $ 48 $ 14 $ 27 $ 27 $ — $ 1 $ 6 $ 1 
Gross amounts offset (3) (2) (2) (2) — — — — 
Net amounts presented in Current
Assets: Other $ 45 $ 12 $ 25 $ 25 $ — $ 1 $ 6 $ 1 
Noncurrent
Gross amounts recognized $ 13 $ 6 $ 6 $ 6 $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Gross amounts offset (5) (1) (4) (4) — — — — 
Net amounts presented in Other
Noncurrent Assets: Other $ 8 $ 5 $ 2 $ 2 $ — $ — $ — $ — 
184
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS DERIVATIVES AND HEDGING
Derivative Liabilities December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Current
Gross amounts recognized $ 64 $ 17 $ 2 $ 2 $ — $ 1 $ 1 $ 15 
Gross amounts offset (3) (2) (2) (2) — — — — 
Net amounts presented in Current
Liabilities: Other $ 61 $ 15 $ — $ — $ — $ 1 $ 1 $ 15 
Noncurrent
Gross amounts recognized $ 260 $ 3 $ 27 $ 12 $ — $ 5 $ — $ 107 
Gross amounts offset (5) (1) (4) (4) — — — — 
Net amounts presented in Other
Noncurrent Liabilities: Other $ 255 $ 2 $ 23 $ 8 $ — $ 5 $ — $ 107 
15. INVESTMENTS IN DEBT AND EQUITY SECURITIES
Duke Energy’s investments in debt and equity securities are primarily comprised of investments held in (i) the NDTF at Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke
Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida, (ii) the grantor trusts at Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Florida and Duke Energy Indiana related to
OPEB plans and (iii) Bison. The Duke Energy Registrants classify investments in debt securities as AFS and investments in equity securities as FV-
NI.
For investments in debt securities classified as AFS, the unrealized gains and losses are included in other comprehensive income until realized, at
which time they are reported through net income. For investments in equity securities classified as FV-NI, both realized and unrealized gains and
losses are reported through net income. Substantially all of Duke Energy’s investments in debt and equity securities qualify for regulatory accounting,
and accordingly, all associated realized and unrealized gains and losses on these investments are deferred as a regulatory asset or liability.
Duke Energy classifies the majority of investments in debt and equity securities as long term, unless otherwise noted.
Investment Trusts
The investments within the Investment Trusts are managed by independent investment managers with discretion to buy, sell and invest pursuant to
the objectives set forth by the investment manager agreements and trust agreements. The Duke Energy Registrants have limited oversight of the
day-to-day management of these investments. As a result, the ability to hold investments in unrealized loss positions is outside the control of the
Duke Energy Registrants. Accordingly, all unrealized losses associated with debt securities within the Investment Trusts are recognized immediately
and deferred to regulatory accounts where appropriate.
Other AFS Securities
Unrealized gains and losses on all other AFS securities are included in other comprehensive income until realized, unless it is determined the
carrying value of an investment has a credit loss. The Duke Energy Registrants analyze all investment holdings each reporting period to determine
whether a decline in fair value is related to a credit loss. If a credit loss exists, the unrealized credit loss is included in earnings. There were no
material credit losses as of December 31, 2021, and 2020.
Other Investments amounts are recorded in Other within Other Noncurrent Assets on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
185
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS INVESTMENTS IN DEBT AND EQUITY SECURITIES
DUKE ENERGY
The following table presents the estimated fair value of investments in debt and equity securities; equity investments are classified as FV-NI and debt
investments are classified as AFS.
December 31, 2021 December 31, 2020
Gross Gross Gross Gross
Unrealized Unrealized Unrealized Unrealized
Holding Holding Estimated Holding Holding Estimated
(in millions) Gains Losses Fair Value Gains Losses Fair Value
NDTF       
Cash and cash equivalents $ — $ — $ 160 $ — $ — $ 177 
Equity securities 4,905 43 7,350 4,138 54 6,235 
Corporate debt securities 39 6 829 76 1 806 
Municipal bonds 14 1 314 22 — 370 
U.S. government bonds 31 12 1,568 51 — 1,361 
Other debt securities 3 1 180 8 — 180 
Total NDTF Investments $ 4,992 $ 63 $ 10,401 $ 4,295 $ 55 $ 9,129 
Other Investments       
Cash and cash equivalents $ — $ — $ 36 $ — $ — $ 127 
Equity securities 36 — 156 79 — 146 
Corporate debt securities 2 1 119 8 — 110 
Municipal bonds 3 1 80 5 — 86 
U.S. government bonds — — 56 — — 42 
Other debt securities — 1 45 — — 47 
Total Other Investments $ 41 $ 3 $ 492 $ 92 $ — $ 558 
Total Investments $ 5,033 $ 66 $ 10,893 $ 4,387 $ 55 $ 9,687 
Realized gains and losses, which were determined on a specific identification basis, from sales of FV-NI and AFS securities for the years ended
December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, were as follows.
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 2019
FV-NI:
Realized gains $ 724 $ 366 $ 172 
Realized losses 141 174 151 
AFS:
Realized gains 56 96 94 
Realized losses 54 51 67 
DUKE ENERGY CAROLINAS
The following table presents the estimated fair value of investments in debt and equity securities; equity investments are classified as FV-NI and debt
investments are classified as AFS.
 December 31, 2021  December 31, 2020
Gross Gross Gross Gross
Unrealized Unrealized Unrealized Unrealized
Holding Holding Estimated Holding Holding Estimated
(in millions) Gains Losses Fair Value Gains Losses Fair Value
NDTF       
Cash and cash equivalents $ — $ — $ 53 $ — $ — $ 30 
Equity securities 2,887 19 4,265 2,442 23 3,685 
Corporate debt securities 24 4 506 49 1 510 
Municipal bonds 2 — 48 6 — 91 
U.S. government bonds 16 3 712 25 — 475 
Other debt securities 3 1 175 7 — 174 
Total NDTF Investments $ 2,932 $ 27 $ 5,759 $ 2,529 $ 24 $ 4,965 
186
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS INVESTMENTS IN DEBT AND EQUITY SECURITIES
Realized gains and losses, which were determined on a specific identification basis, from sales of FV-NI and AFS securities for the years ended
December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, were as follows.
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 2019
FV-NI:
Realized gains $ 440 $ 64 $ 113 
Realized losses 96 99 107 
AFS:
Realized gains 38 60 55 
Realized losses 37 37 38 
PROGRESS ENERGY
The following table presents the estimated fair value of investments in debt and equity securities; equity investments are classified as FV-NI and debt
investments are classified as AFS.
December 31, 2021 December 31, 2020
Gross Gross Gross Gross
Unrealized Unrealized Unrealized Unrealized
Holding Holding Estimated Holding Holding Estimated
(in millions) Gains Losses Fair Value Gains Losses Fair Value
NDTF       
Cash and cash equivalents $ — $ — $ 107 $ — $ — $ 147 
Equity securities 2,018 24 3,085 1,696 31 2,550 
Corporate debt securities 15 2 323 27 — 296 
Municipal bonds 12 1 266 16 — 279 
U.S. government bonds 15 9 856 26 — 886 
Other debt securities — — 5 1 — 6 
Total NDTF Investments $ 2,060 $ 36 $ 4,642 $ 1,766 $ 31 $ 4,164 
Other Investments       
Cash and cash equivalents $ — $ — $ 20 $ — $ — $ 106 
Municipal bonds 2 — 26 3 — 26 
Total Other Investments $ 2 $ — $ 46 $ 3 $ — $ 132 
Total Investments $ 2,062 $ 36 $ 4,688 $ 1,769 $ 31 $ 4,296 
Realized gains and losses, which were determined on a specific identification basis, from sales of FV-NI and AFS securities for the years ended
December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, were as follows.
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 2019
FV-NI:
Realized gains $ 284 $ 302 $ 59 
Realized losses 45 75 44 
AFS:
Realized gains 16 24 36 
Realized losses 14 13 29 
187
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS INVESTMENTS IN DEBT AND EQUITY SECURITIES
DUKE ENERGY PROGRESS
The following table presents the estimated fair value of investments in debt and equity securities; equity investments are classified as FV-NI and debt
investments are classified as AFS.
 December 31, 2021 December 31, 2020
Gross Gross Gross Gross
Unrealized Unrealized Unrealized Unrealized
Holding Holding Estimated Holding Holding Estimated
(in millions) Gains Losses Fair Value Gains Losses Fair Value
NDTF       
Cash and cash equivalents $ — $ — $ 94 $ — $ — $ 76 
Equity securities 1,915 23 2,970 1,617 31 2,459 
Corporate debt securities 15 2 282 27 — 296 
Municipal bonds 12 1 266 16 — 279 
U.S. government bonds 15 3 472 26 — 412 
Other debt securities — — 5 1 — 6 
Total NDTF Investments $ 1,957 $ 29 $ 4,089 $ 1,687 $ 31 $ 3,528 
Other Investments       
Cash and cash equivalents $ — $ — $ 16 $ — $ — $ 1 
Total Other Investments $ — $ — $ 16 $ — $ — $ 1 
Total Investments $ 1,957 $ 29 $ 4,105 $ 1,687 $ 31 $ 3,529 
Realized gains and losses, which were determined on a specific identification basis, from sales of FV-NI and AFS securities for the years ended
December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, were as follows.
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 2019
FV-NI:
Realized gains $ 283 $ 52 $ 38 
Realized losses 44 59 33 
AFS:
Realized gains 15 24 7 
Realized losses 13 13 5 
DUKE ENERGY FLORIDA
The following table presents the estimated fair value of investments in debt and equity securities; equity investments are classified as FV-NI and debt
investments are classified as AFS.
 December 31, 2021 December 31, 2020
Gross Gross Gross Gross
Unrealized Unrealized Unrealized Unrealized
Holding Holding Estimated Holding Holding Estimated
(in millions) Gains Losses Fair Value Gains Losses Fair Value
NDTF        
Cash and cash equivalents $ — $ — $ 13 $ — $ — $ 71 
Equity securities 103 1 115 79 — 91 
Corporate debt securities — — 41 — — — 
U.S. government bonds — 6 384 — — 474 
Total NDTF Investments $ 103 $ 7 $ 553 $ 79 $ — $ 636 
Other Investments    
Cash and cash equivalents $ — $ — $ 3 $ — $ — $ 1 
Municipal bonds 2 — 26 3 — 26 
Total Other Investments $ 2 $ — $ 29 $ 3 $ — $ 27 
Total Investments $ 105 $ 7 $ 582 $ 82 $ — $ 663 
(a)    During the years ended December 31, 2021, and 2020, Duke Energy Florida continued to receive reimbursements from the NDTF for costs
related to ongoing decommissioning activity of the Crystal River Unit 3.(a)
188
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS INVESTMENTS IN DEBT AND EQUITY SECURITIES
Realized gains and losses, which were determined on a specific identification basis, from sales of FV-NI and AFS securities for the years ended
December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, were as follows.
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 2019
FV-NI:
Realized gains $ 1 $ 250 $ 21 
Realized losses 1 16 11 
AFS:
Realized gains 1 — 29 
Realized losses 1 — 24 
DUKE ENERGY INDIANA
The following table presents the estimated fair value of investments in debt and equity securities; equity investments are measured at FV-NI and debt
investments are classified as AFS.
 December 31, 2021 December 31, 2020
Gross Gross Gross Gross
Unrealized Unrealized Unrealized Unrealized
Holding Holding Estimated Holding Holding Estimated
(in millions) Gains Losses Fair Value Gains Losses Fair Value
Investments       
Cash and cash equivalents $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 1 
Equity securities 6 — 97 58 — 97 
Corporate debt securities — — 6 — — 3 
Municipal bonds 1 1 46 1 — 38 
U.S. government bonds — — 12 — — 4 
Total Investments $ 7 $ 1 $ 161 $ 59 $ — $ 143 
Realized gains and losses, which were determined on a specific identification basis, from sales of FV-NI and AFS securities for the years ended
December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, were immaterial.
DEBT SECURITY MATURITIES
The table below summarizes the maturity date for debt securities.
December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Indiana
Due in one year or less $ 159 $ 3 $ 138 $ 31 $ 107 $ 7 
Due after one through five years 957 337 546 256 290 25 
Due after five through 10 years 550 226 248 231 17 10 
Due after 10 years 1,525 875 544 507 37 22 
Total $ 3,191 $ 1,441 $ 1,476 $ 1,025 $ 451 $ 64 
16. FAIR VALUE MEASUREMENTS
Fair value is the exchange price to sell an asset or transfer a liability in an orderly transaction between market participants at the measurement date.
The fair value definition focuses on an exit price versus the acquisition cost. Fair value measurements use market data or assumptions market
participants would use in pricing the asset or liability, including assumptions about risk and the risks inherent in the inputs to the valuation technique.
These inputs may be readily observable, corroborated by market data, or generally unobservable. Valuation techniques maximize the use of
observable inputs and minimize the use of unobservable inputs. A midmarket pricing convention (the midpoint price between bid and ask prices) is
permitted for use as a practical expedient.
Fair value measurements are classified in three levels based on the fair value hierarchy as defined by GAAP. Certain investments are not categorized
within the fair value hierarchy. These investments are measured at fair value using the net asset value per share practical expedient. The net asset
value is derived based on the investment cost, less any impairment, plus or minus changes resulting from observable price changes for an identical
or similar investment of the same issuer.
Fair value accounting guidance permits entities to elect to measure certain financial instruments that are not required to be accounted for at fair
value, such as equity method investments or the company’s own debt, at fair value. The Duke Energy Registrants have not elected to record any of
these items at fair value.
189
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS FAIR VALUE MEASUREMENTS
Valuation methods of the primary fair value measurements disclosed below are as follows.
Investments in equity securities
The majority of investments in equity securities are valued using Level 1 measurements. Investments in equity securities are typically valued at the
closing price in the principal active market as of the last business day of the quarter. Principal active markets for equity prices include published
exchanges such as the NYSE and Nasdaq Stock Market. Foreign equity prices are translated from their trading currency using the currency
exchange rate in effect at the close of the principal active market. There was no after-hours market activity that was required to be reflected in the
reported fair value measurements.
Investments in debt securities
Most investments in debt securities are valued using Level 2 measurements because the valuations use interest rate curves and credit spreads
applied to the terms of the debt instrument (maturity and coupon interest rate) and consider the counterparty credit rating. If the market for a
particular fixed-income security is relatively inactive or illiquid, the measurement is Level 3.
Commodity derivatives
Commodity derivatives with clearinghouses are classified as Level 1. Commodity derivatives with observable forward curves are classified as Level
2. If forward price curves are not observable for the full term of the contract and the unobservable period had more than an insignificant impact on the
valuation, the commodity derivative is classified as Level 3. In isolation, increases (decreases) in natural gas forward prices result in favorable
(unfavorable) fair value adjustments for natural gas purchase contracts; and increases (decreases) in electricity forward prices result in unfavorable
(favorable) fair value adjustments for electricity sales contracts. Duke Energy regularly evaluates and validates pricing inputs used to estimate the fair
value of natural gas commodity contracts by a market participant price verification procedure. This procedure provides a comparison of internal
forward commodity curves to market participant generated curves.
Interest rate derivatives
Most over-the-counter interest rate contract derivatives are valued using financial models that utilize observable inputs for similar instruments and are
classified as Level 2. Inputs include forward interest rate curves, notional amounts, interest rates and credit quality of the counterparties.
Other fair value considerations
See Note 11 for a discussion of the valuation of goodwill and intangible assets.
DUKE ENERGY
The following tables provide recorded balances for assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis on the Consolidated Balance
Sheets. Derivative amounts in the tables below for all Duke Energy Registrants exclude cash collateral, which is disclosed in Note 14. See Note 15
for additional information related to investments by major security type for the Duke Energy Registrants.
 December 31, 2021
(in millions) Total Fair Value Level 1 Level 2 Level 3Not Categorized
NDTF cash and cash equivalents $ 160 $ 160 $ — $ — $ — 
NDTF equity securities 7,350 7,300 — — 50 
NDTF debt securities 2,891 967 1,924 — — 
Other equity securities 156 156 — — — 
Other debt securities 300 45 255 — — 
Other cash and cash equivalents 36 36 — — — 
Derivative assets 320 3 293 24 — 
Total assets 11,213 8,667 2,472 24 50 
Derivative liabilities (472) (13) (314) (145) — 
Net assets (liabilities) $ 10,741 $ 8,654 $ 2,158 $ (121)$ 50 
190
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS FAIR VALUE MEASUREMENTS
 December 31, 2020
(in millions) Total Fair Value Level 1 Level 2 Level 3Not Categorized
NDTF cash and cash equivalents $ 177 $ 177 $ — $ — $ — 
NDTF equity securities 6,235 6,189 — — 46 
NDTF debt securities 2,717 874 1,843 — — 
Other equity securities 146 146 — — — 
Other debt securities 285 37 248 — — 
Other cash and cash equivalents 127 127 — — — 
Derivative assets 61 1 53 7 — 
Total assets 9,748 7,551 2,144 7 46 
Derivative liabilities (324) — (240) (84) — 
Net assets (liabilities) $ 9,424 $ 7,551 $ 1,904 $ (77)$ 46 
The following table provides reconciliations of beginning and ending balances of assets and liabilities measured at fair value using Level 3
measurements.
Derivatives (net)
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020
Balance at beginning of period $ (77)$ (102)
Total pretax realized or unrealized losses included in comprehensive income (75) (84)
Purchases, sales, issuances and settlements:
Purchases 21 14 
Settlements (5) (19)
Net transfers Out of Level 3 — 117 
Total gains (losses) included on the Consolidated Balance Sheet 15 (3)
Balance at end of period $ (121)$ (77)
(a)    Transferred from Level 3 to Level 2 because observable market data became available.
DUKE ENERGY CAROLINAS
The following tables provide recorded balances for assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis on the Consolidated Balance
Sheets.
 December 31, 2021
(in millions) Total Fair Value Level 1 Level 2Not Categorized
NDTF cash and cash equivalents $ 53 $ 53 $ — $ — 
NDTF equity securities 4,265 4,215 — 50 
NDTF debt securities 1,441 339 1,102 — 
Derivative assets 162 — 162 — 
Total assets 5,921 4,607 1,264 50 
Derivative liabilities (35) — (35) — 
Net assets $ 5,886 $ 4,607 $ 1,229 $ 50 
 December 31, 2020
(in millions) Total Fair Value Level 1 Level 2Not Categorized
NDTF cash and cash equivalents $ 30 $ 30 $ — $ — 
NDTF equity securities 3,685 3,639 — 46 
NDTF debt securities 1,250 192 1,058 — 
Derivative assets 20 — 20 — 
Total assets 4,985 3,861 1,078 46 
Derivative liabilities (20) — (20) — 
Net assets $ 4,965 $ 3,861 $ 1,058 $ 46 (a)
191
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS FAIR VALUE MEASUREMENTS
PROGRESS ENERGY
The following table provides recorded balances for assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis on the Consolidated Balance
Sheets.
 December 31, 2021 December 31, 2020
(in millions)Total Fair
Value Level 1 Level 2Total Fair
Value Level 1 Level 2
NDTF cash and cash equivalents $ 107 $ 107 $ — $ 147 $ 147 $ — 
NDTF equity securities 3,085 3,085 — 2,550 2,550 — 
NDTF debt securities 1,450 628 822 1,467 682 785 
Other debt securities 26 — 26 26 — 26 
Other cash and cash equivalents 20 20 — 106 106 
Derivative assets 124 — 124 33 — 33 
Total assets 4,812 3,840 972 4,329 3,485 844 
Derivative liabilities (24) — (24) (29) — (29)
Net assets $ 4,788 $ 3,840 $ 948 $ 4,300 $ 3,485 $ 815 
DUKE ENERGY PROGRESS
The following table provides recorded balances for assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis on the Consolidated Balance
Sheets.
 December 31, 2021 December 31, 2020
(in millions)Total Fair
Value Level 1 Level 2Total Fair
Value Level 1 Level 2
NDTF cash and cash equivalents $ 94 $ 94 $ — $ 76 $ 76 $ — 
NDTF equity securities 2,970 2,970 — 2,459 2,459 — 
NDTF debt securities 1,025 289 736 993 237 756 
Other cash and cash equivalents 16 16 — 1 1 — 
Derivative assets 124 — 124 33 — 33 
Total assets 4,229 3,369 860 3,562 2,773 789 
Derivative liabilities (10) — (10) (14) — (14)
Net assets $ 4,219 $ 3,369 $ 850 $ 3,548 $ 2,773 $ 775 
DUKE ENERGY FLORIDA
The following table provides recorded balances for assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis on the Consolidated Balance
Sheets.
 December 31, 2021 December 31, 2020
(in millions)Total Fair
Value Level 1 Level 2Total Fair
Value Level 1 Level 2
NDTF cash and cash equivalents $ 13 $ 13 $ — $ 71 $ 71 $ — 
NDTF equity securities 115 115 — 91 91 — 
NDTF debt securities 425 339 86 474 445 29 
Other debt securities 26 — 26 26 — 26 
Other cash and cash equivalents 3 3 — 1 1 — 
Total assets 582 470 112 663 608 55 
Derivative liabilities (14) — (14) — — — 
Net assets $ 568 $ 470 $ 98 $ 663 $ 608 $ 55 
DUKE ENERGY OHIO
The recorded balances for assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis on the Consolidated Balance Sheets were not material at
December 31, 2021, and 2020.
192
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS FAIR VALUE MEASUREMENTS
DUKE ENERGY INDIANA
The following table provides recorded balances for assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis on the Consolidated Balance
Sheets.
 December 31, 2021 December 31, 2020
(in millions) Total Fair Value Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total Fair Value Level 1 Level 2 Level 3
Other equity securities $ 97 $ 97 $ — $ — $ 97 $ 97 $ — $ — 
Other debt securities 64 — 64 — 45 — 45 — 
Other cash equivalents — — — — 1 1 — — 
Derivative assets 23 1 — 22 6 — — 6 
Total assets 184 98 64 22 149 98 45 6 
Derivative liabilities (27) (13) (14) — (1) (1) — — 
Net assets $ 157 $ 85 $ 50 $ 22 $ 148 $ 97 $ 45 $ 6 
The following table provides a reconciliation of beginning and ending balances of assets and liabilities measured at fair value using Level 3
measurements.
 Derivatives (net)
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020
Balance at beginning of period $ 6 $ 11 
Purchases, sales, issuances and settlements:
Purchases 18 10 
Settlements (16) (13)
Total gains (losses) included on the Consolidated Balance Sheet 14 (2)
Balance at end of period $ 22 $ 6 
PIEDMONT
The following table provides recorded balances for assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis on the Consolidated Balance
Sheets.
 December 31, 2021 December 31, 2020
(in millions) Total Fair Value Level 1 Level 2 Total Fair ValueLevel 1Level 2
Derivative assets $ 3 $ 3 $ — $ 1 $ 1 $ — 
Derivative liabilities (139) — (139) (122) — (122)
Net (liabilities) assets $ (136)$ 3 $ (139)$ (121)$ 1 $(122)
The following table provides a reconciliation of beginning and ending balances of assets and liabilities measured at fair value using Level 3
measurements.
 Derivatives (net)
 Year Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2020
Balance at beginning of period $ (117)
Net transfers Out of Level 3 117 
Balance at end of period $ — 
(a)    Transferred from Level 3 to Level 2 because observable market data became available.(a)
193
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS FAIR VALUE MEASUREMENTS
QUANTITATIVE INFORMATION ABOUT UNOBSERVABLE INPUTS
The following tables include quantitative information about the Duke Energy Registrants' derivatives classified as Level 3.
December 31, 2021
Weighted
Fair Value Average
Investment Type (in millions)Valuation Technique Unobservable Input Range Range
Duke Energy
Electricity contracts $ (145)RTO forward pricingForward electricity curves – price per MWh $19.04 –$139.11 $ 37.57 
Duke Energy Ohio
FTRs 2 RTO auction pricingFTR price – per MWh 0.06 – 1.79 0.96 
Duke Energy Indiana
FTRs 22 RTO auction pricingFTR price – per MWh (1.18)– 13.11 2.68 
Duke Energy
Total Level 3 derivatives$ (121)
December 31, 2020
Weighted
Fair Value Average
Investment Type (in millions)Valuation Technique Unobservable Input Range Range
Duke Energy
Electricity contracts $ (84)Discounted cash flowForward electricity curves – price per MWh $14.68 –$151.84 $ 28.84 
Duke Energy Ohio
FTRs 1 RTO auction pricing FTR price – per MWh 0.25 – 1.68 0.79 
Duke Energy Indiana
FTRs 6 RTO auction pricing FTR price – per MWh (2.40)– 7.41 1.05 
Duke Energy
Total Level 3 derivatives$ (77)
OTHER FAIR VALUE DISCLOSURES
The fair value and book value of long-term debt, including current maturities, is summarized in the following table. Estimates determined are not
necessarily indicative of amounts that could have been settled in current markets. Fair value of long-term debt uses Level 2 measurements.
 December 31, 2021 December 31, 2020
(in millions) Book Value Fair Value Book Value Fair Value
Duke Energy $ 63,835 $ 69,683 $ 59,863 $ 69,292 
Duke Energy Carolinas 13,275 15,101 12,218 14,917 
Progress Energy 20,823 23,751 19,264 23,470 
Duke Energy Progress 10,249 11,252 9,258 10,862 
Duke Energy Florida 8,482 9,772 7,915 9,756 
Duke Energy Ohio 3,193 3,570 3,089 3,650 
Duke Energy Indiana 4,323 5,067 4,091 5,204 
Piedmont 2,968 3,278 2,780 3,306 
(a)    Book value of long-term debt includes $1.25 billion as of December 31, 2021, and $1.3 billion as of December 31, 2020, of unamortized debt
discount and premium, net in purchase accounting adjustments related to the mergers with Progress Energy and Piedmont that are
excluded from fair value of long-term debt.
At both December 31, 2021, and December 31, 2020, fair value of cash and cash equivalents, accounts and notes receivable, accounts payable,
notes payable and commercial paper, and nonrecourse notes payable of VIEs are not materially different from their carrying amounts because of the
short-term nature of these instruments and/or because the stated rates approximate market rates.(a)
194
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS VARIABLE INTEREST ENTITIES
17. VARIABLE INTEREST ENTITIES
A VIE is an entity that is evaluated for consolidation using more than a simple analysis of voting control. The analysis to determine whether an entity
is a VIE considers contracts with an entity, credit support for an entity, the adequacy of the equity investment of an entity and the relationship of voting
power to the amount of equity invested in an entity. This analysis is performed either upon the creation of a legal entity or upon the occurrence of an
event requiring reevaluation, such as a significant change in an entity’s assets or activities. A qualitative analysis of control determines the party that
consolidates a VIE. This assessment is based on (i) what party has the power to direct the activities of the VIE that most significantly impact its
economic performance and (ii) what party has rights to receive benefits or is obligated to absorb losses that could potentially be significant to the VIE.
The analysis of the party that consolidates a VIE is a continual reassessment.
CONSOLIDATED VIEs
The obligations of the consolidated VIEs discussed in the following paragraphs are nonrecourse to the Duke Energy Registrants. The registrants
have no requirement to provide liquidity to, purchase assets of or guarantee performance of these VIEs unless noted in the following paragraphs.
No financial support was provided to any of the consolidated VIEs during the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, or is expected to be
provided in the future, that was not previously contractually required.
Receivables Financing – DERF/DEPR/DEFR
DERF, DEPR and DEFR are bankruptcy remote, special purpose subsidiaries of Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy
Florida, respectively. DERF, DEPR and DEFR are wholly owned LLCs with separate legal existence from their parent companies, and their assets
are not generally available to creditors of their parent companies. On a revolving basis, DERF, DEPR and DEFR buy certain accounts receivable
arising from the sale of electricity and related services from their parent companies.
DERF, DEPR and DEFR borrow amounts under credit facilities to buy these receivables. Borrowing availability from the credit facilities is limited to
the amount of qualified receivables purchased, which generally exclude receivables past due more than a predetermined number of days and
reserves for expected past-due balances. The sole source of funds to satisfy the related debt obligations is cash collections from the receivables.
Amounts borrowed under the credit facilities are reflected on the Consolidated Balance Sheets as Long-Term Debt.
The most significant activity that impacts the economic performance of DERF, DEPR and DEFR are the decisions made to manage delinquent
receivables. Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida are considered the primary beneficiaries and consolidate
DERF, DEPR and DEFR, respectively, as they make those decisions.
Receivables Financing – CRC
CRC is a bankruptcy remote, special purpose entity indirectly owned by Duke Energy. On a revolving basis, CRC buys certain accounts receivable
arising from the sale of electricity, natural gas and related services from Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana. CRC borrows amounts under a
credit facility to buy the receivables from Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana. Borrowing availability from the credit facility is limited to the
amount of qualified receivables sold to CRC, which generally exclude receivables past due more than a predetermined number of days and reserves
for expected past-due balances. The sole source of funds to satisfy the related debt obligation is cash collections from the receivables. Amounts
borrowed under the credit facility are reflected on Duke Energy's Consolidated Balance Sheets as Long-Term Debt.
The proceeds Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana receive from the sale of receivables to CRC are approximately 75% cash and 25% in the
form of a subordinated note from CRC. The subordinated note is a retained interest in the receivables sold. Depending on collection experience,
additional equity infusions to CRC may be required by Duke Energy to maintain a minimum equity balance of $3 million.
CRC is considered a VIE because (i) equity capitalization is insufficient to support its operations, (ii) power to direct the activities that most
significantly impact the economic performance of the entity is not held by the equity holder and (iii) deficiencies in net worth of CRC are funded by
Duke Energy. The most significant activities that impact the economic performance of CRC are decisions made to manage delinquent receivables.
Duke Energy is considered the primary beneficiary and consolidates CRC as it makes these decisions. Neither Duke Energy Ohio nor Duke Energy
Indiana consolidate CRC.
Receivables Financing – Credit Facilities
The following table summarizes the amounts and expiration dates of the credit facilities and associated restricted receivables described above.
Duke Energy
Duke Energy Duke Energy Duke Energy
Carolinas Progress Florida
(in millions) CRC DERF DEPR DEFR
Expiration date February 2023 January 2025 April 2023 April 2023
Credit facility amount $ 350 $ 475 $ 350 $ 250 
Amounts borrowed at December 31, 2021 350 475 350 250 
Amounts borrowed at December 31, 2020 350 364 250 250 
Restricted Receivables at December 31, 2021 587 844 574 427 
Restricted Receivables at December 31, 2020 547 696 500 397 
195
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS VARIABLE INTEREST ENTITIES
Nuclear Asset-Recovery Bonds – Duke Energy Florida Project Finance, LLC (DEFPF)
DEFPF is a bankruptcy remote, wholly owned special purpose subsidiary of Duke Energy Florida. DEFPF was formed in 2016 for the sole purpose of
issuing nuclear asset-recovery bonds to finance Duke Energy Florida's unrecovered regulatory asset related to Crystal River Unit 3.
In 2016, DEFPF issued senior secured bonds and used the proceeds to acquire nuclear asset-recovery property from Duke Energy Florida. The
nuclear asset-recovery property acquired includes the right to impose, bill, collect and adjust a non-bypassable nuclear asset-recovery charge from
all Duke Energy Florida retail customers until the bonds are paid in full and all financing costs have been recovered. The nuclear asset-recovery
bonds are secured by the nuclear asset-recovery property and cash collections from the nuclear asset-recovery charges are the sole source of funds
to satisfy the debt obligation. The bondholders have no recourse to Duke Energy Florida.
DEFPF is considered a VIE primarily because the equity capitalization is insufficient to support its operations. Duke Energy Florida has the power to
direct the significant activities of the VIE as described above and therefore Duke Energy Florida is considered the primary beneficiary and
consolidates DEFPF.
The following table summarizes the impact of DEFPF on Duke Energy Florida's Consolidated Balance Sheets.
December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020
Receivables of VIEs $ 5 $ 4 
Regulatory Assets: Current 54 53 
Current Assets: Other 39 39 
Other Noncurrent Assets: Regulatory assets 883 937 
Current Liabilities: Other 9 10 
Current maturities of long-term debt 56 55 
Long-Term Debt 946 1,002 
Storm Recovery Bonds – Duke Energy Carolinas NC Storm Funding and Duke Energy Progress NC Storm Funding
Duke Energy Carolinas NC Storm Funding, LLC. (DECNCSF) and Duke Energy Progress NC Storm Funding, LLC. (DEPNCSF) are bankruptcy
remote, wholly owned special purpose subsidiaries of Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress, respectively. These entities were formed in
2021 for the sole purpose of issuing storm recovery bonds to finance certain of Duke Energy Carolinas’ and Duke Energy Progress’ unrecovered
regulatory assets related to storm costs.
In November 2021, DECNCSF and DEPNCSF issued $237 million and $770 million of senior secured bonds, respectively and used the proceeds to
acquire storm recovery property from Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress. The storm recovery property was created by state
legislation and NCUC financing orders for the purpose of financing storm costs incurred in 2018 and 2019. The storm recovery property acquired
includes the right to impose, bill, collect and adjust a non-bypassable charge from all Duke Energy Carolinas’ and Duke Energy Progress’ retail
customers until the bonds are paid in full and all financing costs have been recovered. The storm recovery bonds are secured by the storm recovery
property and cash collections from the storm recovery charges are the sole source of funds to satisfy the debt obligation. The bondholders have no
recourse to Duke Energy Carolinas or Duke Energy Progress. For additional information, see Notes 3 and 6.
DECNCSF and DEPNCSF are considered VIEs primarily because the equity capitalization is insufficient to support their operations. Duke Energy
Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress have the power to direct the significant activities of the VIEs as described above and therefore Duke Energy
Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress are considered the primary beneficiaries and consolidate DECNCSF and DEPNCSF, respectively.
The following table summarizes the impact of these VIEs on Duke Energy Carolinas’ and Duke Energy Progress’ Consolidated Balance Sheets.
December 31, 2021
Duke Energy Duke Energy
(in millions) Carolinas Progress
Regulatory Assets: Current $ 12 $ 39 
Other Noncurrent Assets: Regulatory assets 220 720 
Other Noncurrent Assets: Other 1 4 
Interest Accrued 1 2 
Current maturities of long-term debt 5 15 
Long-Term Debt 228 747 
Commercial Renewables
Certain of Duke Energy’s renewable energy facilities are VIEs due to Duke Energy issuing guarantees for debt service and operations and
maintenance reserves in support of debt financings. Assets are restricted and cannot be pledged as collateral or sold to third parties without prior
approval of debt holders. Additionally, Duke Energy has VIEs associated with tax equity arrangements entered into with third-party investors in order
to finance the cost of renewable assets eligible for tax credits. The activities that most significantly impacted the economic performance of these
renewable energy facilities were decisions associated with siting, negotiating PPAs and EPC agreements, and decisions associated with ongoing
operations and maintenance-related activities. Duke Energy is considered the primary beneficiary and consolidates the entities as it is responsible for
all of these decisions.
196
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS VARIABLE INTEREST ENTITIES
The table below presents material balances reported on Duke Energy's Consolidated Balance Sheets related to Commercial Renewables VIEs.
December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020
Current Assets: Other $ 215 $ 257 
Property, Plant and Equipment: Cost 7,339 6,394 
Accumulated depreciation and amortization (1,474) (1,242)
Other Noncurrent Assets: Other 62 67 
Current maturities of long-term debt 167 167 
Long-Term Debt 1,475 1,569 
Other Noncurrent Liabilities: AROs 173 148 
Other Noncurrent Liabilities: Other 319 316 
NON-CONSOLIDATED VIEs
The following tables summarize the impact of non-consolidated VIEs on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
 December 31, 2021
 Duke Energy Duke Duke
Pipeline Commercial Energy Energy
(in millions) Investments Renewables Total Ohio Indiana
Receivables from affiliated companies $ — $ — $ — $ 79 $ 97 
Investments in equity method unconsolidated affiliates 15 508 523 — — 
Other noncurrent assets 61 — 61 — — 
Total assets $ 76 $ 508 $ 584 $ 79 $ 97 
Other current liabilities 47 4 51 — — 
Other noncurrent liabilities 54 3 57 — — 
Total liabilities $ 101 $ 7 $ 108 $ — $ — 
Net (liabilities) assets $ (25)$ 501 $ 476 $ 79 $ 97 
 December 31, 2020
 Duke Energy Duke Duke
Pipeline Commercial Energy Energy
(in millions) Investments Renewables Total Ohio Indiana
Receivables from affiliated companies $ — $ — $ — $ 83 $ 110 
Investments in equity method unconsolidated affiliates — 530 530 — — 
Other noncurrent assets 31 — 31 — — 
Total assets $ 31 $ 530 $ 561 $ 83 $ 110 
Other current liabilities 928 5 933 — — 
Other noncurrent liabilities 8 10 18 — — 
Total liabilities $ 936 $ 15 $ 951 $ — $ — 
Net (liabilities) assets $ (905)$ 515 $ (390)$ 83 $ 110 
The Duke Energy Registrants are not aware of any situations where the maximum exposure to loss significantly exceeds the carrying values shown
above except for certain renewable energy project entities guarantees for debt services and operations and maintenance, as discussed below.
Pipeline Investments
Duke Energy has investments in various joint ventures to construct and operate pipeline projects. These entities are considered VIEs due to having
insufficient equity to finance their own activities without subordinated financial support. Duke Energy does not have the power to direct the activities
that most significantly impact the economic performance, the obligation to absorb losses or the right to receive benefits of these VIEs and therefore
does not consolidate these entities.
Duke Energy has a 47% ownership interest in ACP. In 2020, Duke Energy determined that it would no longer invest in the construction of the ACP
pipeline. In February 2021, Duke Energy paid approximately $855 million to fund ACP's outstanding debt, relieving Duke Energy of its guarantee. See
Notes 3, 7 and 12 for further information regarding this transaction.
197
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS VARIABLE INTEREST ENTITIES
Commercial Renewables
Duke Energy has investments in various renewable energy project entities. Duke Energy has a 50% ownership in a VIE, which owns a portfolio of
wind projects. This entity is a VIE as a result of Duke Energy issuing guarantees for debt service and operations and maintenance reserves in
support of debt financings. Duke Energy does not consolidate this VIE because power to direct and control key activities is shared jointly by Duke
Energy and the other owner. Duke Energy also has equity ownership in an entity, which owns a portfolio of fuel cell projects. Duke Energy does not
consolidate the fuel cell portfolio as it does not have the power to direct the activities that most significantly impact the economic performance of the
entity.
OVEC
Duke Energy Ohio’s 9% ownership interest in OVEC is considered a non-consolidated VIE due to OVEC having insufficient equity to finance its
activities without subordinated financial support. The activities that most significantly impact OVEC's economic performance include fuel strategy and
supply activities and decisions associated with ongoing operations and maintenance-related activities. Duke Energy Ohio does not have the unilateral
power to direct these activities, and therefore, does not consolidate OVEC.
As a counterparty to an Inter-Company Power Agreement (ICPA), Duke Energy Ohio has a contractual arrangement to receive entitlements to
capacity and energy from OVEC’s power plants through June 2040 commensurate with its power participation ratio, which is equivalent to Duke
Energy Ohio's ownership interest. Costs, including fuel, operating expenses, fixed costs, debt amortization and interest expense, are allocated to
counterparties to the ICPA based on their power participation ratio. The value of the ICPA is subject to variability due to fluctuation in power prices
and changes in OVEC's cost of business. See Note 3 for additional information.
CRC
See discussion under Consolidated VIEs for additional information related to CRC.
Amounts included in Receivables from affiliated companies in the above table for Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana reflect their retained
interest in receivables sold to CRC. These subordinated notes held by Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana are stated at fair value. Carrying
values of retained interests are determined by allocating carrying value of the receivables between assets sold and interests retained based on
relative fair value. The allocated bases of the subordinated notes are not materially different than their face value because (i) the receivables
generally turnover in less than two months, (ii) credit losses are reasonably predictable due to the broad customer base and lack of significant
concentration and (iii) the equity in CRC is subordinate to all retained interests and thus would absorb losses first. The hypothetical effect on fair
value of the retained interests assuming both a 10% and a 20% unfavorable variation in credit losses or discount rates is not material due to the short
turnover of receivables and historically low credit loss history. Interest accrues to Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana on the retained
interests using the acceptable yield method. This method generally approximates the stated rate on the notes since the allocated basis and the face
value are nearly equivalent. An impairment charge is recorded against the carrying value of both retained interests and purchased beneficial interest
whenever it is determined that an OTTI has occurred.
Key assumptions used in estimating fair value are detailed in the following table.
 Duke Energy Ohio Duke Energy Indiana
 2021 2020 2021 2020
Anticipated credit loss ratio 0.5 % 0.5 % 0.3 % 0.3 %
Discount rate 1.1 % 1.6 % 1.1 % 1.6 %
Receivable turnover rate 13.5 % 13.4 % 11.3 % 11.3 %
The following table shows the gross and net receivables sold.
 Duke Energy Ohio Duke Energy Indiana
December 31, December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 2021 2020
Receivables sold $ 269 $ 270 $ 328 $ 344 
Less: Retained interests 79 83 97 110 
Net receivables sold $ 190 $ 187 $ 231 $ 234 
The following table shows sales and cash flows related to receivables sold.
 Duke Energy Ohio Duke Energy Indiana
 Years Ended December 31, Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 2019 2021 2020 2019
Sales       
Receivables sold $ 2,023 $ 1,905 $ 1,979 $ 2,909 $ 2,631 $ 2,837 
Loss recognized on sale 10 10 14 13 12 17 
Cash flows   
Cash proceeds from receivables sold 2,018 1,875 1,993 2,909 2,586 2,860 
Collection fees received 1 1 1 1 1 1 
Return received on retained interests 4 4 6 6 5 9 
198
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS VARIABLE INTEREST ENTITIES
Cash flows from sales of receivables are reflected within Cash Flows From Operating Activities and Cash Flows from Investing Activities on Duke
Energy Ohio’s and Duke Energy Indiana’s Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows.
Collection fees received in connection with servicing transferred accounts receivable are included in Operation, maintenance and other on Duke
Energy Ohio’s and Duke Energy Indiana’s Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income. The loss recognized on sales of
receivables is calculated monthly by multiplying receivables sold during the month by the required discount. The required discount is derived monthly
utilizing a three-year weighted average formula that considers charge-off history, late charge history and turnover history on the sold receivables, as
well as a component for the time value of money. The discount rate, or component for the time value of money, is the prior month-end LIBOR plus a
fixed rate of 1%.
18. REVENUE
Duke Energy recognizes revenue consistent with amounts billed under tariff offerings or at contractually agreed upon rates based on actual
physical delivery of electric or natural gas service, including estimated volumes delivered when billings have not yet occurred. As such, the majority
of Duke Energy’s revenues have fixed pricing based on the contractual terms of the published tariffs, with variability in expected cash flows
attributable to the customer’s volumetric demand and ultimate quantities of energy or natural gas supplied and used during the billing period. The
stand-alone selling price of related sales are designed to support recovery of prudently incurred costs and an appropriate return on invested assets
and are primarily governed by published tariff rates or contractual agreements approved by relevant regulatory bodies. As described in Note 1,
certain excise taxes and franchise fees levied by state or local governments are required to be paid even if not collected from the customer. These
taxes are recognized on a gross basis as part of revenues. Duke Energy elects to account for all other taxes net of revenues.
Performance obligations are satisfied over time as energy or natural gas is delivered and consumed with billings generally occurring monthly and
related payments due within 30 days, depending on regulatory requirements. In no event does the timing between payment and delivery of the
goods and services exceed one year. Using this output method for revenue recognition provides a faithful depiction of the transfer of electric and
natural gas service as customers obtain control of the commodity and benefit from its use at delivery. Additionally, Duke Energy has an enforceable
right to consideration for energy or natural gas delivered at any discrete point in time and will recognize revenue at an amount that reflects the
consideration to which Duke Energy is entitled for the energy or natural gas delivered.
As described above, the majority of Duke Energy’s tariff revenues are at-will and, as such, related contracts with customers have an expected
duration of one year or less and will not have future performance obligations for disclosure. Additionally, other long-term revenue streams, including
wholesale contracts, generally provide services that are part of a single performance obligation, the delivery of electricity or natural gas. As such,
other than material fixed consideration under long-term contracts, related disclosures for future performance obligations are also not applicable.
Duke Energy earns substantially all of its revenues through its reportable segments, Electric Utilities and Infrastructure, Gas Utilities and
Infrastructure and Commercial Renewables.
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure earns the majority of its revenues through retail and wholesale electric service through the generation,
transmission, distribution and sale of electricity. Duke Energy generally provides retail and wholesale electric service customers with their full
electric load requirements or with supplemental load requirements when the customer has other sources of electricity.
Retail electric service is generally marketed throughout Duke Energy's electric service territory through standard service offers. The standard
service offers are through tariffs determined by regulators in Duke Energy's regulated service territory. Each tariff, which is assigned to customers
based on customer class, has multiple components such as an energy charge, a demand charge, a basic facilities charge and applicable riders.
Duke Energy considers each of these components to be aggregated into a single performance obligation for providing electric service, or in the
case of distribution only customers in Duke Energy Ohio, for delivering electricity. Electricity is considered a single performance obligation satisfied
over time consistent with the series guidance and is provided and consumed over the billing period, generally one month. Retail electric service is
typically provided to at-will customers who can cancel service at any time, without a substantive penalty. Additionally, Duke Energy adheres to
applicable regulatory requirements in each jurisdiction to ensure the collectability of amounts billed and appropriate mitigating procedures are
followed when necessary. As such, revenue from contracts with customers for such contracts is equivalent to the electricity supplied and billed in
that period (including unbilled estimates).
Wholesale electric service is generally provided under long-term contracts using cost-based pricing. FERC regulates costs that may be recovered
from customers and the amount of return companies are permitted to earn. Wholesale contracts include both energy and demand charges. For full
requirements contracts, Duke Energy considers both charges as a single performance obligation for providing integrated electric service. For
contracts where energy and demand charges are considered separate performance obligations, energy and demand are each a distinct
performance obligation under the series guidance and are satisfied as energy is delivered and stand-ready service is provided on a monthly basis.
This service represents consumption over the billing period and revenue is recognized consistent with billings and unbilled estimates, which
generally occur monthly. Contractual amounts owed are typically trued up annually based upon incurred costs in accordance with FERC published
filings and the specific customer’s actual peak demand. Estimates of variable consideration related to potential additional billings or refunds owed
are updated quarterly.
199
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REVENUE
The majority of wholesale revenues are full requirements contracts where the customers purchase the substantial majority of their energy needs
and do not have a fixed quantity of contractually required energy or capacity. As such, related forecasted revenues are considered optional
purchases. Supplemental requirements contracts that include contracted blocks of energy and capacity at contractually fixed prices have the
following estimated remaining performance obligations:
Remaining Performance Obligations
(in millions) 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 Thereafter Total
Progress Energy $ 109 $ 53 $ 45 $ 7 $ 7 $ 43 $ 264 
Duke Energy Progress 8 8 8 — — — 24 
Duke Energy Florida 101 45 37 7 7 43 240 
Duke Energy Indiana 1 9 14 14 14 12 64 
Revenues for block sales are recognized monthly as energy is delivered and stand-ready service is provided, consistent with invoiced amounts and
unbilled estimates.
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure earns its revenue through retail and wholesale natural gas service through the transportation, distribution and sale of
natural gas. Duke Energy generally provides retail and wholesale natural gas service customers with all natural gas load requirements. Additionally,
while natural gas can be stored, substantially all natural gas provided by Duke Energy is consumed by customers simultaneously with receipt of
delivery.
Retail natural gas service is marketed throughout Duke Energy's natural gas service territory using published tariff rates. The tariff rates are
established by regulators in Duke Energy's service territories. Each tariff, which is assigned to customers based on customer class, have multiple
components, such as a commodity charge, demand charge, customer or monthly charge and transportation costs. Duke Energy considers each of
these components to be aggregated into a single performance obligation for providing natural gas service. For contracts where Duke Energy
provides all of the customer’s natural gas needs, the delivery of natural gas is considered a single performance obligation satisfied over time, and
revenue is recognized monthly based on billings and unbilled estimates as service is provided and the commodity is consumed over the billing
period. Additionally, natural gas service is typically at-will and customers can cancel service at any time, without a substantive penalty. Duke Energy
also adheres to applicable regulatory requirements to ensure the collectability of amounts billed and receivable and appropriate mitigating
procedures are followed when necessary.
Certain long-term individually negotiated contracts exist to provide natural gas service. These contracts are regulated and approved by state
commissions. The negotiated contracts have multiple components, including a natural gas and a demand charge, similar to retail natural gas
contracts. Duke Energy considers each of these components to be a single performance obligation for providing natural gas service. This service
represents consumption over the billing period, generally one month.
Fixed capacity payments under long-term contracts for the Gas Utilities and Infrastructure segment include minimum margin contracts and supply
arrangements with municipalities and power generation facilities. Revenues for related sales are recognized monthly as natural gas is delivered
and stand-ready service is provided, consistent with invoiced amounts and unbilled estimates. Estimated remaining performance obligations are as
follows:
Remaining Performance Obligations
(in millions) 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 Thereafter Total
Piedmont $ 71 $ 64 $ 61 $ 60 $ 50 $ 286 $ 592 
Commercial Renewables
Commercial Renewables earns the majority of its revenues through long-term PPAs and generally sells all of its wind and solar facility
output, electricity and RECs to customers. The majority of these PPAs have historically been accounted for as leases. For PPAs that are not
accounted for as leases, the delivery of electricity and the delivery of RECs are considered separate performance obligations.
The delivery of electricity is a performance obligation satisfied over time and represents generation and consumption of the electricity over
the billing period, generally one month. The delivery of RECs is a performance obligation satisfied at a point in time and represents delivery
of each REC generated by the wind or solar facility. The majority of self-generated RECs are bundled with energy in Duke Energy’s
contracts and, as such, related revenues are recognized as energy is generated and delivered as that pattern is consistent with Duke
Energy’s performance. Commercial Renewables recognizes revenue based on the energy generated and billed for the period, generally
one month, at contractual rates (including unbilled estimates) according to the invoice practical expedient. Amounts are typically due within
30 days of invoice.
Commercial Renewables also earns revenues from installation of distributed solar generation resources, which is primarily composed of EPC
projects to deliver functioning solar power systems, generally completed within two to 12 months from commencement of construction. The
installation of distributed solar generation resources is a performance obligation that is satisfied over time. Revenue from fixed-price EPC contracts is
recognized using the input method as work is performed based on the estimated ratio of incurred costs to estimated total costs.
Other
The remainder of Duke Energy’s operations is presented as Other, which does not include material revenues from contracts with customers.
200
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REVENUE
Disaggregated Revenues
For the Electric and Gas Utility and Infrastructure segments, revenue by customer class is most meaningful to Duke Energy as each respective
customer class collectively represents unique customer expectations of service, generally has different energy and demand requirements, and
operates under tailored, regulatory approved pricing structures. Additionally, each customer class is impacted differently by weather and a variety of
economic factors including the level of population growth, economic investment, employment levels, and regulatory activities in each of Duke
Energy’s jurisdictions. As such, analyzing revenues disaggregated by customer class allows Duke Energy to understand the nature, amount, timing
and uncertainty of revenue and cash flows arising from contracts with customers. For the Commercial Renewables segment, the majority of revenues
from contracts with customers are from selling all of the unit-contingent output at contractually defined pricing under long-term PPAs with consistent
expectations regarding the timing and certainty of cash flows. Disaggregated revenues are presented as follows:
Year Ended December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
(in millions) Duke EnergyProgress Energy Energy Energy Energy
By market or type of customer EnergyCarolinas EnergyProgress Florida Ohio IndianaPiedmont
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure
Residential $10,097 $ 3,054 $ 5,084 $ 2,156 $ 2,928 $ 767 $ 1,188 $ — 
General 6,375 2,210 2,883 1,378 1,505 440 825 — 
Industrial 2,924 1,145 894 634 260 135 750 — 
Wholesale 2,199 472 1,385 1,164 221 56 285 — 
Other revenues 879 264 716 387 329 83 86 — 
Total Electric Utilities and Infrastructure
revenue from contracts with customers $22,474 $ 7,145 $ 10,962 $ 5,719 $ 5,243 $ 1,481 $ 3,134 $ — 
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure
Residential $ 1,131 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 354 $ — $ 777 
Commercial 561 — — — — 143 — 418 
Industrial 158 — — — — 20 — 137 
Power Generation — — — — — — — 92 
Other revenues 133 — — — — 28 — 45 
Total Gas Utilities and Infrastructure
revenue from contracts with customers $ 1,983 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 545 $ — $ 1,469 
Commercial Renewables
Revenue from contracts with customers $ 217 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Other
Revenue from contracts with customers $ 29 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Total revenue from contracts with customers$24,703 $ 7,145 $ 10,962 $ 5,719 $ 5,243 $ 2,026 $ 3,134 $ 1,469 
Other revenue sources $ 394 $ (43)$ 95 $ 61 $ 16 $ 11 $ 40 $ 100 
Total revenues $25,097 $ 7,102 $ 11,057 $ 5,780 $ 5,259 $ 2,037 $ 3,174 $ 1,569 
(a)    Other revenue sources include revenues from leases, derivatives and alternative revenue programs that are not considered revenues from
contracts with customers. Alternative revenue programs in certain jurisdictions include regulatory mechanisms that periodically adjust for
over or under collection of related revenues.(a)
201
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REVENUE
Year Ended December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
(in millions) Duke EnergyProgress Energy Energy Energy Energy
By market or type of customer EnergyCarolinas EnergyProgress Florida Ohio IndianaPiedmont
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure
Residential $ 9,806 $ 2,997 $ 5,017 $ 2,059 $2,958 $ 726 $ 1,064 $ — 
General 6,194 2,233 2,779 1,312 1,467 442 740 — 
Industrial 2,859 1,137 901 649 252 137 683 — 
Wholesale 1,864 380 1,228 1,034 194 32 224 — 
Other revenues 914 281 596 294 302 82 72 — 
Total Electric Utilities and Infrastructure
revenue from contracts with customers$21,637 $ 7,028 $10,521 $ 5,348 $5,173 $ 1,419 $ 2,783 $ — 
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure
Residential $ 930 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 300 $ — $ 630 
Commercial 446 — — — — 117 — 329 
Industrial 127 — — — — 17 — 110 
Power Generation — — — — — — — 34 
Other revenues 87 — — — — 17 — 70 
Total Gas Utilities and Infrastructure
revenue from contracts with customers$ 1,590 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 451 $ — $ 1,173 
Commercial Renewables
Revenue from contracts with customers$ 227 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Other
Revenue from contracts with customers$ 26 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Total revenue from contracts with
customers $23,480 $ 7,028 $10,521 $ 5,348 $5,173 $ 1,870 $ 2,783 $ 1,173 
Other revenue sources $ 388 $ (13)$ 106 $ 74 $ 15 $ (12)$ 12 $ 124 
Total revenues $23,868 $ 7,015 $10,627 $ 5,422 $5,188 $ 1,858 $ 2,795 $ 1,297 
(a)    Other revenue sources include revenues from leases, derivatives and alternative revenue programs that are not considered revenues from
contracts with customers. Alternative revenue programs in certain jurisdictions include regulatory mechanisms that periodically adjust for
over or under collection of related revenues.(a)
202
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REVENUE
Year Ended December 31, 2019
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
(in millions) Duke EnergyProgress Energy Energy Energy Energy
By market or type of customer EnergyCarolinas EnergyProgress Florida Ohio IndianaPiedmont
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure
Residential $ 9,863 $ 3,044 $ 4,998 $ 2,144 $2,854 $ 733 $ 1,087 $ — 
General 6,431 2,244 2,935 1,368 1,567 451 802 — 
Industrial 3,071 1,215 934 675 259 147 774 — 
Wholesale 2,212 462 1,468 1,281 187 46 235 — 
Other revenues 770 276 548 317 231 80 89 — 
Total Electric Utilities and Infrastructure
revenue from contracts with customers$22,347 $ 7,241 $10,883 $ 5,785 $5,098 $ 1,457 $ 2,987 $ — 
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure
Residential $ 976 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 315 $ — $ 661 
Commercial 508 — — — — 130 — 378 
Industrial 141 — — — — 19 — 122 
Power Generation — — — — — — — 51 
Other revenues 129 — — — — 19 — 110 
Total Gas Utilities and Infrastructure
revenue from contracts with customers$ 1,754 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 483 $ — $ 1,322 
Commercial Renewables
Revenue from contracts with customers$ 223 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Other
Revenue from contracts with customers$ 24 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Total revenue from contracts with
customers $24,348 $ 7,241 $10,883 $ 5,785 $5,098 $ 1,940 $ 2,987 $ 1,322 
Other revenue sources $ 731 $ 154 $ 319 $ 172 $ 133 $ — $ 17 $ 59 
Total revenues $25,079 $ 7,395 $11,202 $ 5,957 $5,231 $ 1,940 $ 3,004 $ 1,381 
(a)    Other revenue sources include revenues from leases, derivatives and alternative revenue programs that are not considered revenues from
contracts with customers. Alternative revenue programs in certain jurisdictions include regulatory mechanisms that periodically adjust for
over or under collection of related revenues.
As described in Note 1, Duke Energy adopted the new guidance for credit losses effective January 1, 2020, using the modified retrospective method
of adoption, which does not require restatement of prior year reported results. The following table presents the reserve for credit losses for trade and
other receivables based on adoption of the new standard.
Years Ended December 31, 2020 and 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) EnergyCarolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio IndianaPiedmont
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ 76 $ 10 $ 16 $ 8 $ 7 $ 4 $ 3 $ 6 
Cumulative Change in Accounting Principle 5 1 2 1 1 — — 1 
Write-Offs (58) (13) (23) (8) (14) — — (6)
Credit Loss Expense 75 13 29 9 20 — — 11 
Other Adjustments 48 12 13 13 — — — — 
Balance at December 31, 2020 $ 146 $ 23 $ 37 $ 23 $ 14 $ 4 $ 3 $ 12 
Write-Offs (58) (21) (25) (12) (13) — — (9)
Credit Loss Expense 54 27 25 11 14 — — 7 
Other Adjustments (20) 13 (1) (1) 1 — — 5 
Balance at December 31, 2021 $ 122 $ 42 $ 36 $ 21 $ 16 $ 4 $ 3 $ 15 
Trade and other receivables are evaluated based on an estimate of the risk of loss over the life of the receivable and current and historical conditions
using supportable assumptions. Management evaluates the risk of loss for trade and other receivables by comparing the historical write-off amounts
to total revenue over a specified period. Historical loss rates are adjusted due to the impact of current conditions, as well as forecasted conditions
over a reasonable time period. The calculated write-off rate can be applied to the receivable balance for which an established reserve does not
already exist. Management reviews the assumptions and risk of loss periodically for trade and other receivables.(a)
203
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REVENUE
The aging of trade receivables is presented in the table below. Duke Energy considers receivables greater than 30 days outstanding past due.
December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke EnergyProgress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) EnergyCarolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio IndianaPiedmont
Unbilled Receivables $ 964 $ 316 $ 266 $ 193 $ 73 $ 4 $ 27 $ 106 
0-30 days 2,104 595 800 405 393 42 51 202 
30-60 days 212 77 72 44 28 4 13 12 
60-90 days 88 37 41 21 20 1 1 2 
90+ days 249 106 65 37 28 47 11 7 
Deferred Payment Arrangements 115 55 45 22 23 2 — 4 
Trade and Other Receivables $ 3,732 $ 1,186 $ 1,289 $ 722 $ 565 $ 100 $ 103 $ 333 
December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke EnergyProgress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) EnergyCarolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio IndianaPiedmont
Unbilled Receivables $ 969 $ 328 $ 283 $ 167 $ 116 $ 2 $ 16 $ 86 
0-30 days 1,789 445 707 398 307 60 26 149 
30-60 days 185 80 54 25 29 8 3 8 
60-90 days 22 1 10 4 6 2 1 3 
90+ days 119 16 32 9 23 30 12 9 
Deferred Payment Arrangements 215 96 80 52 28 — — 7 
Trade and Other Receivables $ 3,299 $ 966 $ 1,166 $ 655 $ 509 $ 102 $ 58 $ 262 
(a)    Unbilled revenues are recognized by applying customer billing rates to the estimated volumes of energy or natural gas delivered but not yet
billed and are included within Receivables and Receivables of VIEs on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
(b)    Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana sell, on a revolving basis, nearly all of their retail accounts receivable, including receivables for
unbilled revenues, to an affiliate, CRC, and account for the transfers of receivables as sales. Accordingly, the receivables sold are not
reflected on the Consolidated Balance Sheets of Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana. See Note 17 for further information. These
receivables for unbilled revenues are $82 million and $121 million for Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana, respectively, as of
December 31, 2021, and $87 million and $134 million for Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana, respectively, as of December 31,
2020.
(c)    Due to certain customer financial hardships created by the COVID-19 pandemic and resulting stay-at-home orders, Duke Energy permitted
customers to defer payment of past-due amounts through an installment payment plan over a period of several months.
19. STOCKHOLDERS' EQUITY
Basic EPS is computed by dividing net income available to Duke Energy common stockholders, as adjusted for distributed and undistributed earnings
allocated to participating securities and accumulated preferred dividends, by the weighted average number of common shares outstanding during the
period. Diluted EPS is computed by dividing net income available to Duke Energy common stockholders, as adjusted for distributed and undistributed
earnings allocated to participating securities and accumulated preferred dividends, by the diluted weighted average number of common shares
outstanding during the period. Diluted EPS reflects the potential dilution that could occur if securities or other agreements to issue common stock,
such as equity forward sale agreements, were exercised or settled. Duke Energy’s participating securities are RSUs that are entitled to dividends
declared on Duke Energy common stock during the RSUs vesting periods. Dividends declared on preferred stock are recorded on the Consolidated
Statements of Operations as a reduction of net income to arrive at net income available to Duke Energy common stockholders. Dividends
accumulated on preferred stock are an adjustment to net income used in the calculation of basic and diluted EPS.(a)(b)
(c)
(a)(b)
(c)
204
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS STOCKHOLDERS' EQUITY
The following table presents Duke Energy’s basic and diluted EPS calculations, the weighted average number of common shares outstanding and
common and preferred share dividends declared.
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions, except per share amounts) 2021 2020 2019
Net Income available to Duke Energy common stockholders $ 3,802 $ 1,270 $ 3,707 
Less: Income (Loss) from discontinued operations 7 7 (7)
Accumulated preferred stock dividends adjustment — 1 (15)
Less: Impact of participating securities 4 2 5 
Income from continuing operations available to Duke Energy common stockholders $ 3,791 $ 1,262 $ 3,694 
Weighted average common shares outstanding – basic 769 737 729 
Equity forwards — 1 — 
Weighted average common shares outstanding – diluted 769 738 729 
EPS from continuing operations available to Duke Energy common stockholders
Basic and Diluted $ 4.93 $ 1.71 $ 5.07 
Potentially dilutive items excluded from the calculation 2 2 2 
Dividends declared per common share $ 3.90 $ 3.82 $ 3.75 
Dividends declared on Series A preferred stock per depositary share $ 1.437 $ 1.437 $ 1.03 
Dividends declared on Series B preferred stock per share $48.750 $49.292 $ — 
(a)    Performance stock awards were not included in the dilutive securities calculation because the performance measures related to the awards had
not been met.
Common Stock
In November 2019, Duke Energy filed a prospectus supplement and executed an Equity Distribution Agreement (EDA) under which it may sell up to
$1.5 billion of its common stock through a new at-the-market (ATM) offering program, including an equity forward sales component. Under the terms
of the EDA, Duke Energy may issue and sell shares of common stock through September 2022.
Separately, in November 2019, Duke Energy marketed an equity offering of 28.75 million shares of common stock through an Underwriting
Agreement. In connection with the offering, Duke Energy entered into equity forward sales agreements with an initial forward price of $85.99 per
share. In March 2020, Duke Energy marketed approximately 940,000 shares of common stock through an equity forward transaction under the ATM
with an initial forward price of $89.76 per share. In May 2020, Duke Energy marketed approximately 903,000 shares of common stock through an
equity forward transaction under the ATM with an initial forward price of $82.44 per share. In August 2020, Duke Energy marketed approximately
936,000 shares of common stock through an equity forward transaction under the ATM with an initial forward price of $79.52 per share.
In December 2020, Duke Energy physically settled the equity forwards by delivering 32 million shares of common stock in exchange for net cash
proceeds of approximately $2.6 billion.
Preferred Stock
On March 29, 2019, Duke Energy completed the issuance of 40 million depositary shares, each representing 1/1,000th share of its Series A
Cumulative Redeemable Perpetual Preferred Stock, at a price of $25 per depositary share. The transaction resulted in net proceeds of $973
million after issuance costs with proceeds used for general corporate purposes and to reduce short-term debt. The preferred stock has a $25
liquidation preference per depositary share and earns dividends on a cumulative basis at a rate of 5.75% per annum. Dividends are payable quarterly
in arrears on the 16th day of March, June, September and December, and began on June 16, 2019.
The Series A Preferred Stock has no maturity or mandatory redemption date, is not redeemable at the option of the holders and includes separate
call options. The first call option allows Duke Energy to call the Series A Preferred Stock at a redemption price of $25.50 per depositary share prior to
June 15, 2024, in whole but not in part, at any time within 120 days after a ratings event where a rating agency amends, clarifies or changes the
criteria it uses to assign equity credit for securities such as the preferred stock. The second call option allows Duke Energy to call the preferred stock,
in whole or in part, at any time, on or after June 15, 2024, at a redemption price of $25 per depositary share. Duke Energy is also required to redeem
all accumulated and unpaid dividends if either call option is exercised.
On September 12, 2019, Duke Energy completed the issuance of 1 million shares of its Series B Fixed-Rate Reset Cumulative Redeemable
Perpetual Preferred Stock, at a price of $1,000 per share. The transaction resulted in net proceeds of $989 million after issuance costs with proceeds
being used to pay down short-term debt, repay at maturity $500 million senior notes due September 2019, and for general corporate purposes. The
preferred stock has a $1,000 liquidation preference per share and earns dividends on a cumulative basis at an initial rate of 4.875% per annum.
Dividends are payable semiannually in arrears on the 16th day of March and September, and began on March 16, 2020. On September 16, 2024, the
First Call Date, and any fifth anniversary of the First Call Date (each a Reset Date), the dividend rate will reset based on the then current five-year
U.S. Treasury rate plus a spread of 3.388%.
The Series B Preferred Stock has no maturity or mandatory redemption date, is not redeemable at the option of the holders and includes separate
call options. The first call option allows Duke Energy to call the Series B Preferred Stock at a redemption price of $1,020 per share, in whole but not
in part, at any time within 120 days after a ratings event. The second call option allows Duke Energy to call the preferred stock, in whole or in part, on
the First Call Date or any subsequent Reset Date at a redemption price in cash equal to $1,000 per share. Duke Energy is also required to redeem all
accumulated and unpaid dividends if either call option is exercised.(a)
205
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS STOCKHOLDERS' EQUITY
Dividends issued on its Series A and Series B Preferred Stock are subject to approval by the Board of Directors. However, the deferral of dividend
payments on the preferred stock prohibits the declaration of common stock dividends.
The Series A and Series B Preferred Stock rank, with respect to dividends and distributions upon liquidation or dissolution:
• senior to Common Stock and to each other class or series of capital stock established after the original issue date of the Series A and
Series B Preferred Stock that is expressly made subordinated to the Series A and Series B Preferred Stock;
• on a parity with any class or series of capital stock established after the original issue date of the Series A and Series B Preferred Stock
that is not expressly made senior or subordinated to the Series A or Series B Preferred Stock;
• junior to any class or series of capital stock established after the original issue date of the Series A and Series B Preferred Stock that is
expressly made senior to the Series A or Series B Preferred Stock;
• junior to all existing and future indebtedness (including indebtedness outstanding under Duke Energy's credit facilities, unsecured senior
notes, junior subordinated debentures and commercial paper) and other liabilities with respect to assets available to satisfy claims against
Duke Energy; and
• structurally subordinated to existing and future indebtedness and other liabilities of Duke Energy's subsidiaries and future preferred stock of
subsidiaries.
Holders of Series A and Series B Preferred Stock have no voting rights with respect to matters that generally require the approval of voting
stockholders. The limited voting rights of holders of Series A and Series B Preferred Stock include the right to vote as a single class, respectively, on
certain matters that may affect the preference or special rights of the preferred stock, except in the instance that Duke Energy elects to defer the
payment of dividends for a total of six quarterly full dividend periods for Series A Preferred Stock or three semiannual full dividend periods for Series
B Preferred Stock. If dividends are deferred for a cumulative total of six quarterly full dividend periods for Series A Preferred Stock or three
semiannual full dividend periods for Series B Preferred Stock, whether or not for consecutive dividend periods, holders of the respective preferred
stock have the right to elect two additional Board members to the Board of Directors.
20. SEVERANCE
During 2021, Duke Energy reviewed its operations and identified opportunities for improvement to better serve its customers. This operational review
included workforce realignment to ensure the company is staffed with the right skill sets and number of teammates to execute the long-term vision for
Duke Energy. As such, Duke Energy extended involuntary severance benefits to certain employees in specific areas as a part of these workforce
realignment efforts.
During 2020, as a result of partial settlements between Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress and the Public Staff, Duke Energy Carolinas
and Duke Energy Progress deferred as Regulatory assets on the Consolidated Balance Sheets, approximately $65 million and $33 million,
respectively, of previously recorded severance charges within Operation, maintenance and other on the Consolidated Statements of Operations.
These severance charges were previously recorded during 2018, as Duke Energy reviewed its operations and identified opportunities for
improvement to better serve its customers. This operational review included the company's workforce strategy and staffing levels to ensure the
company was staffed with the right skill sets and number of teammates to execute the long-term vision for Duke Energy. As such, Duke Energy
extended voluntary and involuntary severance benefits to certain employees in specific areas as a part of workforce planning and digital
transformation efforts.
The following table presents the direct and allocated severance and related charges accrued for approximately 290 employees in 2021, 30
employees in 2020 and 140 employees in 2019, by the Duke Energy Registrants within Operation, maintenance and other on the Consolidated
Statements of Operations.
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Year Ended December 31, 2021 $ 69 $ 33 $ 26 $ 20 $ 6 $ 2 $ 3 $ 2 
Year Ended December 31, 2020 (85) (58) (28) (31) 3 — — — 
Year Ended December 31, 2019 16 8 6 3 3 — 1 1 
(a)    Includes amortization of deferred severance charges of approximately $33 million, $22 million, $11 million and $11 million for Duke Energy,
Duke Energy Carolinas, Progress Energy and Duke Energy Progress, respectively.
(b)    Includes adjustments associated with 2018 severance charges of approximately $(3) million, $(2) million and $(1) million for Duke Energy, Duke
Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Indiana, respectively.
(c)    Includes unamortized deferred severance charges of approximately $(86) million, $(57) million, $(29) million and $(29) million for Duke Energy,
Duke Energy Carolinas, Progress Energy and Duke Energy Progress, respectively.
(d)    Includes adjustments associated with 2018 severance charges of approximately $(6) million, $(2) million, $(3) million and $(2) million for Duke
Energy, Duke Energy Carolinas, Progress Energy and Duke Energy Progress, respectively.(a)(b)
(c)(d)
206
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS SEVERANCE
The table below presents the severance liability for past and ongoing severance plans including the plans described above.
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Balance at December 31, 2020 $ 11 $ 2 $ 3 $ 1 $ 2 $ — $ 1 $ — 
Provision/Adjustments 36 1 1 1 — — — — 
Cash Reductions (8) (1) (2) (1) (1) — (1) — 
Balance at December 31, 2021 $ 39 $ 2 $ 2 $ 1 $ 1 $ — $ — $ — 
21. STOCK-BASED COMPENSATION
The Duke Energy Corporation 2015 Long-Term Incentive Plan (the 2015 Plan) provides for the grant of stock-based compensation awards to
employees and outside directors. The 2015 Plan reserves 10 million shares of common stock for issuance. Duke Energy has historically issued new
shares upon exercising or vesting of share-based awards. However, Duke Energy may use a combination of new share issuances and open market
repurchases for share-based awards that are exercised or vest in the future. Duke Energy has not determined with certainty the amount of such new
share issuances or open market repurchases.
The following table summarizes the total expense recognized by the Duke Energy Registrants, net of tax, for stock-based compensation.
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 2019
Duke Energy $ 64 $ 61 $ 65 
Duke Energy Carolinas 23 22 24 
Progress Energy 24 23 24 
Duke Energy Progress 15 15 15 
Duke Energy Florida 9 9 9 
Duke Energy Ohio 5 4 5 
Duke Energy Indiana 6 6 6 
Piedmont 3 3 3 
Duke Energy's pretax stock-based compensation costs, the tax benefit associated with stock-based compensation expense and stock-based
compensation costs capitalized are included in the following table.
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 2019
RSU awards $ 49 $ 46 $ 44 
Performance awards 39 38 45 
Pretax stock-based compensation cost $ 88 $ 84 $ 89 
Stock-based compensation costs capitalized 5 5 5 
Stock-based compensation expense $ 83 $ 79 $ 84 
Tax benefit associated with stock-based compensation expense $ 19 $ 18 $ 19 
RESTRICTED STOCK UNIT AWARDS
RSU awards generally vest over periods from immediate to three years. Fair value amounts are based on the market price of Duke Energy's common
stock on the grant date. The following table includes information related to RSU awards.
 Years Ended December 31,
 2021 2020 2019
Shares granted (in thousands) 673 498 571 
Fair value (in millions) $ 59 $ 50 $ 51 
207
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS STOCK-BASED COMPENSATION
The following table summarizes information about RSU awards outstanding.
Weighted Average
Shares Grant Date Fair Value
 (in thousands) (per share)
Outstanding at December 31, 2020 939 $ 93 
Granted 673 88 
Vested (502) 89 
Forfeited (67) 92 
Outstanding at December 31, 2021 1,043 92 
RSU awards expected to vest 996 92 
The total grant date fair value of shares vested during the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, was $45 million, $43 million and $49
million, respectively. At December 31, 2021, Duke Energy had $35 million of unrecognized compensation cost, which is expected to be recognized
over a weighted average period of 23 months.
PERFORMANCE AWARDS
Stock-based performance awards generally vest after three years if performance targets are met. The actual number of shares issued will range from
zero to 200% of target shares, depending on the level of performance achieved.
Performance awards contain performance conditions and a market condition. The performance conditions are based on Duke Energy's cumulative
adjusted EPS and total incident case rate (total incident case rate is one of our key employee safety metrics). The market condition is based on TSR
of Duke Energy relative to a predefined peer group.
Relative TSR is valued using a path-dependent model that incorporates expected relative TSR into the fair value determination of Duke Energy’s
performance-based share awards. The model uses three-year historical volatilities and correlations for all companies in the predefined peer group,
including Duke Energy, to simulate Duke Energy’s relative TSR as of the end of the performance period. For each simulation, Duke Energy’s relative
TSR associated with the simulated stock price at the end of the performance period plus expected dividends within the period results in a value per
share for the award portfolio. The average of these simulations is the expected portfolio value per share. Actual life to date results of Duke Energy’s
relative TSR for each grant are incorporated within the model. For performance awards granted in 2021, the model used a risk-free interest rate of
0.24%, which reflects the yield on three-year Treasury bonds as of the grant date, and an expected volatility of 26.9% based on Duke Energy's
historical volatility over three years using daily stock prices.
The following table includes information related to stock-based performance awards.
 Years Ended December 31,
 2021 2020 2019
Shares granted assuming target performance (in thousands) 380 319 320 
Fair value (in millions) $ 33 $ 34 $ 27 
The following table summarizes information about stock-based performance awards outstanding and assumes payout at the target level.
Weighted Average
Shares Grant Date Fair Value
 (in thousands) (per share)
Outstanding at December 31, 2020 962 $ 87 
Granted 380 88 
Vested (346) 73 
Forfeited (44) 92 
Outstanding at December 31, 2021 952 93 
Stock-based performance awards expected to vest 927 93 
The total grant date fair value of shares vested during the years ended December 31, 2021, and 2020, was $25 million and $36 million, respectively.
At December 31, 2021, Duke Energy had $20 million of unrecognized compensation cost, which is expected to be recognized over a weighted
average period of 22 months.
208
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
22. EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
DEFINED BENEFIT RETIREMENT PLANS
Duke Energy and certain subsidiaries maintain, and the Subsidiary Registrants participate in, qualified, non-contributory defined benefit retirement
plans. The Duke Energy plans cover most employees using a cash balance formula. Under a cash balance formula, a plan participant accumulates a
retirement benefit consisting of pay credits based upon a percentage of current eligible earnings, age or age and years of service and interest credits.
Certain employees are eligible for benefits that use a final average earnings formula. Under these final average earnings formulas, a plan participant
accumulates a retirement benefit equal to the sum of percentages of their (i) highest three-, four-, or five-year average earnings, (ii) highest three-,
four-, or five-year average earnings in excess of covered compensation per year of participation (maximum of 35 years) or (iii) highest three-year
average earnings times years of participation in excess of 35 years. Duke Energy also maintains, and the Subsidiary Registrants participate in, non-
qualified, non-contributory defined benefit retirement plans that cover certain executives. The qualified and non-qualified, non-contributory defined
benefit plans are closed to new participants.
Duke Energy uses a December 31 measurement date for its defined benefit retirement plan assets and obligations. Actuarial losses experienced by
the defined benefit retirement plans in remeasuring plan assets as of December 31, 2021, were primarily attributable to actual investment
performance that was less than expected investment performance. Actuarial gains experienced by the defined benefit retirement plans in
remeasuring plan obligations as of December 31, 2021, were primarily attributable to the increase in the discount rate used to measure plan
obligations. Actuarial gains experienced by the defined benefit retirement plans in remeasuring plan assets as of December 31, 2020, were
attributable to actual investment performance that exceeded expected investment performance. Actuarial losses experienced by the defined benefit
retirement plans in remeasuring plan obligations as of December 31, 2020, were primarily attributable to the decrease in the discount rate used to
measure plan obligations.
Net periodic benefit costs disclosed in the tables below represent the cost of the respective benefit plan for the periods presented prior to
capitalization of amounts reflected as Net property, plant and equipment, on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. Only the service cost component of
net periodic benefit costs is eligible to be capitalized. The remaining non-capitalized portions of net periodic benefit costs are classified as either: (1)
service cost, which is recorded in Operations, maintenance and other on the Consolidated Statements of Operations; or as (2) components of non-
service cost, which is recorded in Other income and expenses, net on the Consolidated Statements of Operations. Amounts presented in the tables
below for the Subsidiary Registrants represent the amounts of pension and other post-retirement benefit cost allocated by Duke Energy for
employees of the Subsidiary Registrants. Additionally, the Consolidated Statements of Operations of the Subsidiary Registrants also include allocated
net periodic benefit costs for their proportionate share of pension and post-retirement benefit cost for employees of Duke Energy’s shared services
affiliate that provide support to the Subsidiary Registrants. However, in the tables below, these amounts are only presented within the Duke Energy
column (except for amortization of settlement charges). These allocated amounts are included in the governance and shared service costs discussed
in Note 13.
Duke Energy’s policy is to fund amounts on an actuarial basis to provide assets sufficient to meet benefit payments to be paid to plan participants.
Duke Energy does not anticipate making any contributions in 2022. The following table includes information related to the Duke Energy Registrants’
contributions to its qualified defined benefit pension plans.
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Contributions Made:
2021 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
2020 — — — — — — — — 
2019 77 7 57 4 53 2 2 1 
QUALIFIED PENSION PLANS
Components of Net Periodic Pension Costs
Year Ended December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Service cost $ 176 $ 56 $ 50 $ 29 $ 21 $ 5 $ 10 $ 6 
Interest cost on projected benefit
obligation 220 51 70 30 39 13 18 7 
Expected return on plan assets (558) (141) (187) (84) (102) (28) (40) (20)
Amortization of actuarial loss 133 29 38 18 20 7 13 10 
Amortization of prior service credit (29) (8) (2) (1) (1) (1) (2) (9)
Amortization of settlement charges 9 5 2 2 1 — — 1 
Net periodic pension costs $ (49)$ (8)$ (29)$ (6)$ (22)$ (4)$ (1)$ (5)(a)(b)
209
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
Year Ended December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Service cost $ 165 $ 51 $ 48 $ 27 $ 21 $ 5 $ 9 $ 6 
Interest cost on projected benefit
obligation 269 62 85 38 46 15 22 9 
Expected return on plan assets (572) (145) (190) (87) (101) (28) (42) (21)
Amortization of actuarial loss 128 28 41 18 23 6 12 9 
Amortization of prior service credit (32) (8) (3) (2) (1) — (2) (9)
Amortization of settlement charges 18 9 7 6 1 — 1 1 
Net periodic pension costs $ (24)$ (3)$ (12)$ — $ (11)$ (2)$ — $ (5)
Year Ended December 31, 2019
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Service cost $ 158 $ 49 $ 46 $ 26 $ 20 $ 4 $ 9 $ 5 
Interest cost on projected benefit
obligation 317 75 100 45 54 18 26 10 
Expected return on plan assets (567) (147) (178) (88) (89) (28) (43) (22)
Amortization of actuarial loss 108 24 39 15 24 4 8 8 
Amortization of prior service credit (32) (8) (3) (2) (1) — (2) (9)
Amortization of settlement charge 6 2 1 1 — 2 — — 
Net periodic pension costs $ (10)$ (5)$ 5 $ (3)$ 8 $ — $ (2)$ (8)
(a)    Duke Energy amounts exclude $3 million, $4 million and $4 million for the years ended December 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively, of
regulatory asset amortization resulting from purchase accounting adjustments associated with Duke Energy's merger with Cinergy in April
2006.
(b)    Duke Energy Ohio amounts exclude $1 million, $2 million and $2 million for the years ended December 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively, of
regulatory asset amortization resulting from purchase accounting adjustments associated with Duke Energy's merger with Cinergy in April
2006.
Amounts Recognized in Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income and Regulatory Assets
Year Ended December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Regulatory assets, net decrease $ (261)$ (57)$ (128)$ (31)$ (97)$ (17)$ (19)$ (5)
Accumulated other comprehensive
loss (income)
Deferred income tax expense $ 1 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Amortization of prior year service
credit 1 — — — — — — — 
Amortization of prior year actuarial
losses (8) — (1) — — — — — 
Net amount recognized in
accumulated other comprehensive
income $ (6)$ — $ (1)$ — $ — $ — $ — $ — (a)(b)
(a)(b)
210
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
Year Ended December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Regulatory assets, net (decrease)
increase $ (62)$ (39)$ (26)$ (30)$ 4 $ (2)$ 5 $ (1)
Accumulated other comprehensive
loss (income)
Deferred income tax expense $ 2 $ — $ 1 $ — $ 1 $ — $ — $ — 
Amortization of prior year service
credit 1 — — — — — — — 
Amortization of prior year actuarial
losses (11) — (1) — (3) — — — 
Net amount recognized in
accumulated other comprehensive
income $ (8)$ — $ — $ — $ (2)$ — $ — $ — 
Reconciliation of Funded Status to Net Amount Recognized
Year Ended December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Change in Projected Benefit
Obligation
Obligation at prior measurement date$ 8,634 $ 1,988 $ 2,715 $ 1,193 $ 1,507 $ 502 $ 715 $ 293 
Service cost 168 54 48 28 20 5 9 6 
Interest cost 220 51 70 30 39 13 18 7 
Actuarial gain (200) (42) (108) (18) (89) (10) (10) (5)
Benefits paid (615) (148) (161) (80) (81) (50) (52) (28)
Transfers — — (4) — (4) (10) — — 
Obligation at measurement date $ 8,207 $ 1,903 $ 2,560 $ 1,153 $ 1,392 $ 450 $ 680 $ 273 
Accumulated Benefit Obligation at
measurement date $ 8,144 $ 1,904 $ 2,529 $ 1,154 $ 1,361 $ 439 $ 672 $ 274 
Change in Fair Value of Plan
Assets
Plan assets at prior measurement
date $ 9,337 $ 2,381 $ 3,049 $ 1,422 $ 1,605 $ 472 $ 684 $ 343 
Actual return on plan assets 513 132 169 79 90 26 37 19 
Benefits paid (615) (148) (161) (80) (81) (50) (52) (28)
Transfers — — (4) — (4) (10) — — 
Plan assets at measurement date $ 9,235 $ 2,365 $ 3,053 $ 1,421 $ 1,610 $ 438 $ 669 $ 334 
Funded status of plan $ 1,028 $ 462 $ 493 $ 268 $ 218 $ (12)$ (11)$ 61 
211
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
Year Ended December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Change in Projected Benefit
Obligation
Obligation at prior measurement date$ 8,321 $ 1,923 $ 2,608 $ 1,170 $ 1,424 $ 481 $ 693 $ 292 
Service cost 157 49 46 26 20 4 8 5 
Interest cost 269 62 85 38 46 15 22 9 
Actuarial loss 433 83 144 50 93 21 46 14 
Benefits paid (541) (137) (160) (83) (76) (34) (49) (27)
Benefits paid – settlements (5) — — — — — (5) — 
Transfers — 8 (8) (8) — 15 — — 
Obligation at measurement date $ 8,634 $ 1,988 $ 2,715 $ 1,193 $ 1,507 $ 502 $ 715 $ 293 
Accumulated Benefit Obligation at
measurement date $ 8,577 $ 1,989 $ 2,684 $ 1,194 $ 1,476 $ 493 $ 709 $ 294 
Change in Fair Value of Plan
Assets
Plan assets at prior measurement
date $ 8,910 $ 2,263 $ 2,898 $ 1,364 $ 1,515 $ 443 $ 667 $ 335 
Actual return on plan assets 973 247 319 149 166 48 71 35 
Benefits paid (541) (137) (160) (83) (76) (34) (49) (27)
Benefits paid – settlements (5) — — — — — (5) — 
Transfers — 8 (8) (8) — 15 — — 
Plan assets at measurement date $ 9,337 $ 2,381 $ 3,049 $ 1,422 $ 1,605 $ 472 $ 684 $ 343 
Funded status of plan $ 703 $ 393 $ 334 $ 229 $ 98 $ (30)$ (31)$ 50 
Amounts Recognized in the Consolidated Balance Sheets
December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Prefunded pension $ 1,071 $ 462 $ 494 $ 268 $ 219 $ 74 $ 100 $ 61 
Noncurrent pension liability $ 43 $ — $ 1 $ — $ 1 $ 86 $ 111 $ — 
Net asset (liability) recognized $ 1,028 $ 462 $ 493 $ 268 $ 218 $ (12)$ (11)$ 61 
Regulatory assets $ 1,649 $ 324 $ 563 $ 252 $ 311 $ 93 $ 190 $ 75 
Accumulated other comprehensive
(income) loss  
Deferred income tax benefit $ (20)$ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Prior service credit (1) — — — — — — — 
Net actuarial loss 92 — 1 — — — — — 
Net amounts recognized in accumulated
other comprehensive loss $ 71 $ — $ 1 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — (a)
(b)
212
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Prefunded pension $ 780 $ 393 $ 379 $ 229 $ 143 $ 58 $ 79 $ 50 
Noncurrent pension liability $ 77 $ — $ 45 $ — $ 45 $ 88 $ 110 $ — 
Net asset (liability) recognized $ 703 $ 393 $ 334 $ 229 $ 98 $ (30)$ (31)$ 50 
Regulatory assets $ 1,910 $ 381 $ 691 $ 283 $ 408 $ 110 $ 209 $ 80 
Accumulated other comprehensive
(income) loss
Deferred income tax benefit $ (21)$ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Prior service credit (2) — — — — — — — 
Net actuarial loss 100 — 2 — — — — — 
Net amounts recognized in accumulated
other comprehensive loss $ 77 $ — $ 2 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
(a)    Included in Other within Other Noncurrent Assets on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
(b)    Included in Accrued pension and other post-retirement benefit costs on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
Information for Plans with Accumulated Benefit Obligation in Excess of Plan Assets
December 31, 2021
Duke Duke
Energy Energy
(in millions) Ohio Indiana
Projected benefit obligation $ 153 $ 284 
Accumulated benefit obligation 143 275 
Fair value of plan assets 67 173 
December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke
Duke Progress Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Energy Florida Ohio Indiana
Projected benefit obligation $4,914 $ 828 $ 828 $ 184 $ 293 
Accumulated benefit obligation 4,856 796 796 176 285 
Fair value of plan assets 4,837 783 783 96 183 
Assumptions Used for Pension Benefits Accounting
The discount rate used to determine the current year pension obligation and following year’s pension expense is based on a bond selection-
settlement portfolio approach. This approach develops a discount rate by selecting a portfolio of high-quality corporate bonds that generate sufficient
cash flow to provide for projected benefit payments of the plan. The selected bond portfolio is derived from a universe of non-callable corporate
bonds rated Aa quality or higher. After the bond portfolio is selected, a single interest rate is determined that equates the present value of the plan’s
projected benefit payments discounted at this rate with the market value of the bonds selected.
The average remaining service period for participants in active plans and life expectancy of participants in inactive plans is 14 years for Duke Energy,
Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Ohio, 15 years for Progress Energy and Duke Energy Florida, 13 years for Duke Energy Carolinas and
Duke Energy Indiana and nine years for Piedmont.(a)
(b)
213
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
The following tables present the assumptions or range of assumptions used for pension benefit accounting.
December 31,
2021 2020 2019
Benefit Obligations
Discount rate 2.90% 2.60% 3.30%
Interest crediting rate 4.00% 4.00% 4.00%
Salary increase 3.50 %–4.00% 3.50 %–4.00% 3.50 %–4.00%
Net Periodic Benefit Cost
Discount rate 2.60% 3.30% 4.30%
Interest crediting rate 4.00% 4.00% 4.00%
Salary increase 3.50 %–4.00% 3.50 %–4.00% 3.50 %–4.00%
Expected long-term rate of return on plan assets 6.50% 6.85% 6.85%
Expected Benefit Payments
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke EnergyProgress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) EnergyCarolinas EnergyProgress Florida Ohio IndianaPiedmont
Years ending December 31,
2022 $ 652 $ 174 $ 177 $ 95 $ 81 $ 37 $ 48 $ 27 
2023 653 173 180 97 82 36 48 24 
2024 645 171 181 96 84 35 47 23 
2025 632 168 180 94 85 34 47 20 
2026 605 155 176 90 86 33 45 21 
2027-2031 2,705 655 818 389 426 149 218 85 
NON-QUALIFIED PENSION PLANS
The accumulated benefit obligation, which equals the projected benefit obligation for non-qualified pension plans, was $300 million for Duke Energy,
$12 million for Duke Energy Carolinas, $104 million for Progress Energy, $31 million for Duke Energy Progress, $41 million for Duke Energy Florida,
$3 million for Duke Energy Ohio, $2 million for Duke Energy Indiana and $3 million for Piedmont as of December 31, 2021.
Employer contributions, which equal benefits paid for non-qualified pension plans, were $24 million for Duke Energy, $1 million for Duke Energy
Carolinas, $8 million for Progress Energy, $3 million for Duke Energy Progress and $3 million for Duke Energy Florida for the year ended
December 31, 2021. Employer contributions were not material for Duke Energy Ohio, Duke Energy Indiana or Piedmont for the year ended
December 31, 2021.
Net periodic pension costs for non-qualified pension plans were not material for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 or 2019.
OTHER POST-RETIREMENT BENEFIT PLANS
Duke Energy provides, and the Subsidiary Registrants participate in, some health care and life insurance benefits for retired employees on a
contributory and non-contributory basis. Employees are eligible for these benefits if they have met age and service requirements at retirement, as
defined in the plans. The health care benefits include medical, dental, vision and prescription drug coverage and are subject to certain limitations,
such as deductibles and copayments.
Duke Energy did not make any pre-funding contributions to its other post-retirement benefit plans during the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020
or 2019.
214
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
Components of Net Periodic Other Post-Retirement Benefit Costs
Year Ended December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Service cost $ 4 $ 1 $ 1 $ — $ — $ — $ 1 $ — 
Interest cost on accumulated post-
retirement benefit obligation 18 4 7 4 3 1 1 1 
Expected return on plan assets (11) (7) — — — — — (2)
Amortization of actuarial loss 2 — 1 — 1 — 4 — 
Amortization of prior service credit (13) (4) (2) (1) (1) (1) (1) (2)
Net periodic post-retirement benefit
costs $ — $ (6)$ 7 $ 3 $ 3 $ — $ 5 $ (3)
Year Ended December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Service cost $ 4 $ 1 $ 1 $ — $ — $ — $ 1 $ — 
Interest cost on accumulated post-
retirement benefit obligation 23 5 10 5 4 1 2 1 
Expected return on plan assets (13) (8) — — — — — (2)
Amortization of actuarial loss 2 — 1 — 1 — 4 — 
Amortization of prior service credit (14) (4) (3) (1) (2) (1) (1) (2)
Net periodic post-retirement benefit
costs $ 2 $ (6)$ 9 $ 4 $ 3 $ — $ 6 $ (3)
Year Ended December 31, 2019
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Service cost $ 4 $ 1 $ 1 $ — $ 1 $ — $ 1 $ — 
Interest cost on accumulated post-
retirement benefit obligation 30 7 12 7 5 1 3 1 
Expected return on plan assets (12) (7) — — — — — (1)
Amortization of actuarial loss 4 2 1 — 1 — 4 — 
Amortization of prior service credit (19) (5) (8) (1) (7) (1) (1) (2)
Net periodic post-retirement benefit
costs $ 7 $ (2)$ 6 $ 6 $ — $ — $ 7 $ (2)
(a)    Duke Energy amounts exclude $5 million, $6 million and $6 million for the years ended December 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively, of
regulatory asset amortization resulting from purchase accounting adjustments associated with Duke Energy's merger with Cinergy in April
2006.
(b)    Duke Energy Ohio amounts exclude $1 million, $1 million and $2 million for the years ended December 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively, of
regulatory asset amortization resulting from purchase accounting adjustments associated with Duke Energy's merger with Cinergy in April
2006.(a)(b)
(a)(b)
(a)(b)
215
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
Amounts Recognized in Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income and Regulatory Assets and Liabilities
Year Ended December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Regulatory assets, net (decrease)
increase $ (15)$ — $ (18)$ (9)$ (9)$ 4 $ (4)$ — 
Regulatory liabilities, net increase $ 23 $ 12 $ — $ — $ — $ 4 $ 1 $ 2 
Accumulated other comprehensive
(income) loss
Amortization of prior year actuarial
gain $ (1)$ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Net amount recognized in
accumulated other comprehensive
income $ (1)$ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Year Ended December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Regulatory assets, net increase
(decrease) $ 9 $ — $ 9 $ 6 $ 3 $ — $ (4)$ — 
Regulatory liabilities, net decrease$ (10)$ (7)$ — $ — $ — $ — $ (1)$ — 
Accumulated other comprehensive
(income) loss
Amortization of prior year service
credit $ 1 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Net amount recognized in
accumulated other comprehensive
income $ 1 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Reconciliation of Funded Status to Accrued Other Post-Retirement Benefit Costs
Year Ended December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Change in Projected Benefit
Obligation
Accumulated post-retirement benefit
obligation at prior measurement date$ 709 $ 174 $ 299 $ 166 $ 130 $ 27 $ 61 $ 30 
Service cost 4 1 1 — — — 1 — 
Interest cost 18 4 7 4 3 1 1 1 
Plan participants' contributions 14 3 5 3 2 1 2 — 
Actuarial gains (47) (14) (20) (10) (10) (1) (2) (2)
Benefits paid (73) (19) (29) (16) (13) (3) (9) (2)
Accumulated post-retirement benefit
obligation at measurement date $ 625 $ 149 $ 263 $ 147 $ 112 $ 25 $ 54 $ 27 
Change in Fair Value of Plan Assets
Plan assets at prior measurement date$ 237 $ 139 $ (1)$ (2)$ (1)$ 9 $ 7 $ 37 
Actual return on plan assets 15 9 — — — 1 — 3 
Benefits paid (73) (19) (29) (16) (13) (3) (9) (2)
Employer contributions 18 3 24 13 10 1 6 1 
Plan participants' contributions 14 3 5 3 2 1 2 — 
Plan assets at measurement date $ 211 $ 135 $ (1)$ (2)$ (2)$ 9 $ 6 $ 39 
Funded status of plan $ (414)$ (14)$ (264)$ (149)$ (114)$ (16)$ (48)$ 12 
216
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
Year Ended December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Change in Projected Benefit
Obligation
Accumulated post-retirement benefit
obligation at prior measurement date$ 723 $ 175 $ 303 $ 168 $ 135 $ 29 $ 64 $ 30 
Service cost 4 1 1 — — — 1 — 
Interest cost 23 5 10 5 4 1 2 1 
Plan participants' contributions 15 3 5 3 2 1 2 — 
Actuarial losses 19 8 8 5 2 — 1 1 
Benefits paid (75) (18) (28) (15) (13) (4) (9) (2)
Accumulated post-retirement benefit
obligation at measurement date $ 709 $ 174 $ 299 $ 166 $ 130 $ 27 $ 61 $ 30 
Change in Fair Value of Plan Assets
Plan assets at prior measurement date$ 220 $ 130 $ (1)$ (1)$ — $ 9 $ 5 $ 34 
Actual return on plan assets 24 14 — — — — 1 4 
Benefits paid (75) (18) (28) (15) (13) (4) (9) (2)
Employer contributions 53 10 23 11 10 3 8 1 
Plan participants' contributions 15 3 5 3 2 1 2 — 
Plan assets at measurement date $ 237 $ 139 $ (1)$ (2)$ (1)$ 9 $ 7 $ 37 
Funded status of plan $ (472)$ (35)$ (300)$ (168)$ (131)$ (18)$ (54)$ 7 
Amounts Recognized in the Consolidated Balance Sheets
December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Prefunded post-retirement benefit$ 12 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 1 $ — $ 12 
Current post-retirement liability 9 — 5 3 2 1 — — 
Noncurrent post-retirement liability 417 14 259 146 112 16 48 — 
Net liability (asset) recognized $ 414 $ 14 $ 264 $ 149 $ 114 $ 16 $ 48 $ (12)
Regulatory assets $ 129 $ — $ 126 $ 79 $ 47 $ 4 $ 28 $ — 
Regulatory liabilities $ 162 $ 44 $ — $ — $ — $ 21 $ 63 $ 5 
Accumulated other comprehensive
(income) loss
Deferred income tax expense $ 3 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Prior service credit (1) — — — — — — — 
Net actuarial gain (14) — — — — — — — 
Net amounts recognized in
accumulated other comprehensive
income $ (12)$ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — (a)
(b)
217
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Prefunded post-retirement benefit$ 8 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 1 $ — $ 7 
Current post-retirement liability 9 — 6 4 2 2 — — 
Noncurrent post-retirement liability 471 35 294 164 129 17 54 — 
Net liability (asset) recognized $ 472 $ 35 $ 300 $ 168 $ 131 $ 18 $ 54 $ (7)
Regulatory assets $ 144 $ — $ 144 $ 88 $ 56 $ — $ 32 $ — 
Regulatory liabilities $ 139 $ 32 $ — $ — $ — $ 17 $ 62 $ 3 
Accumulated other comprehensive
(income) loss
Deferred income tax expense $ 3 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Prior service credit (1) — — — — — — — 
Net actuarial gain (13) — — — — — — — 
Net amounts recognized in
accumulated other comprehensive
income $ (11)$ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
(a)    Included in Other within Current Liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. 
(b)    Included in Accrued pension and other post-retirement benefit costs on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
Assumptions Used for Other Post-Retirement Benefits Accounting
The discount rate used to determine the current year other post-retirement benefits obligation and following year’s other post-retirement benefits
expense is based on a bond selection-settlement portfolio approach. This approach develops a discount rate by selecting a portfolio of high-quality
corporate bonds that generate sufficient cash flow to provide for projected benefit payments of the plan. The selected bond portfolio is derived from a
universe of non-callable corporate bonds rated Aa quality or higher. After the bond portfolio is selected, a single interest rate is determined that
equates the present value of the plan’s projected benefit payments discounted at this rate with the market value of the bonds selected.
The average remaining service period of active covered employees is four years for Duke Energy, seven years for Duke Energy Florida, six years for
Duke Energy Carolinas, Progress Energy, Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Indiana and Piedmont and five years for Duke Energy Ohio.
The following tables present the assumptions used for other post-retirement benefits accounting.
December 31,
2021 2020 2019
Benefit Obligations
Discount rate 2.90 % 2.60 % 3.30 %
Net Periodic Benefit Cost
Discount rate 2.60 % 3.30 % 4.30 %
Expected long-term rate of return on plan assets 6.50 % 6.85 % 6.85 %
Assumed Health Care Cost Trend Rate
December 31,
2021 2020
Health care cost trend rate assumed for next year 6.25 % 6.25 %
Rate to which the cost trend is assumed to decline (the ultimate trend rate) 4.75 % 4.75 %
Year that rate reaches ultimate trend 2028 2028(a)
(b)
218
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
Expected Benefit Payments
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke EnergyProgress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) EnergyCarolinas EnergyProgress Florida Ohio IndianaPiedmont
Years ending December 31,
2022 $ 70 $ 17 $ 26 $ 15 $ 12 $ 3 $ 7 $ 2 
2023 62 15 25 14 11 3 6 2 
2024 58 14 23 13 11 3 6 2 
2025 54 13 22 12 10 2 5 2 
2026 50 12 21 12 9 2 5 2 
2027-2031 207 50 87 49 38 8 19 10 
PLAN ASSETS
Description and Allocations
Duke Energy Master Retirement Trust
Assets for both the qualified pension and other post-retirement benefits are maintained in the Duke Energy Master Retirement Trust. Approximately
98% of the Duke Energy Master Retirement Trust assets were allocated to qualified pension plans and approximately 2% were allocated to other
post-retirement plans (comprised of 401(h) accounts), as of December 31, 2021, and 2020. The investment objective of the Duke Energy Master
Retirement Trust is to invest in a diverse portfolio of assets that is expected to generate positive surplus return over time (i.e., asset growth greater
than liability growth) subject to a prudent level of portfolio risk, for the purpose of enhancing the security of benefits for plan participants.
As of December 31, 2021, Duke Energy assumes pension and other post-retirement plan assets will generate a long-term rate of return of 6.5%. The
expected long-term rate of return was developed using a weighted average calculation of expected returns based primarily on future expected returns
across asset classes considering the use of active asset managers, where applicable. The asset allocation targets were set after considering the
investment objective and the risk profile. Equity securities are held for their higher expected returns. Debt securities are primarily held to hedge the
qualified pension plan. Return seeking debt securities, hedge funds and other global securities are held for diversification. Investments within asset
classes are diversified to achieve broad market participation and reduce the impact of individual managers or investments.
Effective January 1, 2022, the target asset allocation for the Duke Energy Retirement Master Trust is 60% liability hedging assets and 40% return-
seeking assets. Duke Energy periodically reviews its asset allocation targets, and over time, as the funded status of the benefit plans increase, the
level of asset risk relative to plan liabilities may be reduced to better manage Duke Energy's benefit plan liabilities and reduce funded status volatility.
The Duke Energy Master Retirement Trust is authorized to engage in the lending of certain plan assets. Securities lending is an investment
management enhancement that utilizes certain existing securities of the Duke Energy Master Retirement Trust to earn additional income. Securities
lending involves the loaning of securities to approved parties. In return for the loaned securities, the Duke Energy Master Retirement Trust receives
collateral in the form of cash and securities as a safeguard against possible default of any borrower on the return of the loan under terms that permit
the Duke Energy Master Retirement Trust to sell the securities. The Duke Energy Master Retirement Trust mitigates credit risk associated
with securities lending arrangements by monitoring the fair value of the securities loaned, with additional collateral obtained or refunded as
necessary. The fair value of securities on loan was approximately $542 million and $482 million at December 31, 2021, and 2020, respectively. Cash
and securities obtained as collateral exceeded the fair value of the securities loaned at December 31, 2021, and 2020, respectively. Securities
lending income earned by the Duke Energy Master Retirement Trust was immaterial for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019,
respectively.
Qualified pension and other post-retirement benefits for the Subsidiary Registrants are derived from the Duke Energy Master Retirement Trust, as
such, each are allocated their proportionate share of the assets discussed below.
The following table includes the target asset allocations by asset class at December 31, 2021, and the actual asset allocations for the Duke Energy
Master Retirement Trust.
Actual Allocation at
Target December 31,
Allocation 2021 2020
Global equity securities 27 % 24 % 30 %
Global private equity securities 1 % 1 % 1 %
Debt securities 62 % 62 % 55 %
Return seeking debt securities 4 % 4 % 5 %
Hedge funds 2 % 3 % 3 %
Real estate and cash 4 % 6 % 6 %
Total 100 % 100 % 100 %
219
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
Other post-retirement assets
Duke Energy's other post-retirement assets are comprised of Voluntary Employees' Beneficiary Association (VEBA) trusts and 401(h) accounts held
within the Duke Energy Master Retirement Trust. Duke Energy's investment objective is to achieve sufficient returns, subject to a prudent level of
portfolio risk, for the purpose of promoting the security of plan benefits for participants.
The following table presents target and actual asset allocations for the VEBA trusts at December 31, 2021.
Actual Allocation at
Target December 31,
Allocation 2021 2020
U.S. equity securities 30 % 19 % 36 %
Non-U.S. equity securities 5 % 5 % 6 %
Real estate 2 % 3 % 2 %
Debt securities 45 % 18 % 42 %
Cash 18 % 55 % 14 %
Total 100 % 100 % 100 %
Fair Value Measurements
Duke Energy classifies recurring and non-recurring fair value measurements based on the fair value hierarchy as discussed in Note 16.
Valuation methods of the primary fair value measurements disclosed below are as follows:
Investments in equity securities
Investments in equity securities are typically valued at the closing price in the principal active market as of the last business day of the reporting
period. Principal active markets for equity prices include published exchanges such as NASDAQ and NYSE. Foreign equity prices are translated from
their trading currency using the currency exchange rate in effect at the close of the principal active market. Prices have not been adjusted to reflect
after-hours market activity. The majority of investments in equity securities are valued using Level 1 measurements. When the price of an institutional
commingled fund is unpublished, it is not categorized in the fair value hierarchy, even though the funds are readily available at the fair value.
Investments in corporate debt securities and U.S. government securities
Most debt investments are valued based on a calculation using interest rate curves and credit spreads applied to the terms of the debt instrument
(maturity and coupon interest rate) and consider the counterparty credit rating. Most debt valuations are Level 2 measurements. If the market for a
particular fixed-income security is relatively inactive or illiquid, the measurement is Level 3. U.S. Treasury debt is typically Level 2.
Investments in short-term investment funds
Investments in short-term investment funds are valued at the net asset value of units held at year end and are readily redeemable at the
measurement date. Investments in short-term investment funds with published prices are valued as Level 1. Investments in short-term investment
funds with unpublished prices are valued as Level 2.
Duke Energy Master Retirement Trust
The following tables provide the fair value measurement amounts for the Duke Energy Master Retirement Trust qualified pension and other post-
retirement assets.
December 31, 2021
Total Fair Not
(in millions) Value Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Categorized
Equity securities $ 2,575 $ 2,547 $ — $ — $ 28 
Corporate debt securities 4,189 — 4,189 — — 
Short-term investment funds 382 272 110 — — 
Partnership interests 95 — — 95 — 
Hedge funds 216 — — — 216 
U.S. government securities 1,618 — 1,618 — — 
Governments bonds – foreign 78 — 78 — — 
Cash 144 144 — — — 
Government and commercial mortgage backed securities 2 — 2 — — 
Net pending transactions and other investments 53 12 41 — — 
Total assets $ 9,352 $ 2,975 $ 6,038 $ 95 $ 244 (b)
(a)
220
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
(a)    Duke Energy Carolinas, Progress Energy, Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Florida, Duke Energy Ohio, Duke Energy Indiana and Piedmont
were allocated approximately 26%, 32%, 15%, 17%, 5%, 7% and 4%, respectively, of the Duke Energy Master Retirement Trust at
December 31, 2021. Accordingly, all amounts included in the table above are allocable to the Subsidiary Registrants using these
percentages.
(b)    Certain investments that are measured at fair value using the net asset value per share practical expedient have not been categorized in the fair
value hierarchy.
December 31, 2020
Total Fair Not
(in millions) Value Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Categorized
Equity securities $ 3,202 $ 3,162 $ — $ — $ 40 
Corporate debt securities 4,162 — 4,162 — — 
Short-term investment funds 397 247 150 — — 
Partnership interests 97 — — — 97 
Hedge funds 198 — — — 198 
U.S. government securities 1,164 — 1,164 — — 
Governments bonds – foreign 73 — 73 — — 
Cash 98 98 — — — 
Net pending transactions and other investments 88 34 54 — — 
Total assets $ 9,479 $ 3,541 $ 5,603 $ — $ 335 
(a)    Duke Energy Carolinas, Progress Energy, Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Florida, Duke Energy Ohio, Duke Energy Indiana and Piedmont
were allocated approximately 26%, 32%, 15%, 17%, 5%, 7% and 4%, respectively, of the Duke Energy Master Retirement Trust at
December 31, 2020. Accordingly, all amounts included in the table above are allocable to the Subsidiary Registrants using these
percentages.
(b)    Certain investments that are measured at fair value using the net asset value per share practical expedient have not been categorized in the fair
value hierarchy.
The following table provides a reconciliation of beginning and ending balances of Duke Energy Master Retirement Trust qualified pension and other
post-retirement assets at fair value on a recurring basis where the determination of fair value includes significant unobservable inputs (Level 3).
(in millions) 2021 2020
Balance at January 1 $ — $ 11 
Sales — (12)
Total gains and other, net — 1 
Transfer of Level 3 assets from other classifications 95 — 
Balance at December 31 $ 95 $ — 
Other post-retirement assets
The following tables provide the fair value measurement amounts for VEBA trust assets.
December 31, 2021
Total Fair
(in millions) Value Level 2
Cash and cash equivalents $ 14 $ 14 
Real estate 2 2 
Equity securities 18 18 
Debt securities 11 11 
Total assets $ 45 $ 45 
December 31, 2020
Total Fair
(in millions) Value Level 2
Cash and cash equivalents $ 5 $ 5 
Real estate 1 1 
Equity securities 23 23 
Debt securities 19 19 
Total assets $ 48 $ 48 (b)
(a)
221
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
EMPLOYEE SAVINGS PLANS
Retirement Savings Plan
Duke Energy or its affiliates sponsor, and the Subsidiary Registrants participate in, employee savings plans that cover substantially all U.S.
employees. Most employees participate in a matching contribution formula where Duke Energy provides a matching contribution generally equal to
100% of employee before-tax and Roth 401(k) contributions of up to 6% of eligible pay per pay period. Dividends on Duke Energy shares held by the
savings plans are charged to retained earnings when declared and shares held in the plans are considered outstanding in the calculation of basic
and diluted EPS.
For new and rehired employees who are not eligible to participate in Duke Energy’s defined benefit plans, an additional employer contribution of 4%
of eligible pay per pay period, which is subject to a three-year vesting schedule, is provided to the employee’s savings plan account. Certain
Piedmont employees whose participation in a prior Piedmont defined benefit plan (that was frozen as of December 31, 2017) are eligible for employer
transition credit contributions of 3% to 5% of eligible pay per period, for each pay period during the three-year period ending December 31, 2020.
The following table includes pretax employer matching contributions made by Duke Energy and expensed by the Subsidiary Registrants.
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Years ended December 31,
2021 $ 229 $ 70 $ 60 $ 39 $ 21 $ 5 $ 12 $ 11 
2020 213 67 57 38 19 5 11 13 
2019 214 66 58 38 20 5 11 13 
23. INCOME TAXES
North Carolina's 2021 Appropriations Act
On November 18, 2021, North Carolina Senate Bill 105 (SB 105) was signed into law by Governor Roy Cooper. Starting with tax year 2025, SB 105
begins phasing out the North Carolina corporate income tax rate over five years, from a statutory rate of 2.5% to zero. Duke Energy recorded a net
reduction of approximately $490 million to its North Carolina deferred tax liability in the fourth quarter of 2021. The majority of this deferred tax liability
reduction was offset by recording a regulatory liability pending NCUC determination of the disposition of the amounts related to Duke Energy
Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress and Piedmont. In addition, Duke Energy recorded a net reduction of North Carolina consolidating deferred tax
assets of approximately $25 million to deferred state income tax expense in the fourth quarter of 2021. North Carolina SB 105 did not have a
significant impact on the financial position, results of operation, or cash flows of Duke Energy, Duke Energy Carolinas, Progress Energy, Duke Energy
Progress or Piedmont.
Consolidated Appropriations Act
On December 27, 2020, the Consolidated Appropriations Act (CAA) was signed into law. In addition to the CAA providing funding for government
operations, it also provided tax provisions to assist with COVID-19 relief, including extending certain expiring tax provisions. The company has
reviewed the provisions of the CAA and has determined that there are no material impacts on the financial statements as a result of the CAA being
signed into law.
CARES Act
On March 27, 2020, the CARES Act was enacted. The CARES Act is an emergency economic stimulus package in response to the COVID-19
pandemic. Among other provisions, the CARES Act accelerates the remaining AMT credit refund allowances resulting in taxpayers being able to
immediately claim a refund in full for any AMT credit carryforwards and deferral of certain 2020 payroll taxes. In the third quarter of 2020, Duke
Energy received $572 million related to these AMT credit carryforwards and $19 million of interest income. In addition, the company deferred
approximately $117 million of payroll taxes, of which, 50% were paid by December 31, 2021, with the remaining 50% payable by December 31, 2022.
The other provisions within the CARES Act do not materially impact Duke Energy's income tax accounting.
222
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS INCOME TAXES
Income Tax Expense
Components of Income Tax Expense
 Year Ended December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke EnergyProgress Energy EnergyEnergy Energy
(in millions) EnergyCarolinas EnergyProgress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Current income taxes
Federal $ (2)$ 241 $ (15)$ 113 $ (75)$ (8)$ 65 $ 23 
State 2 23 (4) 8 (17) (2) 7 3 
Foreign 2 — — — — — — — 
Total current income taxes 2 264 (19) 121 (92) (10) 72 26 
Deferred income taxes       
Federal 199 (130) 203 (16) 202 35 19 17 
State (1) (79) 47 (26) 77 5 16 (13)
Total deferred income taxes 198 (209) 250 (42) 279 40 35 4 
ITC amortization (8) (4) (4) (4) — — — — 
Total income tax expense included in Consolidated
Statements of Operations $ 192 $ 51 $ 227 $ 75 $ 187 $ 30 $ 107 $ 30 
(a)     Total deferred income taxes includes the generation of NOL carryforwards and tax credit carryforwards of $32 million at Duke Energy Carolinas,
$8 million at Duke Energy Indiana, and $3 million at Piedmont. In addition, total deferred income taxes includes utilization of NOL
carryforwards and tax credit carryforwards of $150 million at Duke Energy, $95 million at Progress Energy, $14 million at Duke Energy
Progress, $64 million at Duke Energy Florida, and $2 million at Duke Energy Ohio.
 Year Ended December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress EnergyEnergyEnergy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy ProgressFlorida OhioIndiana Piedmont
Current income taxes        
Federal $(281)$ 314 $ 280 $ 181 $ 148 $ 10 $ 48 $ (27)
State (9) 35 29 17 24 1 7 (8)
Foreign 1 — — — — — — — 
Total current income taxes (289) 349 309 198 172 11 55 (35)
Deferred income taxes       
Federal 155 (171) (167) (180) 1 30 12 60 
State (92) (86) (24) (49) 25 2 17 (7)
Total deferred income taxes 63 (257) (191) (229) 26 32 29 53 
ITC amortization (10) (4) (5) (5) — — — — 
Income tax (benefit) expense from continuing
operations (236) 88 113 (36) 198 43 84 18 
Tax expense from discontinued operations 2 — — — — — — — 
Total income tax (benefit) expense included in
Consolidated Statements of Operations $(234)$ 88 $ 113 $ (36)$ 198 $ 43 $ 84 $ 18 
(a)    Total deferred income taxes includes the generation of NOL carryforwards and tax credit carryforwards of $20 million at Duke Energy Carolinas,
$3 million at Duke Energy Progress, $8 million at Duke Energy Indiana, and $11 million at Piedmont. In addition, total deferred income
taxes includes utilization of NOL carryforwards and tax credit carryforwards of $39 million at Progress Energy, $30 million at Duke Energy
Florida and $79 million at Duke Energy.(a)
(a)
223
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS INCOME TAXES
 Year Ended December 31, 2019
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke EnergyProgress EnergyEnergyEnergyEnergy
(in millions) EnergyCarolinas EnergyProgressFlorida OhioIndianaPiedmont
Current income taxes        
Federal $(299)$ 164 $ (173)$ (36)$ (43)$ (41)$ (23)$ (92)
State 10 13 (7) (3) 18 (1) 1 (1)
Foreign 2 — — — — — — — 
Total current income taxes (287) 177 (180) (39) (25) (42) (22) (93)
Deferred income taxes        
Federal 855 175 422 220 153 77 128 133 
State (38) (37) 17 (18) 27 5 28 3 
Total deferred income taxes 817 138 439 202 180 82 156 136 
ITC amortization (11) (4) (6) (6) — — — — 
Income tax expense from continuing operations 519 311 253 157 155 40 134 43 
Tax benefit from discontinued operations (2) — — — — — — — 
Total income tax expense included in Consolidated
Statements of Operations $ 517 $ 311 $ 253 $ 157 $ 155 $ 40 $ 134 $ 43 
(a)    Total deferred income taxes includes the generation of tax credit carryforwards of $8 million at Duke Energy Carolinas. In addition, total deferred
income taxes includes utilization of NOL carryforwards and tax credit carryforwards of $243 million at Progress Energy, $35 million at Duke
Energy Progress, $152 million at Duke Energy Florida, $25 million at Duke Energy Ohio, $60 million at Duke Energy Indiana, $90 million at
Piedmont and $775 million at Duke Energy.
Duke Energy Income from Continuing Operations before Income Taxes
 Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2021 2020 2019
Domestic $ 3,720 $ 826 $ 4,053 
Foreign 44 13 44 
Income from continuing operations before income taxes $ 3,764 $ 839 $ 4,097 
Statutory Rate Reconciliation
The following tables present a reconciliation of income tax expense at the U.S. federal statutory tax rate to the actual tax expense from continuing
operations.
 Year Ended December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Income tax expense, computed at the
statutory rate of 21% $790 $ 291 $ 384 $ 224 $ 194 $ 49 $ 123 $ 71 
State income tax, net of federal income tax
effect 1 (44) 34 (14) 47 2 18 (8)
Amortization of excess deferred income tax (438) (184) (174) (120) (54) (22) (34) (25)
AFUDC equity income (34) (14) (11) (7) (3) (2) (4) (4)
AFUDC equity depreciation 35 18 10 5 5 2 5 — 
Noncontrolling Interests 72 — — — — — — — 
Renewable energy PTCs (100) — — — — — — — 
Other tax credits (30) (12) (11) (8) (3) (1) (2) (4)
Valuation Allowance (85) — — — — — — — 
Other items, net (19) (4) (5) (5) 1 2 1 — 
Income tax expense from continuing
operations $192 $ 51 $ 227 $ 75 $ 187 $ 30 $ 107 $ 30 
Effective tax rate 5.1 % 3.7 % 12.4 % 7.0 % 20.2 % 12.8 % 18.2 % 8.8 %
(a)    In the fourth quarter of 2021, the company recognized a federal capital gain in the amount of $426 million. As a result, a valuation allowance of
$85 million related to a federal capital loss carryforward was released. This valuation allowance was originally recorded as a result of the
2019 sale of minority interest of certain renewable assets within the Commercial Renewables segment.(a)
(a)
224
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS INCOME TAXES
 Year Ended December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Income tax expense, computed at the
statutory rate of 21% $ 176 $ 219 $ 243 $ 80 $ 204 $ 62 $ 103 $ 61 
State income tax, net of federal income
tax effect (80) (40) 4 (25) 39 2 19 (12)
Amortization of excess deferred income
tax (276) (82) (118) (68) (49) (20) (36) (21)
AFUDC equity income (48) (13) (9) (6) (3) (2) (4) (10)
AFUDC equity depreciation 103 19 10 5 5 1 4 — 
Noncontrolling Interests 62 — — — — — — — 
Renewable energy PTCs (110) — — — — — — — 
Other tax credits (37) (13) (16) (14) (2) (1) (3) (2)
Tax true up (12) (3) 1 (5) 5 — (1) 1 
Other items, net (14) 1 (2) (3) (1) 1 2 1 
Income tax (benefit) expense from
continuing operations $(236)$ 88 $ 113 $ (36)$ 198 $ 43 $ 84 $ 18 
Effective tax rate (28.1)% 8.4 % 9.7 % (9.5)% 20.4 % 14.6 % 17.1 % 6.2 %
 Year Ended December 31, 2019
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Income tax expense, computed at the
statutory rate of 21% $ 860 $ 360 $ 332 $ 202 $ 178 $ 59 $ 120 $ 51 
State income tax, net of federal income tax
effect (22) (19) 8 (17) 35 3 22 2 
Amortization of excess deferred income tax (121) (29) (64) (10) (54) (12) (6) (10)
AFUDC equity income (52) (9) (14) (13) (1) (3) (3) — 
AFUDC equity depreciation 34 19 10 5 5 1 4 — 
Renewable energy PTCs (120) — — — — — — — 
Other tax credits (23) (11) (9) (7) (2) (1) (1) (1)
Tax true up (64) (9) (8) (3) (5) (7) (1) — 
Other items, net 27 9 (2) — (1) — (1) 1 
Income tax expense from continuing
operations $ 519 $ 311 $ 253 $ 157 $ 155 $ 40 $ 134 $ 43 
Effective tax rate 12.7 % 18.1 % 16.0 % 16.3 % 18.3 % 14.3 % 23.5 % 17.6 %
Valuation allowances have been established for certain state NOL carryforwards and state income tax credits that reduce deferred tax assets to an
amount that will be realized on a more-likely-than-not basis. The net change in the total valuation allowance is included in state income tax, net of
federal income tax effect, in the above tables.
225
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS INCOME TAXES
DEFERRED TAXES
Net Deferred Income Tax Liability Components
 December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke EnergyProgress Energy EnergyEnergy Energy
(in millions) EnergyCarolinas EnergyProgress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Deferred credits and other liabilities $ 347 $ 121 $ 101 $ 60 $ 40 $ 19 $ 7 $ 18 
Lease obligations 346 91 197 121 76 4 16 4 
Pension, post-retirement and other employee
benefits 207 (36) 30 17 7 11 20 (8)
Progress Energy merger purchase accounting
adjustments 340 — — — — — — — 
Tax credits and NOL carryforwards 3,784 349 497 160 306 13 195 29 
Regulatory liabilities and deferred credits — 11 — — — 16 — 6 
Investments and other assets — — — — — 5 6 — 
Other 85 12 12 7 4 7 2 8 
Valuation allowance (518) — — — — — — — 
Total deferred income tax assets 4,591 548 837 365 433 75 246 57 
Investments and other assets (2,428) (1,205) (742) (610) (135) — — (39)
Accelerated depreciation rates (10,391) (2,977) (3,891) (1,546) (2,382)(1,125) (1,496) (833)
Regulatory assets and deferred debits, net (1,151) — (768) (417) (350) — (53) — 
Total deferred income tax liabilities (13,970) (4,182) (5,401) (2,573) (2,867)(1,125) (1,549) (872)
Net deferred income tax liabilities $(9,379)$ (3,634)$(4,564)$(2,208)$(2,434)$(1,050)$(1,303)$ (815)
(a)    Primarily related to lease obligations and debt fair value adjustments.
The following table presents the expiration of tax credits and NOL carryforwards.
 December 31, 2021
(in millions) Amount Expiration Year
General Business Credits $ 2,312 2024— 2041
Federal NOL carryforwards 4 2024— 2026
State carryforwards and credits 328 2022— Indefinite
Foreign NOL carryforwards 12 2027— 2037
Foreign Tax Credits 1,128 2024— 2027
Total tax credits and NOL carryforwards $ 3,784    
(a)    A valuation allowance of $4 million has been recorded on the Federal NOL carryforwards, as presented in the Net Deferred Income Tax Liability
Components table.
(b)    A valuation allowance of $112 million has been recorded on the state NOL and attribute carryforwards, as presented in the Net Deferred Income
Tax Liability Components table.
(c)    A valuation allowance of $12 million has been recorded on the foreign NOL carryforwards, as presented in the Net Deferred Income Tax Liability
Components table.
(d)    A valuation allowance of $390 million has been recorded on the foreign tax credits, as presented in the Net Deferred Income Tax Liability
Components table.
(e)    Indefinite carryforward for Federal NOLs, and NOLs for states that have adopted the Tax Act's NOL provisions, generated in tax years beginning
after December 31, 2017.(a)
(a)
(b) (e)
(c)
(d)
226
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS INCOME TAXES
 December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke EnergyProgress Energy EnergyEnergy Energy
(in millions) EnergyCarolinas EnergyProgress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Deferred credits and other liabilities $ 286 $ 85 $ 87 $ 67 $ 18 $ 21 $ 7 $ 38 
Lease obligations 515 96 208 120 87 5 16 5 
Pension, post-retirement and other employee
benefits 236 (30) 68 24 38 16 26 (5)
Progress Energy merger purchase accounting
adjustments 441 — — — — — — — 
Tax credits and NOL carryforwards 3,909 285 508 179 282 16 183 29 
Regulatory liabilities and deferred credits — 11 — — — 18 — — 
Investments and other assets — — — — — 7 — 
Other 93 8 14 9 4 7 1 8 
Valuation allowance (586) — — — — — — — 
Total deferred income tax assets 4,894 455 885 399 429 90 233 75 
Investments and other assets (2,267) (1,127) (669) (507) (164) — (14) (48)
Accelerated depreciation rates (10,729) (3,170) (3,868) (1,778) (2,124)(1,071) (1,433) (844)
Regulatory assets and deferred debits, net (1,142) — (744) (412) (332) — (14) (4)
Total deferred income tax liabilities (14,138) (4,297) (5,281) (2,697) (2,620)(1,071) (1,461) (896)
Net deferred income tax liabilities $(9,244)$ (3,842)$(4,396)$(2,298)$(2,191)$(981)$(1,228)$ (821)
(a)    Primarily related to lease obligations and debt fair value adjustments.
UNRECOGNIZED TAX BENEFITS
The following tables present changes to unrecognized tax benefits.
 Year Ended December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress EnergyEnergyEnergy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Unrecognized tax benefits – January 1 $ 125 $ 10 $ 10 $ 6 $ 3 $ 1 $ 1 $ 1 
Gross decreases – tax positions in prior periods (86) — — — — — — — 
Gross increases – current period tax positions 12 3 5 4 1 — 1 3 
Total changes (74) 3 5 4 1 — 1 3 
Unrecognized tax benefits – December 31 $ 51 $ 13 $ 15 $ 10 $ 4 $ 1 $ 2 $ 4 
(a)    In the fourth quarter of 2021, the company recognized a federal capital gain in the amount of $426 million. As a result of the capital gain, a
previously recorded unrecognized tax benefit related to the character of a taxable loss has been reversed. See note (a) under the Statutory
Rate Reconciliation table for more details.
 Year Ended December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke EnergyProgress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) EnergyCarolinas EnergyProgress Florida Ohio IndianaPiedmont
Unrecognized tax benefits – January 1 $ 126 $ 8 $ 9 $ 6 $ 3 $ 1 $ 1 $ 4 
Gross decreases – tax positions in prior
periods (2) — — — — — — — 
Gross increases – current period tax positions 4 2 1 — — — — — 
Reduction due to lapse of statute of limitations (3) — — — — — — (3)
Total changes (1) 2 1 — — — — (3)
Unrecognized tax benefits – December 31 $ 125 $ 10 $ 10 $ 6 $ 3 $ 1 $ 1 $ 1 (a)
(a)
227
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS INCOME TAXES
 Year Ended December 31, 2019
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke EnergyProgress EnergyEnergy Energy Energy
(in millions) EnergyCarolinas EnergyProgressFlorida Ohio IndianaPiedmont
Unrecognized tax benefits – January 1 $ 24 $ 6 $ 9 $ 6 $ 3 $ 1 $ 1 $ 4 
Unrecognized tax benefits increases 105 2 1 1 — — — — 
Gross decreases – tax positions in prior periods (3) — (1) (1) — — — — 
Total changes 102 2 — — — — — — 
Unrecognized tax benefits – December 31 $ 126 $ 8 $ 9 $ 6 $ 3 $ 1 $ 1 $ 4 
The following table includes additional information regarding the Duke Energy Registrants' unrecognized tax benefits at December 31, 2021. Duke
Energy Registrants do not anticipate a material increase or decrease in unrecognized tax benefits within the next 12 months.
 December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke EnergyProgress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) EnergyCarolinas EnergyProgress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Amount that if recognized, would affect the
effective tax rate or regulatory liability $ 47 $ 13 $ 14 $ 10 $ 4 $ 1 $ 2 $ 4 
(a)    The Duke Energy Registrants are unable to estimate the specific amounts that would affect the ETR versus the regulatory liability.
Duke Energy and its subsidiaries are no longer subject to federal, state, local or non-U.S. income tax examinations by tax authorities for years before
2016, aside from certain state tax attributes carried forward for utilization in future years.
24. OTHER INCOME AND EXPENSES, NET
The components of Other income and expenses, net on the Consolidated Statements of Operations are as follows.
 Year Ended December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Interest income $ 16 $ 4 $ 8 $ 6 $ 2 $ 4 $ 6 $ 19 
AFUDC equity 171 65 51 34 16 7 27 20 
Post in-service equity returns 39 21 16 16 — 1 1 — 
Nonoperating income, other 417 180 140 87 53 6 8 16 
Other income and expense, net $ 643 $ 270 $ 215 $ 143 $ 71 $ 18 $ 42 $ 55 
 Year Ended December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Interest income $ 32 $ 4 $ 8 $ 2 $ 6 $ 4 $ 6 $ 17 
AFUDC equity 154 62 42 29 12 7 23 19 
Post in-service equity returns 27 17 8 8 — 1 1 — 
Nonoperating income, other 240 94 71 36 35 4 7 15 
Other income and expense, net $ 453 $ 177 $ 129 $ 75 $ 53 $ 16 $ 37 $ 51 
 Year Ended December 31, 2019
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Interest income $ 31 $ 1 $ 11 $ — $ 11 $ 10 $ 10 $ 1 
AFUDC equity 139 42 66 60 6 13 18 — 
Post in-service equity returns 29 20 7 7 — 1 — — 
Nonoperating income, other 231 88 57 33 31 — 13 19 
Other income and expense, net $ 430 $ 151 $ 141 $ 100 $ 48 $ 24 $ 41 $ 20 (a)
228
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS SUBSEQUENT EVENTS
25. SUBSEQUENT EVENTS
For information on subsequent events related to regulatory matters and commitments and contingencies, see Notes 3 and 4, respectively.
229
INDEPENDENT ACCOUNTANTS
ITEM 9. CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND FINANCIAL
DISCLOSURE
None.
ITEM 9A. CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES
Disclosure Controls and Procedures
Disclosure controls and procedures are controls and other procedures that are designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by the
Duke Energy Registrants in the reports they file or submit under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported, within the time
periods specified by the SEC rules and forms.
Disclosure controls and procedures include, without limitation, controls and procedures designed to provide reasonable assurance that information
required to be disclosed by the Duke Energy Registrants in the reports they file or submit under the Exchange Act is accumulated and communicated
to management, including the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, as appropriate, to allow timely decisions regarding required
disclosure.
Under the supervision and with the participation of management, including the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, the Duke Energy
Registrants have evaluated the effectiveness of their disclosure controls and procedures (as such term is defined in Rule 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e)
under the Exchange Act) as of December 31, 2021, and, based upon this evaluation, the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer have
concluded that these controls and procedures are effective in providing reasonable assurance of compliance.
Changes in Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
During the fourth quarter of 2021, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida implemented Customer Connect, an SAP based customer
engagement and billing solution. Customer Connect was previously implemented at Duke Energy Carolinas during the second quarter of 2021. As a
result of this implementation, we modified certain existing internal controls and implemented new controls and procedures related to Customer
Connect. We evaluated the design and operating effectiveness of these internal controls and do not believe this implementation had an adverse
effect on our internal control over financial reporting.
Under the supervision and with the participation of management, including the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, the Duke Energy
Registrants have evaluated changes in internal control over financial reporting (as such term is defined in Rules 13a-15 and 15d-15 under the
Exchange Act) that occurred during the fiscal year ended December 31, 2021, and other than with respect to the Customer Connect SAP
implementation, there were no other changes in our internal control over financial reporting during the year ended December 31, 2021, that have
materially affected, or are reasonably likely to materially affect, our internal controls over financial reporting.
Management’s Annual Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
The Duke Energy Registrants’ management is responsible for establishing and maintaining an adequate system of internal control over financial
reporting, as such term is defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f). The Duke Energy Registrants’ internal control system was
designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external
purposes, in accordance with GAAP. Due to inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements.
Also, projections of any evaluation of effectiveness of the internal control over financial reporting to future periods are subject to the risk that controls
may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with policies and procedures may deteriorate.
The Duke Energy Registrants’ management, including their Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, has conducted an evaluation of the
effectiveness of their internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2021, based on the framework in the Internal Control – Integrated
Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission. Based on that evaluation, management
concluded that its internal controls over financial reporting were effective as of December 31, 2021.
Deloitte & Touche LLP, Duke Energy’s independent registered public accounting firm, has issued an attestation report on the effectiveness of Duke
Energy’s internal control over financial reporting, which is included herein. This report is not applicable to the Subsidiary Registrants as these
companies are not accelerated or large accelerated filers.
230
REPORTS
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the shareholders and the Board of Directors of Duke Energy Corporation
Opinion on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the internal control over financial reporting of Duke Energy Corporation and subsidiaries (the “Company”) as of December 31,
2021, based on criteria established in Internal Control — Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of
the Treadway Commission (COSO). In our opinion, the Company maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control over financial
reporting as of December 31, 2021, based on criteria established in Internal Control — Integrated Framework (2013) issued by COSO.
We have also audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB), the
consolidated financial statements as of and for the year ended December 31, 2021, of the Company and our report dated February 24, 2022,
expressed an unqualified opinion on those financial statements.
Basis for Opinion
The Company’s management is responsible for maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting and for its assessment of the
effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting, included in the accompanying Management's Annual Report on Internal Control Over
Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company’s internal control over financial reporting based on our audit. We
are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the
U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain
reasonable assurance about whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material respects. Our audit included
obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material weakness exists, testing and evaluating
the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk, and performing such other procedures as we considered
necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial
reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. A
company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in
reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the company; (2) provide reasonable assurance
that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting
principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and
directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or
disposition of the company’s assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also, projections of any
evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that
the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Charlotte, North Carolina
February 24, 2022
231
OTHER INFORMATION
ITEM 10. DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE
Information regarding Duke Energy's Executive Officers is set forth in Part I, Item 1, "Business – Information about Our Executive Officers," in this
Annual Report on Form 10-K. Duke Energy will provide information that is responsive to the remainder of this Item 10 in its definitive proxy statement
or in an amendment to this Annual Report not later than 120 days after the end of the fiscal year covered by this Annual Report. That information is
incorporated in this Item 10 by reference.
ITEM 11. EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION
Duke Energy will provide information that is responsive to this Item 11 in its definitive proxy statement or in an amendment to this Annual Report not
later than 120 days after the end of the fiscal year covered by this Annual Report. That information is incorporated in this Item 11 by reference.
ITEM 12. SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND RELATED
STOCKHOLDER MATTERS
Equity Compensation Plan Information
The following table shows information as of December 31, 2021, about securities to be issued upon exercise of outstanding options, warrants and
rights under Duke Energy's equity compensation plans, along with the weighted average exercise price of the outstanding options, warrants and
rights and the number of securities remaining available for future issuance under the plans.
Plan CategoryNumber of securities
to be issued upon
exercise of
outstanding options,
warrants and rights
(a)Weighted average
exercise price of
outstanding options,
warrants and rights
(b)Number of securities
remaining available for
future issuance under
equity compensation
plans (excluding
securities reflected in
column (a))
(c)
Equity compensation plans approved by security holders3,277,358 (2) n/a 3,470,774(3)
Equity compensation plans not approved by security holders113,176 (4) n/a n/a(5)
Total3,390,534 n/a 3,470,774
(1)    As of December 31, 2021, no options were outstanding under equity compensation plans.
(2)    Includes RSUs and performance shares (assuming the maximum payout level) granted under the Duke Energy Corporation 2015 Long-Term
Incentive Plan, as well as shares that could be payable with respect to certain compensation deferred under the Duke Energy Corporation
Executive Savings Plan (Executive Savings Plan) or the Directors’ Savings Plan.
(3)    Includes shares remaining available for issuance pursuant to stock awards under the Duke Energy Corporation 2015 Long-Term Incentive Plan.
(4)    Includes shares that could be payable with respect to certain compensation deferred under the Executive Savings Plan or the Duke Energy
Corporation Directors' Savings Plan (Directors' Savings Plan), each of which is a non-qualified deferred compensation plan described in
more detail below.
(5)    The number of shares remaining available for future issuance under equity compensation plans not approved by security holders cannot be
determined because it is based on the amount of future voluntary deferrals, if any, under the Executive Savings Plan and the Directors'
Savings Plan.
Under the Executive Savings Plan, participants can elect to defer a portion of their base salary and short‑term incentive compensation. Participants
also receive a company matching contribution in excess of the contribution limits prescribed by the Internal Revenue Code under the Duke Energy
Retirement Savings Plan, which is the 401(k) plan in which employees are generally eligible to participate. Eligible participants may also earn pay
credits based on age and length of service on eligible earnings that exceed limited prescribed by the Internal Revenue Code.
In general, payments are made following termination of employment or death in the form of a lump sum or installments, as selected by the
participant. Participants may direct the deemed investment of their accounts (with certain exceptions) among investment options available under the
Duke Energy Retirement Savings Plan, including the Duke Energy Common Stock Fund. Participants may change their investment elections on a
daily basis. Deferrals of equity awards are credited with earnings and losses based on the performance of the Duke Energy Common Stock Fund.
The benefits payable under the plan are unfunded and subject to the claims of Duke Energy’s creditors.
Under the Directors’ Savings Plan, outside directors may elect to defer all or a portion of their annual compensation, generally consisting of retainers.
Deferred amounts are credited to an unfunded account, the balance of which is adjusted for the performance of phantom investment options,
including the Duke Energy Common Stock Fund, as elected by the director, and generally are paid when the director terminates his or her service
from the Board of Directors.
Duke Energy will provide additional information that is responsive to this Item 12 in its definitive proxy statement or in an amendment to this Annual
Report not later than 120 days after the end of the fiscal year covered by this Annual Report. That information is incorporated in this Item 12 by
reference.
ITEM 13. CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS AND DIRECTOR INDEPENDENCE
Duke Energy will provide information that is responsive to this Item 13 in its definitive proxy statement or in an amendment to this Annual Report not
later than 120 days after the end of the fiscal year covered by this Annual Report. That information is incorporated in this Item 13 by reference.(1)
232
OTHER INFORMATION
ITEM 14. PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTING FEES AND SERVICES
Deloitte provided professional services to the Duke Energy Registrants. The following tables present the Deloitte fees for services rendered to the
Duke Energy Registrants during 2021 and 2020.
 Year Ended December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Types of Fees        
Audit Fees $13.2 $ 3.1 $ 4.7 $ 2.4 $ 2.3 $ 1.9 $ 1.7 $ 1.3 
Audit-Related Fees 1.5 0.1 0.2 0.1 0.1 0.2 — — 
Total Fees $14.7 $ 3.2 $ 4.9 $ 2.5 $ 2.4 $ 2.1 $ 1.7 $ 1.3 
 Year Ended December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Types of Fees        
Audit Fees $12.9 $ 3.0 $ 4.5 $ 2.3 $ 2.2 $ 1.9 $ 1.7 $ 1.3 
Audit-Related Fees 1.7 0.2 0.3 0.1 0.2 0.3 0.1 — 
Tax Fees 0.1 — — — — — — — 
Total Fees $14.7 $ 3.2 $ 4.8 $ 2.4 $ 2.4 $ 2.2 $ 1.8 $ 1.3 
(a)    Audit Fees are fees billed, or expected to be billed, by Deloitte for professional services for the financial statement audits, audit of the Duke
Energy Registrants’ financial statements included in the Annual Report on Form 10-K, reviews of financial statements included in Quarterly
Reports on Form 10‑Q, and services associated with securities filings such as comfort letters and consents.
(b)    Audit-Related Fees are fees billed, or expected to be billed, by Deloitte for assurance and related services that are reasonably related to the
performance of an audit or review of financial statements, including statutory reporting requirements.
(c)    Tax Fees are fees billed by Deloitte for tax return assistance and preparation, tax examination assistance and professional services related to
tax planning and tax strategy.
To safeguard the continued independence of the independent auditor, the Audit Committee of Duke Energy adopted a policy that all services provided
by the independent auditor require preapproval by the Audit Committee. Pursuant to the policy, certain audit services, audit-related services, tax
services and other services have been specifically preapproved up to fee limits. In the event the cost of any of these services may exceed the fee
limits, the Audit Committee must specifically approve the service. All services performed in 2021 and 2020 by the independent accountant were
approved by the Audit Committee pursuant to the preapproval policy.(a)
(b)
(a)
(b)
(c)
233
EXHIBITS
ITEM 15. EXHIBITS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES
(a)     Consolidated Financial Statements and Supplemental Schedules included in Part II of this Annual Report are as follows:
Duke Energy Corporation
Consolidated Financial Statements
Consolidated Statements of Operations for the Years Ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2021, and 2020
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019
Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
All other schedules are omitted because they are not required, or because the required information is included in the Consolidated Financial
Statements or Notes.
Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC
Consolidated Financial Statements
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2021, and 2020
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019
Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
All other schedules are omitted because they are not required, or because the required information is included in the Consolidated Financial
Statements or Notes.
Progress Energy, Inc.
Consolidated Financial Statements
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2021, and 2020
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019
Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
All other schedules are omitted because they are not required, or because the required information is included in the Consolidated Financial
Statements or Notes.
Duke Energy Progress, LLC
Consolidated Financial Statements
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2021, and 2020
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019
Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
All other schedules are omitted because they are not required, or because the required information is included in the Consolidated Financial
Statements or Notes.
Duke Energy Florida, LLC
Consolidated Financial Statements
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2021, and 2020
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019
Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
All other schedules are omitted because they are not required, or because the required information is included in the Consolidated Financial
Statements or Notes.
Duke Energy Ohio, Inc.
Consolidated Financial Statements
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2021, and 2020
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019
Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
All other schedules are omitted because they are not required, or because the required information is included in the Consolidated Financial
Statements or Notes.
234
EXHIBITS
Duke Energy Indiana, LLC
Consolidated Financial Statements
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2021, and 2020
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019
Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
All other schedules are omitted because they are not required, or because the required information is included in the Consolidated Financial
Statements or Notes.
Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc.
Consolidated Financial Statements
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2021, and 2020
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019
Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
All other schedules are omitted because they are not required, or because the required information is included in the Consolidated Financial
Statements or Notes.
235
EXHIBITS
EXHIBIT INDEX
Exhibits filed herewith are designated by an asterisk (*). All exhibits not so designated are incorporated by reference to a prior filing, as indicated.
Items constituting management contracts or compensatory plans or arrangements are designated by a double asterisk (**). The Company agrees to
furnish upon request to the commission a copy of any omitted schedules or exhibits upon request on all items designated by a triple asterisk (***).
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Exhibit Duke EnergyProgressEnergyEnergyEnergyEnergy
Number EnergyCarolinasEnergyProgressFloridaOhioIndianaPiedmont
2.1 Agreement and Plan of Merger between Duke
Energy Corporation, Diamond Acquisition
Corporation and Progress Energy, Inc., dated as of
January 8, 2011 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 2.1 to Duke Energy Corporation's Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on January 11, 2011, File
No. 1-32853).X    X         
2.2 Agreement and Plan of Merger between Piedmont
Natural Gas Company, Duke Energy Corporation
and Forest Subsidiary, Inc. (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 2.1 to Duke Energy
Corporation's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
October 26, 2015, File No. 1-32853).X X
3.1 Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Duke
Energy Corporation's Current Report on Form 8-K
filed on May 20, 2014, File No. 1-32853).X
3.2 Amended and Restated By-Laws of Duke Energy
Corporation (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1
to Duke Energy Corporation's Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on January 4, 2016, File No. 1-
32853).X
3.3 Articles of Organization including Articles of
Conversion (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1
to Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC's Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on April 7, 2006, File No. 1-4928).  X           
3.3.1 Amended Articles of Organization, effective
October 1, 2006 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 3.1 to Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC's
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended September 30, 2006, filed on November 13,
2006, File No. 1-4928).  X           
3.4 Amended Articles of Incorporation of Duke Energy
Ohio, Inc. (formerly The Cincinnati Gas & Electric
Company), effective October 23, 1996, (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 3(a) to registrant's Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
September 30, 1996, filed on November 13, 1996,
File No. 1-1232).          X   
3.4.1 Amended Articles of Incorporation, effective
September 19, 2006 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 3.1 to Duke Energy Ohio, Inc.'s (formerly The
Cincinnati Gas & Electric Company) Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
September 30, 2006, filed on November 17, 2006,
File No. 1-1232).          X   
3.5 Certificate of Conversion of Duke Energy Indiana,
LLC (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
January 4, 2016, File No. 1-3543).            X
3.5.1 Articles of Entity Conversion of Duke Energy
Indiana, LLC (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
3.2 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed
on January 4, 2016, File No. 1-3543).            X
3.5.2 Plan of Entity Conversion of Duke Energy Indiana,
LLC (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.3 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
January 4, 2016, File No. 1-3543).            X
3.5.3 Articles of Organization of Duke Energy Indiana,
LLC (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.4 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
January 4, 2016, File No. 1-3543).X
3.5.4 Amended and Restated Limited Liability Company
Operating Agreement of Duke Energy Indiana, LLC,
dated August 25, 2021 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 3.1 to registrant's Quarterly Report on Form
10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2021,
filed on November 4, 2021, File No. 1-3543).X
3.6 Limited Liability Company Operating Agreement of
Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 3.2 to registrant's Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on April 7, 2006, File No.
1-4928).  X           
3.7 Regulations of Duke Energy Ohio, Inc. (formerly The
Cincinnati Gas & Electric Company), effective
July 23, 2003 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
3.2 to registrant's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for
the quarter ended June 30, 2003, filed on August 13,
2003, File No. 1-1232).          X   
3.8 Articles of Organization including Articles of
Conversion for Duke Energy Progress, LLC
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
August 4, 2015, File No. 1-3382).      X       
3.8.1 Plan of Conversion of Duke Energy Progress, Inc.
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.2 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
August 4, 2015, File No. 1-3382).X
3.8.2 Limited Liability Company Operating Agreement of
Duke Energy Progress, LLC (incorporated byX
gy g , ( p y
reference to Exhibit 3.3 to registrant's Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on August 4, 2015, File No.
1-3382).
3.9 Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation of
Progress Energy, Inc. (formerly CP&L Energy, Inc.),
effective June 15, 2000 (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 3(a)(1) to registrant's Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2000,
filed on August 14, 2000, File No. 1-3382).    X         
3.9.1 Articles of Amendment to the Amended and
Restated Articles of Incorporation of Progress
Energy, Inc. (formerly CP&L Energy, Inc.), effective
December 4, 2000 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 3(b)(1) to registrant's Annual Report on Form
10-K for the year ended December 31, 2001, filed
on March 28, 2002, File No. 1-3382).    X         
3.9.2 Articles of Amendment to the Amended and
Restated Articles of Incorporation of Progress
Energy, Inc. (formerly CP&L Energy, Inc.), effective
May 10, 2006 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
3(a) to registrant's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q
for the quarter ended June 30, 2006, filed on August
9, 2006, File No. 1-15929).    X         
3.9.3 By-Laws of Progress Energy, Inc. (formerly CP&L
Energy, Inc.), effective May 10, 2006 (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 3(b) to registrant's Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30,
2006, filed on August 9, 2006, File No. 1-15929).X
3.10 Articles of Conversion for Duke Energy Florida, LLC
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.4 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
August 4, 2015, File No. 1-3274).        X     
3.10.1 Articles of Organization for Duke Energy Florida,
LLC (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.5 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
August 4, 2015, File No. 1-3274).       X     
3.10.2 Plan of Conversion of Duke Energy Florida, Inc.
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.6 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
August 4, 2015, File No. 1-3274).        X     
3.10.3 Limited Liability Company Operating Agreement of
Duke Energy Florida, LLC (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 3.7 to registrant's Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on August 4, 2015, File No.
1-3274).X
3.11 Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation of
Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc., dated as of
October 3, 2016 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 3.1 to registrant's Annual Report on Form 10-
K for the fiscal year ended October 31, 2016, filed
on December 22, 2016, File No. 001-06196).X
3.11.1 Bylaws of Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc., as
amended and restated effective October 3, 2016
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.2 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
October 3, 2016, File No. 1-06196).X
3.12 Certificate of Designations with respect to Series A
Preferred Stock, dated March 28, 2019
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to
registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
March 29, 2019, File No. 1-32853).X
3.13 Certificate of Designation with respect to the Series
B Preferred Stock, dated September 11, 2019
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to
registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
September 12, 2019, File No. 1-32853).X
3.14 Description of Registered Securities (incorporated
by reference from the registrant's prospectus
contained in Form S-3 filed on September 23, 2019,
File No. 333-233896,under the headings
"Description of Common Stock," "Description of
Preferred Stock," "Description of Depositary
Shares," "Description of Stock Purchase Contracts
and Stock Purchase Units," and "Description of Debt
Securities").X
3.15 Description of Registered Securities (incorporated
by reference from the registrant’s prospectus
contained in Form S-3 filed on September 23, 2019,
File No. 333-233896-01, under the heading
"Description of Debt Securities").X
3.16 Description of Registered Securities (incorporated
by reference from the registrant’s prospectus
contained in Form S-3 filed on September 23, 2019,
File No. 333-233896-02, under the headings
"Description of First Mortgage Bonds" and
"Description of Debt Securities").X
3.17 Description of Registered Securities (incorporated
by reference from the registrant’s prospectus
contained in Form S-3 filed on September 23, 2019,
File No. 333-233896-03, under the headings
"Description of First Mortgage Bonds" and
"Description of Unsecured Debt Securities").X
3.18 Description of Registered Securities (incorporated
by reference from the registrant’s prospectus
containedinFormS3filedonSeptember232019X
contained in Form S-3 filed on September 23, 2019,
File No. 333-233896-04, under the headings
"Description of First Mortgage Bonds" and
"Description of Unsecured Debt Securities").
3.19 Description of Registered Securities (incorporated
by reference from the registrant’s prospectus
contained in Form S-3 filed on September 23, 2019,
File No. 333-233896-05, under the headings
"Description of First Mortgage Bonds" and
"Description of Debt Securities").X
3.20 Description of Registered Securities (incorporated
by reference from the registrant’s prospectus
contained in Form S-3 filed on September 23, 2019,
File No. 333-233896-06, under the headings
"Description of First and Refunding Mortgage
Bonds," "Description of Senior Notes," and
"Description of Subordinate Notes").X
4.1 Indenture between Duke Energy Corporation and
The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A.,
as Trustee, dated as of June 3, 2008 (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke Energy
Corporation's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
June 16, 2008, File No. 1-32853).X             
4.1.1 First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 16,
2008 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to
Duke Energy Corporation's Current Report on Form
8-K filed on June 16, 2008, File No. 1-32853).X             
4.1.2 Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
January 26, 2009 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to Duke Energy Corporation's Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on January 26, 2009, File
No. 1-32853).X             
4.1.3 Third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of August
28, 2009 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
Duke Energy Corporation's Current Report on Form
8-K filed on August 28, 2009, File No. 1-32853).X             
4.1.4 Fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March
25, 2010 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
Duke Energy Corporation's Current Report on Form
8-K filed on March 25, 2010, File No. 1-32853).X             
4.1.5 Fifth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of August
25, 2011 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
Duke Energy Corporation's Current Report on Form
8-K filed on August 25, 2011, File No. 1-32853).X             
4.1.6 Sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
November 17, 2011 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to Duke Energy Corporation's Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on November 17, 2011,
File No. 1-32853).X             
4.1.7 Seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
August 16, 2012 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to Duke Energy Corporation's Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on August 16, 2012, File
No. 1-32853).X             
4.1.8 Eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of January
14, 2013 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2 to
the Registration Statement of Form 8-A of Duke
Energy Corporation filed on January 14, 2013, File
No. 1-32853).X             
4.1.9 Ninth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 13,
2013 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
Duke Energy Corporation's Current Report on Form
8-K filed on June 13, 2013, File No. 1-32853).X             
4.1.10 Tenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of October
11, 2013 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
Duke Energy Corporation's Current Report on Form
8-K filed on October 11, 2013, File No. 1-32853).X             
4.1.11 Eleventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April
4, 2014 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
Duke Energy Corporation's Current Report on Form
8-K filed on April 4, 2014, File No. 1-32853).X
4.1.12 Twelfth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
November 19, 2015 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.2 to Duke Energy Corporation's Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on November 19, 2015,
File No. 1-32853).X
4.1.13 Thirteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April
18, 2016, to the indenture dated as of June 3, 2008,
between Duke Energy Corporation and The Bank of
New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as Trustee
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke
Energy Corporation's Quarterly Report on Form 10-
Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2016, filed on
May 5, 2016, File No. 1-32853).X
4.1.14Fourteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
August 12, 2016 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-
K filed on August 12, 2016, File No. 1-32853).X
4.1.15 Fifteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April
11, 2017 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to
registrant's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended March 31, 2017, filed on May 9, 2017,
File No. 1-32853).X
4.1.16 Sixteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June
13, 2017 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
registrant's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended June 30, 2017, filed on August 3,
2017, File No. 1-32853).X
4.1.17 Seventeenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
August 10, 2017 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-
K filed on August 10, 2017, File No. 1-32853).X
4.1.18 Eighteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
March 29, 2018 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.2 to registrant's Quarterly Report on Form
10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2018, filed on
May 10, 2018, File No. 1-32853).X
4.1.19 Nineteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
May 16, 2018 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to registrant's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for
the quarter ended June 30, 2018, filed on August 2,
2018, File No. 1-32853).X
4.1.20 Twentieth Supplemental Indenture (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.2 to registrant's Registration
Statement on Form 8-A filed on September 17,
2018, File No. 1-32853).X
4.1.21 Twenty-first Supplemental Indenture (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to registrant’s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on March 11, 2019, File
no. 1-32853).X
4.1.22 Twenty-second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
June 7, 2019 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed
on June 7, 2019, File No. 1-32853).X
4.1.23 Twenty-third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
May 15, 2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed
on May 15, 2020, File No. 1-32853).X
4.1.24 Twenty-fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
September 11, 2020 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.2 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-
K filed on September 11, 2020, File No. 1-32853).X
4.1.25 Twenty-fifth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
June 10, 2021 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed
on June 10, 2021, File No. 1-32853).X
4.1.26 Twenty-sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
September 28, 2021 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-
K filed on September 28, 2021, File No. 1-32853).X
4.2 Senior Indenture between Duke Energy Carolinas,
LLC and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust
Company, N.A., as successor trustee to JPMorgan
Chase Bank (formerly known as The Chase
Manhattan Bank), dated as of September 1, 1998
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4-D-1 to
registrant's Post-Effective Amendment No. 2 to
Registration Statement on Form S-3 filed on April 7,
1999, File No. 333-14209).  X           
4.2.1 Fifteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April
3, 2006 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4.1
to registrant's Registration Statement on Form S-3
filed on October 3, 2007, File No. 333-146483-03). X           
4.2.2 Sixteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June
5, 2007 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
June 6, 2007, File No. 1-4928).  X           
4.3 First and Refunding Mortgage from Duke Energy
Carolinas, LLC to The Bank of New York Mellon
Trust Company, N.A., successor trustee to Guaranty
Trust Company of New York, dated as of December
1, 1927 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 7(a) to
registrant's Form S-1, effective October 15, 1947,
File No. 2-7224).  X           
4.3.1 Instrument of Resignation, Appointment and
Acceptance among Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC,
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Trustee, and The
Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as
Successor Trustee, dated as of September 24,
2007, (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.6.1 to
registrant's Registration Statement on Form S-3 filed
on October 3, 2007, File No. 333-146483).  X           
4.3.2 Ninth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of February
1, 1949 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 7(j) to
registrant's Form S-1 filed on February 3, 1949, File
No. 2-7808).  X           
4.3.3 Twentieth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June
15, 1964 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4-B-
20 to registrant's Form S-1 filed on August 23, 1966,
File No. 2-25367).  X           
4.3.4 Twenty-third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
February 1, 1968 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 2-B-26 to registrant's Form S-9 filed on
January 21, 1969, File No. 2-31304).  X           
4.3.5 Sixtieth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March
11990(i tdb f tEhibit4B61  X           
1, 1990 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4-B-61
to registrant's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the
year ended December 31, 1990, File No.1-4928).
4.3.6 Sixty-third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of July
1, 1991 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4-B-64
to registrant's Registration Statement on Form S-3
filed on February 13, 1992, File No. 33-45501).  X           
4.3.7 Eighty-fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
March 20, 2006 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.6.9 to registrant's Registration Statement
on Form S-3 filed on October 3, 2007, File No. 333-
146483-03). X           
4.3.8 Eighty-fifth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
January 10, 2008 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC’s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on January 11, 2008, File
No.1-4928).  X           
4.3.9 Eighty-seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
April 14, 2008 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC’s Current Report
on Form 8-K filed on April 15, 2008, File No.1-4928).  X           
4.3.10 Eighty-eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
November 17, 2008 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC’s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on November 20, 2008,
File No.1-4928).  X           
4.3.11 Ninetieth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
November 19, 2009 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC’s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on November 19, 2009,
File No.1-4928).  X           
4.3.12 Ninety-first Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
June 7, 2010 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC’s Current Report
on Form 8-K filed on June 7, 2010, File No.1-4928).  X           
4.3.13 Ninety-third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
May 19, 2011 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC’s Current Report
on Form 8-K filed on May 19, 2011, File No.1-4928).  X           
4.3.14 Ninety-fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
December 8, 2011 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC’s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on December 8, 2011, File
No.1-4928).  X           
4.3.15 Ninety-fifth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
September 21, 2012 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC’s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on September 21, 2012,
File No.1-4928).  X           
4.3.16 Ninety-sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
March 12, 2015, between Duke Energy Carolinas,
LLC and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust
Company, N.A., as Trustee (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke Energy Carolinas,
LLC's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on March
12, 2015, File No. 1-4928).X
4.3.17 Ninety-seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
March 11, 2016 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC's Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on March 11, 2016, File
No. 1-4928).X
4.3.18 Ninety-eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
November 17, 2016 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC's Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on November 17, 2016,
File No. 1-4928).X
4.3.19 Ninety-ninth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
November 14, 2017 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on November 14, 2017,
File No. 1-4928).X
4.3.20 One Hundredth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
March 1, 2018 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed
on March 1, 2018, File No. 1-4928).X
4.3.21 One-Hundred and Second Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of August 14, 2019 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.1 to registrant’s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on August 14, 2019, File
No. 1-4928).X
4.3.22 One-Hundred and Third Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of January 8, 2020 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.2 to registrant's Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on January 8, 2020, File
No. 1-4928).X
4.3.23 One-Hundred and Fourth Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of January 8, 2020 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.3 to registrant's Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on January 8, 2020, File
No. 1-4928).X
4.3.24 One-Hundred and Fifth Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of April 1, 2021 (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 4.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form
8-K filed on April 1, 2021, File No. 1-4928).X
4.4 Mortgage and Deed of Trust between Duke Energy
Progress, Inc. (formerly Carolina Power & Light
Company) and The Bank of New York Mellon
(formerly Irving Trust Company) and Frederick G.
Herbst (Tina D. Gonzalez, successor), as Trustees,
dated as of May 1, 1940.      X       
4.4.1 First through Fifth Supplemental Indentures thereto
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(b), File No.
2-64189).X
4.4.2 Sixth Supplemental Indenture dated April 1, 1960
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(b)-5, File No.
2-16210).X
4.4.3 Seventh Supplemental Indenture dated November
1, 1961 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(b)-6,
File No. 2-16210).X
4.4.4 Eighth Supplemental Indenture dated July 1, 1964
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(b)-8, File No.
2-19118).X
4.4.5 Ninth Supplemental Indenture dated April 1, 1966
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(b)-2, File No.
2-22439).X
4.4.6 Tenth Supplemental Indenture dated October 1,
1967 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(b)-2,
File No. 2-24624).X
4.4.7 Eleventh Supplemental Indenture dated October 1,
1968 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(c), File
No. 2-27297).X
4.4.8 Twelfth Supplemental Indenture dated January 1,
1970 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(c), File
No. 2-30172).X
4.4.9 Thirteenth Supplemental Indenture dated August 1,
1970 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(c), File
No. 2-35694).X
4.4.10 Fourteenth Supplemental Indenture dated January
1, 1971 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(c),
File No. 2-37505).X
4.4.11 Fifteenth Supplemental Indenture dated October 1,
1971 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(c), File
No. 2-39002).X
4.4.12 Sixteenth Supplemental Indenture dated May 1,
1972 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(c), File
No. 2-41738).X
4.4.13 Seventeenth Supplemental Indenture dated
November 1, 1973 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-43439).X
4.4.14 Eighteenth Supplemental Indenture dated
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-
47751).X
4.4.15 Nineteenth Supplemental Indenture dated May 1,
1974 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(c), File
No. 2-49347).X
4.4.16 Twentieth Supplemental Indenture dated December
1, 1974 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(c),
File No. 2-53113).X
4.4.17 Twenty-first Supplemental Indenture dated April 15,
1975 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(d), File
No. 2-53113).X
4.4.18 Twenty-second Supplemental Indenture dated
October 1, 1977 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-59511).X
4.4.19 Twenty-third Supplemental Indenture dated June 1,
1978 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(c), File
No. 2-61611).X
4.4.20 Twenty-fourth Supplemental Indenture dated May
15, 1979 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(d),
File No. 2-64189).X
4.4.21 Twenty-fifth Supplemental Indenture dated
November 1, 1979 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-65514).X
4.4.22 Twenty-sixth Supplemental Indenture dated
November 1, 1979 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-66851).X
4.4.23 Twenty-seventh Supplemental Indenture dated April
1, 1980 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2 (d),
File No. 2-66851).X
4.4.24 Twenty-eighth Supplemental Indenture dated
October 1, 1980 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4(b)-1, File No. 2-81299).X
4.4.25 Twenty-ninth Supplemental Indenture dated October
1, 1980 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(b)-2,
File No. 2-81299).X
4.4.26 Thirtieth Supplemental Indenture dated December 1,
1982 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(b)- 3,
File No. 2-81299).X
4.4.27 Thirty-first Supplemental Indenture dated March 15,
1983 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(c)-1,
File No. 2-95505).X
4.4.28 Thirty-second Supplemental Indenture dated March
15, 1983 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4(c)-2, File No. 2-95505).X
4.4.29 Thirty-third Supplemental Indenture dated
December 1, 1983 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4(c)-3, File No. 2-95505).X
4.4.30 Thirty-fourth Supplemental Indenture dated
December 15, 1983 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4(c)-4, File No. 2-95505).X
4.4.31 Thirty-fifth Supplemental Indenture dated April 1,
1984 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(c)-5,
File No. 2-95505).X
4.4.32 Thirty-sixth Supplemental Indenture dated June 1,
1984 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(c)-6,
File No. 2-95505).X
4.4.33 Thirty-seventh Supplemental Indenture dated June
1, 1984 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(c)-7,
File No. 2-95505).X
4.4.34 Thirty-eighth Supplemental Indenture dated June 1,
1984 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(c)- 8,
File No. 2-95505).X
4.4.35 Thirty-ninth Supplemental Indenture dated April 1,
1985 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(b), File
No. 33-25560).X
4.4.36 Fortieth Supplemental Indenture dated October 1,
1985 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(c), File
No. 33-25560).X
4.4.37 Forty-first Supplemental Indenture dated March 1,
1986 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(d), File
No. 33-25560).X
4.4.38 Forty-second Supplemental Indenture dated July 1,
1986 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(e), File
No. 33-25560).X
4.4.39 Forty-third Supplemental Indenture dated January 1,
1987 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(f), File
No. 33-25560).X
4.4.40 Forty-fourth Supplemental Indenture dated
December 1, 1987 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4(g), File No. 33-25560).X
4.4.41 Forty-fifth Supplemental Indenture dated September
1, 1988 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(h),
File No. 33-25560).X
4.4.42 Forty-sixth Supplemental Indenture dated April 1,
1989 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(b), File
No. 33-33431).X
4.4.43 Forty-seventh Supplemental Indenture dated August
1, 1989 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(c),
File No. 33-33431).X
4.4.44 Forty-eighth Supplemental Indenture dated
November 15, 1990 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4(b), File No. 33-38298).X
4.4.45 Forty-ninth Supplemental Indenture dated
November 15, 1990 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4(c), File No. 33-38298).X
4.4.46 Fiftieth Supplemental Indenture dated February 15,
1991 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(h), File
No. 33-42869).X
4.4.47 Fifty-first Supplemental Indenture dated April 1,
1991 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(i), File
No. 33-42869).X
4.4.48 Fifty-second Supplemental Indenture dated
September 15, 1991(incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4(e), File No. 33-48607).X
4.4.49 Fifty-third Supplemental Indenture dated January 1,
1992 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(f), File
No. 33-48607).X
4.4.50 Fifty-fourth Supplemental Indenture dated April 15,
1992 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4 (g), File
No. 33-48607).X
4.4.51 Fifty-fifth Supplemental Indenture dated July 1, 1992
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(e), File No.
33-55060).X
4.4.52 Fifty-sixth Supplemental Indenture dated October 1,
1992 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(f), File
No. 33-55060).X
4.4.53 Fifty-seventh Supplemental Indenture dated
February 1, 1993 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4(e), File No. 33-60014).X
4.4.54 Fifty-eighth Supplemental Indenture dated March 1,
1993 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(f), File
No. 33-60014).X
4.4.55 Fifty-ninth Supplemental Indenture dated July 1,
1993 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(a) to
Post-Effective Amendment No. 1, File No. 33-
38349).X
4.4.56 Sixtieth Supplemental Indenture dated July 1, 1993
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(b) to Post-
Effective Amendment No. 1, File No. 33-38349).X
4.4.57 Sixty-first Supplemental Indenture dated August 15,
1993 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(e), File
No. 33-50597).X
4.4.58 Sixty-second Supplemental Indenture dated January
15, 1994 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4 toX
5,99(copoatedbyeeeceto btto
Duke Energy Progress’ Current Report on Form 8-K
dated January 19, 1994, File No. 1-3382).
4.4.59 Sixty-third Supplemental Indenture dated May 1,
1994 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(f) for
Duke Energy Progress’ Form S-3, File No. 033-
57835).X
4.4.60 Sixty-fourth Supplemental Indenture dated August
15, 1997 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit to
Duke Energy Progress’ Current Report on Form 8-K
dated August 26, 1997, File No. 1-3382).X
4.4.61 Sixty-fifth Supplemental Indenture dated April 1,
1998 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(b) for
Duke Energy Progress’ Registration Statement on
Form S-3 filed December 18, 1998, File No. 333-
69237).X
4.4.62 Sixty-sixth Supplemental Indenture dated March 1,
1999 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(c) to
Duke Energy Progress’ Current Report on Form 8-K
filed on March 19, 1999, File No. 1-3382).X
4.4.63 Form of Carolina Power & Light Company First
Mortgage Bond, 6.80% Series Due August 15, 2007
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4 to Duke
Energy Progress’ Form 10-Q for the period ended
September 30, 1998, File No. 1-3382).X
4.4.64 Sixty-eighth Supplemental Indenture dated April 1,
2000 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit No. 4(b)
to Duke Energy Progress’ Current Report on Form
8-K filed on April 20, 2000, File No. 1-3382).X
4.4.65 Sixty-ninth Supplemental Indenture dated June 1,
2000 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit No. 4b(2)
to Duke Energy Progress’ Annual Report on Form
10-K for the year ended December 31, 2000, filed
on March 29, 2001, File No. 1-3382).X
4.4.66 Seventieth Supplemental Indenture dated July 1,
2000 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4b(3) to
Duke Energy Progress’ Annual Report on Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2000, filed on
March 29, 2001, File No. 1-3382).X
4.4.67 Seventy-first Supplemental Indenture dated
February 1, 2002 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4b(2) to Duke Energy Progress’ Annual
Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December
31, 2001, filed on March 28, 2002, File No. 1-3382
and 1-15929).X
4.4.68 Seventy-second Supplemental Indenture, dated as
of September 1, 2003 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4 to Duke Energy Progress, Inc.'s (formerly
Carolina Power & Light Company (d/b/a Progress
Energy Carolinas, Inc.)) Current Report on Form 8-K
filed on September 12, 2003, File No. 1-3382).      X       
4.4.69 Seventy-third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
March 1, 2005 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4 to Duke Energy Progress, Inc.'s (formerly Carolina
Power & Light Company (d/b/a Progress Energy
Carolinas, Inc.)) Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
March 22, 2005, File No. 1-3382).      X       
4.4.70 Seventy-fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
November 1, 2005 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4 to Duke Energy Progress, Inc.'s (formerly
Carolina Power & Light Company (d/b/a Progress
Energy Carolinas, Inc.)) Current Report on Form 8-K
filed on November 30, 2005, File No. 1-3382).      X       
4.4.71 Seventy-fifth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
March 1, 2008 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4 to Duke Energy Progress, Inc.'s (formerly Carolina
Power & Light Company (d/b/a Progress Energy
Carolinas, Inc.)) Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
March 13, 2008, File No. 1-3382).      X       
4.4.72 Seventy-sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
January 1, 2009 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4 to Duke Energy Progress, Inc.'s (formerly
Carolina Power & Light Company (d/b/a Progress
Energy Carolinas, Inc.)) Current Report on Form 8-K
filed on January 15, 2009, File No. 1-3382).      X       
4.4.73 Seventy-seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as
of June 18, 2009 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4 to Duke Energy Progress, Inc.'s (formerly
Carolina Power & Light Company (d/b/a Progress
Energy Carolinas, Inc.)) Current Report on Form 8-K
filed on June 23, 2009, File No. 1-3382).      X       
4.4.74 Seventy-eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
September 1, 2011 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4 to Duke Energy Progress, Inc.'s (formerly
Carolina Power & Light Company (d/b/a Progress
Energy Carolinas, Inc.)) Current Report on Form 8-K
filed on September 15, 2011, File No. 1-3382).      X       
4.4.75 Seventy-ninth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
May 1, 2012 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4
to Duke Energy Progress, Inc.'s (formerly Carolina
Power & Light Company (d/b/a Progress Energy
Carolinas, Inc.)) Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
May 18, 2012, File No. 1-3382).      X       
4.4.76 Eightieth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
March 1, 2013 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit      X       
4.1 to Duke Energy Progress, Inc.'s (formerly
Carolina Power & Light Company (d/b/a Progress
Energy Carolinas, Inc.)) Current Report on Form 8-K
filed on March 12, 2013, File No. 1-3382).
4.4.77 Eighty-second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
March 1, 2014, between Duke Energy Progress, Inc.
and The Bank of New York Mellon (formerly Irving
Trust Company) and Tina D. Gonzalez (successor to
Frederick G. Herbst) and forms of global notes
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke
Energy Progress, Inc.'s Current Report on Form 8-K
filed on March 6, 2014, File No. 1-3382).X
4.4.78 Eighty-third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
November 1, 2014, between Duke Energy Progress,
Inc. and The Bank of New York Mellon (formerly
Irving Trust Company) and Tina D. Gonzalez
(successor to Frederick G. Herbst) and forms of
global notes (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to Duke Energy Progress, Inc.'s Current Report
on Form 8-K filed on November 20, 2014, File No. 1-
3382).X
4.4.79 Eighty-fifth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
August 1, 2015 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to Duke Energy Progress, LLC's Current Report
on Form 8-K filed on August 13, 2015, File No. 1-
3382).X
4.4.80 Eighty-sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
September 1, 2016 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-
K filed on September 16, 2016, File No. 1-15929).X
4.4.81 Eighty-seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
September 1, 2017 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-
K filed on September 8, 2017, File No. 1-3382).X
4.4.82 Eighty-ninth Supplemental Indenture (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to registrant’s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on March 7, 2019, File no.
1-3382).X
4.4.83 Ninetieth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
August 1, 2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed
on August 20, 2020, File No. 1-3382).X
4.4.84 Ninety-first Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
August 1, 2021 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed
on August 12, 2021, File No. 1-3382).X
4.4.85 First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of August 1,
2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
August 20, 2020, File No. 1-3382).X
4.5 Indenture (for Debt Securities) between Duke
Energy Progress, Inc. (formerly Carolina Power &
Light Company) and The Bank of New York Mellon
(successor in interest to The Chase Manhattan
Bank), as Trustee (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4(a) to registrant's Current Report on Form
8-K filed on November 5, 1999, File No. 1-3382).      X       
4.6 Indenture (for [Subordinated] Debt Securities) (open
ended) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(a)(2)
to Duke Energy Progress, Inc.'s (formerly Carolina
Power & Light Company (d/b/a Progress Energy
Carolinas, Inc.)) Registration Statement on Form S-
3 filed on November 18, 2008, File No. 333-
155418).      X       
4.7 Indenture (for First Mortgage Bonds) between Duke
Energy Florida, Inc. (formerly Florida Power
Corporation) and The Bank of New York Mellon (as
successor to Guaranty Trust Company of New York
and The Florida National Bank of Jacksonville), as
Trustee, dated as of January 1, 1944, (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit B-18 to registrant's Form A-2,
File No. 2-5293).        X     
4.7.1 Seventh Supplemental Indenture (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4(b) to Duke Energy Florida,
Inc.'s (formerly Florida Power Corporation)
Registration Statement on Form S-3 filed on
September 27, 1991, File No. 33-16788).        X     
4.7.2 Eighth Supplemental Indenture (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4(c) to Duke Energy Florida,
Inc.'s (formerly Florida Power Corporation)
Registration Statement on Form S-3 filed on
September 27, 1991, File No. 33-16788).        X     
4.7.3 Sixteenth Supplemental Indenture (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4(d) to Duke Energy Florida,
Inc.'s (formerly Florida Power Corporation)
Registration Statement on Form S-3 filed on
September 27, 1991, File No. 33-16788).        X     
4.7.4 Twenty-ninth Supplemental Indenture (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 4(c) to Duke Energy Florida,
Inc.'s (formerly Florida Power Corporation)
Registration Statement on Form S-3 filed on
September 17, 1982, File No. 2-79832).        X     
4.7.5 Thirty-eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
July 25, 1994 (incorporated by reference to exhibit
4(f)toDukeEnergyFloridaInc's(formerlyFlorida        X     
4(f) to Duke Energy Florida, Inc.s (formerly Florida
Power Corporation) Registration Statement on Form
S-3 filed on August 29, 1994, File No. 33-55273).
4.7.6 Forty-first Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
February 1, 2003 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4 to Duke Energy Florida, Inc.'s (formerly
Duke Energy Florida Power Corporation (d/b/a
Progress Energy Florida, Inc.)) Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on February 21, 2003, File No. 1-
3274).        X     
4.7.7 Forty-second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
April 1, 2003 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4
to Duke Energy Florida, Inc.'s (formerly Florida
Power Corporation (d/b/a Progress Energy Florida,
Inc.)) Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended June 30, 2003, filed on August 11, 2003, File
No. 1-3274). X
4.7.8 Forty-third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
November 1, 2003 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4 to Duke Energy Florida, Inc.'s (formerly
Florida Power Corporation (d/b/a Progress Energy
Florida, Inc.)) Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
November 21, 2003, File No. 1-3274).X
4.7.9 Forty-fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
August 1, 2004 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4(m) to Duke Energy Florida, Inc.'s (formerly Florida
Power Corporation (d/b/a Progress Energy Florida,
Inc.)) Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2004, filed on March 16, 2005,
File No. 1-3274).X
4.7.10 Forty-sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
September 1, 2007 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4 to Duke Energy Florida, Inc.'s (formerly
Florida Power Corporation (d/b/a Progress Energy
Florida, Inc.)) Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
September 19, 2007, File No. 1-3274).X
4.7.11 Forty-seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
December 1, 2007 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4 to Duke Energy Florida, Inc.'s (formerly
Florida Power Corporation (d/b/a Progress Energy
Florida, Inc.)) Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
December 13, 2007, File No. 1-3274).X
4.7.12 Forty-eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
June 1, 2008 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4
to Duke Energy Florida, Inc.'s (formerly Florida
Power Corporation (d/b/a Progress Energy Florida,
Inc.)) Current Report on Form 8-K filed on June 18,
2008, File No. 1-3274).X
4.7.13 Forty-ninth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
March 1, 2010 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4 to Duke Energy Florida, Inc.'s (formerly Florida
Power Corporation (d/b/a Progress Energy Florida,
Inc.)) Current Report on Form 8-K filed on March 25,
2010, File No. 1-3274).X
4.7.14 Fiftieth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of August
11, 2011 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4 to
Duke Energy Florida, Inc.'s (formerly Florida Power
Corporation (d/b/a Progress Energy Florida, Inc.))
Current Report on Form 8-K filed on August 18,
2011, File No. 1-3274).X
4.7.15 Fifty-first Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
November 1, 2012 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to Duke Energy Florida, Inc.'s (formerly
Florida Power Corporation (d/b/a Progress Energy
Florida, Inc.)) Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
November 20, 2012, File No. 1-3274).X
4.7.16 Fifty-third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
September 1, 2016 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-
K filed on September 9, 2016, File No. 1-03274).X
4.7.17 Fifty-fifth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June
1, 2018 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
June 21, 2018, File No. 1-3274).X
4.7.18 Fifty-sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
November 1, 2019 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-
K filed on November 26, 2019, File No. 1-3274).X
4.7.19 Fifty-seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
June 1, 2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed
on June 11, 2020, File No. 1-3274).X
4.7.20 Fifty-eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
November 1, 2021 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-
K filed on December 2, 2021, File No. 1-3274).X
4.8 Indenture (for Debt Securities) between Duke
Energy Florida, Inc. (formerly Florida Power
Corporation (d/b/a Progress Energy Florida, Inc.))
and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company,
National Association (successor in interest to J.P.
Morgan Trust Company, National Association), as
Trustee, dated as of December 7, 2005
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(a) to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
December132005FileNo1-3274)X
December 13, 2005, File No. 13274).
4.8.1 First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of December
12, 2017 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
December 12, 2017, File No. 1-03274).X
4.8.2 Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
November 26, 2019 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.2 to registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-
K filed on November 26, 2019, File No. 1-3274).X
4.9 Indenture (for [Subordinated] Debt Securities) (open
ended) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(a)(2)
Duke Energy Florida, Inc.'s (formerly Florida Power
Corporation (d/b/a Progress Energy Florida, Inc.))
Registration Statement on Form S-3 filed on
November 18, 2008, File No. 333-155418).X
4.10 Original Indenture (Unsecured Debt Securities)
between Duke Energy Ohio, Inc. (formerly The
Cincinnati Gas & Electric Company) and The Bank
of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as
Successor Trustee, dated as of May 15, 1995
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3 to registrant's
Form 8-A filed on July 27, 1995, File No. 1-1232).X
4.10.1 First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 1,
1995 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4 B to
Duke Energy Ohio, Inc.'s (formerly The Cincinnati
Gas & Electric Company) Quarterly Report on Form
10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 1995, filed on
August 11, 1995, File No. 1-1232).X
4.10.2 Seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June
15, 2003 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
Duke Energy Ohio, Inc.'s (formerly The Cincinnati
Gas & Electric Company) Quarterly Report on Form
10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2003, filed on
August 13, 2003, File No. 1-1232).X
4.11 Original Indenture (First Mortgage Bonds) between
Duke Energy Ohio, Inc. (formerly The Cincinnati Gas
& Electric Company) and The Bank of New York
Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as Successor Trustee,
dated as of August 1, 1936 (incorporated by
reference to an exhibit to registrant's Registration
Statement No. 2-2374).X
4.11.1 Fortieth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March
23, 2009 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
Duke Energy Ohio, Inc.’s (formerly The Cincinnati
Gas & Electric Company) Current Report on Form 8-
K filed on March 24, 2009, File No. 1-1232).X
4.11.2 Forty-second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
September 6, 2013 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to Duke Energy Ohio, Inc.’s (formerly The
Cincinnati Gas & Electric Company) Current Report
on Form 8-K filed on September 6, 2013, File No. 1-
1232).X
4.11.3 Forty-fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
June 23, 2016 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
June 23, 2016, File No. 1-1232).X
4.11.4 Forty-fifth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
March 27, 2017 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-
K filed on March 27,2017, File No. 1-01232).X
4.11.5 Forty-sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
January 8, 2019 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-
K filed on January 8, 2019, File No. 1-1232).X
4.11.6 Forty-seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
May 21, 2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed
on May 21, 2020, File No. 1-1232).X
4.12 Indenture between Duke Energy Indiana, LLC
(formerly PSI Energy, Inc.) and The Bank of New
York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as Successor
Trustee, dated as of November 15, 1996
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(v) to the
Cinergy Corp. Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 1996, filed on March 27, 1997, File
No. 1-11377).X
4.12.1 Third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March
15, 1998 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4-w to
Cinergy Corp.’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the
year ended December 31, 1997, filed on March 27,
1998, File No. 1-11377).X
4.12.2 Eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
September 23, 2003 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.2 to Duke Energy Indiana, LLC's (formerly
PSI Energy, Inc.) Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for
the quarter ended September 30, 2003, filed on
November 13, 2003, File No. 1-3543).X
4.12.3 Ninth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of October
21, 2005 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.7.3
to Duke Energy Indiana, LLC's (formerly PSI Energy,
Inc.) Registration Statement on Form S-3 filed on
September 29, 2010, File No. 333-169633).X
4.12.4 Tenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 9,
2006 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
Duke Energy Indiana, LLC’s (formerly PSI Energy,X
ueegydaa,Cs(oeyS egy,
Inc.) Current Report on Form 8-K filed on June 15,
2006, File No. 1-3543).
4.13 Original Indenture (First Mortgage Bonds) between
Duke Energy Indiana, LLC (formerly PSI Energy,
Inc.) and Deutsche Bank National Trust Company,
as Successor Trustee, dated as of September 1,
1939, (filed as an exhibit in File No. 70-258).X
4.13.1 Tenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of July 1,
1952, (filed as an exhibit in File No. 2-9687).X
4.13.2 Twenty-third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
January 1, 1977, (filed as an exhibit in File No. 2-
57828).X
4.13.3 Twenty-fifth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
September 1, 1978, (filed as an exhibit in File No. 2-
62543).X
4.13.4 Twenty-sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
September 1, 1978, (filed as an exhibit in File No. 2-
62543).X
4.13.5 Thirtieth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
August 1, 1980, (filed as an exhibit in File No. 2-
68562).X
4.13.6 Thirty-fifth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
March 30, 1984, (filed as an exhibit to registrant's
Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 1984, File No. 1-3543).X
4.13.7 Forty-sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
June 1, 1990, (filed as an exhibit to registrant's
Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 1991, File No. 1-3543).X
4.13.8 Forty-seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
July 15, 1991, (filed as an exhibit to registrant's
Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 1991, File No. 1-3543).X
4.13.9 Forty-eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
July 15, 1992, (filed as an exhibit to registrant's
Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 1992, File No. 1-3543).X
4.13.10Fifty-second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
April 30, 1999 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4 to Duke Energy Indiana, LLC’s (formerly PSI
Energy, Inc.) Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended March 31, 1999, filed on May 13,
1999, File No. 1-3543).X
4.13.11Fifty-seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
August 21, 2008 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to Duke Energy Indiana, LLC’s (formerly
PSI Energy, Inc.) Current Report Form 8-K filed on
August 21, 2008, File No. 1-3543).X
4.13.12Fifty-eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
December 19, 2008 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.8.12 to Duke Energy Indiana, LLC’s
(formerly PSI Energy, Inc.) Registration Statement
on Form S-3 filed on September 29, 2010, File No.
333-169633-02).X
4.13.13Fifty-ninth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
March 23, 2009 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to Duke Energy Indiana, LLC’s (formerly
PSI Energy, Inc.) Current Report on Form 8-K filed
on March 24, 2009, File No. 1-3543).X
4.13.14Sixtieth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 1,
2009 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.8.14 to
Duke Energy Indiana, LLC’s (formerly PSI Energy,
Inc.) Registration Statement on Form S-3 filed on
September 29, 2010, File No. 333-169633-02).X
4.13.15Sixty-first Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
October 1, 2009 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.8.15 to Duke Energy Indiana, LLC’s
(formerly PSI Energy, Inc.) Registration Statement
on Form S-3 filed on September 29, 2010, File No.
333-169633-02).X
4.13.16Sixty-second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
July 9, 2010 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to Duke Energy Indiana, LLC’s (formerly PSI
Energy, Inc.) Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
July 9, 2010, File No. 1-3543). X
4.13.17Sixty-third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
September 23, 2010 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.8.17 to Duke Energy Indiana, LLC’s
(formerly PSI Energy, Inc.) Registration Statement
on Form S-3 filed on September 29, 2010, File No.
333-169633-02).X
4.13.18Sixty-fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
December 1, 2011 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4(d)(2)(xviii) to Duke Energy Indiana, LLC’s
(formerly PSI Energy, Inc.) Registration Statement
on Form S-3 filed on September 30, 2013, File No.
333-191462-03).X
4.13.19Sixty-fifth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
March 15, 2012 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to Duke Energy Indiana, LLC’s (formerly
PSI Energy, Inc.) Current Report on Form 8-K filed
on March 15, 2012, File No. 1-3543).X
4.13.20Sixty-sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of July X
y pp , y
11, 2013 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
Duke Energy Indiana, LLC’s (formerly PSI Energy,
Inc.) Current Report on Form 8-K filed on July 11,
2013, File No. 1-3543).
4.13.21Sixty-seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
January 1, 2016, between Duke Energy Indiana, Inc.
and Deutsche Bank National Trust Company, as
Trustee, supplementing and amending the Indenture
of Mortgage or Deed of Trust, dated September 1,
1939, between Duke Energy Indiana, Inc. and
Deutsche Bank National Trust Company, as Trustee
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Duke
Energy Indiana, LLC's (formerly PSI Energy, Inc.)
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended March 31, 2016, filed on May 5, 2016, File
No. 1-3543).X
4.13.22Sixty-eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
May 12, 2016 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed
on May 12, 2016, File No. 1-3543).X
4.13.23Sixty-ninth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
September 27, 2019 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-
K filed on September 27, 2019, File No. 1-3543).X
4.13.24Seventieth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
March 12, 2020 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-
K filed on March 12, 2020, File No. 1-3543).X
4.14 Repayment Agreement between Duke Energy Ohio,
Inc. (formerly The Cincinnati Gas & Electric
Company) and The Dayton Power and Light
Company, dated as of December 23, 1992, (filed
with registrant's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the
year ended December 31, 1992, File No. 1-1232).X
4.15 Unsecured Promissory Note between Duke Energy
Indiana, LLC (formerly PSI Energy, Inc.) and the
Rural Utilities Service, dated as of October 14, 1998
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4 to registrant's
Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 1998, filed on March 8, 1999, File No.
1-3543).X
4.16 6.302% Subordinated Note between Duke Energy
Indiana, LLC (formerly PSI Energy, Inc.) and Cinergy
Corp., dated as of February 5, 2003 (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 4(yyy) to registrant's
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended March 31, 2003, filed on May 12,2003, File
No. 1-3543).X
4.17 6.403% Subordinated Note between Duke Energy
Indiana, LLC (formerly PSI Energy, Inc.) and Cinergy
Corp., dated as of February 5, 2003 (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 4(zzz) to registrant's
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended March 31, 2003, filed on May 12, 2003, File
No. 1-3543).X
4.18 Contingent Value Obligation Agreement between
Progress Energy, Inc. (formerly CP&L Energy, Inc.)
and The Chase Manhattan Bank, as Trustee, dated
as of November 30, 2000 (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 4.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form
8-K filed on December 1, 2000, File No. 1-3382).X
4.19 Form of 3.47% Series A Senior Notes due July 16,
2027 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
March 29, 2012, File No. 1-06196).X
4.20 Form of 3.57% Series B Senior Notes due July 16,
2027 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
March 29, 2012, File No. 1-06196).X
4.21 Form of 4.65% Senior Notes due 2043 (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to registrant's Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on August 1, 2013, File No.
1-06196).X
4.22 Form of 4.10% Senior Notes due 2034 (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to registrant's Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on September 18, 2014,
File No. 1-06196).X
4.23 Form of 3.60% Senior Notes due 2025 (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to registrant's Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on September 14, 2015,
File No. 1-06196).X
4.24 Form of 3.64% Senior Notes due 2046 (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to registrant's Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on July 28, 2016, File No.
1-06196).X
4.25 Form of 4.24% Series B Senior Notes due June 6,
2021 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on May
12, 2011, File No. 1-06196).X
4.26 Indenture, dated as of April 1, 1993, between
Piedmont and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust
Company, N.A. (as successor to Citibank, N.A.),
Trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
itt'RittiStt tF S3fildX
registrant's Registration Statement on Form S-3 filed
on May 16, 1995, File No. 33-59369).
4.26.1 Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June
15, 2003, between Piedmont and Citibank, N.A.,
Trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to
registrant's Registration Statement on Form S-3 filed
on June 19, 2003, File No. 333-106268).X
4.26.2 Fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of May 6,
2011, between Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc.
and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company,
N.A., as trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.2 to registrant's Registration Statement on Form
S-3-ASR filed on July 7, 2011, File No. 333-
175386).X
4.26.3 Fifth Supplemental Indenture, dated August 1, 2013,
between the Company and The Bank of New York
Mellon Trust Company, N.A. (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.1 to registrant's Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on August 1, 2013, File No.
1-06196).X
4.26.4 Sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated September 18,
2014, between the Company and The Bank of New
York Mellon Trust Company, N.A. (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.1 to registrant's Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on September 18, 2014,
File No. 1-06196).X
4.26.5 Seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated September
14, 2015, between the Company and The Bank of
New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A. (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to registrant's Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on September 14, 2015,
File No. 1-06196).X
4.26.6 Eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated July 28, 2016,
between the Company and The Bank of New York
Mellon Trust Company, N.A. (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.1 to registrant's Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on July 28, 2016, File No.
1-06196).X
4.26.7 Ninth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of May 24,
2019 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on May
24, 2019, File No. 1-6196).X
4.26.8 Tenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of May 21,
2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on May
21, 2020, File No. 1-6196).X
4.26.9 Eleventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
March 11, 2021 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-
K filed on March 11, 2021, File No. 1-6196).X
4.27 Medium-Term Note, Series A, dated as of October 6,
1993 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.8 to
registrant's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year
ended October 31, 1993, File No. 1-06196).X
4.28 Medium-Term Note, Series A, dated as of
September 19, 1994 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.9 to registrant's Annual Report on Form 10-
K for the year ended October 31, 1994, File No. 1-
06196).X
4.29 Form of 6% Medium-Term Note, Series E, dated as
of December 19, 2003 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 99.2 to registrant's Current Report on Form
8-K filed on December 23, 2003, File No. 1-06196).X
4.30 Form of Master Global Note (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.4 to registrant's Registration
Statement on Form S-3 filed on April 30, 1997, File
No. 333-26161).X
4.31 Pricing Supplement of Medium-Term Notes, Series
B, dated October 3, 1995 (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 4.10 to registrant's Annual Report on Form
10-K for the year ended October 31, 1995, File No.
1-06196).X
4.32 Pricing Supplement of Medium-Term Notes, Series
B, dated October 4, 1996 (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 4.11 to registrant's Annual Report on Form
10-K for the year ended October 31, 1996, File No.
1-06196).X
4.33 Pricing Supplement of Medium-Term Notes, Series
C, dated September 15, 1999 (incorporated by
reference to Rule 424(b)(3) Pricing Supplement to
Form S-3 Registration Statement Nos. 33-59369
and 333-26161).X
4.34 Agreement of Resignation, Appointment and
Acceptance dated as of March 29, 2007, by and
among Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc.,
Citibank, N.A., and The Bank of New York Trust
Company, N.A. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to registrant's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for
the quarter ended April 30, 2007, filed on June 8,
2007, File No. 1-06196).X
10.1 Agreements with Piedmont Electric Membership
Corporation, Rutherford Electric Membership
Corporation and Blue Ridge Electric Membership
Corporation (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
1015toDukeEnergyCorporation'sQuarterlyX
10.15 to Duke Energy Corporations Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30,
2006, filed on August 9, 2006, File No. 1-32853).
10.2 Asset Purchase Agreement between Saluda River
Electric Cooperative, Inc., as Seller, and Duke
Energy Carolinas, LLC, as Purchaser, dated as of
December 20, 2006 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form
8-K filed on December 27, 2006, File No. 1-4928).X
10.3 Settlement between Duke Energy Corporation, Duke
Energy Carolinas, LLC and the U.S. Department of
Justice resolving Duke Energy's used nuclear fuel
litigation against the U.S. Department of Energy,
dated as of March 6, 2007 (incorporated by
reference to Item 8.01 to registrant's Current Report
on Form 8-K filed on March 12, 2007, File No. 1-
4928).X
10.4 Letter Agreement between Georgia Natural Gas
Company and Piedmont Energy Company dated
February 12, 2016 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form
8-K filed on February 18, 2016, File No. 1-06196).X
10.5 Assignment of Membership Interests dated as of
October 3, 2016 between Piedmont ACP Company,
LLC and Dominion Atlantic Coast Pipeline, LLC,
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
October 7, 2016, File No. 1-06196).X
10.6 Agreements between Piedmont Electric Membership
Corporation, Rutherford Electric Membership
Corporation and Blue Ridge Electric Membership
Corporation (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.15 to Duke Energy Corporation's Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30,
2006, filed on August 9, 2006, File No. 1-32853).X
10.7 Conveyance and Assignment Agreement, dated as
of October 3, 2016, by and between Piedmont
Energy Company and Georgia Natural Gas
Company (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1
to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
October 3, 2016, File No. 1-06196).X
10.8 Engineering, Procurement and Construction
Management Agreement between Duke Energy
Indiana, LLC (formerly PSI Energy, Inc.) and Bechtel
Power Corporation, dated as of December 15, 2008
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.16 to
registrant's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2008, filed on March 13, 2009,
File No. 1-3543). (Portions of the exhibit have been
omitted and filed separately with the Securities and
Exchange Commission pursuant to a request for
confidential treatment pursuant to Rule 24b-2 under
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.)X
10.9 Formation and Sale Agreement between Duke
Ventures, LLC, Crescent Resources, LLC, Morgan
Stanley Real Estate Fund V U.S. L.P., Morgan
Stanley Real Estate Fund V Special U.S., L.P.,
Morgan Stanley Real Estate Investors V U.S., L.P.,
MSP Real Estate Fund V, L.P., and Morgan Stanley
Strategic Investments, Inc., dated as of
September 7, 2006 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.3 to Duke Energy Corporation's Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
September 30, 2006, filed on November 9, 2006,
File No. 1-32853).X
10.10 Operating Agreement of Pioneer Transmission, LLC
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Duke
Energy Corporation's Quarterly Report on Form 10-
Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2008, filed
on November 7, 2008, File No. 1-32853).X
10.11**Amended and Restated Duke Energy Corporation
Directors' Saving Plan, dated as of January 1, 2014
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.32 to Duke
Energy Corporation's Annual Report on Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2013, filed on
February 28, 2014, File No. 1-32853).X
*10.12**Amendment to Duke Energy Corporation Directors'
Savings Plan, effective as of December 16, 2021.X
10.13 Engineering, Procurement and Construction
Management Agreement between Duke Energy
Indiana, LLC (formerly PSI Energy, Inc.) and Bechtel
Power Corporation, dated as of December 15, 2008
(incorporated by reference to Item 1.01 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
December 19, 2008, File Nos. 1-32853 and 1-3543).
(Portions of the exhibit have been omitted and filed
separately with the Securities and Exchange
Commission pursuant to a request for confidential
treatment pursuant to Rule 24b-2 under the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.)X X
10.14**Duke Energy Corporation Executive Severance Plan
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
January 13, 2011, File No. 1-32853).X
10.15 $6,000,000,000 Five-Year Credit Agreement
between Duke Energy Corporation, Duke Energy
C li LLCDkE OhiI DkX X X X
Carolinas, LLC, Duke Energy Ohio, Inc., Duke
Energy Indiana, LLC, Duke Energy Kentucky, Inc.,
Carolina Power and Light Company d/b/a Duke
Energy Progress, Inc. and Florida Power
Corporation, d/b/a Duke Energy Florida, Inc., as
Borrowers, the lenders listed therein, Wells Fargo
Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent,
Bank of America, N.A. and The Royal Bank of
Scotland plc, as Co-Syndication Agents and Bank of
China, New York Branch, Barclays Bank PLC,
Citibank, N.A., Credit Suisse AG, Cayman Islands
Branch, Industrial and Commercial Bank of China
Limited, New York Branch, JPMorgan Chase Bank,
N.A. and UBS Securities LLC, as Co-Documentation
Agents, dated as of November 18, 2011
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
November 25, 2011, File Nos. 1-32853, 1-4928, 1-
1232 and 1-3543).
10.15.1Amendment No. 1 and Consent between Duke
Energy Corporation, Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC,
Duke Energy Ohio, Inc., Duke Energy Indiana, LLC,
Duke Energy Kentucky, Inc., Duke Energy Progress,
Inc., Duke Energy Florida, Inc., and Wells Fargo
Bank, National Association, dated as of December
18, 2013 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1
to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
December 23, 2013, File Nos. 1-32853, 1-4928, 1-
3382, 1-3274, 1-1232 and 1-3543).X X X X X X
10.15.2Amendment No. 2 and Consent between Duke
Energy Corporation, Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC,
Duke Energy Ohio, Inc., Duke Energy Indiana, LLC,
Duke Energy Kentucky, Inc., Duke Energy Progress,
Inc., and Duke Energy Florida, Inc., the Lenders
party hereto, the issuing Lenders party hereto, Wells
Fargo Bank, National Association, as Administrative
Agent and Swingline Lender, dated as of January
30, 2015 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1
of registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
February 5, 2015, File Nos. 1-32853, 1-4928, 1-
1232, 1-3543, 1-3382 and 1-3274).X X X X X X
10.15.3Amendment No. 3 and Consent, dated as of March
16, 2017, among the registrants, the Lenders party
thereto, the issuing Lenders party thereto, and Wells
Fargo Bank, National Association, as Administrative
Agent and Swingline Lender (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1 to registrants' Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on March 17, 2017, File
Nos. 1-32853, 1-04928, 1-03382, 1-03274, 1-01232,
1-03543, 1-06196).X X X X X X X
10.15.4Amendment No.4 and Consent, dated as of March
18, 2019, among Duke Energy Corporation, Duke
Energy Carolinas, LLC, Duke Energy Ohio, Inc.,
Duke Energy Indiana, LLC, Duke Energy Kentucky,
Inc., Duke Energy Progress, LLC, Duke Energy
Florida, LLC, and Piedmont Natural Gas Company,
Inc., the Lenders party thereto, the Issuing Lenders
party thereto, and Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association, as Administrative Agent and Swingline
Lender (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to
registrants’ Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
March 21, 2019, File Nos. 1-32853. 1-4928, 1-3382,
1-3274, 1-1232, 1-3543, 1-6196).X X X X X X X
10.15.5Amendment No. 5 and Consent, dated as of March
16, 2020, among registrants', the Lenders party
thereto, the Issuing Lenders party thereto, and Wells
Fargo Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent, and
Swingline Lender (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 to registrants' Current Report on Form
8-K filed on March 17, 2020, File Nos. 1-32853, 1-
4928, 1-3382, 1-3274, 1-1232, 1-3543, 1-6196).X X X X X X X
10.16**Duke Energy Corporation 2015 Long-Term Incentive
Plan (incorporated by reference to Appendix C to
registrant's DEF 14A filed on March 26, 2015, File
No. 1-32853).X
10.16.1**Amendment to Duke Energy Corporation 2015
Long-Term Incentive Plan (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.16.1 to Duke Energy
Corporation's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the
year ended December 31, 2018, filed on February
28, 2019, File No. 1-32853).X
10.17**Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.4 to
registrant's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended March 31, 2017 filed on May 9, 2017,
File No. 1-32853).X
10.18**Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.24 to Duke
Energy Corporation's Annual Report on Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2017, filed on
February 21, 2018, File No. 1-32853).X
10.19**Performance Share Award Agreement (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Duke Energy
Corporation’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended March 31, 2019, filed on May 9, 2019,
File No. 1-32853).X
10.20**Performance Award Agreement (incorporated by X
reference to Exhibit 10.4 to Duke Energy
Corporation's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended March 31, 2020, filed on May 12,
2020, File No. 1-32853).
10.21**Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to Duke
Energy Corporation’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-
Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2019, filed on
May 9, 2019, File No. 1-32853).X
10.22 Settlement Agreement between Duke Energy
Corporation, the North Carolina Utilities Commission
Staff and the North Carolina Public Staff, dated as of
November 28, 2012 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form
8-K filed on November 29, 2012, File No. 1-32853).X
10.23 Settlement Agreement between Duke Energy
Corporation and the North Carolina Attorney
General, dated as of December 3, 2012
(incorporated by reference Item 7.01 to registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 3,
2012, File No. 1-32853).X
10.24 Settlement Agreement between Duke Energy
Carolinas, LLC, Duke Energy Progress, LLC, and
The North Carolina Department of Environmental
Quality, dated as of December 31, 2019
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to
registrants' Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
January 2, 2020, File Nos. 1-4928, 1-3382).X X
10.25 Duke Energy Carolinas Summary of Partial
Settlement in North Carolina Rate Case
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 99.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
March 26, 2020, File Nos. 1-32853, 1-4928, 1-
3382).X X X
10.26 Coal Combustion Residuals Settlement Agreement
between registrants and the Public Staff-North
Carolina Utilities Commission, the North Carolina
Attorney General's Office, and the Sierra Club,
dated as of January 22, 2021 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1 to registrants' Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March
31, 2021, filed on May 10, 2021, File Nos. 1-32853,
1-4928, 1-3382).X X X
10.27 Investment Agreement by and among Cinergy
Corp., Duke Energy Indiana HoldCo, LLC, Duke
Energy Corporation, and Epson Investment PTE.
LTD,. dated as of January 28, 2021 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2 to registrants' Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March
31, 2021, filed on May 10, 2021, File Nos. 1-32853,
1-3543).X X
10.28 Cooperation Agreement, dated as of November 13,
2021, by and among Duke Energy Corporation,
Elliott Investment Management L.P., and Elliott
International, L.P.(incorporated by reference to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
November 15, 2021, File No. 1-32853).X
10.29**Form of Change-in-Control Agreement (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.58 to Duke Energy
Corporation's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the
year ended December 31, 2012, filed on March 1,
2013, File No. 1-32853).X
10.30**Amended and Restated Duke Energy Corporation
Executive Cash Balance Plan, dated as of January
1, 2014 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.52
to Duke Energy Corporation's Annual Report on
Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2013,
filed on February 28, 2014, File No. 1-32852).X
10.30.1**Amended and Restated Duke Energy Corporation
Executive Cash Balance Plan, dated as of
September 30, 2020 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form
8-K filed on September 25, 2020, File No. 1-32853).X
10.31 Purchase, Construction and Ownership Agreement,
dated as of July 30, 1981, between Duke Energy
Progress, Inc. (formerly Carolina Power & Light
Company) and North Carolina Municipal Power
Agency Number 3 and Exhibits, together with
resolution, dated as of December 16, 1981,
changing name to North Carolina Eastern Municipal
Power Agency, amending letter, dated as of
February 18, 1982, and amendment, dated as of
February 24, 1982 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10(a) to registrant's File No. 33-25560).X
10.32 Operating and Fuel Agreement, dated as of July 30,
1981, between Duke Energy Progress, Inc. (formerly
Carolina Power & Light Company) and North
Carolina Municipal Power Agency Number 3 and
Exhibits, together with resolution, dated as of
December 16, 1981, changing name to North
Carolina Eastern Municipal Power Agency,
amending letters, dated as of August 21, 1981, and
December 15, 1981, and amendment, dated as of
February 24, 1982 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10(b) to registrant's File No. 33-25560).X
10.33 Power Coordination Agreement, dated as of July 30, X
033 oeCoodatogeeet,datedasoJuy30,
1981, between Duke Energy Progress, Inc. (formerly
Carolina Power & Light Company) and North
Carolina Municipal Power Agency Number 3 and
Exhibits, together with resolution, dated as of
December 16, 1981, changing name to North
Carolina Eastern Municipal Power Agency and
amending letter, dated as of January 29, 1982
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10(c) to
registrant's File No. 33-25560).
10.34 Amendment, dated as of December 16, 1982, to
Purchase, Construction and Ownership Agreement,
dated as of July 30, 1981, between Duke Energy
Progress, Inc. (formerly Carolina Power & Light
Company) and North Carolina Eastern Municipal
Power Agency (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10(d) to registrant's File No. 33-25560).X
10.35 Precedent and Related Agreements between Duke
Energy Florida, Inc. (formerly Florida Power
Corporation d/b/a Progress Energy Florida, Inc.
(“PEF”)), Southern Natural Gas Company, Florida
Gas Transmission Company (“FGT”), and BG LNG
Services, LLC (“BG”), including: a) Precedent
Agreement between Southern Natural Gas
Company and PEF, dated as of December 2, 2004;
b) Gas Sale and Purchase Contract between BG
and PEF, dated as of December 1, 2004; c) Interim
Firm Transportation Service Agreement by and
between FGT and PEF, dated as of December 2,
2004; d) Letter Agreement between FGT and PEF,
dated as of December 2, 2004, and Firm
Transportation Service Agreement between FGT
and PEF to be entered into upon satisfaction of
certain conditions precedent; e) Discount Agreement
between FGT and PEF, dated as of December 2,
2004; f) Amendment to Gas Sale and Purchase
Contract between BG and PEF, dated as of January
28, 2005; and g) Letter Agreement between FGT
and PEF, dated as of January 31, 2005
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K/A filed on
March 15, 2005, File Nos. 1-15929 and 1-3274).
(Portions of the exhibit have been omitted and filed
separately with the Securities and Exchange
Commission pursuant to a request for confidential
treatment pursuant to Rule 24b-2 under the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.)X X
10.36 Engineering, Procurement and Construction
Agreement between Duke Energy Florida, Inc.
(formerly Florida Power Corporation d/b/a/ Progress
Energy Florida, Inc.), as owner, and a consortium
consisting of Westinghouse Electric Company LLC
and Stone & Webster, Inc., as contractor, for a two-
unit AP1000 Nuclear Power Plant, dated as of
December 31, 2008 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form
8-K filed on March 2, 2009, File Nos. 1-15929 and 1-
3274). (Portions of the exhibit have been omitted
and filed separately with the Securities and
Exchange Commission pursuant to a request for
confidential treatment pursuant to Rule 24b-2 under
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.)X X
10.37**Employment Agreement between Duke Energy
Corporation and Lynn J. Good, dated as of June 17,
2013 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to
Duke Energy Corporation's Current Report on Form
8-K filed on June 18, 2013, File No. 1-32853).X
10.37.1**Amendment to Employment Agreement between
Duke Energy Corporation and Lynn J. Good, dated
as of June 25, 2015 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 to Duke Energy Corporation's Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on June 29, 2015, File No.
1-32853).X
10.38**Duke Energy Corporation Executive Short-Term
Incentive Plan, dated as of February 25, 2013
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Duke
Energy Corporation's Current Report on Form 8-K
filed on May 7, 2013, File No. 1-32853).X
10.39**Duke Energy Corporation 2017 Director
Compensation Program Summary (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.3 to Duke Energy
Corporation's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended June 30, 2017 filed on August 3,
2017, File No. 1-32853).X
10.40**Amended and Restated Duke Energy Corporation
Executive Savings Plan, dated as of January 1,
2014 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.82 to
Duke Energy Corporation's Annual Report on Form
10-K for the year ended December 31, 2013, filed
on February 28, 2014, File No. 1-32853).X
10.40.1**Amendment to Duke Energy Corporation Executive
Savings Plan, dated as of January 1, 2014
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Duke
Energy Corporation's Quarterly Report on Form 10-
Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2017, filed
on November 3, 2017, File No. 1-32853).X
10.40.2**Amendment to Duke Energy Corporation Executive
Savings Plan, dated as of October 1, 2020X
g
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Duke
Energy Corporation's Current Report on Form 8-K
filed on September 25, 2020, File No. 1-32853).
10.41**Consulting Agreement, dated as of September 22,
2021, between Duke Energy Business Services,
LLC and Douglas F Esamann (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1 to registrant's Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on September 27, 2021,
File No. 1-32853).X
*10.42**Retention Award Agreement X
10.43 Agreement between Duke Energy SAM, LLC, Duke
Energy Ohio, Inc., Duke Energy Commercial
Enterprise, Inc. and Dynegy Resource I, LLC, dated
as of August 21, 2014 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.61 to Duke Energy Corporation's Annual
Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December
31, 2014, filed on March 2, 2015, File No. 1-32853).X X
10.44 Asset Purchase Agreement between Duke Energy
Progress, Inc. and North Carolina Eastern Municipal
Power Agency, dated as of September 5, 2014
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.62 to Duke
Energy Corporation's Annual Report on Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2014, filed on
March 2, 2015, File No. 1-32853).X X
10.45 Accelerated Stock Repurchase Program executed
by Goldman, Sachs & Co., and JPMorgan Chase
Bank, N.A. on April 6, 2015, under an agreement
with Duke Energy Corporation (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Duke Energy
Corporation's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
April 6, 2015, File No. 1-32853).X
10.46 Plea Agreement between Duke Energy Corporation
and the Court of the Eastern District of North
Carolina in connection with the May 14, 2015, Dan
River Grand Jury Settlement (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.3 to Duke Energy
Corporation's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended June 30, 2015, filed on August 7,
2015, File No. 1-32853).X
10.47 Plea Agreement between Duke Energy Corporation
and the Court of the Eastern District of North
Carolina in connection with the May 14, 2015, Dan
River Grand Jury Settlement (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.4 to Duke Energy
Corporation's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended June 30, 2015, filed on August 7,
2015, File No. 1-32853).X
10.48 Purchase and Sale Agreement by and among Duke
Energy International Group S.à.r.l., Duke Energy
International Brazil Holdings S.à.r.l. and China Three
Gorges (Luxembourg) Energy S.à.r.l., dated as of
October 10, 2016 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 2.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-
K filed on October 13, 2016, File No. 1-32853).X
10.49Purchase and Sale Agreement by and among Duke
Energy Brazil Holdings II, C.V., Duke Energy
International Uruguay Investments SRL, Duke
Energy International Group S.à.r.l., Duke Energy
International España Holdings SL, Duke Energy
International Investments No. 2 Ltd., ISQ Enerlam
Aggregator, L.P., and Enerlam (UK) Holdings Ltd.,
dated as of October 10, 2016 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 2.2. to registrant's Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on October 13, 2016, File
No. 1-32853).X
10.50 $1,000,000,000 Credit Agreement, dated as of June
14, 2017, among Duke Energy Corporation, the
Lenders listed therein, The Bank of Nova Scotia, as
Administrative Agent, PNC Bank, N.A., Sumitomo
Mitsui Banking Corporation, and TD Bank, N.A., as
C0-Syndication Agents, and Bank of China, New
York Branch, BNP Paribas, Santander Bank, N.A.
and U.S. Bank N.A., as Co-Documentation Agents
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
June 14, 2017, File No. 1-32853).X
10.51 $1,000,000,000 Credit Agreement, dated as of May
15, 2019, among Duke Energy Corporation, the
Lenders party thereto, The Bank of Nova Scotia, as
Administrative Agent, PNC Bank, N.A., Sumitomo
Mitsui Banking Corporation, and TD Bank, N.A., as
Co-Syndication Agents, and Bank of China, New
York Branch, BNP Paribas, Santander Bank, N.A.,
and U.S. Bank, N.A., as Co-Documentation Agents
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to
registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on May
16, 2019, File No. 1-32853).X
10.51.1First Amendment to $1,000,000,000 Credit
Agreement, dated as of May 15, 2019, among Duke
Energy Corporation, the Lenders party therein, The
Bank of Nova Scotia, as Administrative Agent, PNC
Bank, N.A., Sumitomo Mitsui Banking Corporation,
and TD Bank, N.A., as Co-Syndication Agents, and
Bank of China, New York Branch, BNP Paribas,
Santander Bank, N.A., and U.S> Bank, N.A., as Co-
D ttiA t(i tdb f tX
Documentation Agents (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.3 to registrant's Quarterly Report on Form
10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2021, filed on
May 10, 2021, File No. 1-32853).
10.52 $1.5 billion 364-Day Term Loan Credit Agreement,
dated as of March 19, 2020, among the registrant,
as Borrower, certain Lenders from time to time
parties thereto, and PNC Bank, N.A., as
Administrative Agent, and registrant's borrowing of
the remaining $500 million under registrant's existing
$1 billion revolving credit facility on March 17, 2020
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
March 19, 2020, File No. 1-32853).X
10.52.1Joinder Agreement, dated as of March 27, 2020, by
and among, the registrant, each of the Incremental
Lenders listed therein, and PNC Bank, N.A., as
Administrative Agent (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.2.1 to registrant's Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2020,
filed on May 12, 2020, File No. 1-32853).X
10.53 Note Purchase Agreement, dated as of May 6, 2011,
among Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc. and
the Purchasers party thereto (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10 to registrant's Current Report
on Form 8-K filed on May 12, 2011, File No. 1-
06196).X
10.54 Amended and Restated Limited Liability Company
Agreement of Constitution Pipeline Company, LLC
dated April 9, 2012, by and among Williams Partners
Operating LLC and Cabot Pipeline Holdings LLC
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to
registrant's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended January 31, 2013, filed on March 6,
2013, File No. 1-06196).X
10.54.1First Amendment to Amended and Restated Limited
Liability Company Agreement of Constitution
Pipeline Company, LLC, dated as of November 9,
2012, by and among Constitution Pipeline Company,
LLC, Williams Partners Operating LLC, Cabot
Pipeline Holdings LLC, and Piedmont Constitution
Pipeline Company, LLC (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 10.2 to registrant's Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q for the quarter ended January 31, 2013,
filed on March 6, 2013, File No. 1-06196).X
10.54.2Second Amendment to Amended and Restated
Limited Liability Company Agreement of Constitution
Pipeline Company, LLC, dated as of May 29, 2013,
by and among Constitution Pipeline Company, LLC,
Williams Partners Operating LLC, Cabot Pipeline
Holdings LLC, Piedmont Constitution Pipeline
Company, LLC, and Capitol Energy Ventures Corp.
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 99.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
September 4, 2013, File No. 1-06196).X
10.55 Second Amended and Restated Limited Liability
Company Agreement of SouthStar Energy Services
LLC, dated as of September 1, 2013, by and
between Georgia Natural Gas Company and
Piedmont Energy Company (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.39 to registrant's Annual
Report on Form 10-K for the year ended October 31,
2013, filed on December 23, 2013, File No. 1-
06196).X
10.56 Limited Liability Company Agreement of Atlantic
Coast Pipeline, LLC, dated as of September 2,
2014, by and between Dominion Atlantic Coast
Pipeline, LLC, Duke Energy ACP, LLC, Piedmont
ACP Company, LLC, and Maple Enterprise
Holdings, Inc. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.35 to registrant's Annual Report on Form 10-K for
the year ended October 31, 2014, filed on
December 23, 2014, File No. 1-06196).X
10.57 Amended and Restated Limited Liability Company
Operating Agreement of Duke Energy Indiana
Holdco, LLC (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.1 to registrants' Current Report on Form 8-K filed
on September 8, 2021, File Nos. 1-32853, 1-03543).X X
10.58 Engineering, Procurement and Construction
Agreement between Duke Energy Business
Services, LLC, as agent for and on behalf of
Piedmont Natural Gas Company Inc. and Matrix
Service, Inc., dated as of April 30, 2019
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to
registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended June 30, 2019, filed on August 6,
2019, File No. 1-06196). (Portions of the exhibit
have been omitted for confidentiality.)X
10.59 Decommissioning Services Agreement between
Duke Energy Florida, LLC, and ADP CR3, LLC, and
ADP SF1, LLC (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.3 to registrant's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q
for the quarter ended June 30, 2019, filed on August
6, 2019, File No. 2-5293). (Portions of the exhibit
have been omitted for confidentiality.)X
10.60 Form of Forward Sale Agreement (incorporated by
referencetoExhibit10.1toregistrant'sCurrentX
reference to Exhibit 10.1 to registrants Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on November 8, 2019, File
No. 1-32853).
10.61 Lease Agreement dated as of December 23, 2019,
between the registrant and CGA 525 South Tryon
TIC 1, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company,
CGA 525 South Tryon TIC 2, LLC, a Delaware
limited liability company, and CK 525 South Tryon
TIC, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.64 to
registrant's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2019, filed on February 20,
2020, File No. 1-4928).X
10.62 Construction Agency Agreement dated as of
December 23, 2019, between the registrant and
CGA 525 South Tryon TIC 1, LLC, a Delaware
limited liability company, CGA 525 South Tryon TIC
2, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company, and CK
525 South Tryon TIC, LLC, a Delaware limited
liability company (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.65 to registrant's Annual Report on Form
10-K for the year ended December 31, 2019, filed
on February 20, 2020, File No. 1-4928).X
*21 List of Subsidiaries X  
*23.1.1Consent of Independent Registered Public
Accounting Firm.X  
*23.1.2Consent of Independent Registered Public
Accounting Firm. X  
*23.1.3Consent of Independent Registered Public
Accounting Firm.  X  
*23.1.4Consent of Independent Registered Public
Accounting Firm.   X  
*23.1.5Consent of Independent Registered Public
Accounting Firm.   X  
*23.1.6Consent of Independent Registered Public
Accounting Firm.   X
*23.1.7Consent of Independent Registered Public
Accounting Firm.X
*24.1 Power of attorney authorizing Lynn J. Good and
others to sign the Annual Report on behalf of the
registrant and certain of its directors and officers.X
*24.2 Certified copy of resolution of the Board of Directors
of the registrant authorizing power of attorney.X
*31.1.1Certification of the Chief Executive Officer Pursuant
to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*31.1.2Certification of the Chief Executive Officer Pursuant
to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*31.1.3Certification of the Chief Executive Officer Pursuant
to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*31.1.4Certification of the Chief Executive Officer Pursuant
to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*31.1.5Certification of the Chief Executive Officer Pursuant
to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*31.1.6Certification of the Chief Executive Officer Pursuant
to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*31.1.7Certification of the Chief Executive Officer Pursuant
to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*31.1.8Certification of the Chief Executive Officer Pursuant
to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*31.2.1Certification of the Chief Financial Officer Pursuant
to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*31.2.2Certification of the Chief Financial Officer Pursuant
to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*31.2.3Certification of the Chief Financial Officer Pursuant
to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*31.2.4Certification of the Chief Financial Officer Pursuant
to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*31.2.5Certification of the Chief Financial Officer Pursuant
to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*31.2.6Certification of the Chief Financial Officer Pursuant
to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*31.2.7Certification of the Chief Financial Officer Pursuant
to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*31.2.8Certification of the Chief Financial Officer Pursuant
to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*32.1.1Certification Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as
Adopted Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-
Oxley Act of 2002.X
*32.1.2Certification Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as
Adopted Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-
Oxley Act of 2002.X
*32.1.3Certification Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as
Adopted Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-
Oxley Act of 2002.X
*32.1.4Certification Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as
Adopted Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-
Oxley Act of 2002.X
*32.1.5Certification Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as
Adopted Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-
OlAtf2002X
Oxley Act of 2002.
*32.1.6Certification Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as
Adopted Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-
Oxley Act of 2002.X
*32.1.7Certification Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as
Adopted Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-
Oxley Act of 2002.X
*32.1.8Certification Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as
Adopted Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-
Oxley Act of 2002.X
*32.2.1Certification Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as
Adopted Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-
Oxley Act of 2002.X
*32.2.2Certification Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as
Adopted Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-
Oxley Act of 2002.X
*32.2.3Certification Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as
Adopted Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-
Oxley Act of 2002.X
*32.2.4Certification Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as
Adopted Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-
Oxley Act of 2002.X
*32.2.5Certification Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as
Adopted Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-
Oxley Act of 2002.X
*32.2.6Certification Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as
Adopted Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-
Oxley Act of 2002.X
*32.2.7Certification Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as
Adopted Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-
Oxley Act of 2002.X
*32.2.8Certification Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as
Adopted Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-
Oxley Act of 2002.X
*101.INSXBRL Instance Document (this does not appear in
the Interactive Data File because it's XBRL tags are
embedded within the Inline XBRL document).X X X X X X X X
*101.SCHXBRL Taxonomy Extension Schema Document X X X X X X X X
*101.CALXBRL Taxonomy Calculation Linkbase Document X X X X X X X X
*101.LABXBRL Taxonomy Label Linkbase Document X X X X X X X X
*101.PREXBRL Taxonomy Presentation Linkbase Document X X X X X X X X
*101.DEFXBRL Taxonomy Definition Linkbase Document X X X X X X X X
*104 Cover Page Interactive Data File (formatted in Inline
XBRL and contained in Exhibit 101).X X X X X X X X
The total amount of securities of each respective registrant or its subsidiaries authorized under any instrument with respect to long-term debt not filed
as an exhibit does not exceed 10% of the total assets of such registrant and its subsidiaries on a consolidated basis. Each registrant agrees, upon
request of the SEC, to furnish copies of any or all of such instruments to it.
E-1
SIGNATURES
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrants have duly caused this report to
be signed on their behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Date: February 24, 2022
DUKE ENERGY
CORPORATION
(Registrant)
By: /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
Lynn J. Good
Chair, President and Chief Executive Officer
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
(i) /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
 Lynn J. Good
 Chair, President and Chief Executive Officer (Principal Executive Officer and Director)
  
(ii) /s/ STEVEN K. YOUNG
 Steven K. Young
 Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer (Principal Financial Officer)
  
(iii) /s/ CYNTHIA S. LEE
 Cynthia S. Lee
 Vice President, Chief Accounting Officer and Controller (Principal Accounting Officer)
   
(iv) Directors:  
 Michael G. Browning* Lynn J. Good*
Annette K. Clayton* John T. Herron*
 Theodore F. Craver, Jr.* Idalene F. Kesner*
 Robert M. Davis* E. Marie McKee*
 Caroline D. Dorsa* Michael J. Pacilio*
W. Roy Dunbar* Thomas E. Skains*
 Nicholas C. Fanandakis* William E. Webster, Jr.*
 
Steven K. Young, by signing his name hereto, does hereby sign this document on behalf of the registrant and on behalf of each of the above-named
persons previously indicated by asterisk (*) pursuant to a power of attorney duly executed by the registrant and such persons, filed with the Securities
and Exchange Commission as an exhibit hereto.
   
 By: /s/ STEVEN K. YOUNG
 Attorney-In-Fact
    
 Date: February 24, 2022
E-2
SIGNATURES
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be
signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Date: February 24, 2022
DUKE ENERGY CAROLINAS,
LLC
(Registrant)
By: /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
Lynn J. Good
Chief Executive Officer
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
   
(i) /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
 Lynn J. Good
 Chief Executive Officer (Principal Executive Officer)
   
(ii) /s/ STEVEN K. YOUNG
 Steven K. Young
 Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer (Principal Financial Officer)
   
(iii) /s/ CYNTHIA S. LEE
 Cynthia S. Lee
 Vice President, Chief Accounting Officer and Controller (Principal Accounting Officer)
   
(iv) Directors:  
   
 /s/ LYNN J. GOOD  
 Lynn J. Good  
   
 /s/ DHIAA M. JAMIL  
 Dhiaa M. Jamil  
   
 /s/ JULIA S. JANSON  
 Julia S. Janson  
Date: February 24, 2022
E-3
SIGNATURES
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be
signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Date: February 24, 2022
PROGRESS ENERGY, INC.
(Registrant)
By: /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
Lynn J. Good
Chief Executive Officer
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
   
(i) /s/ LYNN J. GOOD  
 Lynn J. Good  
 Chief Executive Officer (Principal Executive Officer)
   
(ii) /s/ STEVEN K. YOUNG
 Steven K. Young
 Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer (Principal Financial Officer)
 
(iii)/s/ CYNTHIA S. LEE
 Cynthia S. Lee
 Vice President, Chief Accounting Officer and Controller (Principal Accounting Officer)
   
(iv)Directors:  
   
 /s/ KODWO GHARTEY-TAGOE 
 Kodwo Ghartey-Tagoe  
   
 /s/ LYNN J. GOOD  
 Lynn J. Good  
Date: February 24, 2022
E-4
SIGNATURES
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be
signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Date: February 24, 2022
DUKE ENERGY PROGRESS,
LLC
(Registrant)
By: /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
Lynn J. Good
Chief Executive Officer
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
(i) /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
 Lynn J. Good
 Chief Executive Officer (Principal Executive Officer)
  
(ii) /s/ STEVEN K. YOUNG
 Steven K. Young
 Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer (Principal Financial Officer)
 
(iii)/s/ CYNTHIA S. LEE
 Cynthia S. Lee
 Vice President, Chief Accounting Officer and Controller (Principal Accounting Officer)
  
(iv)Directors:
  
 /s/ KODWO GHARTEY-TAGOE
 Kodwo Ghartey-Tagoe
  
/s/ R. ALEXANDER GLENN
R. Alexander Glenn
 /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
 Lynn J. Good
  
 /s/ DHIAA M. JAMIL
 Dhiaa M. Jamil
  
 /s/ JULIA S. JANSON
 Julia S. Janson
Date: February 24, 2022
E-5
SIGNATURES
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be
signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Date: February 24, 2022
DUKE ENERGY FLORIDA,
LLC
(Registrant)
By: /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
Lynn J. Good
Chief Executive Officer
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
   
(i) /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
 Lynn J. Good
 Chief Executive Officer (Principal Executive Officer)
   
(ii) /s/ STEVEN K. YOUNG
 Steven K. Young
 Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer (Principal Financial Officer)
   
(iii)/s/ CYNTHIA S. LEE
 Cynthia S. Lee
 Vice President, Chief Accounting Officer and Controller (Principal Accounting Officer)
   
(iv)Directors:  
 /s/ KODWO GHARTEY-TAGOE 
 Kodwo Ghartey-Tagoe  
   
/s/ R. ALEXANDER GLENN
R. Alexander Glenn
 /s/ LYNN J. GOOD  
Lynn J. Good
   
 /s/ DHIAA M. JAMIL  
Dhiaa M. Jamil
   
 /s/ JULIA S. JANSON  
 Julia S. Janson  
Date: February 24, 2022
E-6
SIGNATURES
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be
signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Date: February 24, 2022
DUKE ENERGY OHIO, INC.
(Registrant)
By: /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
Lynn J. Good
Chief Executive Officer
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
   
(i) /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
 Lynn J. Good
 Chief Executive Officer (Principal Executive Officer)
 
(ii) /s/ STEVEN K. YOUNG
 Steven K. Young
 Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer (Principal Financial Officer)
 
(iii)/s/ CYNTHIA S. LEE
 Cynthia S. Lee
 Vice President, Chief Accounting Officer and Controller (Principal Accounting Officer)
   
(iv)Directors:  
/s/ R. ALEXANDER GLENN
R. Alexander Glenn
   
 /s/ LYNN J. GOOD  
 Lynn J. Good  
   
 /s/ DHIAA M. JAMIL  
 Dhiaa M. Jamil  
Date: February 24, 2022
E-7
SIGNATURES
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be
signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Date: February 24, 2022
DUKE ENERGY INDIANA,
LLC
(Registrant)
By: /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
Lynn J. Good
Chief Executive Officer
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
   
(i) /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
 Lynn J. Good
 Chief Executive Officer (Principal Executive Officer)
 
(ii) /s/ STEVEN K. YOUNG
 Steven K. Young
 Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer (Principal Financial Officer)
 
(iii) /s/ CYNTHIA S. LEE
 Cynthia S. Lee
 Vice President, Chief Accounting Officer and Controller (Principal Accounting Officer)
   
(iv) Directors:  
   
 /s/ R. ALEXANDER GLENN
R. Alexander Glenn
   
 /s/ KELLEY A. KARN
Kelley A. Karn
/s/ STAN PINEGAR
Stan Pinegar
Date: February 24, 2022
E-8
SIGNATURES
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be
signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Date: February 24, 2022
PIEDMONT NATURAL GAS
COMPANY, INC.
(Registrant)
By: /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
Lynn J. Good
Chief Executive Officer
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
   
(i) /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
 Lynn J. Good
 Chief Executive Officer (Principal Executive Officer)
 
(ii) /s/ STEVEN K. YOUNG
 Steven K. Young
 Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer (Principal Financial Officer)
 
(iii) /s/ CYNTHIA S. LEE
 Cynthia S. Lee
 Vice President, Chief Accounting Officer and Controller (Principal Accounting Officer)
   
(iv) Directors:  
 /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
Lynn J. Good
/s/ DHIAA M. JAMIL
Dhiaa M. Jamil
/s/ BRIAN D. SAVOY
Brian D. Savoy
Date: February 24, 2022
E-9
